eared their craft Tom saw several large, shaggy black
objects standing in a line on the path the adventurers had come over
a little while before. The objects were between the gold-seekers and
the RED CLOUD.

"What in the world are those?" asked the young inventor.

"Look to me like black stones," spoke Ned.

"Stones?" cried Abe. "Look out, boys, those are musk oxen; and big
ones, too! There's a lot of 'em! Make for the ship! If they attack
us we're goners!"

The boys and Mr. Parker needed no second warning. Turning so as to
rush past the shaggy creatures, the four headed toward the ship.

But if our friends expected to reach it unmolested they were
disappointed. No sooner had they increased their pace than the oxen,
with snorts of rage, darted forward. The animals may have imagined
they were about to be attacked, and determined to make the first
move.

"Here they come!" yelled Ned.

"Sprint for it!" cried Tom.

"Oh, if I only had my gun!" groaned Abe.

It was hard work running over the ice and snow, hampered as they
were with their heavy fur garments. They soon realized this, and the
pace was telling on them. They were now near to the ship, but the
savage creatures still were between them and the craft.

"Try around the other way!" directed Tom, They changed their
direction, but the oxen also shifted their ground, and with loud
bellows of rage came on, shaking their shaggy heads and big horns,
while the hair, hanging down from their sides and flanks, dragged in
the snow.

"Right at 'em! Run and yell!" advised the young inventor. "Maybe we
can scare 'em!"

They followed his advice. Yelling like Indians the four rushed
straight for the animals. For a moment only the creatures halted.
Then, bellowing louder than ever they rushed straight at Tom and the
others.

The largest of the oxen, with a sudden swerve, made for Mr. Parker,
who was slightly in the lead off to one side. In an instant the
scientist was tossed high in the air, falling in a snow bank.

"Mr. Damon! Mr. Damon!" yelled Tom, frantically. "Get a gun and
shoot these beasts!"

The young inventor and his two companions had come to a halt. The
oxen also stopped momentarily. Suddenly Mr. Damon appeared on the
deck of the airship. He held two rifles. Laying one down he aimed
the other at the ox which was rushing at the prostrate Mr. Parker.
The eccentric man fired. He hit the beast on the flank, and, with a
bellow of rage it turned.

"Now's our time!" yelled Tom. "Head for the ship, I'll get my
electric gun!"

"We can't leave Mr. Parker!" yelled Abe.

But the scientist had arisen, and was running toward the RED CLOUD.
He did not seem to be much hurt. Mr. Damon fired again, hitting
another beast, but not mortally.

Once more the herd of shaggy creatures came on, but the adventurers
were now almost at the ship, on the deck of which stood Mr. Damon,
firing as fast as he could work the lever and pull the trigger.




CHAPTER XIX

THE CAVES OF ICE


"Keep on firing! Hold 'em back a few minutes and I'll soon turn my
electric rifle loose on 'em!" yelled Tom Swift as he sprinted
forward. "Keep on shooting, Mr. Damon!"

"Bless my powder-horn! I will!" cried the excited man. "I'll fire
all the cartridges there are in the rifle!"

Which, at the rate he was discharging the weapon, would not take a
long time. But it had the effect of momentarily checking the advance
of the creatures.

Not for long, however. Our friends had barely reached the airship,
with Mr. Parker stumbling and slipping on the ice and snow, ere the
musk oxen came on again, with loud bellows.

"They're going to charge the ship! They'll ram her!" yelled Ned
Newton.

"I think I can stop them!" cried Tom, who had leaped toward his
stateroom. He came out a moment later, carrying a peculiar-looking
gun, The adventurers had seen it before, but never in operation, as
Tom had only put some finishing touches on it since undertaking the
voyage to the caves of ice.

"What sort of a weapon is that?" cried Abe, as he helped Mr. Parker
on board.

"It's my new electric rifle," answered the young inventor. "I don't
know how it will work, as it isn't entirely finished, but I'm going
to try it."

Putting it to his shoulder he aimed at the leading musk ox, and
pulled a small lever. There was no report, no puff of smoke and no
fire, yet the big creature, which had been rushing at the ship,
suddenly stopped, swayed for a moment, and then fell over in the
snow, kicking in his death agony.

"One down!" yelled Tom. "My rifle works all right, even if it isn't
finished!"

He aimed at another ox, and that creature was stopped in its tracks.
Mr. Damon had exhausted his cartridges, and had ceased firing, but
Abe Abercrombie was ready with his rifle, and opened up on the
beasts. Tom killed another with his electric gun, and Abe shot two.
This stopped the advance, and only just in time, for the foremost
animals were already close to the ship, and had they rushed at the
frail hull they might have damaged it beyond repair.

"Here goes for the big one!" cried Tom, and, aiming at the largest
ox of the herd, the young inventor pulled the lever. The brute fell
over dead, and the rest, terror stricken, turned and fled.

"Hurrah! That's the stuff!" cried Ned Newton, capering about on
deck. He had hurried to his stateroom and secured his rifle, and,
before the musk oxen were out of sight he had killed one, which gave
him great delight.

"Mighty lucky we drove them away," declared Abe. "They are terrible
savage at times, an' I reckon we struck one of them times. But say,
Tom, what sort of a gun is that you got, anyhow?"

"Oh, it fires electric bullets," explained our hero. "But I haven't
time to tell you about it now. Let's get out and skin one of those
oxen. The fresh meat will come in good, for we've been living on
canned stuff since we left Seattle. We've got time enough before it
gets dark."

They hurried to where the shaggy creatures lay in the snow, and soon
there was enough fresh meat to last a long time, as it would keep
well in the intense cold. Tom put away his electric gun, briefly
explaining the system of it to his companions. The time was to come,
and that not very far off, when that same electric rifle was to save
his life in a remarkable manner, in the wilds of Africa where he
went to hunt elephants.

In the cozy cabin that night they sat and talked of the day's
adventures. The airship had been slightly lifted up by means of the
gas bag, and now rested on a level keel, so it was more comfortable
for the gold hunters.

"I did not complete my observations about the great snow slide,"
remarked Professor Parker, "I trust I will have time to go over the
ground again to-morrow."

"We leave early in the morning," objected Tom.

"Besides, I don't believe it would be safe to go over that ground
again," put in Mr. Damon.

"Bless my gunpowder! But when I saw those savage creatures rushing
at you, I thought it was all up with us. Are you hurt, Parker, my
dear fellow? I forgot to ask before."

"Not hurt in the least," answered the scientist. "My heavy and thick
fur garments saved me from the beasts' horns, and I fell in some
soft snow. I was quite startled for a moment. I thought it might be
the beginning of the snow movement."

"It was an ox movement," said Ned, in a low voice to Tom.

Morning saw the travelers again under way, with the Red Cloud now
floating high enough to avoid the lofty peaks. The weather was clear
but very cold, and Tom, who was in the pilot-house, could see a long
distance ahead, and note many towering crags, which, had the airship
been flying low enough, would have interfered with her progress.

"We'll have to keep the searchlight going all night, to avoid a
collision," he decided.

"Are we anywhere near the place?" asked Mr. Damon.

"We're in th' right region," declared the old miner. "I think we're
on th' right track. I recognize a few more landmarks."

"There wouldn't have been any trouble if I hadn't lost the map."
complained Tom, bitterly.

"Never mind about that," insisted Abe. "We'll find th' place anyhow.
But look ahead there; is that another hail storm headin' this way,
Tom?"

The young inventor glanced to where Abe pointed. There was a mist in
the air, and, for a time great apprehension was felt, but, in a few
minutes there was a violent flurry of snow and they all breathed
easier. For, though the flakes were so numerous as to completely
shut off the view, there was no danger to the airship from them. Tom
steered by the compass.

The storm lasted several hours, and when it was over the adventurers
found themselves several miles nearer their destination--at least
they hoped they were nearer it, for they were going it blind.

Abe declared they were now in the region of the gold valley. They
cruised about for two days, making vain observations by means of
powerful telescopes, but they saw no signs of any depression which
corresponded with the place whence Abe had seen the gold taken from.
At times they passed over Indian villages, and had glimpses of the
skin-clad inhabitants rushing out to point to the strange sight of
the airship overhead. Tom was beginning to reproach himself again
for his carelessness in losing the map, and it did begin to took as
if they were making a fruitless search.

Still they all kept up their good spirits, and Mr. Damon concocted
some new dishes from the meat of the musk oxen. It was about a week
after the fight with the savage creatures when, one day, as Ned was
on duty in the pilothouse, he happened to lock down. What he saw
caused him to call to Tom.

"What's the matter?" demanded the young inventor, as he hurried
forward.

"Look down there," directed Ned. "It looks as if we were sailing
over a lot of immense beehives of the old-fashioned kind."

Tom looked. Below were countless, rounded hummocks of snow or ice.
Some were very large--as immense as a great shed in which a
dirigible balloon could be housed--while others were as small as the
ice huts in which the Eskimos live.

"That's rather strange," remarked Tom. "I wonder--"

But he did not complete his sentence, for Abe Abercrombie, who had
come to stand beside him, suddenly yelled out:

"The caves of ice! The caves of ice! Now I know where we are! We're
close to the valley of gold! There are the caves of ice, and just
beyond is th' place we're lookin' for! We've found it at last!"




CHAPTER XX

IN THE GOLD VALLEY


The excited cries of the old miner brought Mr. Damon and Mr. Parker
to the pilothouse on the run.

"Bless my refrigerator!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "Are there more of
those savage, shaggy creatures down there?"

"No, but we are over th' caves of ice," explained Abe. "That means
we are near th' gold."

"You don't say so!" burst out the scientist. "The caves of ice! Now
I can begin my real observations! I have a theory that the caves are
on top of a strata of ice that is slowly moving down, and will
eventually bury the whole of the North American continent. Let me
once get down there, and I can prove what I say."

"I'd a good deal rather you wouldn't prove it, if it's going to be
anything like it was on Earthquake Island, or out among the diamond
makers." said Tom Swift. "But we will go down there, to see what
they are like. Perhaps there is a trail from among the ice caves to
the valley of gold."

"I don't think so," said Abe, shaking his head.

"I think th' gold valley lies over that high ridge," and he pointed
to one. "That's where me an' my partner was," he went on. "I
recognize th' place now."

"Well, we'll go down here, anyhow," decided Tom, and he pulled the
lever to let some gas out of the bag, and tilted the deflection
rudder to send the airship toward the odd caves.

And, curious enough did our friends find them when they had made a
landing and got out to walk about them. It was very cold, for on
every side was solid ice. They walked on ice, which was like a floor
beneath their feet, level save where the ice caves reared
themselves. As for the caverns, they, too, were hollowed out of the
solid ice. It was exactly as though there had once been a level
surface of some liquid. Then by some upheaval of nature, the surface
was blown into bubbles, some large and some small. Then the whole
thing had frozen solid, and the bubbles became hollow caves. In time
part of the sides fell in and made an opening, so that nearly all
the caves were capable of being entered.

This method of their formation was advanced as a theory by Mr.
Parker, and no one cared to dispute him. The gold-seekers walked
about, gazing on the ice caves with wonder showing on their faces.

It was almost like being in some fantastic scene from fairyland, the
big ice bubbles representing the houses, the roofs being rounded
like the igloos of the Eskimos. Some had no means of entrance, the
outer surface showing no break. Others had small openings, like a
little doorway, while of still others there remained but a small
part of the original cave, some force of nature having crumbled and
crushed it.

"Wonderful! Wonderful!" exclaimed Mr. Parker. "It bears out my
theory exactly! Now to see how fast the ice is moving."

"How are you going to tell?" asked Tom.

"By taking some mark on this field of ice, and observing a distant
peak. Then I will set up a stake, and by noting their relative
positions, I can tell just how fast the ice field is moving
southward." The scientist hurried into the ship to get a sharpened
stake he had prepared for this purpose.

"How fast do you think the ice is moving?" asked Ned.

"Oh, perhaps two or three feet a year." "Two or three feet a year?"
gasped Mr. Damon. "Why, Parker, my dear fellow, at that rate it will
be some time before the ice gets to New York."

"Oh, yes. I hardly expect it will reach there within two thousand
years, but my theory will be proved, just the same!"

"Humph!" exclaimed Abe Abercrombie, "I ain't goin' to worry any
more, if it's goin' t' take all that while. I reckoned, to hear him
talk, that it was goin' t' happen next summer."

"So did I," agreed Tom, but their remarks were lost on Mr. Parker
who was busy making observations. The young inventor and the others
walked about among the ice caves.

"Some of these caverns would be big enough to house the RED CLOUD in
case of another hail storm," observed Tom. "That one over there
would hold two craft the size of mine," and, in fact, probably three
could have gotten in if the opening had been somewhat enlarged, for
the ice cave to which our hero pointed was an immense one.

As the adventurers were walking about they were startled by a
terrific crashing sound. They started in alarm, for, off to their
left, the top of one of the ice caverns had crashed inward, the
blocks of frozen water crushing and grinding against one another.

"It's a good thing we weren't in there," remarked Tom, and he could
not repress a shudder, "There wouldn't have been much left of the
RED CLOUD if she had been inside."

It was a desolate place, in spite of the wild beauty of it, and
beautiful it was when the sun shone on the ice caves, making them
sparkle as if they were studded with diamonds. But it was cold and
cheerless, and there were no signs that human beings had ever been
there. Mr. Parker had completed the setting of his stake, and picked
out his landmarks, and was gravely making his "observations," and
jotting down some figures in a notebook.

"How fast is it moving, Parker?" called Mr. Damon.

"I can't tell yet," was the response. "It will require observations
extending over several days before I will know the rate."

"Then we might as well go on," suggested Tom. "There is nothing to
be gained from staying here, and I would like to get to the gold
valley. Abe says we are near it."

"Right over that ridge, I take it to be," replied the miner. "An' we
can't get there any too soon for me. Those Fogers may git their ship
fixed up, an' arrive before we do if we wait much longer."

"Not much danger, I guess," declared Ned.

"Well, we'll go up in the air, and see what we can find," decided
Tom, as he turned back toward the ship.

They found the "ridge" as Abe designated it. to be a great plateau,
over a hundred miles in extent, and they were the better part of
that day crossing it, for they went slowly, so as not to miss the
valley which the miner was positive was close at hand. Mr. Parker
disliked leaving the ice caves, but Abe said there were more in the
valley where they were going, and the scientist could renew his
observations.

It was getting dusk when Tom, who was peering through a powerful
glass, called out:

"Well, we're at the end of the plateau, and it seems to dip down
into a valley just beyond here."

"Then that's the place!" cried Abe, excitedly. "Go slow, Tom."

Our hero needed no such caution. Carefully he sent the airship
forward. A few minutes later they were passing over a large Eskimo
village, the fur-clad inhabitants of which rushed about wildly
excited at the sight of the airship.

"There they are! Them's th' beggars!" cried the old miner. "Them's
th' fellows who drove me an' my partner away. But there's th' valley
of gold! I know it now! How t' fill our pockets with nuggets!"

"Are you sure this is the place?" asked Mr. Damon.

"Sartin sure of it!" declared Abe. "Put her down, Tom! Put her
down!"

"All right," agreed the young inventor, as he shifted the deflection
rudder. The airship began her descent into the valley. The edge of
the plateau, leading down into the great depression was now black
with the Eskimos and Indians, who were capering about, gesticulating
wildly.

"It's quite a surprise party to 'em," observed Ned Newton.

"Yes, I hope they don't spring one on us," added Tom.

Down and down went the RED CLOUD lower and lower into the valley.

"There are ice caves there!" cried Mr. Parker, pointing to the
curiously rounded and hollow hummocks. "Lots of them!"

"And larger than the others!" added Mr. Damon.

The airship was now moving slowly, for Tom wanted to pick out a good
landing place. He saw a smooth stretch of the ice just ahead of him,
in front of an immense ice cave.

"I'll make for that," he told Ned.

A few minutes later the craft had come to rest. Tom shut off the
power and hurried from the pilothouse, donning his fur coat as he
rushed out. A blast of frigid air met him as he opened the outer
door of the cabin. Back on the ridge of the plateau he could see the
fringe of Indians.

"Well, we're here in the valley," he said, as his friends gathered
about him on the icy ground.

"An' now for th' gold!" cried Abe, "for it's here that th' nuggets
are--enough for all of us! Come on an' have a hunt for 'em!"




CHAPTER XXI

THE FOGERS ARRIVE


In Spite of the fact that he tried to remain calm, Tom Swift felt a
wild exultation as he thought of what lay before him and his
friends. To be in a place where gold could be picked up! where they
might all become fabulously wealthy! where the ground might be seen
covered with the precious yellow metal! this was enough to set the
nerves of any one a-tingle!

Tom could hardly realize it at first. After many hardships, no
little danger, and after an attempt on the part of their enemies to
defeat them, they had at last reached their goal. Now, as Abe had
said, they could hunt for the gold.

But if they expected to see the precious yellow nuggets lying about
ready to be picked up like so many kernels of corn, they were
disappointed. A quick look all about showed them only a vast extent
of ice and snow, broken here and there by the big caves of ice.
There were not so many of the latter as at the first place they
stopped, but the caverns were larger.

"Gold--I don't see any gold," remarked Ned Newton, with a
disappointed air. "Where is it?"

"Bless my pocketbook, yes! Where is it?" demanded Mr. Damon.

"Oh, we've got to dig for it," explained Abe. "It's only when
there's been a slight thaw that some of th' pebble nuggets kin be
seen. They're under th' ice, an' we've got t' dig for 'em."

"Does it ever thaw up here?" asked Mr. Parker. "The ice of the caves
seems thick enough to last forever."

"It does thaw an' melt some," went on the miner. "But some of th'
caves last all through what they call 'summer' up here, though it's
more like winter. We're above th' Arctic circle now, friends."

"Maybe we can keep on to the Pole," suggested Ned.

"Not this trip," spoke Tom, grimly. "We'll try for the gold, first."

"Yes, an' I'm goin' t' begin diggin' right away!" exclaimed Abe, as
he turned back into the airship, and came out again with a pick and
shovel, a supply of which implements had been brought along. The
others followed his example. and soon the ice chips were flying
about in a shower, while the sun shining on them gave the appearance
of a rainbow.

"Look at those Indians watching us," remarked Ned to Tom, as he
paused in his chipping of the frozen surface. The young inventor
glanced up toward the distant plateau where a fringe of dark figures
stood. The natives were evidently intently watching the gold-
seekers.

"Do you think there's any danger from them. Abe?" asked Tom.

"Not much," was the reply. "They made trouble for me an' my partner,
but I guess th' airship has scared 'em sufficient, so they won't
come snoopin' down here," and Abe fell to at his digging again.

Mr. Damon was also vigorously wielding a pick, but Mr. Parker like
the true scientist he was, had renewed his observations. Evidently
the gold had no attractions for him, or, if it did, he preferred to
wait until he had finished his calculations.

Vigorously the adventurers wielded their implements, making the ice
fly, but for an hour or more no gold was discovered. Mr. Damon,
after picking lightly at a certain place, would get discouraged, and
move on to another. So did Ned, and Tom, after going down quite a
way, left off work, and walked over to one of the big ice caves.

"What's up?" asked Ned, resting from his labors.

"I was thinking whether it would be safe to put the RED CLOUD in
this ice cave for a shelter," replied Tom. "There may come up a hail
storm at any time, and damage it. The caves would be just the place
for it, only I'm afraid the roof might collapse."

"It looks strong," said Ned. "Let's ask Mr. Parker his opinion."

"Good idea," agreed Tom.

The scientist was soon taking measurements of the thickness of the
cave roof, noting its formation, and looking at the frozen floor.

"I see no reason why this cave should collapse," he finally
announced. "The only danger is the movement of the whole valley of
ice, and that is too gradual to cause any immediate harm. Yes, I
think the airship could be housed in the ice cave."

"Then I'll run her in, and she'll be safer," decided Tom. "I guess
we three can do it, Ned, and leave Mr. Damon and Abe to keep on
digging for gold." The airship was so buoyant that it could easily
be moved about on the bicycle wheels on which it rested, and soon,
after the lower edge of the opening into the ice cave had been
smoothed down, the RED CLOUD was placed in the novel shelter.

"Now to continue the search for the yellow nuggets!" cried Ned, and
Tom went with him, even Mr. Parker condescending to take a pick,
now. Abe was the only one who dug steadily in one place. The others
tried spot after spot.

"You've got t' stick t' one lead until you find somethin', or until
it peters out," explained the miner. "You must git down to th' dirt
before you'll find any gold, though you may strike a few grains that
have worked up into th' ice."

After this advice they all kept to one hole until they had worked
down through the ice to the dirt surface below. But even then, Abe,
who was the first to achieve this, found no gold, and the old miner
went to another location.

All the rest of that day they dug, but with no result. Not even a
few grains of yellow dust rewarded their efforts.

"Are you sure this is the right place?" asked Mr. Damon, somewhat
fretfully, of Abe. as they ate supper that night in the airship,
sheltered as it was in the ice cave.

"I'm positive of it," was the reply. "There's gold here, but it will
take some prospectin' t' find it. Maybe th' deposits have been
shifted by th' ice movement, as Mr. Parker says. But it's here, an'
we'll git it. We'll try ag'in t'-morrow."

They did try, but with small success. Laboring all day in the cold
the only result was a few little yellow pebbles that Tom found
imbedded in the ice. But they were gold, and the finding of them
gave the seekers hope as they wearily began their task the following
day. The weather seemed even colder, and there was the indication of
a big storm.

They were scattered in different places on the ice, not far away
from the big cave, each one picking away vigorously. Suddenly Abe,
who had laboriously worked his way down to the dirt, gave an
exultant yell.

"I've struck it! Struck it rich!" he shouted, leaping about as he
threw down his pick, "Look here, everybody!" He stooped down over
the hole. They all ran to his side, and saw him lifting from a
little pocket in the dirt, several large, yellow pebbles.

"Gold! Gold!" cried Abe. "We've struck it at last!"

For a moment no one spoke, though there was a wild beating of their
hearts. Then, off toward the farther end of the valley there sounded
a curious noise. It was a shouting and yelling, mingled with the
snapping of whips and the howls and barkings of dogs.

"Bless my handkerchief!" cried Mr. Damon. "What's that?"

They all saw a moment later. Approaching over the frozen snow were
several Eskimo sledges, drawn by dog teams, and the native drivers
were shouting and cracking their whips of walrus hide.

"The natives are coming to attack us!" cried Ned.

Tom said nothing. He was steadily observing the approaching sleds.
They came on rapidly. Abe was holding the golden nuggets in his
gloved hands.

"Get the guns! Where's your electric rifle, Tom?" cried Mr. Damon.

"I don't believe we'll need the guns--just yet," answered the young
inventor, slowly.

"Bless my cartridge-belt! Why not?" demanded the eccentric man.

"Because those are the Fogers," replied Tom. "They have followed us-
-Andy and his father! Andy Foger here!" gasped Ned.

Tom nodded grimly. A few minutes later the sleds had come to a halt
not far from our friends, and Andy, followed by his father, leaped
off his conveyance. The two were clad in heavy fur garments.

"Ha, Tom Swift! You didn't get here much ahead of us!" exulted the
bully. "I told you I'd get even with you! Come on, now, dad, we'll
get right to work digging for gold!"

Tom and his companions did not know what to say.




CHAPTER XXII

JUMPING THE CLAIM


There was a sneering look on Andy's face, and Mr. Foger, too, seemed
delighted at having reached the valley of gold almost as soon as had
our friends. Tom and the others looked at the means by which the
bully had arrived. There were four sleds, each one drawn by seven
dogs, and in charge of a dark-skinned native. On the two foremost
sleds Andy and his father had ridden, while the other two evidently
contained their supplies.

For a moment Andy surveyed Tom's party and then, turning to one of
the native drivers, he said:

"We'll camp here. You fellows get to work and make an ice house, and
some of you cook a meal--I'm hungry."

"No need build ice house," replied the native, who spoke English
brokenly.

"Why not?" demanded Andy.

"Live in ice cave-plenty much ob'em--plenty much room," went on the
Eskimo, indicating several of the large caverns.

"Ha! That's a good idea," agreed Mr. Foger, "Andy, my son, we have
houses already made for us, and very comfortable they seem, too.
We'll take up our quarters in one, and then hunt for the gold."

Mr. Foger seemed to ignore Tom and his friends. Abe Abercrombie
strode forward.

"Look here, you Fogers!" he exclaimed without ceremony, "was you
calculatin' on stakin' any claims here?"

"If you mean are we going to dig for gold, we certainly are,"
replied Andy insolently, "and you can't stop us."

"I don't know about that," went on Abe, grimly. "I ain't goin' t'
say nothin' now, about th' way you stole th' map from me, an' made a
copy, but I am goin t' say this, an' that is it won't be healthy fer
any of you t' git in my way, or t' try t' dig on our claims!"

"We'll dig where we please!" cried Andy. "You don't own this
valley!"

"We own as much of it as we care to stake out, by right of prior
discovery!" declared Tom, firmly.

"And I say we'll dig where we please!" insisted Andy. "Hand me a
pick," he went on to another of the natives.

"Wait jest a minute," spoke Abe calmly, as he put his little store
of nuggets in the pocket of his fur coat, and drew out a big
revolver. "It ain't healthy t' talk that way, Andy Foger, an' th'
sooner you find that out th' better. You ain't in Shopton now, an'
th' only law here is what we make for ourselves. Tom, maybe you'd
better get out th' rifles, an' your electric gun, after all. It
seems like we might have trouble," and Abe cooly looked to see if
his weapon was loaded.

"Oh, of course we didn't mean to usurp any of your rights, my dear
friend!" exclaimed Mr, Foger quickly, and he seemed nervous at the
sight of the big revolver, while Andy hastily moved until he was
behind the biggest of the sledge drivers. "We don't want to violate
any of your rights," went on Mr. Foger. "But this valley is large,
and do I understand that you claim all of it?"

"We could if we wanted to," declared Abe stoutly; "but we'll be
content with three-quarter of it, seein' we was here fust. If you
folks want t' dig fer gold, go over there," and he pointed to a spot
some distance away.

"We'll dig where we please!" cried Andy.

"Oh, will you?" and there was an angry light in Abe's eyes. "I
guess, Tom, you'd better git--"

"No! No! My son is wrong--he is too hasty," interposed Mr. Foger.
"We will go away--certainly we will. The valley is large enough for
both of us--just as you say. Come, Andy!"

The bully seemed about to refuse, but a look at Abe's angry face and
a sight of Mr. Damon coming from the cave where the airship was,
with a rifle, for the eccentric man had hastened to get his weapon--
this sight calmed Andy down. Without further words he and his father
got back on their sleds, and were soon being driven off to where a
large ice cave loomed up, about a mile away.

"Good riddance," muttered the miner, "now we kin go on diggin'
wthout bein' bothered by that little scamp."

"I don't know about that," spoke Tom, shaking his head dubiously.
"There's always trouble when Andy Foger's within a mile. I'm afraid
we haven't seen the last of him."

"He'd better not come around here ag'in," declared Abe. "Queer, how
he should turn up, jest when I made a big strike."

"They must have come on all the way from where their airship was
wrecked, by means of dog sleds," observed Ned, and the others agreed
with him. Later they learned that this was so; that after the
accident to the ANTHONY, the crew had refused to proceed farther
north, and had gone back. But Mr. Foger had hired the natives with
the dog teams, and, by means of the copy of the map and with what
knowledge his Eskimos had, had reached the valley of gold.

"We have certainly struck it rich," went on Abe, as he went back to
where he had dug the hole. "Now we'd better all begin prospectin'
here, for it looks like a big deposit. We'll stake out a large
enough claim to take it all in. I guess Mr. Parker can do that,
seein' as how he knows about such things."

The scientist agreed to do this part of the work, it being
understood that all the gold discovered would be shared equally
after the expenses of the trip had been paid.

Feverishly Abe and the others began to dig. They did not come upon
such a rich deposit as the miner had found, but there were enough
nuggets picked up to prove that the expedition would be very
successful.

No more attention was paid to the Fogers, but through the telescope
Tom could see that the bully and his father had made a camp in one
of the ice caves, and that both were eagerly digging in the frozen
surface of the valley.

Before night several thousand dollars' worth of gold had been taken
out by our friends. It was stored in the airship, and then, after
suppers the craft's searchlight was taken off, and placed in such a
position in front of the cave of ice so that the beams would
illuminate the claim staked out by Tom and the others.

"We'll stand watch an' watch," suggested Abe, "but I don't think
them Fogers will come around here ag'in."

They did not, and the night passed peacefully. The next day our
friends were again at work digging for gold. So were the Fogers, as
could be observed through the glass, but it was impossible to see
whether they got any nuggets.

The gold seemed to be in "pockets," and that day the ones in the
vicinity of the strike first made by Abe were cleaned out.

"We'll have to locate some new 'pockets,'" said the miner, and the
adventurers scattered over the frozen plain to look for other
deposits of the precious metal.

Tom and Ned were digging together not far from one another. Suddenly
Ned let out a joyful cry.

"Strike anything?" asked Tom.

"Something rich," answered the bank clerk. He lifted from a hole in
the ground a handful of the golden pebbles.

"It's as good as Abe's was!" exclaimed Tom. "We must stake it out at
once, or the Fogers may jump it. Come on, we'll go back and tell
Abe, and get Mr. Parker and Mr. Damon over here."

The three men were some distance away, and there was no sign of the
Fogers. Tom and Ned hurried back to where their friends were,
leaving their picks and shovels on the frozen ground.

The good news was soon told, and, with some stakes hastily made from
some extra wood carried on the airship, the little party hastened
back to where Tom and Ned had made their strike.

As they emerged from behind a big hummock of ice they saw, standing
over the holes which the lads had dug, Andy Foger and his father!
Each one had a rifle, and there was a smile of triumph on Andy's
face!

"What are you doing here?" cried Tom, the hot blood mounting to his
cheeks.

"We've just staked out a claim here," answered the bully.

"And you deserted it," put in Mr. Foger smoothly. "I think your
mining friend will tell you that we have a right to take up an
abandoned claim."

"But we didn't abandon it!" declared Tom. "We only went away to get
the stakes."

"The claim was abandoned, and we have 'jumped' it," went on Mr.
Foger, and he cocked his rifle. "I need hardly tell you that
possession is nine points of the law, and that we intend to remain.
Andy, is your gun loaded?"

"Yes, pa."

"I--I guess they've got us--fer th' time bein'," murmured Abe, as he
motioned to Tom and the others to come away. "Besides they've got
guns, an' we haven't--but wait," added the miner, mysteriously. "I
haven't played all my tricks yet."




CHAPTER XXIII

ATTACKED BY NATIVES


To state that Tom and his friends were angry at the trick the Fogers
had played on them would be putting it mildly. There was righteous
indignation in their hearts, and, as for the young inventor he felt
that much blame was attached to him for his neglect in not remaining
on guard at the place of the lucky strike while Ned went to call the
others.

"I guess Andy must have been spying on us," spoke Ned, "or he would
never have known when to rush up just as he did; as soon as we
left."

"Probably," admitted Tom, bitterly.

"But, bless my penholder!" cried Mr. Damon. "Can't we do something,
Abe? Won't the law--?"

"There ain't any law out here, except what you make yourself," said
the miner. "I guess they've got us for th' time bein'."

"What do you mean by that?" asked Tom, detecting a gleam of hope in
Abe's tone.

"Well, I mean that I think we kin git ahead of 'em. Come on back to
th' ship, an' we'll talk it over."

They walked away, leaving Andy and his father in possession of the
rich deposits of gold, and that it was much richer even then than
the hole Abe had first discovered was very evident. The two Fogers
were soon at work, digging out the yellow metal with the pick and
shovels Tom and Ned had so thoughtlessly dropped.

"What little law there is out here they've got on their side," went
on Abe, "an' they've got possession, too, which is more. Of course
we could go at 'em in a pitched battle, but I take it you don't want
any bloodshed?" and he looked at Tom.

"Of course not," replied the lad quickly, "but I'd like to meet Andy
alone, with nothing but my fists for a little while," and Tom's eyes
snapped.

"So would I," added Ned.

"Perhaps we can find another pocket of gold better than  that  one,"
suggested Mr. Damon.

"We might," admitted Abe, "but that one was ours an' we're entitled
to it. This valley is rich in gold deposits, but you can't allers
put your hand on 'em. We may have t' hunt around for a week until we
strike another. An', meanwhile, them Fogers will be takin' our gold!
It's not to be borne! I'll find some way of drivin' 'em out. An'
we've got t' do it soon, too."

"You mean if we don't that they'll get all the gold?" asked Mr.
Damon.

"No, I mean that soon it will be th' long night up here, an' we
can't work. We'll have t' go back, an' I don't want t' go back until
I've made my pile."

"Neither do any of us, I guess," spoke Tom, "but there doesn't seem
to be any help for it."

They discussed several plans on reaching the ship, but none seemed
feasible without resorting to force, and this they did not want to
do, as they feared there might be bloodshed. When night closed in
they could see the gleam of a campfire, kindled by the Foger party,
at the gold-pocket, from bits of the scrubby trees that grew in that
frigid clime.

"They're going to stay on guard," announced Tom. "We can't get it
away from them to-night."

Though Abe had spoken of some plan to regain the advantage the
Fogers had of them, the old miner was not quite ready to propose it.
All the next day he seemed very thoughtful, while going about with
the others, seeking new deposits of gold. Luck did not seem to be
with them. They found two or three places where there were traces of
the yellow pebbles, but in no very great quantity.

Meanwhile the Fogers were busy at the pocket Ned had located. They
seemed to be taking out much of the precious metal.

"And it all ought to be ours," declared Tom, bitterly.

"Yes, and it shall be, too!" suddenly exclaimed. Abe. "I think I
have a plan that will beat 'em."

"What is it?" asked Tom.

"Let's get back to the ship, and I'll tell you," said Abe. "We can't
tell when one of their natives might be sneakin' in among these ice
caves, an' they understand some English. They might give my scheme
away."

In brief Abe's plan, as he unfolded it in the cabin of the RED CLOUD
was this:

They would divide into two parties, one consisting of Ned and Tom,
and the other of the three men. The latter, by a circuitous route,
would go to the ice caves where the Fogers had established their
camp. It was there that the Indians remained during the day, while
Andy and his father labored at the gold pocket, for, after the first
day when they had had the natives aid them, father and son had
worked alone at the hole, probably fearing to trust the Indians. At
night, though either Andy or his father remained on guard, with one
or two of the dusky-skinned dog drivers.

"But we'll work this trick before night," said Abe. "We three men
will get around to where the natives are in the ice cave. We'll
pretend to attack them, and raise a great row, firing our guns in
the air, and all that sort of thing, an' yellin' t' beat th' band.
Th' natives will yell, too, you can depend on that."

"Th' Fogers will imagine we are tryin' t' git away with their sleds
an' supplies, an' maybe their gold, if they've got it stored in th'
ice cave. Naturally Andy or his father will run here, an' that will
leave only one on guard at th' mine. Then Tom an' Ned can sneak up.
Th' two of 'em will be a match for even th' old Foger, if he happens
t' stay, an' while Tom or Ned comes up in front, t' hold his
attention, th' other can come up in back, an' grab his arms, if he
tries t' shoot. Likely Andy will remain at th' gold hole, an' you
two lads kin handle him, can't you?"

"Well, I guess!" exclaimed Tom and Ned together.

The plan worked like a charm. Abe, Mr. Damon and Mr. Parker raised a
great din at the ice cave where the Foger natives were. The sound
carried to the hole where Andy and his father were digging out the
gold. Mr. Foger at once ran toward the cave, while Andy, catching up
his gun, remained on the alert.

Then came the chance of Tom and Ned. The latter coming from his
hiding-place, advanced boldly toward the bully, while Tom, making a
detour, worked his way up behind.

"Here! You keep away!" cried Andy, catching sight of Ned. "I see
what the game is, now! It's a trick!"

"You're a nice one to talk about tricks!" declared Ned, advancing
slowly.

"Keep away if you don't want to get hurt!" yelled Andy.

"Oh, you wouldn't hurt me; would you?" mocked Ned, who wanted to
give Tom time to sneak up behind the bully.

"Yes, I would! Keep back!" Andy was nervously fingering his weapon.
The next instant his gun flew from his grasp, and he went over
backward in Tom's strong grip; for the young inventor, in his
sealskin shoes had worked up in the rear without a sound. The next
moment Andy broke away and was running for his life, leaving Tom and
Ned in possession of the gold hole, and that without a shot being
fired. A little later the three men, who had hurried away from the
cave as Mr. Foger rushed up to see what caused the racket, joined
Tom and Ned, and formal possession was taken of their lucky strike.

"We'll guard it well, now," decided Tom, and later that day they
moved some supplies near the hole, and for a shelter built an igloo,
Eskimo fashion, in which work Abe had had some experience. Then they
moved the airship to another ice cave, nearer their "mine" as they
called it, and prepared to stand guard.

But there seemed to be no need, for the following day there was no
trace of the Fogers. They and their natives had disappeared.

"I guess we were too much for them," spoke Tom. But the sequel was
soon to prove differently.

It was three days after our friends had regained their mine, during
which time they had dug out considerable gold, that toward evening,
as Tom was taking the last of the output of yellow pebbles into the
cave where the airship was, he looked across the valley.

"Looks like something coming this way," observed the young inventor.
"Natives, I guess."

"It is," agreed Ned, "quite a large party, too!"

"Better tell Abe and the others," went on Tom. "I don't like the
looks of this. Maybe the sudden disappearance of the Fogers has
something to do with it."

Abe, Mr. Damon and Mr. Parker hurried from the ice cave. They had
caught up their guns as they ran out.

"They're still coming on," called Tom, "and are headed this way."

"They're Indians, all right!" exclaimed Abe. "Hark! What's that?"

It was the sound of shouting and singing.

Through the gathering dusk the party advanced. Our friends closely
scanned them. There was something familiar about the two leading
figures, and it could now be seen that in the rear were a number of
dog sleds.

"There's Andy Foger and his father!" cried Ned. "They've gone and
got a lot of Eskimos to help them drive us away."

"That's right!" admitted Tom. "I guess we're in for it now!"

With a rush the natives, led by the Fogers, came on. They were
yelling now. An instant later they began firing their guns.

"It's a fierce attack!" cried Tom. "Into the ice cave for shelter!
We can cover the gold mine from there. I'll get my electric gun!"




CHAPTER XXIV

THE WRECK OF THE AIRSHIP


Almost before our friends could retreat into the cave which now
sheltered the RED CLOUD, the attacking natives opened fire.
Fortunately they only had old-fashioned, muzzle-loading muskets,
and, as their aim was none of the best, there was comparatively
little danger. The bullets, however, did sing through the fast-
gathering darkness with a vicious sound, and struck the heavy sides
and sloping front of the ice cave with a disconcerting "ping!"

"I don't hear Andy or his father firing!" called Tom, as he and the
others returned the fire of the savage Indians. "I could tell their
guns by the sharper reports. The Fogers carry repeating rifles, and
they're fine ones, if they're anything like the one we took from
Andy, Ned."

"That's right," agreed Tom's chum, "I don't believe Andy or his
father dare fire. They're afraid to, and they're putting the poor
ignorant natives up to it. Probably they hired them to try to drive
us away."

This, as they afterward learned, was exactly the case.

The battle, if such it could be called, was kept up. There was about
a hundred natives, all of whom had guns, and, though they were slow
to load, there were enough weapons to keep up a constant fusilade.
On their part, Tom and the others fired at first over the heads of
the natives, for they did not want to kill any of the deluded men.
Later, though, when they saw the rush keeping up, they fired at
their legs, and disabled several of the Eskimos, the electric gun
proving very effective.

It was now quite dark, and the firing slackened. From their position
in the cave, Tom and the others could command the hole where the
gold was, and, as they saw several natives sneaking up to it the
young inventor and Ned, both of whom were good shots, aimed to have
the bullets strike the ice close to where the Indians were.

This sort of shooting was enough, and the natives scurried away.
Then Tom hit on the plan of playing the searchlight on the spot, and
this effectually prevented an unseen attack. It seemed to discourage
the enemy, too for they did not venture into that powerful glow of
light.

"They won't do anything more until morning," declared Abe. "Then
we'll have it hot an' heavy, though, I'm afeered. Well, we'll have
t' make th' best of it!"

They took turns standing guard that night, but no attack was made.
The fact of the Fogers coming back with the band of Indians told
Tom, more plainly than words, how desperately his enemies would do
battle with them. Anxiously they waited for the morning.

Several times in the night Mr. Parker was seen roaming about
uneasily, though it was not his turn to be on guard. Finally Tom
asked him what was the matter, and if he could not sleep.

"It isn't that," answered the scientist, "but I am worried about the
ice. I can detect a slight but peculiar movement by means of some of
my scientific instruments. I am alarmed about it. I fear something
is going to happen."

But Tom was too worried about the outcome of the fight he knew would
be renewed on the next day, to think much about the ice movement. He
thought it would only be some scientific phenomena that would amount
to little.

With the first streak of the late dawn, the gold-seekers were up,
and partook of a hot breakfast, with strong coffee which Mr. Damon
brewed. Tom took an observation from the mouth of the cave. The
searchlight was still dimly glowing, and it did not disclose
anything. Tom turned it off. He thought he saw a movement among the
ranks of the enemy, who had camped just beyond the gold hole.

"I guess they're coming!" cried the lad. "Get ready for them!"

The adventurers caught up their guns, and hurried to the entrance of
the cave. Mr. Parker lingered behind, and was observed to be
narrowly scanning the walls of the cavern.

"Come on, Parker, my dear man!" begged Mr. Damon. "We are in grave
danger, and we need your help. Bless my life insurance policy! but I
never was in such a state as this."

"We may soon be in a worse one," was the answer of the gloomy
scientist.

"What do you mean?" asked Mr. Damon, but he hurried on without
waiting for a reply.

Suddenly, from without the cave came a series of fierce yells. It
was the battle-cry of the Indians. At the same moment there sounded
a fusillade of guns.

"The battle is beginning!" cried Tom Swift, grimly. He held his
electric gun, though he had not used it very much in the previous
attack, preferring to save it for a time of more need.

As the defenders of the cave reached the entrance they saw the body
of natives rushing forward. They were almost at the gold hole, with
Andy Foger and his father discreetly behind the first row of
Eskimos, when, with a suddenness that was startling, there sounded
throughout the whole valley a weird sound!

It was like the wailing of some giant--the sighing of some mighty
wind. At the same time the air suddenly became dark, and then there
came a violent snow squall, shutting out instantly the sight of the
advancing natives. Tom and the others could not see five feet beyond
the cave.

"This will delay the attack," murmured Ned, "They can't see to come
at us."

Mr. Parker came running up from the interior of the cave. On his
face there was a look of alarm.

"We must leave here at once!" he cried.

"Leave here?" repeated Tom. "Why must we? The enemy are out there!
We'd run right into them!"

"It must be done!" insisted the scientist. "We must leave the cave
at once!"

"What for?" cried Mr. Damon.

"Because the movement of the ice that I predicted, has begun. It is
much more rapid than I supposed it would be. In a short time this
cave and all the others will be crushed flat!"

"Crushed flat!" gasped Tom.

"Yes, the caves of ice are being destroyed! Hark! You can hear them
snapping!"

They all listened. Above the roar of the storm could be made out the
noise of crushing, grinding ice-sounds like cannon being fired, as
the great masses of frozen crystal snapped like frail planks.

"The ice caves are being destroyed by an upheaval of nature!" went
on Mr. Parker. "This one will soon go! The walls are bulging now! We
must get out!"

"But the natives! They will kill us!" cried Mr. Damon. "Bless my
soul! what a trying position to be in."

"I guess the natives are as bad off as we are," suggested Ned.
"They're not firing, and I can hear cries of alarm, I think they're
running away."

There was a lull in the snow flurry, and the white curtain seemed to
lift for a moment. The gold-seekers had a glimpse of the natives in
full retreat, with the Fogers--father and son--racing panic-stricken
after them. Tom could also see a big cave, just beyond the gold
hole, collapse and crumble to pieces like a house of cards.

"We have no time to lose!" Mr. Parker warned them. "The roof of this
cave is slowly coming down. The sides are collapsing! We must get
out!"

"Then wheel out the airship!" cried Tom. "We must save that! We
needn't fear the natives, now!"

The young inventor hurried to the RED CLOUD calling to Ned and the
others. They hastened to his side. It was an easy matter to move the
airship along on the wheels. It neared the opening of the cave. The
rumbling, roaring, grinding sound of the ice increased.

"Why--why!" cried Tom in surprise and alarm, as the craft neared the
mouth of the ice cavern, "we can't get it out--the opening is too
small! Yet it came in easily enough!"

"The cave is collapsing--growing smaller every moment!" cried Mr.
Parker. "We have only time to save our lives! Run out!"

"And leave the airship? Never!" yelled Tom.

"You must! You can't save that and your life!"

"Get axes and make the opening bigger!" suggested Ned, who, like his
chum, could not bear to think of the destruction of the beautiful
craft.

"No time! No time!" shouted Mr. Parker, frantically, "We must get
out! Save what you can from the ship--the gold--some supplies--the
guns--some food--save what you can!"

Then ensued a wild effort to get from the doomed craft what they
could--what they would need if they were to save their lives in that
cold and desolate country. Food, some blankets--their guns--as much
of the gold as they could hastily gather together--their weapons and
some ammunition--all this was carried from the cabin outside the
cave. The entrance was rapidly growing smaller. The roof was already
pressing down on the gas-bag.

Tom gave one last look at his fine craft. There were tears in his
eyes. He started into the cabin for something he had forgotten. Mr.
Parker grabbed him by the arm.

"Don't go in!" he cried hoarsely. "The cave will collapse in another
instant!" He rushed with Tom out of the cavern, and not a moment too
soon. The others were already outside.

Then with a rush and a roar, with a sound like a great explosion,
with a rending, grinding and booming as the great pieces of ice
collapsed one against the other, the big ice cave settled in, as
does some great building when the walls are weakened!

Down crashed the roof of the ice cave! Down upon the RED CLOUD,
burying out of sight, forever, under thousands of tons of ice and
snow, the craft which was the pride of Tom Swift's heart! It was the
end of the airship!

Tom felt a moisture of tears in his eyes as he stood there in the
midst of the snowstorm.




CHAPTER XXV

THE RESCUE--CONCLUSION


For a few moments after the collapse of the cave, and the
destruction of the airship, on which they depended to take them from
that desolate land, no one spoke. The calamity had been too
terrible--they could hardly understand it.

The snow had ceased, and, over the frozen plain, in full retreat,
could be seen the band of attacking Indians. They had fled in terror
at the manifestation of Nature. And Nature, as if satisfied at the
mischief she had wrought, called a halt to the movement of the ice.
The roaring, grinding sounds ceased, and there were no more
collapses of caves in that neighborhood.

"Well, we are up against it," spoke Tom, softly. "Poor old RED
CLOUD! There'll never be another airship like you!"

"We are lucky to have escaped with our lives," said Mr. Parker.
"Another moment and it would have been too late. I was expecting
something like this--I predicted it."

But his honor was an empty one--no one cared to dispute it with him.

"Bless my refrigerator! What's to be done!" exclaimed Mr. Damon.

"Start from here as soon as possible," decided Abe.

"Why, do you think the natives will come back?" asked Ned.

"No, but we have only a small supply of food, my lad, an' it's hard
to git up here. We must hit th' trail fer civilization as soon as we
kin!"

"Go back--how; without the airship?" asked Tom, blankly.

"Walk!" exclaimed the miner, grimly. "It's th' only way!"

They realized that. There was no hope of digging through that mass
of fantastically piled ice to reach the airship, and, even if they
could have done so, it would have been crushed beyond all hope of
repair. Nor could they dig down for more food, though what they had
hastily saved was little enough.

"Well, if we've got to go, we'd better start," suggested Tom, sadly.
"Poor old RED CLOUD!"

"Maybe we can get a little more gold," suggested Ned.

They walked over to the hole whence they had taken the yellow
nuggets. The "pocket" was not to be seen. It was buried out of sight
under tons of ice.

"We'll get no more gold here," decided Abe, "lf we get safely out of
th' valley, and t' the nearest white settlement, we'll be lucky."

"Bless my soul! Is it as bad as that!" cried Mr. Damon.

Abe nodded without speaking. There was nothing else to do. Sadly and
silently they made up into packs the things they had saved, and
started southward, guided by a small compass the miner had with him.

It was a melancholy party. Fortunately the weather had turned a
little warmer or they might have been frozen to death. They tramped
all that day, shaping their course to take them out of the valley on
a side well away from where the hostile natives lived. At night they
made rude shelters of snow and blocks of ice and ate cold victuals.
The second day it grew colder, and they were slightly affected by
snow-blindness, for they had lost their dark glasses in the cave.

Even the gold seemed too great a burden to carry, and they found
they had more of it than at first they supposed. On the third day
they were ready to give up, but Abe bravely urged them on. Toward
the close of the fourth day, even the old miner was in despair, for
the food they could carry was not such as to give strength and
warmth, and they saw no game to shoot.

They were just getting ready to go into a cheerless camp for the
night, when Tom, who was a little in advance, looked ahead.

"Ned, do I see something or is it only a vision?" he asked.

"What does it look like?" asked his chum.

"Like Eskimos on sleds."

"That's what it is," agreed Ned, after an observation. "Maybe it's
the Fogers, or some of the savage Indians."

They halted in alarm, and got out their guns. The little party of
natives kept coming on toward them.

Suddenly Abe uttered a cry, but it was one of joy and not fear.

"Hurrah!" he yelled, "It's all right--they're friendly natives!
They're of the same tribe that helped me an' my partner! It's all
right, boys, we're rescued now!"

And so it proved. A few minutes later the gold-seekers were on the
sleds of the friendly Eskimos, some of whom remembered Abe, and the
weary and hungry adventures were being rushed toward the native
village as fast as the dogs could run. It was a hunting party that
had come upon our friends just in time.

Little more remains to be told. Well cared for by the kind Eskimos,
Tom and his friends soon recovered their spirits and strength. They
arranged for dog teams to take them to Sitka, and paid their friends
well for the service, not only in gold, but by presenting what was
of more value, the guns they no longer needed. Tom, however,
retained his electric rifle.

Three weeks after that they were on a steamer bound for
civilization, having bidden their friends the Eskimos good-by.

"Homeward bound," remarked Tom, some time later, as they were in a
train speeding across the continent. "It was a great trip, and the
gold we got will more than repay us, even to building a new airship.
Still, I can't help feeling sorry about the RED CLOUD."

"I don't blame you," returned Ned. "Are you going to build another
airship, Tom?"

"Not one like the RED CLOUD, I think. But I have in mind plans for a
sort of racing craft. I think I'll start it when I get back home."

How Tom's plans developed, and what sort of a craft he built will be
related in the next volume of this series, to be called "Tom Swift
and His Sky Racer; or, the Quickest Flight on Record." In that will
be told how the young inventor foiled his enemies, and how he saved
his father's life. Our friends arrived safely at Shopton in due
season. They learned that the two Fogers had reached there shortly
before them. Tom and his party decided not to prosecute them, and
they did not learn the identity of the men who tried to rob Tom of
the map.

"But I guess Andy won't go about boasting of his airship any more,"
said Ned, "nor of how he got our gold mine away from us. He'll sing
mighty small for a while."

The store of gold brought from the North, proved quite valuable,
though but for the unforeseen accidents our friends could have
secured much more. Yet they were well satisfied. With his share Abe
Abercrombie settled down out West, Mr. Damon gave most of his gold
to his wife, Mr. Parker bought scientific instruments with his, Ned
invested his in bank stock, and Tom Swift, after buying a beautiful
gift for a certain pretty young lady, used part of the remainder to
build his Sky Racer.

And now, for a time, we will take leave of Tom and his friends, and
say good-by.










This etext was produced by Charles Franks, Greg Weeks, and the
Online Distributed Proofreading Team.






TOM SWIFT AND HIS ELECTRIC RIFLE

OR

Daring Adventures in Elephant Land

by VICTOR APPLETON




CONTENTS

     I   TOM WANTS EXCITEMENT
    II   TRYING THE NEW GUN
   III   A DIFFICULT TEST
    IV   BIG TUSKS WANTED
     V   RUSH WORK
    VI   NEWS FROM ANDY
   VII   THE BLACK HAWK FLIES
  VIII   OFF FOR AFRICA
    IX   ATTACKED BY A WHALE
     X   OFF IN THE AIRSHIP
    XI   ANCHORED TO EARTH
   XII   AMONG THE NATIVES
  XIII   ON THE ELEPHANT TRAIL
   XIV   A STAMPEDE
    XV   LIONS IN THE NIGHT
   XVI   SEEKING THE MISSIONARIES
  XVII   SHOTS FROM ABOVE
 XVIII   NEWS OF THE RED PYGMIES
   XIX   AN APPEAL FOR HELP
    XX   THE FIGHT
   XXI   DRIVEN BACK
  XXII   A NIGHT ATTACK
 XXIII   THE RESCUE
  XXIV   TWO OTHER CAPTIVES
   XXV   THE ROGUE ELEPHANT--CONCLUSION




CHAPTER I

TOM WANTS EXCITEMENT


"Have you anything special to do to-night, Ned?" asked Tom Swift,
the well-known inventor, as he paused in front of his chum's window,
in the Shopton National Bank.

"No, nothing in particular," replied the bank clerk, as he stacked
up some bundles of bills. "Why do you ask?"

"I wanted you to come over to the house for a while."

"Going to have a surprise party, or something like that?"

"No, only I've got something I'd like to show you."

"A new invention?"

"Well, not exactly new. You've seen it before, but not since I've
improved it. I'm speaking of my new electric rifle. I've got it
ready to try, now, and I'd like to see what you think of it. There's
a rifle range over at the house, and we can practice some shooting,
if you haven't anything else to do."

"I haven't, and I'll be glad to come. What are you doing in the
bank, anyhow; putting away more of your wealth, Tom?"

"Yes, I just made a little deposit. It's some money I got from the
government for the patents on my sky racer, and I'm salting it down
here until Dad and I can think of a better investment."

"Good idea. Bring us all the money you can," and the bank clerk, who
held a small amount of stock in the financial institution, laughed,
his chum joining in with him.

"Well, then. I'll expect you over this evening," went on the
youthful inventor, as he turned to leave the bank.

"Yes, I'll be there. Say, Tom, have you heard the latest about Andy
Foger?"

"No, I haven't heard much since he left town right after I beat him
in the aeroplane race at Eagle Park."

"Well, he's out of town all right, and I guess for a long time this
trip. He's gone to Europe."

"To Europe, eh? Well, he threatened to go there after he failed to
beat me in the race, but I thought he was only bluffing."

"No, he's really gone this time."

"Well, I, for one, am glad of it. Did he take his aeroplane along?"

"Yes, that's what he went for. It seems that this Mr. Landbacher,
the German who really invented it, and built it with money which Mr.
Foger supplied, has an idea he can interest the German or some other
European government in the machine. Andy wanted to go along with
him, and as Mr. Foger financed the scheme, I guess he thought it
would be a good thing to have some one represent him. So Andy's
gone."

"Then he won't bother me. Well, I must get along. I'll expect you
over to-night," and with a wave of his hand Tom Swift hurried from
the bank.

The young inventor jumped into his electric runabout which stood
outside the institution, and was about to start off when he saw a
newsboy selling papers which had just come in from New York, on the
morning train.

"Here, Jack, give me a TIMES," called Tom to the lad, and he tossed
the newsboy a nickel. Then, after glancing at the front page, and
noting the headings, Tom started off his speedy car, in which, on
one occasion, he had made a great run, against time. He was soon at
home.

"Well, Dad, I've got the money safely put away," he remarked to an
aged gentleman who sat in the library reading a book. "Now we won't
have to worry about thieves until we get some more cash in."

"Well, I'm glad it's coming in so plentifully," said Mr. Swift with
a smile. "Since my illness I haven't been able to do much, Tom, and
it all depends on you, now."

"Don't let that worry you, Dad. You'll soon be as busy as ever,"
for, following a serious operation for an ailment of the heart, Mr.
Swift, who was a veteran inventor, had not been able to do much. But
the devices of his son, especially a speedy monoplane, which Tom
invented, and sold to the United States Government, were now
bringing them in a large income. In fact with royalties from his
inventions and some gold and diamonds which he had secured on two
perilous trips, Tom Swift was quite wealthy.

"I'll never be as busy as I once was," went on Mr. Swift, a little
regretfully, "but I don't know that I care as long as you continue
to turn out new machines, Tom. By the way, how is the electric rifle
coming on? I haven't heard you speak of it lately."

"It's practically finished, Dad. It worked pretty well the time I
took it when we went on the trip to the caves of ice, but I've
improved it very much since then. In fact I'm going to give it a
severe test to-night. Ned Newton is coming over, and it may be that
then we'll find out something about it that could be bettered. But I
think not. It suits me as it is."

"So Ned is coming over to see it; eh? You ought to have Mr. Damon
here to bless it a few times."

"Yes, I wish I did. And he may come along at any moment, as it is.
You never can tell when he is going to turn up. Mrs. Baggert says
you were out walking while I was at the bank, Dad. Do you feel
better after it?"

"Yes, I think I do, Tom. Oh, I'm growing stronger every day, but it
will take time. But now tell me something about the electric gun."

Thereupon the young inventor related to his father some facts about
the improvements he had recently made to the weapon. It was dinner
time when he had finished, and, after the meal Tom went out to the
shed where he built his aeroplanes and his airships, and in which
building he had fitted up a shooting gallery.

"I'll get ready for the trial to-night," he said "I want to see what
it will do to a dummy figure. Guess I'll make a sort of scarecrow
and stuff it with straw. I'll get Eradicate to help me. Rad! I say,
Rad! Where are you?"

"Heah I is, Massa Tom! Heah I is" called a colored man as he came
around the corner of a small stable where he kept his mule
Boomerang. "Was yo'-all callin' me?"

"Yes, Rad, I want you to help make a scarecrow."

"A scarecrow, Massa Tom! Good land a' massy! What fo' yo' want ob a
scarecrow? Yo'-all ain't raisin' no corn, am yo'?"

"No, but I want something to shoot at when Ned Newton comes over to-
night."

"Suffin t' shoot at? Why Massa Tom! Good land a' massy! Yo'-all
ain't gwine t' hab no duel, am yo'?"

"No, Rad, but I want a life-size figure on which to try my new
electric gun. Here are some old clothes, and if you will stuff them
with rags and straw and fix them so they'll stand up, they'll do
first-rate. Have it ready by night, and set it up at the far end of
the shooting gallery."

"All right, Massa Tom. I'll jest do dat, fo' yo'," and leaving the
colored man to stuff the figure, after he had showed him how, Tom
went back into the house to read the paper which he had purchased
that morning.

He skimmed over the news, thinking perhaps he might see something of
the going abroad of Andy Foger with the German aeroplane, but there
was nothing.

"I almost wish I was going to Europe," sighed Tom. "I will certainly
have to get busy at something, soon. I haven't had any adventure
since I won the prize at the Eagle Park aviaton meet in my sky
racer. Jove! That was some excitement! I'd like to do that over
again, only I shouldn't want to have Dad so sick," for just before
the race, Tom had saved his father's life by making a quick run in
the aeroplane, to bring a celebrated surgeon to the invalid's aid.

"I certainly wish I could have some new adventures," mused Tom, as
he turned the pages of the paper. "I could afford to take a trip
around the earth after them, too, with the way money is coming in
now. Yes, I do wish I could have some excitement. Hello, what's
this! A big elephant hunt in Africa. Hundreds of the huge creatures
captured in a trap--driven in by tame beasts. Some are shot for
their tusks. Others will be sent to museums."

He was reading the headlines of the article that had attracted his
attention, and, as he read, he became more and more absorbed in it.
He read the story through twice, and then, with sparkling eyes, he
exclaimed:

"That's just what I want. Elephant shooting in Africa! My! With my
new electric rifle, and an airship, what couldn't a fellow do over
in the dark continent! I've a good notion to go there! I wonder if
Ned would go with me? Mr. Damon certainly would. Elephant shooting
in Africa! In an airship! I could finish my new sky craft in short
order if I wanted to. I've a good notion to do it!"




CHAPTER II

TRYING THE NEW GUN


While Tom Swift is thus absorbed in thinking about a chance to hunt
elephants, we will take the opportunity to tell you a little more
about him, and then go on with the story.

Many of you already know the young inventor, but those who do not
may be interested it hearing that he is a young American lad, full
of grit and ginger, who lives with his aged father in the town of
Shopton, in New York State. Our hero was first introduced to the
public in the book, "Tom Swift and His Motorcycle."

In that volume it was related how Tom bought a motor-cycle from a
Mr. Wakefield Damon, of Waterford. Mr. Damon was an eccentric
individual, who was continually blessing himself, some one else, or
something belonging to him. His motor-cycle tried to climb a tree
with him, and that was why he sold it to Tom. The two thus became
acquainted, and their friendship grew from year to year.

After many adventures on his motor-cycle Tom got a motor-boat, and
had some exciting times in that. One of the things he and his father
and his chum, Ned Newton, did, was to rescue, from a burning balloon
that had fallen into Lake Carlopa, an aeronaut named John Sharp.
Later Tom and Mr. Sharp built an airship called the Red Cloud, and
with Mr. Damon and some others had a series of remarkable fights.

In the Red Cloud they got on the track of some bank robbers, and
captured them, thus foiling the plans of Andy Foger, a town bully,
and one of Tom's enemies, and putting to confusion the plot of Mr.
Foger, Andy's father.

After many adventures in the air Tom and his friends, in a submarine
boat, invented by Mr. Swift, went under the ocean for sunken
treasure and secured a large part of it.

It was not long after this that Tom conceived the idea of a powerful
electric car, which proved, to be the speediest of the road, and in
it he won a great race, and saved from ruin a bank in which his
father and Mr. Damon were interested.

The sixth book of the series, entitled "Tom Swift and His Wireless
Message," tells how, in testing a new electric airship, which a
friend of Mr. Damon's had invented, Tom, the inventor and Mr. Damon
were lost on an island in the middle of the ocean. There they found
some castaways, among whom were Mr. and Mrs. Nestor, parents of Mary
Nestor of Shopton, a girl of whom Tom was quite fond.

Tom Swift, after his arrival home, went on an expedition among a
gang of men known as the "Diamond Makers" who were hidden in the
Rocky Mountains. He was accompanied by Mr. Barcoe Jenks, one of the
castaways of Earthquake Island. They found the diamond makers, and
had some surprising adventures, barely escaping with their lives.

This did not daunt Tom, however, and he once more started off on an
expedition in his airship the Red Cloud to Alaska, amid the caves of
ice. He was searching for a valley of gold, and though he and his
friends found it, they came to grief. The Fogers, father and son,
tried to steal the gold from them, and, failing in that, incited the
Eskimos against our friends. There was a battle, but the forces of
nature were even more to be dreaded than the terrible savages.

The ice cave, in which the Red Cloud was stored, collapsed, crushing
the gallant craft, and burying it out of sight forever under
thousand of tons of the frozen bergs.

After a desperate journey Tom and his friends reached civilization,
with a large supply of gold. Tom regretted very much the destruction
of the airship, but he at once set to work on another--a monoplane
this time, instead of a combined aeroplane and dirigible balloon.
This new craft he called the Humming Bird and it was a "sky racer"
of terrific speed. In it, as we have said, Tom brought a specialist
to operate on his father, when, because of a broken railroad bridge,
the physician could not otherwise have gotten to Shopton. He and Tom
traveled through the air at the rate of over one hundred miles an
hour. Later, Tom took part in a big race for a ten-thousand-dollar
prize, and won, defeating Andy Foger, and a number of well-known
"bird-men" who used biplanes and monoplanes of a more or less
familiar type.

The government became interested in Tom's craft, the Humming Bird,
and, as told in the ninth book of this series, Tom Swift and His Sky
Racer, they secured some rights in the invention.

And now Tom, who had done nothing for several months following the
great race--that is, nothing save to work on his new rifle--Tom, we
say, sighed for new adventures.

"Well, Tom, what is on your mind?" asked his father at the supper
table that evening. "What is worrying you?"

"Nothing is worrying me, Dad."

"You are thinking of something. I can see that. Are you afraid your
electric rifle won't work as well as you hope, when Ned comes over
to try it?"

"No, it isn't that, Dad. But I may as well tell you, I guess. I've
been reading in the paper about a big elephant hunt in Africa, and
I--"

"That's enough, Tom! You needn't say any more," interrupted Mr.
Swift. "I can see which way the wind is blowing. You want to go to
Africa with your new rifle."

"Well, Dad, not exactly--that is--"

"Now, Tom, you needn't deny it," and Mr. Swift laughed. "Well, I
don't blame you a bit. You have been rather idle of late."

"I would like to go, Dad," admitted the young inventor, "only I'd
never think of it while you weren't well."

"Don't worry about me, Tom. Of course I will be lonesome while you
are gone, but don't let that stand in the way. If you want to go to
Africa, you may start to-morrow, and take your new rifle with you."

"The rifle part would be all right, Dad, but if I went I'd want to
take an airship along, and it will take me some little time to
finish the Black Hawk, as I have named my new craft."

"Well, there's no special hurry, is there?" asked Mr. Swift. "The
elephants in Africa are likely to stay there for some time. If you
want to go, why don't you get right to work on the Black Hawk and
make the trip? I'd like to go myself."

"I wish you would, Dad," exclaimed Tom eagerly.

"No, son, I couldn't think of it. I want to stay here and get well.
Then I am going to resume work on my wireless motor. Perhaps I'll
have it finished when you come back from Africa with an airship load
of elephants' tusks."

"Perhaps," admitted the young inventor. "Well, Dad, I'll think of
it. But now I'm going after my rifle, and--"

Tom was interrupted by a ring of the front-door bell, and Mrs.
Baggert, the housekeeper, who was almost like a mother to the youth,
went to answer it.

"It's Ned Newton, I guess," murmured Tom, and, a little later, his
chum entered the room.

"Oh, I guess I'm early," said Ned. "Haven't you had supper yet,
Tom'"

"Yes, we're just finished. Come on out and we'll try the gun."

"And practice shooting elephants," added Mr. Swift with a laugh, as
he mentioned to Ned the latest idea of Tom.

"Say! That would he great!" cried the bank clerk. "I wish I could
go!"

"Come along!" invited Tom cordially. "We'll have more fun than we
did in the caves of ice," for Ned had gone on the voyage to Alaska.

The two youths went out to the shed where the rifle gallery had been
built. The new electric weapon was out there, and Eradicate Sampson,
the colored man, who was a sort of servant and man-of-all-work about
the Swift household, had set up the scarecrow figure at the end of
the gallery.

"Now we'll try some shots," said Tom, as he took the gun out of the
case. "Just turn on a few more lights, will you, Mr. Jackson," and
the engineer, who was employed by Tom and his father to aid them in
their inventive work, did as requested.

The gallery was now brilliantly illuminated, with the reflectors
throwing the beams on the big stuffed figure, which, save for a
face, looked very much like a human being, standing at the end of
the gallery.

"I don't suppose you want to go down there and hold it, while I
shoot at it; do you, Rad?" asked Tom jokingly, as he prepared the
electric rifle for use.

"No indeedy, I don't!" cried Eradicate. "Yo'-all will hab t' scuse
me, Massa Tom. I think I'll be goin' now."

"What's your hurry?" asked Ned, as he saw the colored man hastily
preparing to leave the improvised gallery.

"I spects I'd better fro' down some mo' straw fo' a bed fo' my mule
Boomerang!" exclaimed Eradicate, as he hastily slid out of the door,
and shut it after him.

"Rad is nervous," remarked Tom. "He doesn't like this gun. Well, it
certainly does great execution."

"How does it work'" asked Ned, as he looked at the curious gun. The
electric weapon was not unlike an ordinary heavy rifle in appearance
save that the barrel was a little longer, and the stock larger in
every way. There were also a number of wheels, levers, gears and
gages on the stock.

"It works by electricity," explained Tom.

"That is, the force comes from a powerful current of stored
electricity."

"Oh, then you have storage batteries in the stock?"

"Not exactly. There are no batteries, but the current is a sort of
wireless kind. It is stored in a cylinder, just as compressed air or
gases are stored, and can be released as I need it."

"And when it's all gone, what do you do?"

"Make more power by means of a small dynamo."

"And does it shoot lead bullets?"

"Not at all. There are no bullets used."

"Then how does it kill?"

"By means of a concentrated charge of electricity which is shot from
the barrel with great force. You can't see it, yet it is there. It's
just as if you concentrated a charge of electricity of five thousand
volts into a small globule the size of a bullet. That flies through
space, strikes the object aimed at and--well, we'll see what it does
in a minute. Mr. Jackson, just put that steel plate up in front of
the scarecrow; will you?"

The engineer proceeded to put into place a section of steel armor-
plate before the stuffed figure.

"You don't mean to say you're going to shoot through that, do you?"
asked Ned in surprise.

"Surely. The electric bullets will pierce anything. They'll go
through a brick wall as easily as the x-rays do. That's one valuable
feature of my rifle. You don't have to see the object you aim at. In
fact you can fire through a house, and kill something on the other
side."

"I should think that would be dangerous."

"It would be, only I can calculate exactly, by means of an automatic
arrangement, just how far the charge of electricity will go. It
stops short just at the limit of the range, and is not effective
beyond that. Otherwise, if I did not limit it and if I fired at the
scarecrow, through the piece of steel, and the bullet hit the
figure, it would go on, passing through whatever else was in the
way, until its power was lost. I use the term 'bullet,' though as I
said, it isn't properly one."

"By Jove, Tom, it certainly is a dangerous weapon!"

"Yes, the range-limit idea is a new one. That's what I've been
working on lately. There are other features of the gun which I'll
explain later, particularly the power it has to shoot out luminous
bars of light. But now we'll see what it will do to the image."

Tom took his place at the end of the range, and began to adjust some
valves and levers. In spite of the fact that the gun was larger than
an ordinary rifle, it was not as heavy as the United States Army
weapon.

Tom aimed at the armor-plate, and, by means of an arrangement on the
rifle, he could tell exactly when he was pointing at the scarecrow,
even though he could not see it.

"Here she goes!" he suddenly exclaimed.

Ned watched his chum. The young inventor pressed a small button at
the side of the rifle barrel, about where the trigger should have
been. There was no sound, no smoke, no flame and not the slightest
jar.

Yet as Ned watched he saw the steel plate move slightly. The next
instant the scarecrow figure seemed to fly all to pieces. There was
a shower of straw, rags and old clothes, which fell in a shapeless
heap at the end of the range.

"Say. I guess you did for that fellow, all right!" exclaimed Ned.

"It looks so," admitted Tom, with a note of pride in his voice. "Now
we'll try another test."

As he laid aside his rifle in order to help Mr. Jackson shift the
steel plate there was a series of yells outside the shed.

"What's that?" asked Tom, in some alarm.

"Sounds like some one calling," answered Ned.

"It is," agreed Mr. Jackson. "Perhaps Eradicate's mule has gotten
loose. I guess we'd better--"

He did not finish, for the shouts increased in volume, and Tom and
Ned could hear some one yelling:

"I'll have the law on you for this! I'll have you arrested, Tom
Swift! What do you mean by trying to kill me? Where are you? Don't
try to hide away, now. You were trying to shoot me, and I'm not
going to have it!"

Some one pounded on the door of the shed.

"It's Barney Moker!" exclaimed Tom. "I wonder what can have
happened?"




CHAPTER III

A DIFFICULT TEST


Tom Swift opened the door of the improvised rifle gallery and looked
out. By the light of a full moon, which shone down from a cloudless
sky, he saw a man standing at the portal. The man's face was
distorted with rage, and he shook his fist at the young inventor.

"What do you mean by shooting at me?" he demanded. "What do you
mean, I say? The idea of scaring honest folks out of their wits, and
making 'em think the end of the world has come! What do you mean by
it? Why don't you answer me? I say, Tom Swift, why don't you answer
me?"

"Because you don't give me a chance, Mr. Moker," replied our hero.

"I want to know why you shot at me? I demand to know!" and Mr.
Moker, who was a sort of miserly town character, living all alone in
a small house, just beyond Tom's home, again shook his fist almost
in the lad's face. "Why don't you tell me? Why don't you tell me?"
he shouted.

"I will, if you give me a chance!" fairly exploded Tom. "If you can
be cool for five minutes, and come inside and tell me what happened
I'll be glad to answer any of your questions, Mr. Moker. I didn't
shoot at you."

"Yes, you did! You tried to shoot a hole through me!"

"Tell me about it?" suggested Tom, as the excited man calmed down
somewhat. "Are you hurt?"

"No, but it isn't your fault that I'm not. You tried hard enough to
hurt me. Here I am, sitting at my table reading, and, all at once
something goes through the side of the house, whizzes past my ear,
makes my hair fairly stand up on end, and goes outside the other
side of the house. What kind of bullets do you use, Tom Swift?
that's what I want to know. They went through the side of my house,
and never left a mark. I demand to know what kind they are."

"I'll tell you, if you'll only give me a chance," went on Tom
wearily. "How do you know it was me shooting?"

"How do I know? Why, doesn't the end of this shooting gallery of
yours point right at my house? Of course it does; you can't deny
it!"

Tom did not attempt to, and Mr. Moker went on:

"Now what do you mean by it?"

"If any of the bullets from my electric gun went near you, it was a
mistake, and I'm sorry for it," said Tom.

"Well, they did, all right," declared the excited man. "They went
right past my ear."

"I don't see how they could," declared Tom. "I was trying my new
electric rifle, but I had the limit set for two hundred feet, the
length of the gallery. That is, the electrical discharge couldn't go
beyond that distance."

"I don't know what it was, but it went through the side of my house
all the same," insisted Mr. Moker. "It didn't make a hole, but it
scorched the wall paper a little."

"I don't see how it could," declared Tom. "It couldn't possibly have
gone over two hundred feet with the gage set for that distance." He
paused suddenly, and hurried over to where he had placed his gun.
Catching up the weapon he looked at the gage dial. Then he uttered
an exclamation.

"I'm sorry to admit that you are right, Mr. Moker!" he said finally.
"I made a mistake. The gage is set for a thousand feet instead of
two hundred. I forgot to change it. The charge, after passing
through the steel plate, and the scarecrow figure, destroying the
latter, went on, and shot through the side of your house."

"Ha! I knew you were trying to shoot me!" exclaimed the still angry
man. "I'll have the law on you for this!"

"Oh, that's all nonsense!" broke in Ned Newton "Everybody knows Tom
Smith wouldn't try to shoot you, or any one else, Mr. Moker."

"Then why did he shoot at me?"

"That was a mistake," explained Tom, "and I apologize to you for
it."

"Humph! A lot of good that would do me, if I'd been killed!"
muttered the miser. "I'm going to sue you for this. You might have
put me in my grave."

"Impossible!" exclaimed Tom.

"Why impossible?" demanded the visitor.

"Because I had so set the rifle that almost the entire force of the
electrical bullet was expended in blowing apart the scarecrow figure
I made for a test," explained Tom. "All that passed through your
house was a small charge, and, if it HAD hit you there would have
been no more than a little shock, such as you would feel in taking
hold of an electric battery."

"How do I know this?" asked the man cunningly. "You say so, but for
all I know you may have wanted to kill me."

"Why?" asked Tom, trying not to laugh.

"Oh, so you might get some of my money. Of course I ain't got none,"
the miser went on quickly, "but folks thinks I've got a lot, and I
have to be on the lookout all the while, or they'd murder me for
it."

"I wouldn't," declared the young inventor. "It was a mistake. Only
part of the spent charge passed near you. Why, if it had been a
powerful charge you would never have been able to come over here. I
set the main charge to go off inside the scarecrow, and it did so,
as you can see by looking at what's left of it," and he pointed to
the pile of clothes and rags.

"How do I know this?" insisted the miser with a leer at the two
lads.

"Because if the charge had gone off either before or after it passed
through the figure, it would not have caused such havoc of the cloth
and straw," explained Tom. "First the charge would have destroyed
the steel plate, which it passed through without even denting it.
Why, look here, I will now fire the rifle at short range, and set it
to destroy the plate. See what happens."

He quickly adjusted the weapon, and aimed it at the plate, which,
had again been set up on the range. This time Tom was careful to set
the gage so that even a small part of the spent. charge would not go
outside the gallery.

The young inventor pressed the button, and instantly the heavy steel
plate was bent, torn and twisted as though a small sized cannon ball
had gone through it.

"That's what the rifle will do at short range," said Tom. "Don't
worry, Mr. Moker, you didn't have a narrow escape. You were in no
danger at all, though I apologize for the fright I caused you."

"Humph! That's an easy way to get out of it!" exclaimed the miser.
"I believe I could sue you for damages, anyhow. Look at my scorched
wall paper."

"Oh, I'll pay for that," said Tom quickly, for he did not wish to
have trouble with the unpleasant man. "Will ten dollars be enough?"
He knew that the whole room could be repapered for that, and he did
not believe the wall-covering was sufficiently damaged for such work
to be necessary.

"Well, if you'll make it twelve dollars, I won't say anything more
about it," agreed the miser craftily, "though it's worth thirteen
dollars, if it is a penny. Give me twelve dollars, Tom Swift, and I
won't prosecute you."

"All right, twelve dollars it shall be," responded the young
inventor, passing over the money, and glad to be rid of the
unpleasant character.

"And after this, just fire that gun of yours the other way,"
suggested Mr. Moker as he went out, carefully folding the bills
which Tom had handed him.

"Hum! that was rather queer," remarked Ned, after a pause.

"It sure was," agreed his chum. "This rifle will do more than I
thought it would. I'll have to be more careful. I was sure I set the
gage for two hundred feet. I'll have to invent some automatic
attachment to prevent it being discharged when the gage is set
wrong." Let us state here that Tom did this, and never had another
accident.

"Well, does this end the test?" asked Ned.

"No, indeed. I want you to try it, while I look on," spoke Tom. "We
haven't any more stuffed figures to fire at, but I'll set up some
targets. Come on, try your luck at a shot."

"I'm afraid I might disturb Mr. Moker, or some of the neighbors."

"No danger. I've got it adjusted right now. Come on, see if you can
shatter this steel target," and Tom set up a small one at the end of
the range.

Then, having properly fixed the weapon, Tom handed it to his chum,
and, taking his place in a protected part of the gallery, prepared
to watch the effect of the shot.

"Let her go!" cried Tom, and Ned pressed the button.

The effect was wonderful. Though there was no noise, smoke nor
flame, the steel plate seemed to crumple up, and collapse as if it
had been melted in the fire. There was a jagged hole through the
center, but some frail boards back of it were not even splintered.

"Good shot!" cried Tom enthusiastically. "I had the distance gage
right that time."

"You sure did," agreed Ned. "The electric bullet stopped as soon as
it did its work on the plate. What's next?"

"I'm going to try a difficult test," explained Tom. "You know I said
the gun would shoot luminous charges?" "Yes."

"Well, I'm going to try that, now. I wish we had another image to
shoot at, but I'll take a big dry-goods box, and make believe it's
an elephant. Now, this is going to be a hard test, such as we'd meet
with, if we were hunting in Africa. I want you to help me."

"What am I to do?" asked Ned.

"I want you to go outside," explained Tom, "set up a dry-goods box
against the side of the little hill back of the shed, and not tell
me where you put it. Then I'll go out, and, by means of the luminous
charge, I'll locate the box, set the distance gage, and destroy it."

"Well, you can see it anyhow, in the moonlight," objected Ned.

"No, the moon is under a cloud now," explained Tom, looking out of a
window. "It's quite dark, and will give me just the test I want for
my new electric rifle."

"But won't it be dangerous, firing in the dark? Suppose you misjudge
the distance, and the bullet, or charge, files off and hits some
one?"

"It can't. I'll set the distance gage before I shoot. But if I
should happen to make a mistake the charge will go into the side of
the hill, and spend itself there. There is no danger. Go ahead, and
set up the box, and then come and tell me. Mr. Jackson will help
you."

Ned and the engineer left the gallery. As Tom had, said, it was very
dark now, and if Tom could see in the night to hit a box some
distance away, his weapon would be all that he claimed for it.

"This will do," said the engineer, as he pointed to a box, one of
several piled up outside the shed. The two could hardly see to make
their way along, carrying it to the foot of the hill, and they
stumbled several times. But at last it was in position, and then Ned
departed to call Tom, and have him try the difficult test--that of
hitting an object in the dark.




CHAPTER IV

BIG TUSKS WANTED


"Well, are you all ready for me?" asked the young inventor, as he
took up his curious weapon, and followed Ned out into the yard. It
was so dark that they had fairly to stumble along.

"Yes, we're ready," answered Ned. "And you'll be a good one, Tom, if
you do this stunt. Now stand here, "he went on, as he indicated a
place as well as he could in the dark. The box is somewhere in that
direction," and he waved his hand vaguely. "I'm not going to tell
you any more, and let's see you find it.

"Oh, I will, all right--or, rather, my electric rifle will,"
asserted Tom.

The inventor of the curious and terrible weapon took his position.
Behind him stood Ned and Mr. Jackson, and just before Tom was ready
to fire, his father came stalking through the darkness, calling to
them.

"Are you there, Tom?"

"Yes Dad, is anything the matter?"

"No, but I thought I'd like to see what luck you have. Rad was
saying you were going to have a test in the dark."

"I'm about ready for it," replied Tom. "I'm going to blow up a box
that I can't see. You know how it's done, Dad, for you helped me in
perfecting the luminous charge, but it's going to be something of a
novelty to the others. Here we go, now!"

Tom raised his rifle, and aimed it in the dark. Ned Newton,
straining his eyes to see, was sure the young inventor was pointing
the gun at least twenty feet to one side of where the box was
located, but he said nothing, for from experiences in the past, he
realized that Tom knew what he was doing.

There was a little clicking sound, as the youth moved some gear
wheel on his gun. Then there came a faint crackling noise, like some
distant wireless apparatus beginning to flash a message through
space.

Suddenly a little ball of purplish light shot through the darkness
and sped forward like some miniature meteor. It shed a curious
illuminating glow all about, and the ground, and the objects on it
were brought into relief as by a lightning flash.

An instant later the light increased in intensity, and seemed to
burst like some piece of aerial fireworks. There was a bright glare,
in which Ned and the others could see the various buildings about
the shed. They could see each other's faces, and they looked pale
and ghastly in the queer glow. They could see the box, brought into
bold relief, where Ned and the engineer had placed it.

Then, before the light had died away, they witnessed a curious
sight. The heavy wooden box seemed to dissolve, to collapse and to
crumple up like one of paper, and ere the last rays of the
illuminating bullet faded, the watchers saw the splinters of wood
fall back with a clatter in a little heap on the spot where the dry-
goods case had been.

A silence followed, and the darkness was all the blacker by contrast
with the intense light. At length Tom spoke, and he could not keep
from his voice a note of triumph.

"Well, did I do it?" he asked.

"You sure did!" exclaimed Ned heartily.

"Fine!" cried Mr. Swift.

"Golly! I wouldn't gib much fo' de hide ob any burglar what comed
around heah!" muttered Eradicate Sampson. "Dat box am knocked clean
into nuffiness, Massa Tom."

"That's what I wanted to do," explained the lad. "And I guess this
will end the test for tonight."

"But I don't exactly understand it," spoke Ned, as they all moved
toward the Swift home, Eradicate going to the stable to see how his
mule was. "Do you have two kinds of bullets, Tom, one for night and
one for the daytime?"

"No," answered Tom, "there is only one kind of bullet, and, as I
have said, that isn't a bullet at all. That is, you can't see it, or
handle it, but you can feel it. Strictly speaking, it is a
concentrated discharge of wireless electricity directed against a
certain object. You can't see it any more than you can see a
lightning bolt, though that is sometimes visible as a ball of fire.
My electric rifle bullets are similar to a discharge of lightning,
except that they are invisible."

"But we saw the one just now," objected Ned.

"No, you didn't see the bullet," said Tom.

"You saw the illuminating flash which I send out just before I fire,
to reveal the object I am to hit. That is another part of my rifle
and is only used at night."

"You see I shoot out a ball of electrical fire which will disclose
the target, or the enemy at whom I am firing. As soon as that is
discharged the rifle automatically gets ready to shoot the electric
charge, and I have only to press the proper button, and the
'bullet,' as I call it, follows on the heels of the ball of light.
Do you see?"

"Perfectly," exclaimed Ned with a laugh. "What a gun that would be
for hunting, since most all wild beasts come out only at night."

"That was one object in making this invention," said Tom. "I only
hope I get a chance to use it now."

"I thought you were going to Africa after elephants," spoke Mr.
Swift.

"Well, I did think of it." admitted Tom, "but I haven't made any
definite plans. But come into the house, Ned. and I'll show you more
in detail how my rifle works."

Thereupon the two chums spent some time going into the mysteries of
the new weapon. Mr. Swift and Mr. Jackson were also much interested,
for, though they had seen the gun previously and had helped Tom
perfect it, they had not yet tired of discussing its merits.

Ned stayed quite late that night, and promised to come over the next
day, and watch Tom do some more shooting.

"I'll show you how to use it, too," promised the young inventor, and
he was as good as his word, initiating Ned into the mysteries of the
electric rifle, and showing him to store the charges of death-
dealing electricity in the queer-looking stock.

For a week after that Tom and Ned practiced with the terrible gun,
taking care not to have any more mishaps like the one that had
marked the first night. They were both good shots with ordinary
weapons and it was not long before they had equaled their record
with the new instrument.

It was one warm afternoon, when Tom was out in the meadow at one
side of his house, practicing with his rifle on some big boxes he
had set up for targets, that he saw an elderly man standing close to
the fence watching him. When Tom blew to pieces a particularly large
packing-case, standing a long distance away from it, the stranger
called to the youth.

"I beg your pardon," he said, "but is that a dynamite gun you are
using?"

"No, it's an electric rifle," was the answer.

"Would you mind telling me something about it?" went on the elderly
man, and as Tom's weapon was now fully protected by patents, the
young inventor cordially invited the stranger to come nearer and see
how it worked.

"That's the greatest thing I ever saw!" exclaimed the man
enthusiastically when Tom had blown up another box, and had told of
the illumination for night firing. "The most wonderful weapon I ever
heard of! What a gun it would be in my business."

"What is your trade?" asked Tom curiously, for he had noted that the
man, while aged, was rugged and hearty, and his skin was tanned a
leathery brown, showing that he was much in the open air.

"I'm a hunter," was the reply, "a hunter of big game, principally
elephants, hippos and rhinoceroses. I've just finished a season in
Africa, and I'm going back there again soon. I came on to New York
to get a new elephant gun. I've got a sister living over in
Waterford, and I've been visiting her. I went out for a stroll to-
day, and I came farther than I intended. That's how I happened to be
passing here."

"A sister in Waterford, eh?" mused Tom, wondering whether the
elephant hunter had met Mr. Damon. "And how soon are you going hack
to Africa, Mr.--er--" and Tom hesitated.

"Durban is my name, Alexander Durban," said the old man. "Why, I am
to start back in a few weeks. I've got an order for a pair of big
elephant tusks--the largest I can get for a wealthy New York man,--
and I'm anxious to fulfil the contract. The game isn't what it once
was. There's more competition and the elephants are scarcer. So I've
got to hustle."

"I got me a new gun. but my! it's nothing to what yours is. With
that weapon I could do about as I pleased. I could do night hunting,
which is hard in the African jungle. Then I wouldn't have any
trouble getting the big tusks I'm after. I could get a pair of them,
and live easy the rest of my life. Yes, I wouldn't ask anything
better than a gun like yours. But I s'pose they cost like the
mischief?" He looked a question at Tom.

"This is the only one there is," was the lad's answer. "But I am
very glad to have met you, Mr. Durban. Won't you come into the
house? I'm sure my father will be glad to see you, and I have
something I'd like to talk to you about," and Tom, with many wild
ideas in his head, led the old elephant hunter toward the house.

The dream of the young inventor might come true after all.




CHAPTER V

RUSH WORK


Mr. Swift made the African hunter warmly welcome, and listened with
pride to the words of praise Mr. Durban bestowed on Tom regarding
the rifle.

"Yes, my boy has certainly done wonders along the inventive line,"
said Mr. Swift.

"Not half as much as you have, Dad," interrupted the lad, for Tom
was a modest youth.

"You should see his sky racer," went on the old inventor.

"Sky racer? What's that?" asked Mr. Durban. "Is it another kind of
gun or cannon?"

"It's an aeroplane--an airship," explained Mr. Swift.

"An airship!" exclaimed the old elephant hunter. "Say, you don't
mean that you make balloons, do you?"

"Well, they're not exactly balloons," replied Tom, as he briefly
explained what an aeroplane was, for Mr. Durban, having been in the
wilds of the jungle so much, had had very little chance to see the
wonders and progress of civilization.

"They are better than balloons," went on Tom, "for they can go where
you want them to."

"Say! That's the very thing!" cried the old hunter enthusiastically.
"If there's one thing more than another that is needed in hunting in
Africa it's an airship. The travel through the jungle is something
fierce, and that, more than anything else, interferes with my work.
I can't cover ground enough, and when I do get on the track of a
herd of elephants, and they get away, it's sometimes a week before I
can catch up to them again."

"For, in spite of their size, elephants can travel very fast, and
once they get on the go, nothing can stop them. An airship would be
the very thing to hunt elephants with in Africa--an airship and this
electric rifle. I wonder why you haven't thought of going, Tom
Swift."

"I have thought of it," answered the young inventor, "and that's why
I asked you in. I want to talk about it."

"Do you mean you want to go?" demanded the old man eagerly.

"I certainly do!"

"Then I'm your man! Say, Tom Swift, I'd be proud to have you go to
Africa with me. I'd be proud to have you a member of my hunting
party, and, though I don't like to boast, still if you'll ask any of
the big-game people they'll tell you that not every one can
accompany Aleck Durban."

Tom realized that he was speaking to an authority and a most
desirable companion, should he go to Africa, and he was very glad of
the chance that had made him acquainted with the veteran hunter.

"Will you go with me?" asked Mr. Durban. "You and your electric gun
and your airship? Will you come to Africa to hunt elephants, and
help me get the big tusks I'm after?"

"I will!" exclaimed Tom.

"Then we'll start at once. There's no need of delaying here any
longer."

"Oh, but I haven't an airship ready," said the young inventor. The
face of the old hunter expressed his disappointment.

"Then we'll have to give up the scheme," he said ruefully.

"Not at all," Tom told him. "I have all the material on hand for
building a new airship. I have had it in mind for some time, and I
have done some work on it. I stopped it to perfect my electric
rifle, but, now that is done, I'll tackle the Black Hawk again, and
rush that to completion."-

"The Black Hawk?" repeated Mr. Durban, wonderingly.

"Yes, that's what I will name my new craft. The RED CLOUD was
destroyed, and so I thought I'd change the color this time, and
avoid bad luck."

"Good!" exclaimed the hunter. "When do you think you can have it
finished?"

"Oh, possibly in a month--perhaps sooner, and then we will go to
Africa and hunt elephants!"

"Bless my ivory paper cutter!" exclaimed a voice in the hall just
outside the library. "Bless my fingernails! But who's talking about
going to Africa?"

The old hunter looked at Tom and his father in surprise, but the
young inventor laughing and going to the door, called out:

"Come on in, Mr. Damon. I didn't hear you ring. There is some one
here from your town."

"Is it my wife?" asked the odd gentleman who was always blessing
something. "She said she was going to her mother's to spend a few
weeks, and so I thought I'd come over here and see if you had
anything new on the program. The first thing I hear is that you are
going to Africa. And so there's some one from Waterford in there,
eh? Is it my wife?"

"No," answered Tom with another laugh. "Come on in Mr. Damon."

"Bless my toothpick!" exclaimed the odd gentleman, as he saw the
grizzled elephant hunter sitting between Tom and Mr. Swift. "I have
seen you somewhere before, my dear sir."

"Yes," admitted Mr. Durban, "if you're from Waterford you have
probably seen me traveling about the streets there. I'm stopping
with my sister, Mrs. Douglass, but I can't stand it to be in the
house much, so I'm out of doors, wandering about a good bit of the
time. I miss my jungle. But we'll soon be in Africa, Tom Swift and
me."

"Is it possible, Tom?" asked Mr. Damon. "Bless my diamond mines! but
what are you going to do next?"

"It's hard to say," was the answer. "But you came just in time. Mr.
Damon. I'm going to rush work on the Black Hawk, my newest airship,
and we'll leave for elephant land inside of a month, taking my new
electric rifle along. Will you come"

"Bless my penknife! I never thought of such a thing. I--I--guess--
no, I don't know about it--yes, I'll go!" he suddenly exclaimed.
"I'll, go! Hurrah for the elephants!" and he jumped up and shook
hands in turn with Mr. Durban, to whom he had been formally
introduced, and with Tom and Mr. Swift.

"Then it's all settled but the details," declared the youth, "and
now I'll call in Mr. Jackson, and we'll talk about how soon we can
have the airship ready."

"My, but you folks are almost as speedy as a herd of the big
elephants themselves!" exclaimed Mr. Durban, and with the advent of
the engineer the talk turned to things mechanical among Tom and Mr.
Jackson and Mr. Damon, while Mr. Durban told Mr. Swift hunting
stories which the old inventor greatly enjoyed.

The next day Tom engaged two machinists who had worked for him
building airships before, and in the next week rush work began on
the new Black Hawk. Meanwhile Mr. Durban was a frequent visitor at
Tom's home, where he learned to use the new rifle, declaring it was
even more wonderful than he had at first supposed.

"That will get the elephants!" he exclaimed. It did, as you shall
soon learn, and it also was the means of saving several lives in the
wilds of the African jungle.




CHAPTER VI

NEWS FROM ANDY


Tom Swift's former airship, the Red Cloud, had been such a fine
craft, and had done such good service that he thought, in building a
successor, that he could do no better than to follow the design of
the skyship which had been destroyed in the ice caves. But, on
talking with the old elephant hunter, and learning something of the
peculiarities of the African jungle the young inventor decided on
certain changes.

In general the Black Hawk would be on the lines of the Red Cloud but
it would be smaller and lighter and would also be capable of swifter
motion.

"You want it so that it will rise and descend quickly and at sharp
angles," said Mr. Durban.

"Why," inquired Tom.

"Because in Africa, at least in the part where we will go, there are
wide patches of jungle and forest, with here and there big open
places. If you are skimming along close to the ground, in an open
place, in pursuit of a herd of elephants and they should suddenly
plunge into the forest, you would want to be able to rise above the
trees quickly."

"That's so," admitted Tom. "Then I'll have to use a smaller gas bag
than we had on the other ship, for the air resistance to that big
one made us go slowly at times."

"Will it be as safe with a small bag?" Mr. Damon wanted to know.

"Yes, for I will use a more powerful gas, so that we will be more
quickly lifted," said the young inventor. "I will also retain the
aeroplane feature, so that the Black Hawk will be a combined biplane
and dirigible balloon. But it will have many new features. I have
the plans all drawn for a new style of gas generating apparatus, and
I think it can be made in time."

There were busy days about the Swift home. Mrs. Baggert, the
housekeeper, was in despair. She said the good meals she got ready
were wasted, because no one would come to table when they were
ready. She would ring the bell, and announce that dinner would be
served in five minutes.

Then Tom would shout from his workshop that he could not leave until
he had inserted a certain lever in place. Mr. Jackson would
positively decline to sit down until he had screwed fast some part
of a machine. Even Mr. Swift, who, because of his recent illness,
was not allowed to do much, would often delay his meal to test some
new style of gears.

As for Mr. Damon, it was to be expected that he would be eccentric
as he always was. He was not an expert mechanic, but he knew
something of machinery and was of considerable help to Tom in the
rush work on the airship. He would hear the dinner bell ring, and
would exclaim:

"Bless my napkin ring! I can't come now. I have to fix up this
electrical register first."

And so it would go. Eradicate and Boomerang, his mule, were the only
ones who ate regularly, and they always insisted on stopping at
exactly twelve o'clock to partake of the noonday meal.

"'Cause ef I didn't," explained the colored man, "dat contrary mule
ob mine would lay down in de dust ob de road an' not move a step,
lessen' he got his oats. So dat's why we has t' eat, him an' me."

"Well, I'm glad there's some one who's got sense," murmured Mrs.
Baggert. Eradicate and Boomerang were of great service in the
hurried work that followed, for the colored man in his cart brought
from town, or from the freight depot, many things that Tom needed.

The young inventor was very enthusiastic about his proposed trip,
and at night, after a hard day's work in the shop, he would read
books on African hunting, or he would sit and listen to the stories
told by Mr. Durban. And the latter knew how to tell hunting tales,
for he had been long in his dangerous calling, and had had many
narrow escapes.

"And there are other dangers than from elephants and wild beasts in
Africa," he said.

"Bless my toothbrush!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "Do you mean cannibals,
Mr. Durban?"

"Some cannibals," was the reply. "but they're not the worst. I mean
the red pygmies. I hope we don't get into their clutches."

"Red pygmies!" repeated Tom, wonderingly.

"Yes, they're a tribe of little creatures, about three feet high,
covered with thick reddish hair, who live in the central part of
Africa, near some of the best elephant-hunting ground. They are
wild, savage and ferocious, and what they lack individually in
strength, they make up in numbers. They're like little red apes, and
woe betide the unlucky hunter who falls into their merciless hands.
They treat him worse than the cannibals do."

"Then we'll look out for them," said Tom. "But I fancy my electric
rifle will make them give us a wide berth."

"It's a great gun," admitted the old hunter with a shake of his
head, "but those red pygmies are terrible creatures. I hope we don't
get them on our trail. But tell me, Tom, how are you coming on with
the airship? for I don't know much about mechanics, and to me it
looks as if it would never be put together. I's like one of those
queer puzzles I've seen 'em selling in the streets of London."

"Oh, it's nearer ready than it looks to be," said Tom. "We'll have
it assembled, and ready for a trial in about two weeks more."

Work on the Black Hawk was rushed more than ever in the next few
days, another extra machinist being engaged. Then the craft began to
assume shape and form, and with the gas bag partly inflated and the
big planes stretching out from either side, it began to look
something like the ill-fated Red Cloud.

"It's going to be a fine ship!" cried Tom enthusiastically, one day,
as he went to the far side of the ship to get a perspective view of
it. "We'll make good time in this."

"Are you going to sail all the way to Africa--across the ocean--in
her?" asked Mr. Durban, in somewhat apprehensive tones.

"Oh, no," replied Tom. "I believe she would be capable of taking us
across the ocean, but there is no need of running any unnecessary
risks. I want to get her safely to Africa, and have her do stunts in
elephant land."

"Then what are your plans?" asked the hunter.

"We'll put her together here," said Tom, "give her a good try-out to
see that she works well, and then pack her up for shipment to the
African coast by steamer. We'll go on the same ship, and when we
arrive we'll put the Black Hawk together again, and set sail for the
interior."

"Good idea," commented Mr. Durban. "Now, if you've no objections,
I'm going to do a little practice with the electric rifle."

"Go ahead," assented Tom. "There comes Ned Newton; he'll be glad of
a chance for a few shots while I work on this new propeller motor.
It just doesn't suit me."

The bank clerk, who had arranged to go to Africa with Tom, was seen
advancing toward the aeroplane shed. In his hand Ned held a paper,
and as he saw Tom he called out:

"Have you heard the news?"

"What news?" inquired the young inventor.

"About Andy Foger. He and his aeroplane are lost!"

"Lost!" cried Tom, for in spite of the mean way the bully had
treated him our hero did not wish him any harm.

"Well, not exactly lost," went on Ned, as he held out the paper to
Tom, "but he and his sky-craft have disappeared."

"Disappeared?"

"Yes. You know he and that German, Mr. Landbacher, went over to
Europe to give some aviation exhibitions. Well, I see by this paper
that they went to Egypt, and were doing a high-flying stunt there,
when a gale sprang up, they lost control of the aeroplane and it was
swept out of sight."

"In which direction; out to sea?"

"No, toward the interior of Africa."

"Toward the interior of Africa!" cried Tom. "And that's where we're
going in a couple of weeks. Andy in Africa!"

"'Maybe we'll see him there," suggested Ned.

"Well, I certainly hope we do not!" exclaimed Tom, as he turned back
to his work, with an undefinable sense of fear in his heart.




CHAPTER VII

THE BLACK HAWK FLIES


It was with no little surprise that the news of the plight that was
said to have befallen Andy Foger was received by Tom and his
associates. The newspaper had quite an account of the affair, and,
even allowing the usual discount for the press dispatches, it looked
as if the former bully was in rather distressing circumstances.

"He won't have to be carried very far into Africa to be in a bad
country," said the old hunter. "Of course, some parts of the
continent are all right, and for me, I like it all, where there's
hunting to be had. But I guess your young friend Foger won't care
for it."

"He's no friend of ours." declared Ned, as Tom was reading the
newspaper account. "Still, I don't wish him any bad luck, and I do
hope he doesn't become the captive of the red pygmies."

"So do I," echoed the old hunter fervently. There was no news of
Andy in the papers the next day, though there were cable dispatches
speculating on what might have happened to him and the airship. In
Shopton the dispatches created no little comment, and it was said
that Mr. Foger was going to start for Africa at once to rescue his
son. This, however, could not he confirmed.

Meanwhile Tom and his friends were very busy over the Black Hawk.
Every hour saw the craft nearer completion, for the young inventor
had had much experience in this sort of work now, and knew just how
to proceed.

To Mr. Damon were intrusted certain things which he could well
attend to, and though he frequently stopped to bless his necktie or
his shoelaces, still he got along fairly well.

There would be no necessity of purchasing supplies in this country,
for they could get all they needed in the African city of Majumba,
on the western coast, where they planned to land. There the airship
would be put together, stocked with provisions and supplies, and
they would begin their journey inland. They planned to head for Buka
Meala, crossing the Congo River, and then go into the very interior
of the heart of the dark continent.

As we have described in detail, in the former books of this series,
the construction of Tom Swift's airship, the Red Cloud, and as the
Black Hawk was made in a similar manner to that, we will devote but
brief space to it now. As the story proceeds, and the need arises
for a description of certain features, we will give them to you, so
that you will have a clear idea of what a wonderful craft it was.

Sufficient to say that there was a gas bag, made of a light but
strong material, and capable of holding enough vapor, of a new and
secret composition, to lift the airship with its load. This was the
dirigible-balloon feature of the craft, and with the two powerful
propellers, fore and aft (in which particular the Black Hawk
differed from the Red Cloud which had two forward propellers);--with
these two powerful wooden screws, as we have said, the new ship
could travel swiftly without depending on the wing planes.

But as there is always a possibility of the gas bag being punctured,
or the vapor suddenly escaping from one cause or another, Tom did
not depend on this alone to keep his craft afloat. It was a perfect
aeroplane, and with the gas bag entirely empty could be sent
scudding along at any height desired. To enable it to rise by means
of the wings, however, it was necessary to start it in motion along
the ground, and for this purpose wheels were provided.

There was a large body or car to the craft, suspended from beneath
the gas bag, and in this car were the cabins, the living, sleeping
and eating apartments, the storerooms and the engine compartment.

This last was a marvel of skill, for it contained besides the gas
machine, and the motor for working the propellers, dynamos, gages,
and instruments for telling the speed and height, motors for doing
various pieces of work, levers, wheels, cogs, gears, tanks for
storing the lifting gas, and other features of interest.

There were several staterooms for the use of the young captain and
the passengers, an observation and steering tower, a living-room,
where they could all assemble as the ship was sailing through the
air, and a completely equipped kitchen.

This last was Mr. Damon's special pride, as he was a sort of cook,
and he liked nothing better than to get up a meal when the craft was
two or three miles high, and scudding along at seventy-five miles an
hour.

In addition there were to be taken along many scientific
instruments, weapons of defense and offense, in addition to the
electric rifle, and various other objects which will be spoken of in
due time.

"Well," remarked Tom Swift one afternoon, following a hard day's
work in the shop, "I think, if all goes well, and we have good
weather, I'll give the Black Hawk a trial tomorrow."

"Do you think it will fly?" asked Ned.

"There is no telling," was the answer of the young inventor. "These
things are more or less guesswork, even when you make two exactly
alike. As far as I can tell, we have now a better craft than the Red
Cloud was, but it remains to be seen how she will behave."

They worked late that night, putting the finishing touches on the
Black Hawk, and in the morning the new airship was wheeled out of
the shed, and placed on the level starting ground, ready for the
trial flight.

Only the bare machinery was in her, as yet, and the gas bag had not
been inflated as Tom wanted to try the plane feature first. But the
vapor machine was all ready to start generating the gas whenever it
was needed. Nor was the Black Hawk painted and decorated as she
would be when ready to be sent to Africa. On the whole, she looked
rather crude as she rested there on the bicycle wheels, awaiting the
starting of the big propellers. As the stores and supplies were not
yet in, Tom took aboard, in addition to Mr. Damon, Ned, his father,
Mr. Jackson and Mr. Durban, some bags of sand to represent the extra
weight that would have to be carried.

"If she'll rise with this load she'll do," announced the young
inventor, as he went carefully over the craft, looking to see that
everything was in shape.

"If she does rise it will be a new experience for me," spoke the old
elephant hunter. "I've never been in an airship before. It doesn't
seem possible that we can get up in the air with this machine."

"Maybe we won't," spoke Tom, who was always a little diffident about
a new piece of machinery.

"Well, if it doesn't do it the first time, it will the second, or
the fifty-second," declared Ned Newton. "Tom Swift doesn't give up
until he succeeds."

"Stop it! You'll make me blush!" cried the Black Hawk's owner as he
tried the different gages and levers to see that they were all
right.

After what seemed like a long time he gave the word for those who
were to make the trial trip to take their places. They did so, and
then, with Mr. Jackson, Tom went to the engine room. There was a
little delay, due to the fact that some adjustment was necessary on
the main motor. But at last it was fixed.

"Are you all ready?" called Tom.

"All ready," answered Mr. Damon. The old elephant hunter sat in a
chair, nervously gripping the arms, and with a grim look on his
tanned face. Mr. Swift was cool, as Ned, for they had made many
trips in the air. Outside were Eradicate Sampson and Mrs. Baggert.

"Here we go!" suddenly cried Tom, and he yanked over the lever that
started the main motor and propellers. The Black Hawk trembled
throughout her entire length. She shivered and shook. Faster and
faster whirled the great wooden screws. The motor hummed and
throbbed.

Slowly the Black Hawk moved across the ground. Then she gathered
speed. Now she was fairly rushing over the level space. Tom Swift
tilted the elevation rudder, and with a suddenness that was
startling, at least to the old elephant hunter, the new airship shot
upward on a steep, slant.

"The Black Hawk flies!" yelled Ned Newton. "Now for elephant land
and the big tusks!"

"Yes, and perhaps for the red pygmies, too," added Tom in a low
voice. Then he gave his whole attention to the management of his new
machine, which was rapidly mounting upward, with a speed rivalling
that of his former big craft.




CHAPTER VIII

OFF FOR AFRICA


Higher and higher went the Black Hawk, far above the earth, until
the old elephant hunter, looking down, said in a voice which he
tried to make calm and collected, but which trembled in spite of
himself:

"Of course I'm not an expert at this game, Tom Swift, but it looks
to me as if we'd never get down. Don't you think we're high enough?"

"For the time being, yes," answered the young inventor. "I didn't
think she'd climb so far without the use of the gas. She's doing
well."

"Bless my topknot, yes!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "She beats the Red
Cloud, Tom. Try her on a straight-away course."

Which the youth did, pointing the nose of the craft along parallel
to the surface of the earth, and nearly a mile above it. Then,
increasing the speed of the motor, and with the big propellers
humming, they made fast time.

The old elephant hunter grew more calm as he saw that the airship
did not show any inclination to fall, and he noted that Tom and the
others not only knew how to manage it, but took their fight as much
a matter of course as if they were in an automobile skimming along
on the surface of the ground.

Tom put his craft through a number of evolutions, and when he found
that she was in perfect control as an aeroplane, he started the gas
machine, filled the big black bag overhead, and, when it was
sufficiently buoyant, he shut off the motor, and the Black Hawk
floated along like a balloon.

"That's what we'll do if our power happens to give out when we get
over an African jungle, with a whole lot of wild elephants down
below, and a forest full of the red pygmies waiting for us,"
explained Tom to Mr. Durban.

"And I guess you'll need to do it, too," answered the hunter. "I
don't know which I fear worse, the bad elephants wild with rage, as
they get some times, or the little red men who are as strong as
gorillas, and as savage as wolves. It would be all up with us if we
got into their hands. But I think this airship will be just what we
need in Africa. I'd have been able to get out of many a tight place
if I had had one on my last trip."

While the Black Hawk hung thus, up the air, not moving, save as the
wind blew her, Tom with his father and Mr. Jackson made an
inspection of the machinery to find out whether it had been strained
any. They found that it had worked perfectly, and soon the craft was
in motion again, her nose this time being pointed toward the earth.
Tom let out some of the gas, and soon the airship was on the ground
in front of the shed she had so recently left.

"She's all right," decided the young inventor after a careful
inspection. "I'll give her a couple more trials, put on the
finishing touches and then we'll be ready for our trip to Africa.
Have you got everything arranged to go, Ned?"

"Sure. I have a leave of absence from the bank, thanks to your
father and Mr. Damon, most of my clothes are packed, I've bought a
gun and I've got a lot of quinine in case I get a fever."

"Good!" cried the elephant hunter. "You'll do all right, I reckon.
I'm glad I met you young fellows. Well, I've lived through my first
trip in the air, which is more than I expected when I started."

They discussed their plans at some length, for, now that the airship
had proved all that they had hoped for, it would not be long ere
they were under way. In the days that followed Tom put the finishing
touches on the craft, arranged to have it packed up for shipment,
and spent some time practicing with his electric rifle. He got to be
an expert shot, and Mr. Durban, who was a wonder with the ordinary
rifle, praised the young inventor highly.

"There won't many of the big tuskers get away from you, Tom Swift,"
he said. "And that reminds me, I got a letter the other day, from
the firm I collect ivory for, stating that the price had risen
because of a scarcity, and urging me to hurry back to Africa and get
all I could. It seems that war has broken out among some of the
central African tribes, and they are journeying about in the jungle,
on the war path here and there, and have driven the elephants into
the very deepest wilds, where the ordinary hunters can't get at
them."

"Maybe we won't have any luck, either," suggested Ned.

"Oh, yes, we will," declared the hunter. "With our airship, the
worst forest of the dark continent won't have any terrors for us,
for we can float above it. And the fights of the natives won't have
any effect. In a way, this will be a good thing, for with the price
of ivory soaring, we can make more money than otherwise. There's a
chance for us all to get a lot of money."

"Bless my piano keys!" exclaimed Mr. Damon, "if I can get just one
elephant, and pull out his big ivory teeth, I'll be satisfied. I
want a nice pair of tusks to set up on either side of my fireplace
for ornaments."

"A mighty queer place for such-like ornaments," said Mr. Durban in a
low voice. Then he added: "Well, the sooner we get started the
better I'll like it, for I want to get that pair of big tusks for a
special customer of mine."

"I'll give the Black Hawk one more trial flight, and then take her
apart and ship her," decided Tom, and the final flight, a most
successful one, took place the following day.

Then came another busy season when the airship was taken apart for
shipment to the coast of Africa by steamer. It was put into big
boxes and crates, and Eradicate and his mule took them to the
station in Shopton.

"Don't you want to come to Africa with us, Rad?" asked Tom, when the
last of the cases had been sent off. "You'll find a lot of your
friends there."

"No, indeedy, I doan't want t' go," answered the colored man,
"though I would like to see dat country."

"Then why don't you come?"

"Hu! Yo' think, Massa Tom, dat I go anywhere dat I might meet dem
little red men what Massa Durban talk about? No, sah, dey might hurt
mah mule Boomerang."

"Oh, I wasn't going to take the mule along," said Tom, wondering how
the creature might behave in the airship.

"Not take Boomerang? Den I SUTTINLY ain't goin," and Eradicate
walked off, highly offended, to give some oats to his faithful if
somewhat eccentric steed.

After the airship had been sent off there yet remained much for Tom
Swift to do. He had to send along a number of special tools and
appliances with which to put the ship together again, and also some
with which to repair the craft in case of accident. So that this
time was pretty well occupied. But at length everything was in
readiness, and with his electric rifle knocked down for
transportation, and with his baggage, and that of the others, all
packed, they set off one morning to take the train for New York,
where they would get a steamer for Africa.

Numerous good-bys had been said, and Tom had made a farewell call on
Mary Nestor, promising to bring her some trophy from elephant land,
though he did not quite know what it would be.

Mr. Damon, as the train started, blessed everything he could think
of. Mr. Swift waved his hand and wished his son and the others good
luck, feeling a little lonesome that he could not make one of the
party. Ned was eager with excitement, and anticipation of what lay
before him. Tom Swift was thinking of what he could accomplish with
his electric rifle, and of the wonderful sights he would see, and,
as for the old elephant hunter, he was very glad to be on the move
again, after so many weeks of idleness, for he was a very active
man.

Their journey to New York was uneventful, and they found that the
parts of the airship had safely arrived, and had been taken aboard
the steamer. The little party went aboard themselves, after a day
spent in sight-seeing, and that afternoon the Soudalar, which was
the vessel's name, steamed away from the dock at high tide.

"Off for Africa!" exclaimed Tom to Ned, as they stood at the rail,
watching the usual crowd wave farewells. "Off for Africa, Ned."

As Tom spoke, a gentleman who had been standing near him and his
chum, vigorously waving his hand to some one on the pier, turned
quickly. He looked sharply at the young inventor for a moment, and
then exclaimed:

"Well, if it isn't Tom Swift! Did I hear you say you were going to
Africa?"

Tom looked at the gentleman with rather a puzzled air for a moment.
The face was vaguely familiar, but Tom could not recall where he had
seen it. Then it came to him in a flash.

"Mr. Floyd Anderson!" exclaimed our hero. "Mr. Anderson of--"

"Earthquake Island!" exclaimed the gentleman quickly, as he extended
his hand. "I guess you remember that place, Tom Swift."

"Indeed I do. And to think of meeting you again, and on this African
steamer," and Tom's mind went back to the perilous days when his
wireless message had saved the castaways of Earthquake Island, among
whom were Mr. Anderson and his wife.

"Did I hear you say you were going to Africa?" asked Mr. Anderson,
when he had been introduced to Ned, and the others in Tom's party.

"That's where we're bound for," answered the lad. "We are going to
elephant land. But where are you going, Mr. Anderson?"

"Also to Africa, but not on a trip for pleasure or profit like
yourselves. I have been commissioned by a missionary society to
rescue two of its workers from the heart of the dark continent."

"Rescue two missionaries?" exclaimed Tom, wonderingly.

"Yes, a gentleman and his wife, who, it is reported, have fallen
into the hands of a race known as the red pygmies, who hold them
captives!"




CHAPTER IX

ATTACKED BY A WHALE


Surprise at Mr. Anderson's announcement held Tom silent for a
moment. That the gentleman whom he had been the means of rescuing,
among others, from Earthquake Island, should be met with so
unexpectedly, was quite a coincidence, but when it developed that he
was bound to the same part of the African continent as were Tom and
his friends, and when he said he hoped to rescue some missionaries
from the very red pygmies so feared by the old elephant hunter--this
was enough to startle any one.

"I see that my announcement has astonished you," said Mr. Anderson,
as he noted the look of surprise on the face of the young inventor.

"It certainly has! Why, that's where we are bound for, in my new
airship. Come down into our cabin, Mr. Anderson, and tell us all
about it. Is your wife with you?"

"No, it is too dangerous a journey on which to take her. I have
little hope of succeeding, for it is now some time since the
unfortunate missionaries were captured, but I am going to do my
best, and organize a relief expedition when I get to Africa."

Tom said nothing at that moment, but he made up his mind that if it
was at all possible he would lend his aid, that of his airship, and
also get his friends to assist Mr. Anderson. They went below to a
special cabin that had been reserved for Tom's party, and there, as
the ship slowly passed down New York Bay, Mr. Anderson told his
story.

"I mentioned to you, when we were on Earthquake Island," he said to
Tom, "that I had been in Africa, and had done some hunting. That is
not my calling, as it is that of your friend, Mr. Durban, but I know
the country pretty well. However, I have not been there in some
time."

"My wife and I are connected with a church in New York that, several
years ago, raised a fund and sent two missionaries, Mr. and Mrs.
Jacob Illingway, to the heart of Africa. They built up a little
mission there, and for a time all went well, and they did good work
among the natives."

"They are established in a tribe of friendly black men, of simple
nature, and, while the natives did not become Christianized to any
remarkable extent, yet they were kind to the missionaries. Mr. and
Mrs. Illingway used frequently to write to members of our church,
telling of their work. They also mentioned the fact that adjoining
the country of the friendly blacks there was a tribe of fierce
little red men,--red because of hair of that color all over their
bodies."

"That's right," agreed Mr. Durban, shaking his head solemnly.
"They're red imps, too!"

"Mr. Illingway often mentioned in his letters," went on Mr.
Anderson, "that there were frequent fights between the pygmies and
the race of blacks, but the latter had no great fear of their small
enemies. However, it seems that they did not take proper
precautions, for not long ago there was a great battle, the blacks
were attacked by a large force of the red pygmies, who overwhelmed
them by numbers, and finally routed them, taking possession of their
country."

"What became of the missionaries?" asked Ned Newton.

"I'll tell you," said Mr. Anderson. "For a long time we heard
nothing, beyond the mere news of the fight, which we read of in the
papers. The church people were very anxious about the fate of Mr.
and Mrs. Illingway, and were talking of sending a special messenger
to inquire about them, when a cablegram came from the headquarters
of the society in London."

"It seems that one of the black natives, named Tomba, who was a sort
of house servant to Mr. and Mrs. Illingway, escaped the general
massacre, in which all his friends were killed. He made his way
through the jungle to a white settlement, and told his story,
relating how the two missionaries had been carried away captive by
the pygmies."

"A terrible fate," commented Mr. Durban.

"Yes, they might better be dead, from all the accounts we can hear,"
went on Mr. Anderson.

"Bless my Sunday hat! Don't say that!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "Maybe
we can save them, Mr. Anderson."

"That is what I am going to try to do, though it may be too late. As
soon as definite news was received, our church held a meeting,
raised a fund, and decided to send me off to find Mr. and Mrs.
Illingway, if alive, or give them decent burial, if I could locate
their bones. The reason they selected me was because I had been in
Africa, and knew the country."

"I made hurried arrangements, packed up, said good-by to my wife,
and here I am. But to think of meeting you, Tom Swift! And to hear
that you are also going to Africa. I wish I could command an airship
for the rescue. It might be more easily accomplished!"

"That's just what I was going to propose!" exclaimed Tom. "We are
going to the land of the red pygmies, and while I have promised to
help Mr. Durban in getting ivory, and while I want to try my
electric rifle on big game, still we can do both, I think. You can
depend on us, Mr. Anderson, and if the Black Hawk can be of any
service to you in the rescue, count us in!"

"Gosh!" cried the former castaway of Earthquake Island. "This is the
best piece of luck I could have! Now tell me all about your plans."
which Tom and the others did, listening in turn, to further details
about the missionaries.

Just how they would go to work to effect the rescue, or how they
could locate the particular tribe of little red men who had Mr. and
Mrs. Illingway, they did not know.

"We may be able to get hold of this Tomba," said Mr. Durban. "If not
I guess between Mr. Anderson and myself we can get on the trail,
somehow. I'm anxious to get to the coast, see the airship put
together again, and start for the interior."

"So am I," declared Tom, as he got out his electric rifle, and began
to put it together, for he wanted to show Mr. Anderson how it
worked.

They had a pleasant and uneventful voyage for two weeks. The weather
was good, and, to tell the truth, it was rather monotonous for Torn
and the others, who were eager to get into activity again. Then came
a storm, which, while it was not dangerous, yet gave them plenty to
think and talk about for three days. Then came more calm weather,
when the Soudalar plowed along over gently heaving billows.

They were about a week from their port of destination, which vas
Majumba, on the African coast, when, one afternoon, as Tom and the
others were in their cabin, they heard a series of shouts on deck,
and the sound of many feet running to and fro.

"Something has happened!" exclaimed the young inventor.

Tom raced for the companionway, and was soon on deck, followed by
Mr. Durban and the others. They saw a crowd of sailors and
passengers leaning over the port rail.

"What's the matter?" asked Tom, of the second mate, who was just
passing.

"Fight between a killer and a whale," was the reply. "The captain
has ordered the ship to lay-to so it can be watched."

Tom made his way to the rail. About a quarter of a mile away there
could be observed a great commotion in the ocean. Great bodies
seemed to be threshing about, beating the water to foam, and, with
the foam could be seen bright blood mingled. Occasionally two jets
of water, as from some small fountain, would shoot upward.

"He's blowing hard!" exclaimed one of the sailors. "I guess he's
about done for!"

"Which one?" asked Tom.

"The whale," was the reply. "The killer has the best of the big
fellow," and the sailor quickly explained how the smaller killer
fish, by the peculiarity of its attack, and its great ferocity,
often bested its larger antagonist.

The battle was now at its height, and Tom and the others were
interested spectators. At times neither of the big creatures could
be seen, because of the smother of foam in which they rolled and
threshed about. The whale endeavored to sound, or go to the bottom,
but the killer stuck to him relentlessly.

Suddenly, however, as Tom looked, the whale, by a stroke of his
broad tail, momentarily stunned his antagonist. Instantly realizing
that he was free the great creature, which was about ninety feet
long, darted away, swimming on the surface of the water, for he
needed to get all the air possible.

Quickly acquiring momentum, the whale came on like a locomotive,
spouting at intervals, the vapor from the blowholes looking not
unlike steam from some submarine boat.

"He looks to be heading this way," remarked Mr. Durban to Tom.

"He is," agreed the young inventor, "but I guess he'll dive before
he gets here. He only wants to get away from the killer. Look, the
other one is swimming this way, too!"

"Bless my harpoon, but he sure is!" called Mr. Damon. "They'll renew
the fight near here."

But he was mistaken, for the killer, after coming a little distance
after the whale, suddenly turned, hesitated for a moment, and then
disappeared in the depths of the ocean.

The whale, however, continued to come on, speeding through the water
with powerful strokes. There was an uneasy movement among some of
the passengers.

"Suppose he strikes the ship," suggested one woman.

"Nonsense! He couldn't," said her husband.

"The old man had better get under way, just the same," remarked a
sailor near Tom, as he looked up at the bridge where the captain was
standing.

The "old man," or commander, evidently thought the same thing, for,
after a glance at the oncoming leviathan, which was still headed
directly for the vessel, he shoved the lever of the telegraph signal
over to "full speed ahead."

Hardly had he done so than the whale sank from sight.

"Oh, I'm so glad!" exclaimed the woman who had first spoken of the
possibility of the whale hitting the ship, "I am afraid of those
terrible creatures."

"They're as harmless as a cow, unless they get angry," said her
husband.

Slowly the great ship began to move through the water. Tom and his
friends were about to go back to their cabin, for they thought the
excitement over, when, as the young inventor turned from the rail,
he felt a vibration throughout the whole length of the steamer, as
if it had hit on a sand-bar.

Instantly there was a jangling of bells in the engine room, and the
Soudalar lost headway.

"What's the matter?" asked several persons.

They were answered a moment later, for the big whale, even though
grievously wounded in his fight with the killer, had risen not a
hundred feet away from the ship, and was coming toward it with the
speed of an express train.

"Bless my blubber!" cried Mr. Damon. "We must have hit the whale, or
it hit us under the water and now it's going to attack us!"

He had no more than gotten the words out of his mouth ere the great
creature of the deep came on full tilt at the vessel, struck it a
terrific blow which made it tremble from stem to stern, and careen
violently.

There was a chorus of frightened cries, sailors rushed to and fro,
the engine-room bells rang violently, and the captain and mates
shouted hoarse orders.

"Here he comes again!" yelled Mr. Durban, as he hurried to the side
of the ship. "The whale takes us for an enemy, I guess. and he's
going to ram us again!"

"And if he does it many times, he'll start the plates and cause a
leak that won't be stopped in a hurry!" cried a sailor as he rushed
past Tom.

The young inventor looked at the oncoming monster for a moment, and
then started on the run for his cabin.

"Here! Where are you going?" cried Mr. Damon, but Tom did not
answer.




CHAPTER X

OFF IN THE AIRSHIP


As Tom Swift hurried down the companionway he again felt the ship
careen as the whale struck it a powerful blow, and he was almost
knocked off his feet. But he kept on.

Below he found some frightened men and women, a number of whom were
adjusting life preservers about them, under the impression that the
ship had struck a rock and was going down. They had not been up on
deck, and did not know of the battle between the killer and the
whale, nor what followed.

"Oh, I know we're sinking!" cried one timid woman. "What has
happened?" she appealed to Tom.

"It will be all right in a little while," he assured her.

"But what is it? I want to know. Have we had a collision."

"Yes, with a whale," replied Tom, as he grabbed up something from
his stateroom, and again rushed up on deck. As he reached it the
whale came on once more, and struck the ship another terrific blow.
Then the monster sank and could be seen swimming back, just under
the surface of the water, getting ready to renew the attack.

"He's going to ram us again!" cried Mr. Damon. "Bless my machine
oil! Why doesn't the captain do something?"

At that moment the commander cried from the bridge:

"Send a man below, Mr. Laster, to see if we are making any water.
Then tell half a dozen of the sailors to get out the rifles, and see
if they can't kill the beast. He'll put us in Davy Jones's locker if
he keeps this up! Lively now, men!"

The first mate, Mr. Laster, called out the order. A sailor went
below to see if the ship was leaking much, and the captain rang for
full speed ahead. But the Soudalar was slow in getting under way
again, and, even at top speed she was no match for the whale, which
was again rushing toward the vessel.

"Quick with those rifles!" cried the captain. "Fire a volley into
the beast!"

"There's no need!" suddenly called Mr. Damon, who had caught sight
of Tom Swift, and the object which the lad carried.

"No need?" demanded the commander. "Why, has the whale sunk, or made
off?"

"No," answered the eccentric man, "the whale is still coming on, but
Tom Swift will fix him. Get there, Tom, and let him have a good
one!"

"What sort of a gun is that?" demanded the commander as the young
inventor took his place at the rail, which was now almost deserted.

Tom did not answer. Bracing himself against the rolling and heaving
of the vessel, which was now under about half speed, Tom aimed his
electric rifle at the oncoming leviathan. He looked at the automatic
gage, noted the distance and waiting a moment until the crest of a
wave in front of the whale had subsided, he pressed the button.

If those watching him expected to hear a loud report, and see a
flash of flame, they were disappointed. There was absolutely no
sound, but what happened to the whale was most surprising.

The great animal stopped short amid a swirl of foam, and the next
instant it seemed to disintegrate. It went all to pieces, just as
had the dummy figure which Tom on one occasion fired at with his
rifle and as had the big packing-cases. The whale appeared to
dissolve, as does a lump of sugar in a cup of hot tea, and, five
seconds after Tom Swift had fired his electric gun, there was not a
sign of the monster save a little blood on the calm sea.

"What--what happened?" asked the captain in bewilderment. "Is--is
that monster gone?"

"Completely gone!" cried Mr. Damon. "Bless my powder horn, Tom, but
I knew you could do it!"

"Is that a new kind of whale gun, firing an explosive bullet?"
inquired the commander, as he came down off the bridge and shook
hands with Tom. "If it is, I'd like to buy one. We may be rammed
again by another whale."

"This is my new, electric rifle," explained the young inventor
modestly, "and it fires wireless charges of electricity instead of
bullets. I'm sorry I can't let you have it, as it's the only one I
have. But I guess no more whales will ram us. That one was evidently
crazed by the attack of the killer, and doubtless took us for
another of its enemies."

Sailors and passengers crowded around Tom, eager to shake his hand,
and to hear about the gun. Many declared that he had saved the ship.

This was hardly true, for the whale could not have kept up its
attacks much longer. Still he might have done serious damage, by
causing a leak, and, while the Soudalar was a stanch craft, with
many water-tight compartments, still no captain likes to be a week
from land with a bad leak, especially if a storm comes up. Then,
too, there was the danger of a panic among the passengers, had the
attacks been kept up, so, though Tom wanted to make light of his
feat, the others would not let him.

"You're entitled to the thanks of all on board," declared Captain
Wendon, "and I'll see that the owners hear of what you did. Well, I
guess we can go on, now. I'll not stop again to see a fight between
a killer and a whale."

The steamer resumed her way at full speed, and the sailor, who had
gone below, came up to report that there was only a slight leak,
which need not cause any uneasiness.

Little was talked of for the next few days but the killing of the
whale, and Tom had to give several exhibitions of his electric
rifle, and explain its workings. Then, too, the story of his
expedition became known, and also the object of Mr. Anderson's
quest, and Tom's offer of aid to help rescue the missionaries, so
that, altogether, our hero was made much of during the remainder of
the voyage.

"Well, if your gun will do that to a whale, what will it do to an
elephant?" asked Mr. Durban one morning, when they were within a
day's steaming of their port. "I'm afraid it's almost too strong,
Tom. It will leave nothing--not even the tusks to pick up."

"Oh, I can regulate the power," declared the lad. "I used full force
on the whale, just to see what it would do. It was the first tine
I'd tried it on anything alive. I can so regulate the charge that it
will kill even an elephant, and leave scarcely a mark on the beast."

"I'd like to see it done," remarked the old. hunter.

"I'll show you, if we sight any sharks," promised Tom. He was able
to keep his word for that afternoon a school of the ugly fish
followed the steamer for the sake of the food scraps thrown
overboard. Tom took his position in the stern, and gave an
exhibition of shooting with his electric gun that satisfied even Mr.
Durban, exacting as he was.

For the lad, by using his heaviest charges, destroyed the largest
sharks so that they seemed to instantly disappear in the water, and
from that he toned down the current until he could kill some of the
monsters so easily and quickly that they seemed to float motionless
on the surface, yet there was no life left in them once the electric
charge touched them.

"We'll use the light charges when we're killing elephants for their
tusks," said Tom, "and the heavy ones when we're in danger from a
rush of the beasts."

He little knew how soon he would have to put his plan into effect.

They arrived safely at Majumba, the African coast city, and for two
days Tom was kept busy superintending the unloading of the parts of
his airship. But it was safely taken ashore, and he and his friends
hired a disused warehouse in which to work at reassembling the Black
Hawk.

Tom had everything down to a system, and, in less than a week the
aircraft was once more ready to be sent aloft. It was given a try-
out, much to the astonishment of the natives, and worked perfectly.
Then Tom and his friends busied themselves laying in a stock of
provisions and stores for the trip into the interior.

They made inquiries about the chances of getting ivory and were told
that they were good if they went far enough into the jungle and
forests, for the big beasts had penetrated farther and farther
inland.

They also tried to get some news regarding the captive missionaries,
but were unsuccessful nor could they learn what had become of Tomba,
who had brought the dire news to civilization.

"It's too soon to hope for anything yet," said Mr. Anderson. "Wait
until we get near the country of the red pygmies."

"And then it may be too late," said Tom in a low voice.

It was two weeks after their arrival in Majumba that Tom announced
that all was in readiness. The airship was in perfect working order,
it was well stocked with food, arms, articles and trinkets with
which to trade among the natives, spare parts for the machinery,
special tools and a good supply of the chemicals needed to
manufacture the lifting gas.

Of course Tom did not leave behind his electric weapon and Mr.
Durban and the others took plenty of ammunition for the ordinary
rifles which they carried.

One morning, after cabling to his father that they were about to
start, Tom gave a last careful look to his airship, tested the motor
and dynamos, took a hasty survey of the storeroom, to see that
nothing had been forgotten, and gave the word to get aboard.

They took their places in the cabin. Outside a crowd of natives, and
white traders of many nationalities had gathered. Tom pulled the
starting lever. The Black Hawk shot across a specially prepared
starting ground, and, attaining sufficient momentum, suddenly arose
into the air.

There was a cheer from the watching crowd, and several superstitious
blacks, who saw the airship for the first time, ran away in terror.

Up into the blue atmosphere Tom took his craft. He looked down on
the city over which he was flying. Then he pointed the prow of the
Black Hawk toward the heart of the dark continent.

"Off for the interior!" he murmured. "I wonder if we'll ever get out
again?"

No one could answer. They had to take their chances with the dangers
and terrors of elephant land, and with the red pygmies. Yet Tom
Swift was not afraid.




CHAPTER XI

ANCHORED TO EARTH


With the voyage on the steamer, their arrival in Africa, the many
strange sights of the city of Majumba, and the refitting of the
airship, our friends had hardly had time to catch their breath since
Tom Swift's determination to go elephant hunting. Now, as the Black
Hawk was speeding into the interior, they felt, for the first time
in many weeks, that they "could take it easy," as Ned Newton
expressed it.

"Thank goodness," said the bank clerk, "I can sit down and look at
something for a while," and he gazed out of the main cabin windows
down at the wild country over which they were then flying.

For, so swiftly had the airship moved that it was hardly any time at
all before it had left Majumba far behind, and was scudding over the
wilderness.

"Bless my camera," exclaimed Mr. Damon, who had brought along one of
the picture machines, "bless my camera! I don't call that much to
look at," and he pointed to the almost impenetrable forest over
which they then were.

"No, it isn't much of a view," said the old elephant hunter, "but
wait. You'll soon see all you want to. Africa isn't all like this.
There are many strange sights before us yet. But, Tom Swift, tell us
how the airship is working in this climate. Do you find any
difficulty managing it?"

"Not at all," answered Tom, who was in the cabin then, having set
the automatic steering apparatus in the pilot house, and come back
to join the others. "It works as well as it did in good old York
State. Of course I can't tell what affect the continual hot and
moist air will have on the gas bag, but I guess we'll make out all
right."

"I certainly hope so," put in Mr. Anderson. "It would be too bad to
be wrecked in the middle of Africa, with no way to get out."

"Oh, you needn't worry about that," said Ned with a laugh. "If the
airship should smash, Tom would build another out of what was left,
and we'd sail away as good as before."

"Hardly that," answered the young inventor.

"But we won't cross a bridge until we hear it coming, as Eradicate
would say. Hello, that looks like some sort of native village."

He pointed ahead to a little clearing in the forest, where a number
of mud and grass huts were scattered about. As they came nearer they
could see the black savages, naked save for a loin cloth, running
about in great excitement, and pointing upward.

"Yes, that's one of the numerous small native villages we'll see
from now on," said Mr. Durban. "Many a night have I spent in those
same grass huts after a day's hunting. Sometimes, I've been
comfortable, and again not. I guess we've given those fellows a
scare."

It did seem so, for by this time the whole population, including
women and children, were running about like mad. Suddenly, from
below there sounded a deep booming noise, which came plainly to the
ears of the elephant hunters through the opened windows of the
airship cabin.

"Hark! What's that?" cried Tom, raising his hand for silence.

"Bless my umbrella! it sounds like thunder," said Mr. Damon.

"No, it's one of their war drums," explained Mr. Durban. "The
natives make large ones out of hollow trees, with animal skins
stretched over the ends, and they beat them to sound a warning, or
before going into battle. It makes a great noise."

"Do you think they want to fight us?" asked Ned, looking anxiously
at Tom, and then toward where his rifle stood in a corner of the
cabin.

"No, probably that drum was beaten by some of the native priests,"
explained the hunter. "The natives are very superstitious, and
likely they took us for an evil spirit, and wanted to drive us
away."

"Then we'll hustle along out of their sight," said Tom, as he went
to the pilot house to increase the speed of the airship, for he had
been letting it drift along slowly to enable the adventurers to view
the country over which they were passing. A few minutes later, under
the increased force of the machinery, the Black Hawk left the native
village, and the crowd of frightened blacks, far behind.

The travelers passed over a succession of wild stretches of forest
or jungle, high above big grassy plains, over low but rugged
mountain ranges, and big rivers. Now and then they would cross some
lake, on the calm surface of which could be made out natives, in big
canoes, hollowed out from trees. In each case the blacks showed
every appearance of fright at the sight of the airship throbbing
along over their heads.

On passing over the lake, Ned Newton looked down and cried out
excitedly:

"Look! Elephants! They're in swimming, and the natives are shooting
them! Now's our chance, Tom!"

Mr. Anderson and Mr. Durban, after a quick glance, drew back
laughing.

"Those are hippopotami!" exclaimed the old elephant man. "Good
hunting, if you don't care what you shoot, but not much sport in it.
It will be some time yet before we see any elephants, boys."

Ned was rather chagrined at his mistake, but the African travelers
told him that any one, not familiar with the country, would have
made it, especially in looking down from a great height.

They sailed along about half a mile above the earth, Tom gradually
increasing the speed of the ship, as he found the machinery to be
working well. Dinner was served as they were crossing a high grassy
plateau, over which could be seen bounding a number of antelopes.

"Some of those would go good for a meal," said Mr. Durban, after a
pause during which he watched the graceful creatures.

"Then we'll go down and get some for supper," decided Tom, for in
that hot climate it was impossible to carry fresh meat on the
airship.

Accordingly, the Black Hawk was sent down, and came to rest in a
natural clearing on the edge of the jungle. After waiting until the
fierce heat of noonday was over, the travelers got out their rifles
and, under the leadership of Mr. Durban and Mr. Anderson, who was
also an experienced hunter, they set off.

Game was plentiful, but as they could only eat a comparatively small
quantity, and as it would not keep, they only shot what they needed.
Tom had his electric rifle, but hesitated to use it, as Mr. Durban
and Mr. Anderson had each already bowled over a fine buck.

However, a chance came most unexpectedly, for, as they were passing
along the banks of a little stream, which was almost hidden from
view by thick weeds and rank grass, there was a sudden commotion in
the bushes, and a fierce wild buffalo sprang out at the party.

There are few animals in Africa more dreaded by hunters than the
wild buffalo, for the beast, with its spreading sharp horns is a
formidable foe, and will seldom give up the attack until utterly
unable to move. They are fierce and relentless.

"Look out!" yelled Mr. Durban. "To cover, everybody! If that beast
gets after you it's no fun! You and I will fire at him, Mr. Anderson!"

Mr. Durban raised his rifle, and pulled the trigger, but, for some
reason, the weapon failed to go off. Mr. Anderson quickly raised
his, but his foot slipped in a wet place and he fell. At that moment
the buffalo, with a snort of rage, charged straight for the fallen man.

"Tom! your electric rifle!" yelled Ned Newton, but he need not have
done so, for the young inventor was on the alert.

Taking instant aim, and adjusting his weapon for the heaviest
charge, Tom fired at the advancing beast. The result was the same as
in the case of the whale, the buffalo seemed to melt away. And it
was stopped only just in time, too, for it was close to the
prostrate Mr. Anderson, who had sprained his ankle slightly, and
could not readily rise.

It was all over in a few seconds, but it was a tense time while it
lasted.

"You saved my life again, Tom Swift," said Mr. Anderson, as he
limped toward our hero. "Once on Earthquake Island, and again now. I
shan't forget it," and he shook hands with the young inventor.

The others congratulated Tom on his quick shot, and Mr. Damon, as
usual blessed everything in sight, and the electric rifle
especially.

They went back to the airship, taking the fresh meat with them, but
on account of the injury to Mr. Anderson's ankle could not make
quick progress, so that it was almost dusk when they reached the
craft.

"Well, we'll have supper, and then start off," proposed Tom, "I
don't think it would be wise to remain on the ground so near the
jungle."

"No' it's safer in the air," agreed Mr. Durban. The meal was much
enjoyed, especially the fresh meat, and, after it was over, Tom took
his place in the pilot house to start the machinery, and send the
airship aloft.

The motor hummed and throbbed, and the gas hissed into the bag, for
the ground was not level enough to permit of a running start by
means of the planes. Lights gleamed from the Black Hawk and the big
search-lantern in front cast a dazzling finger of light into the
black forest.

"Well, what are you waiting for?" called Ned, who heard the
machinery in motion, but who could not feel the craft rising. "Why
don't you go up, Tom?"

"I'm trying to," answered the young inventor. "Something seems to be
the matter." He pulled the speed lever over a few more notches, and
increased the power of the gas machine. Still the Black Hawk did not
rise.

"Bless my handkerchief box!" cried Mr. Damon, "what's the matter?"

"I don't know," answered Tom. "We seem to be held fast."

He further increased the speed of the propellers, and the gas
machine was set to make vapor at its fullest capacity, and force it
into the bag. Still the craft was held to the earth.

"Maybe the gas has no effect in this climate," called Ned.

"It can't be that," replied Tom. "The gas will operate anywhere. It
worked all right today."

Suddenly she airship moved up a little way, and then seemed to be
pulled down again, hitting the ground with a bump.

"Something is holding us!" cried Tom. "We're anchored to earth! I
must see what it is!" and, catching up his electric rifle, he dashed
out of the cabin.




CHAPTER XII

AMONG THE NATIVES


For a moment after Tom's departure the others stared blankly at one
another. They could hear the throbbing and hum of the machinery, and
feel the thrill of the anchored airship. But they could not
understand what the trouble was.

"We must help Tom!" cried Ned Newton at length as he caught up his
rifle. "Maybe we are in the midst of a herd of elephants, and they
have hold of the ship in their trunks."

"It couldn't be!" declared Mr. Durban, yet they soon discovered that
Ned's guess was nearer the truth then any of them had suspected at
the time.

"We must help him, true enough!" declared Mr. Anderson, and he and
the others followed Ned out on deck.

"Where are you Tom?" called his chum.

"Here." was the answer. "I'm on the forward deck."

"Do you see anything?"

"No, it's too dark. Turn the search-light this way."

"I will," shouted Mr. Damon, and a moment later the gleam of the
powerful lantern brought Tom clearly into view, as he stood on the
small forward observation platform in the bow of the Black Hawk.

An instant later the young inventor let out a startled cry.

"What is it?" demanded Mr. Durban.

"An immense snake!" shouted Tom. "It's wound around a tree, and
partly twined around the ship! That's why we couldn't go up! I'm
going to shoot it."

They looked to where he pointed, and there, in the glare of the
light, could be seen an immense python, fully twenty-five feet long,
the forward part of its fat ugly body circled around the slender
prow of the airship, while the folds of the tail were about a big
tree.

Tom Swift raised his electric rifle, took quick aim, and, having set
it to deliver a moderate charge, pressed the button. The result was
surprising, for the snake being instantly killed the folds uncoiled
and the ship shot upward, only, instead of rising on an even keel,
the bow pointed toward the sky, while the stern was still fast to
the earth. Tilted at an angle of forty-five degrees the Black Hawk
was in a most peculiar position, and those standing on the deck
began to slide along it.

"There's another snake at the stern!" cried Mr. Damon as he grasped
a brace to prevent falling off. "Bless my slippers! it's the mate of
the one you killed! Shoot the other one, Tom!"

The young inventor needed no urging. Making his way as best he could
to the stern of the airship, he killed the second python, which was
even larger than the first, and in an instant the Black Hawk shot
upward, this time level, and as it should be. Things on board were
soon righted, and the travelers could stand upright. High above the
black jungle rose the craft, moving forward under the full power of
the propellers, until Tom rushed into the engine room, and reduced
speed.

"Well, talk about things happening!" exclaimed Ned, when they had
somewhat recovered from the excitement. "I should say they were
beginning with a vengeance!"

"That's the way in Africa," declared Mr. Durban. "It's a curious
country. Those pythons generally go in pairs, but it's the first
time I ever knew them to tackle an airship. They probably stay
around here where there is plenty of small game for them, and very
likely they merely anchored to our craft while waiting for a supper
to come along."

"It was a very odd thing," said Tom. "I couldn't imagine what held
us. After this I'll see that all is clear before I try to go up.
Next time we may he held by a troop of baboons and it strains the
machinery to have it pull against dead weight in that way."

However, it was found no harm had resulted from this experience,
and, after reducing the gas pressure, which was taking them too
high, Tom set the automatic rudders.

"We'll keep on at slow speed through the night," he explained, "and
in the morning we'll be pretty well into the interior. Then we can
lay our course for wherever we want to go. Where had we better head
for?"

"I don't want to interfere with your plans," said Mr. Anderson, "but
I would like to rescue those missionaries. But the trouble is, I
don't know just where to look for them. We couldn't get much of a
line in Majumba on where the country of the red pygmies is located.
What do you think about it, Mr. Durban?"

"As far as elephant hunting goes we can probably do as well in the
pygmy land as anywhere else," answered the veteran, "and perhaps it
will be well to head for that place. If we run across any elephant
herds in the meanwhile, we can stop, get the ivory, and proceed."

They discussed this plan at some length, and agreed that it was the
best thing to do. Mr. Durban had a map of the country around the
center of Africa, and he marked on it, as nearly as he could, the
location of the pygmies' country, while Mr. Anderson also had a
chart, showing the location of the mission which had been wiped out
of existence. It was in the midst of a wild and desolate region.

"We'll do the best we can," declared Tom, "and I think we'll
succeed. We ought to be there in about a week, if we have no bad
luck."

All that night the Black Hawk flew on over Africa, covering mile
after mile, passing over jungle, forest, plains, rivers and lakes,
and, doubtless, over many native villages, though they could not be
seen.

Morning found the travelers above a great, grassy plain, dotted here
and there with negro settlements which were separated by rivers,
lakes or thin patches of forest.

"Well, we'll speed up a bit," decided Tom after breakfast, which was
eaten to the weird accompaniment of hundreds of native warning-
drums, beaten by the superstitious blacks.

Tom went to the engine room, and turned on more speed. He was about
to go back to the pilot house, to set the automatic steering
apparatus to coincide with the course mapped out, when there was a
crash of metal, an ominous snapping and buzzing sound, followed by a
sudden silence.

"What's that?" cried Ned, who was in the motor compartment with his
chum.

"Something's gone wrong!" exclaimed the young inventor, as he sprang
back toward the engine. The propellers had ceased revolving, and as
there was no gas in the bag at that time, it having been decided to
save the vapor for future needs, the Black Hawk began falling toward
the earth.

"We're going down!" yelled Ned.

"Yes, the main motor has broken!" exclaimed Tom. "We'll have to
descend to repair it."

"Say!" yelled Mr. Damon, rushing in, "we're right over a big African
village! Are we going to fall among the natives?"

"It looks that way," admitted Tom grimly, as he hastened to the
pilot house to shift the wings so that the craft could glide easily
to the ground.

"Bless my shoe blacking!" cried the eccentric man as he heard the
beating of drums, and the shouts of the savages.

A little later the airship had settled into the midst of a crowd of
Africans, who swarmed all about the craft.




CHAPTER XIII

ON AN ELEPHANT TRAIL


"Get ready with your guns, everybody!" cried the old elephant
hunter, as he prepared to leave the cabin of the Black Hawk. "Tom
Swift, don't forget your electric rifle. There'll be trouble soon!"

"Bless my cartridge belt!" gasped Mr. Damon. "Why? What will happen?"

"The natives," answered Mr. Durban. "They'll attack us sure as fate!
See, already they're getting out their bows and arrows, and
blowguns! They'll pierce the gas bag in a hundred places!"

"If they do, it will be a bad thing for us," muttered Tom. "We can't
have that happen."

He followed the old elephant hunter outside, and Mr. Anderson, Ned
Newton and Mr. Damon trailed after, each one with a gun, while Tom
had his electric weapon. The airship rested on its wheels on some
level ground, just in front of a large hut, surrounded by a number
of smaller ones. All about were the natives, tall, gaunt black men,
hideous in their savagery, wearing only the loin cloth, and with
their kinky hair stuck full of sticks, bones and other odd objects
they presented a curious sight.

 Some of them were dancing about, brandishing their weapons--clubs
spears, bows, and arrows, or the long, slender blowguns, consisting
merely of a hollow reed. Women and children there were, too, also
dancing and leaping about, howling at the tops of their voices.
Above the unearthly din could be heard the noise of the drums and
tom-toms, while, as the adventurers drew up in front of their
airship, there came a sort of chant, and a line of natives, dressed
fantastically in the skins of beasts, came filing out of the large
hut.

"The witch-doctors!" exclaimed Tom, who had read of them in African
travel books.

"Are they going to attack us?" cried Ned.

"Bless my hymn book! I hope not!" came from Mr. Damon. "We wouldn't
have any chance at all in this horde of black men. I wish Eradicate
Sampson and his mule Boomerang were here. Maybe he could talk their
language, and tell them that we meant no harm."

"If there's any talking to be done, I guess our guns will have to do
it," said Tom grimly.

"I can speak a little of their language," remarked Mr. Durban, "but
what in the world are the beggars up to, anyhow? I supposed they'd
send a volley of arrows at us, first shot, but they don't seem to be
going to do that."

"No, they're dancing around us," said Tom.

"That's it!" exclaimed Mr. Anderson. "I have it! Why didn't I think
of it before? The natives are welcoming us!"

"Welcoming us?" repeated Ned.

"Yes," went on the missionary seeker. "They are doing a dance in our
honor, and they have even called out the witch-doctors to do us
homage."

"That's right," agreed Mr. Durban, who was listening to the chanting
of the natives dressed in animal skins. "They take us for spirits
from another land, and are making us welcome here. Listen, I'll see
if I can make out what else they are saying."

The character of the shouts and chants changed abruptly, and the
dancing increased in fervor, even the children throwing themselves
wildly about. The witch-doctors ran around like so many maniacs, and
it looked as much like an American Indian war dance as anything
else.

"I've got it!" shouted Mr. Durban, for he had to call loudly to be
heard above the din. "They are asking us to make it rain. It seems
there has been a dry spell here, and their own rain-makers and
witch-doctors haven't been able to get a drop out of the sky. Now,
they take it that we have come to help them. They think we are going
to bring rain."

"And if we don't, what will happen?" asked Tom.

"Maybe they won't be quite so glad to see us," was the answer.

"Well, if they don't mean war, we might as well put up our weapons,"
suggested Mr. Anderson. "If they're going to be friendly, so much
the better, and if it should happen to rain while we're here, they'd
think we brought it, and we could have almost anything we wanted.
Perhaps they have a store of ivory hidden away, Mr. Durban. Some of
these tribes do."

"It's possible, but the chances for rain are very small. How long
will we have to stay here, Tom Swift?" asked the elephant hunter
anxiously.

"Well, perhaps I can get the motor mended in two or three days,"
answered the young inventor.

"Then we'll have to stay here in the meanwhile," decided Mr. Durban.
"Well, we'll make the best of it. Ha, here comes the native king to
do us honor," and, as he spoke there came toward the airship a
veritable giant of a black man, wearing a leopard skin as a royal
garment, while on his head was a much battered derby hat, probably
purchased at a fabulous price from some trader. The king, if such he
could be called, was accompanied by a number of attendants and
witch-doctors. In front walked a small man, who, as it developed,
was an interpreter. The little cavalcade advanced close to the
airship, and came to a halt. The king made a low bow, either to the
craft or to the elephant hunters drawn up in front of it. His
attendants followed his example, and then the interpreter began to
speak.

Mr. Durban listened intently, made a brief answer to the little man,
and then the elephant hunter's face lighted up.

"It's all right," he said to Tom and the others. "The king takes us
for wonderful spirits from another land. He welcomes us, says we can
have whatever we want, and he begs us to make it rain. I have said
we will do our best, and I have asked that some food be sent us.
That's always the first thing to do. We'll be allowed to stay here
in peace until Tom can mend the ship, and then we'll hit the air
trail again."

The talk between Mr. Durban and the interpreter continued for some
little time longer. Then the king went back to his hut, refusing, as
Mr. Durban said, an invitation to come aboard and see how a modern
airship was constructed. The natives, too, seemed anxious to give
the craft a wide berth.

The excitement had quieted down now, and, in a short tine a crowd of
native women came toward the airship, bearing, in baskets on their
heads, food of various kinds. There were bananas, some wild fruits,
yams, big gourds of goats' milk, some boiled and stewed flesh of
young goats, nicely cooked, and other things, the nature of which
could only be guessed at.

"Shall we eat this stuff, or stick to Mr. Damon's cooking?" asked
Tom.

"Oh, you'll find this very good," explained Mr. Durban. "I've eaten
native cookery before. Some of it is excellent and as this appears
to be very good, Mr. Damon can have a vacation while we are here."

The old elephant hunter proved the correctness of his statement by
beginning to eat, and soon all the travelers were partaking of the
food left by the native women. They placed it down on the ground at
a discreet distance from the airship, and hurriedly withdrew. But if
the women and men were afraid, the children were not, and they were
soon swarming about the ship, timidly touching the sides with their
little black fingers, but not venturing on board.

Tom, with Ned and Mr. Damon to help him, began work on the motor
right after dinner. He found the break to be worse than he had
supposed, and knew that it would take at least four days to repair
it.

Meanwhile the airship continued to be a source of wonder to the
natives. They were always about it, save at night, but their
admiration was a respectful one. The king was anxious for the rain-
making incantations to begin, but Mr. Durban put him off.

"I don't want to deceive these simple natives," he said, "and for
our own safety we can't pretend to make rain, and fail. As soon as
we have a chance we'll slip away from here."

But an unexpected happening made a change in their plans. It was on,
the afternoon of their third day in the native village, and Tom and
his assistants were working hard at the motor. Suddenly there seemed
to be great excitement in the vicinity of the king's hut. A native
had rushed into the village from the jungle, evidently with some
news, for presently the whole place was in a turmoil.

Once more the king and his attendants filed out toward the airship.
Once more the interpreter talked to Mr. Durban, who listened
eagerly.

"By Jove! here's our chance!" he cried to Tom, when the little man
had finished.

"What is it?" asked the young inventor.

"A runner has just come in with news that a large herd of wild
elephants is headed this way. The king is afraid the big beasts will
trample down all their crops, as often occurs, and he begs us to go
out and drive the animals away. It's just what we want. Come on,
Tom, and all of you. The airship will be safe here, for the natives
think that to meddle with it would mean death or enchantment for
then. We'll get on our first elephant trail!"

The old hunter went into the cabin for his big game gun, while Tom
hastened to get out his electric rifle. Now he would have a chance
to try it on the powerful beasts which he had come to Africa to
hunt.

Amid the excited and joyous shouts of the natives, the hunters filed
out of the village, led by the dusky messenger who had brought the
news of the elephants. And, as Tom and the others advanced, they
could hear a distant trumpeting, and a crashing in the jungle that
told of the near presence of the great animals.




CHAPTER XIV

A STAMPEDE


"Look to your guns, everybody!" cautioned Mr. Durban. "It's no joke
to be caught in an elephant herd with an unloaded rifle. Have you
plenty of ammunition, Mr. Damon?"

"Ammunition? Bless my powder bag, I think I have enough for all the
elephants I'll kill. If I get one of the big beasts I'll be
satisfied. Bless my piano keys! I think I see them, Tom!"

He pointed off through the thick jungle. Surely something was moving
there amid the trees; great slate-colored bodies, massive forms and
waving trunks! The trumpeting increased, and the crashing of the
underbrush sounded louder and nearer.

"There they are!" cried Tom Swift joyously.

"Now for my first big game!" yelled Ned Newton.

"Take it easy," advised Mr. Anderson. "Remember to aim for the spot
I mentioned to you as being the best, just at the base of the skull.
If you can't make a head shot, or through the eye, try for the
heart. But with the big bullets we have, almost any kind of a shot,
near a vital spot, will answer."

"And Tom can fire at their TOES and put them out of business,"
declared Ned, who was eagerly advancing. "How about it, Tom?"

"Well, I guess the electric rifle will come up to expectations. Say,
Mr. Durban, they seem to be heading this way!" excitedly cried Tom,
as the herd of big beasts suddenly turned and changed their course.

"Yes, they are," admitted the old elephant hunter calmly. "But that
won't matter. Take it easy. Kill all you can."

"But we don't want to put too many out of business," said Tom, who
was not needlessly cruel, even in hunting.

"I know that," answered Mr. Durban. "But this is a case of
necessity. I've got to get ivory, and we have to kill quite a few
elephants to accomplish this. Besides the brutes will head for the
village and the natives' grain fields, and trample them down, if
they're not headed back. So all together now, we'll give them a
volley. This is a good place! There they are. All line up now. Get
ready!"

He halted, and the others followed his example. The natives had come
to a stop some time before, and were huddled together in the jungle
back of our friends, waiting to see the result of the white men's
shots.

Tom, Ned, Mr. Damon, and the two older hunters were on an irregular
line in the forest. Before them was the mass of elephants advancing
slowly, and feeding on the tender leaves of trees as they came on.
They would reach up with their long trunks, strip off the foliage,
and stuff it into their mouths. Sometimes, they even pulled up small
trees by the roots for the purpose of stripping them more easily.

"Jove! There are some big tuskers in that bunch!" cried Mr. Durban.
"Aim for the bulls, every one, don't kill the mothers or little
ones." Tom now saw that there were a number of baby Elephants in the
herd, and he appreciated the hunter's desire to spare them and their
mothers.

"Here we go!" exclaimed Mr. Durban, as he saw that Tom and the
others were ready. "Aim! Fire!"

There were thundering reports that awoke the echoes of the jungle,
and the sounds of the rifles were followed by shrill trumpets of
rage. When the smoke blew away three elephants were seen prostrate,
or, rather two, and part of another one. The last vas almost blown
to pieces by Tom Swift's electric rifle; for the young inventor had
used a little too heavy charge, and the big beast had been almost
annihilated.

Mr. Durban had dropped his bull with a well-directed shot, and Mr.
Anderson had a smaller one to his credit.

"I guess I missed mine," said Ned ruefully.

"Bless my dress-suit case!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "So did I!"

"One of you hit that fellow!" cried Mr. Durban. "He's wounded."

He pointed to a fair-sized bull who was running wildly about,
uttering shrill cries of anger. The other beasts had gathered in a
compact mass, with the larger bulls, or tuskers, on the outside, to
protect the females and young.

"I'll try a shot at him," said Tom, and raising his electric, gun,
he took quick aim. The elephant dropped in his tracks, for this time
the young inventor had correctly adjusted the power of the wireless
bullet.

"Good!" cried Mr. Durban. "Give them some more! This is some of the
best ivory I've seen yet!"

As he spoke he fired, and bowled over another magnificent specimen.
Ned Newton, determined to make a record of at least one, fired
again, and to his delight, saw a big fellow drop.

"I got him!" he yelled.

Mr. Anderson also got another, and then Mr. Damon, blessing
something which his friends could not make out, fired at one of the
largest bulls in the herd.

"You only nipped him!" exclaimed Mr. Durban when the smoke had
drifted away. "I guess I'll put him out of his misery!"

He raised his weapon and pulled the trigger but no report followed.
He uttered an exclamation of dismay.

"The breech-action has jammed!" he exclaimed. "Drop him, Tom. He's
scented us, and is headed this way. The whole herd will follow in a
minute."

Already the big brute wounded by Mr. Damon had trumpeted out a cry
of rage and defiance. It was echoed by his mates. Then, with
upraised trunk, he darted forward, followed by a score of big
tuskers.

But Tom had heard and understood. The leading beast had not taken
three steps before he dropped under the deadly and certain fire of
the young inventor.

"Bless my wishbone!" cried Mr. Damon when he saw how effective the
electric weapon was.

There was a shout of joy from the natives in the rear. They saw the
slain creatures and knew there would be much fresh meat and feasting
for them for days to come.

Suddenly Mr. Durban cried out: "Fire again, Tom! Fire everybody! The
whole herd is coming this way. If we don't stop them they'll overrun
the fields and village, anti may smash the airship! Fire again!"

Almost as he spoke, the rush, which had been stopped momentarily,
when Tom dropped the wounded elephant, began again. With shrill
menacing cries the score of bulls in the lead came on, followed this
time by the females and the young.

"It's a stampede!" yelled Mr. Anderson, firing into the midst of the
herd. Mr. Durban was working frantically at his clogged rifle. Ned
and Mr. Damon both fired, and Tom Swift, adjusting his weapon to
give the heaviest charges, shot a fusillade of wireless bullets into
the center of the advancing elephants, who were now wild with fear
and anger.

"It's a stampede all right!" said Tom, when he saw that the big
creatures were not going to stop, in spite of the deadly fire poured
into them.




CHAPTER XV

LIONS IN THE NIGHT


Shouting, screaming, imploring their deities in general, and the
white men in particular for protection, the band of frightened
natives broke and ran through the jungle, caring little where they
went so long as they escaped the awful terror of the pursuing herd
of maddened elephants. Behind them came Tom Swift and the others,
for it were folly to stop in the path of the infuriated brutes.

"Our only chance is to get on their flank and try to turn them!"
yelled Mr. Durban. "We may beat them in getting to the clearing, for
the trail is narrow. Run, everybody!"

No one needed his excited advice to cause them to hurry. They
scudded along, Mr. Damon's cap falling off in his haste. But he did
not stop to pick it up.

The hunters had one advantage. They were on a narrow but well-
cleared trail through the jungle, which led from the village where
they were encamped, to another, several miles away. This trail was
too small for the elephants, and, indeed, had to be taken in single
file by the travelers.

But it prevented the elephants making the same speed as did our
friends, for the jungle, at this point, consisted of heavy trees,
which halted the progress of even the strongest of the powerful
beasts. True, they could force aside the frail underbrush and the
small trees, but the others impeded their progress.

"We'll get there ahead of them!" cried Tom. "Have you got your rifle
in working order yet, Mr. Durban?"

"No, something has broken, I fear. We'll have to depend on your
electric gun, Tom. Have you many charges left?"

"A dozen or so. But Ned and the others have plenty of ammunition."

"Don't count--on--me!" panted Mr. Damon, who was well-nigh
breathless from the run. "I--can't--aim--straight--any--more!"

"I'll give 'em a few more bullets!" declared Mr. Anderson.

The fleeing natives were now almost lost to sight, for they could
travel through the jungle, ignoring the trail, at high speed. They
were almost like snakes or animals in this respect. Their one
thought was to get to their village, and, if possible, protect their
huts and fields of grain from annihilation by the elephants.

Behind our friends, trumpeting, bellowing and crashing came the
pachyderms. They seemed to be gaining, and Tom, looking back, saw
one big brute emerge upon the trail, and follow that.

"I've got to stop him, or some of the others will do the same,"
thought the young inventor. He halted and fired quickly. The
elephant seemed to melt away, and Tom with regret, saw a pair of
fine tusks broken to bits. "I used too heavy a charge," he murmured,
as he took up the retreat again.

In a few minutes the party of hunters, who were now playing more in
the role of the hunted, came out into the open. They could hear the
natives beating on their big hollow tree drums, and on tom-toms,
while the witch-doctors and medicine men were chanting weird songs
to drive the elephants away.

But the beasts came on. One by one they emerged from the jungle,
until the herd was gathered together again in a compact mass. Then,
under the leadership of some big bulls, they advanced. It seemed as
if they knew what they were doing, and were determined to revenge
themselves by trampling the natives' huts under their ponderous
feet.

But Tom and the others were not idle. Taking a position off to one
side, the young inventor began pouring a fusillade of the electric
bullets into the mass of slate-colored bodies. Mr. Anderson was also
firing, and Ned, who had gotten over some of his excitement, was
also doing execution. Mr. Durban, after vainly trying to get his
rifle to work, cast it aside. "Here! Let me take your gun!" he cried
to Mr. Damon, who, panting from the run, was sitting beneath a tree.

"Bless my cartridge belt! Take it and welcome!" assented the
eccentric man. It still had several shots in the magazine, and these
the old hunter used with good effect.

At first it seemed as if the elephants could not be turned back.
They kept on rushing toward the village, which was not far away, and
Tom and the others followed at one side, as best they could, firing
rapidly. The electric rifle did fearful execution.

Emboldened by the fear that all their possessions would be destroyed
a body of the natives rushed out, right in front of the elephants,
and beat tom-toms and drums, almost under their feet, at the same
time singing wild songs.

"I'm afraid we can't stop them!" muttered Mr. Anderson. "We'd better
hurry to the airship, and protect that, Tom."

But, almost as he spoke, the tide of battle turned. The elephants
suddenly swung about, and began a retreat. They could not stand the
hot fire of the four guns, including Tom's fearful weapon. With wild
trumpetings they fled back into the jungle, leaving a number of
their dead behind.

"A close call," murmured Tom, as he drew a breath of relief. Indeed
this was true, for the tide had turned when the foremost elephants
were not a hundred feet away from the first rows of native huts.

"I should say it was," agreed Ned Newton, wiping his face with his
handkerchief. He, as well as the others, was an odd-looking sight.
They were blackened by powder smoke, scratched by briars, and red
from exertion.

"But we got more ivory in this hour than I could have secured in a
week of ordinary hunting" declared Mr. Durban. "If this keeps up we
won't have to get much more, except that I don't think any of the
tusks to-day are large enough for the special purpose of my
customer."

"The sooner we get enough ivory the quicker we can go to the rescue
of the missionaries," said Mr. Anderson.

"That's so," remarked Tom. "We must not forget the red pygmies."

The natives were now dancing about, wild in delight at the prospect
of unlimited eating, and also thankful for what the white men had
done for them. Alone, the blacks would never have been able to stop
the stampede. They were soon busy cutting up the elephants ready for
a big feast, and runners were sent to tell neighboring tribes, in
adjoining villages, of the delights awaiting them.

Mr. Durban gave instructions about saving the ivory tusks, and the
valuable teeth, each pair worth about $1,000, were soon cut out and
put away for our friends. Some had been lost by the excessive power
of Tom's gun, but this could not be helped. It was necessary to stop
the rush at any price.

There was soon a busy scene at the native village, and with the
arrival of other tribesmen it seemed as if Bedlam had broken loose.
The blacks chattered like so many children as they prepared for the
feast.

"Do white men ever eat elephant meat?" asked Mr. Damon, as the
adventurers were gathered about the airship.

"Indeed they do," declared Mr. Durban. "Baked elephant foot is a
delicacy that few appreciate. I'll have the natives cook some for
us."

He gave the necessary orders, and the travelers had to admit that it
was worth coming far to get.

For the next few days and nights there was great feasting in that
African village, and the praises of the white men, and power of Tom
Swift's electric rifle, were sung loud and long.

Our friends had resumed work on repairing the airship, and the young
inventor declared, one night, that they could proceed the next day.

They were seated around a small campfire, watching the dancing and
antics of some natives who were at their usual work of eating meat.
All about our friends were numerous blazes for the cooking of the
feasts, and some were on the very edge of the jungle.

Suddenly, above the uncouth sounds of the merry-making, there was
heard a deep vibration and roar, not unlike the distant rumble of
thunder or the hum of a great steamer's whistle heard afar in the
fog.

"What's that?" cried Ned.

"Lions," said Mr. Durban briefly. "They have been attracted by the
smell of cooking."

At that moment, and instantly following a very loud roar, there was
an agonized scream of pain and terror. It sounded directly in back
of the airship.

"A lion!" cried Mr. Anderson. "One of the brutes has grabbed a
native!"

Tom Swift caught up his rifle, and darted off toward the dark
jungle.




CHAPTER XVI

SEEKING THE MISSIONARIES


"Here! Come back!" yelled Mr. Damon and Mr. Anderson, in the same
breath, while the old elephant hunter cried out: "Don't you know
you're risking your life, Tom to go off in the dark, to trail a
lion?"

"I can't stand it to let the native be carried off!" Tom shouted
back.

"But you can't see in the dark," objected Mr. Anderson. He had
probably forgotten the peculiar property of the electric rifle. Tom
kept on, and the others slowly followed.

The natives had at once ceased their merrymaking at the roaring of
the lions, and now all were gathered close about the campfires, on
which more wood had been piled, to drive away the fearsome brutes.

"There must be a lot of them," observed Mr. Durban, as menacing
growls and roars came from the jungle, along the edge of which Tom
and the others were walking just then. "There are so many of the
brutes that they are bold, and they must be hungry, too. They came
close to our fire, because it wasn't so bright as the other blazes,
and that native must have wandered off into the forest. Well, I
guess it's all up with him."

"He's screaming yet," observed Ned.

Indeed, above the rumbling roars of the lions, and the crackling of
the campfires, could be heard the moaning cries of the unfortunate
black.

"He's right close here!" suddenly called Tom. "He's skirting the
jungle. I think I can get him!"

"Don't take any risks!" called Mr. Durban, who had caught up his own
rifle, that was now in working order again.

Tom Swift was not in sight. He had now penetrated into the jungle--
into the black forest where stalked the savage lions, intent on
getting other prey. Mr. Durban and Mr. Anderson vainly tried to
pierce the darkness to see something at which to shoot. Ned Newton
had eagerly started to follow his chum, but could not discern where
Tom was. A nameless fear clutched at the lad's heart. Mr. Damon was
softly blessing everything of which he could think.

Once more came that pitiful cry from the native, who was, as they
afterward learned, being dragged along by the lion, who had grabbed
him by the shoulder.

Suddenly in the dense jungle there shone a purple-bluish light. It
illuminated the scene like some great sky-rocket for an instant, and
in that brief time Ned and the others caught sight of a great, tawny
form, bounding along. It was a lion, with head held high, dragging
along a helpless black man.

A second later, and before the intense glare had died away, the
watchers saw the lion gently sink down, as though weary. He stopped
short in his tracks, his head rolled back, the jaws relaxed and the
native, who was unconscious now, toppled to one side.

"Tom's killed him with the electric rifle!" cried Mr. Durban.

"Bless my incandescent lamp! so he has," agreed Mr. Damon. "Bless my
dynamo! but that's a wonderful gun, it's as powerful as a
thunderbolt, or as gentle as a summer shower."

Mr. Durban seeing that the lion was dead, in that brief glance he
had had of the brute, called to some of the natives to come and get
their tribesman. They came, timidly enough at first, carrying many
torches, but when they understood that the lion was dead, they
advanced more boldly. They carried the wounded black to a hut, where
they applied their simple but effective remedies for the cruel bite
in his shoulder.

After Tom had shot several other of the illuminated charges into the
jungle, to see if he could discover any more lions, but failed to do
so, he and his friends returned to the anchored airship, amid the
murmured thanks of the Africans.

Bright fires were kept blazing all the rest of the night, but,
though lions could be heard roaring in the jungle, and though they
approached alarmingly close to the place where our friends were
encamped, none of the savage brutes ventured within the clearing.

With the valuable store of ivory aboard the Black Hawk, which was
now completely repaired, an early start was made the next morning.
The Africans besought Tom and his companions to remain, for it was
not often they could have the services of white men in slaying
elephants and lions.

"But, we've got to get on the trail," decided Tom, when the natives
had brought great stores of food, and such simple presents as they
possessed, to induce the travelers to remain.

"Every hour may add to the danger of the missionaries in the hands
of the red pygmies."

"Yes," said Mr. Anderson gravely, "it is our duty to save them."

And so the airship mounted into the air, our friends waving
farewells to the simple-hearted blacks, who did a sort of farewell
war-dance in their honor, shouting their praises aloud, and beating
the drums and tom-toms, so that the echoes followed for some time
after the Black Hawk had begun to mount upward toward the sky.

The craft was in excellent shape, due to the overhauling Tom had
given it while making the repairs. With the propellers beating the
air, and the rudder set to hold them about two thousand feet high,
the travelers moved rapidly over clearings, forests and jungles.

It was agreed that now, when they had made such a good start in
collecting ivory, that they would spend the next few days in trying
to get on the trail of the red pygmies. It might seem a simple
matter, after knowing the approximate location of the land of these
fierce little natives, to have proceeded directly to it. But Africa
is an immense continent, and even in an airship comparatively little
of the interior can be seen at a time.

Besides, the red pygmies had a habit of moving from place to place,
and they were so small, and so wild, capable of living in very tiny
huts or caves, and so primitive, not building regular villages as
the other Africans do, that as Ned said, they were as hard to locate
as the proverbial flea.

Our friends had a general idea of where to look for them, but on
nearing that land, and making inquiries of several friendly tribes,
they learned that the red pygmies had suddenly disappeared from
their usual haunts.

"I guess they heard that we were after them," said Tom, with a grim
smile one day, as he sent the airship down toward the earth, for
they were over a great plain, and several native villages could he
seen dotted on its surface.

"More likely they are in hiding because they have as captives two
white persons," said Mr. Anderson. "They are fierce and fearless,
but, nevertheless, they have, in times past, felt the vengeance of
the white man, and perhaps they dread that now."

They made a descent, and spent several days making inquiries from
the friendly blacks about the race of little men. But scarcely
anything was learned. Some of the negro tribes admitted having heard
of the red pygmies, and others, with superstitious incantations and
imprecations, said they had never heard of them.

One tribe of very large negroes had heard a rumor to the effect that
the band of the pygmies was several days' journey from their
village, across the mountains, and when Tom sent his airship there,
the searchers only found an impenetrable jungle, filled with lions
and other wild beasts, but not a sign of the pygmies, and with no
elephants to reward their search.

"But we're not going to give up," declared Tom, and the others
agreed with him. Forward went the Black Hawk in the search for the
imprisoned ones, but, as the days passed, and no news was had, it
seemed to grow more and more hopeless.

"I'm afraid if we do find them now," remarked Mr. Anderson at
length, "that we'll only recover the bodies of the missionaries."

"Then we'll avenge them," said Tom quietly.

They had stopped at another native village to make inquiries, but
without result, and were about to start off again that night when a
runner came in to announce that a herd of big elephants was feeding
not many miles away.

"Well, we'll stay over a day or so, and get some more ivory,"
decided Mr. Durban and that night they got ready for what was to
prove a big hunt.




CHAPTER XVII

SHOTS FROM ABOVE


"There they are!"

"My, what a lot of big ones!"

"Jove! Mr. Anderson, see those tusks!"

"Yes, you ought to get what you want this time, Mr. Durban."

"Bless my hatband! There must be two hundred of them!" exclaimed Mr.
Damon.

"I'm glad I recharged my rifle last night!" exclaimed Tom Swift.
"It's fully loaded now."

Then followed exulting cries and shouts of the natives, who were
following our friends, the elephant hunters, who had given voice to
the remarks we have just quoted.

It was early in the morning, and the hunt was about to start, for
the news brought in by the runner the night before had been closely
followed by the brutes themselves, and at dawn our friends were
astir, for scouts brought in word that the elephants, including many
big ones, were passing along only a few miles from the African
village.

Cautiously approaching, with the wind blowing from the elephants to
them, the white hunters made their way along. Mr. Durban was in the
lead, and when he saw a favorable opportunity he motioned for the
others to advance. Then, when he noticed the big bull sentinels of
the herd look about as if to detect the presence of enemies, he gave
another signal and the hunters sank out of sight in the tall grass.

As for the natives, they were like snakes, unseen but ever present,
wriggling along on their hands and knees. They were awaiting the
slaughter, when there would be fresh meat in abundance.

At length the old elephant hunter decided that they were near enough
to chance some shots. As a matter of fact, Tom Swift, with his
electric rifle, had been within range some time before, but as he
did not want to spoil the sport for the others, by firing and
killing, and so alarming the herd, he had held back. Now they could
all shoot together.

"Let her go!" suddenly cried Mr. Durban, and they took aim.

There was a fusillade of reports and several of the big brutes
toppled over.

"Bless my toothbrush!" cried Mr. Damon, "that's the time I got one!"

"Yes, and a fine specimen, too!" added Mr. Durban, who had only
succeeded in downing a small bull, with an indifferent pair of
tusks. "A fine speciment, Mr. Damon, I congratulate you!"

As for Tom Swift, he had killed two of the largest elephants in the
herd.

But now the hunters had their work cut out for them, since the
beasts had taken fright and were charging away at what seemed an
awkward gait, but which, nevertheless, took them rapidly over the
ground.

"Come on!" cried Mr. Durban. "We must get some more. Some of the
finest tusks I have ever seen are running away from us!"

He began to race after the retreating herd, but it is doubtful if he
would have caught up to them had not a band of natives, who had
crept up and surrounded the beasts, turned them by shouts and the
beating of tom-toms. Seeing an enemy in front of them, the elephants
turned, and our friends were able to get in several more shots. Tom
Swift picked out only those with immense tusks, and soon had several
to his credit. Ned Newton also bagged some prizes.

But finally the elephants, driven to madness by the firing and the
yells of the natives, broke through the line of black men, and
charged off into the jungle, where it was not only useless but
dangerous to follow them.

"Well, we have enough," said Mr. Durban, and when the tusks had been
collected it was found that indeed a magnificent and valuable supply
had been gathered.

"But I have yet to get my prize ones," said the old hunter with a
sigh. "Maybe we'll find the elephant with them when we locate the
red pygmies."

"If we do, we'll have our work cut out for us," declared Tom.

As on the other occasion after the hunt, there was a great feast for
the natives, who invited tribes from miles around, and for two days,
while the tusks were being cut out and cleaned, there were barbeques
on every side.

It was one afternoon, when they were seated in the shade of the
airship, cleaning their guns, and discussing the plans they had best
follow next, that our travellers suddenly heard a great commotion
amongst the Africans, who had for the past hour been very quiet,
most of them sleeping after the feasts. They yelled and shouted, and
began to beat their drums.

"Something is coming," said Ned.

"Perhaps there's going to be a fight," suggested Tom.

"Maybe it's the red pygmies," said Mr. Damon. "Bless my--"

But what he was going to bless he did not say, for at that instant
it seemed as if every native in sight suddenly disappeared, almost
like magic. They sank down into the grass, darted into their huts,
or hid in the tall grass.

"What can it be?" cried Tom, as he looked to see that his rifle was
in working order.

"Some enemy," declared Mr. Anderson.

"There they are!" cried Ned Newton, and as he spoke there burst into
view, coming from the tall grass that covered the plain about the
village, a herd of savage, wild buffaloes. On rushed the shaggy
creatures, their long, sharp horns seeming like waving spears as
they advanced.

"Here's more sport!" cried Tom.

"No! Not sport! Danger!" yelled Mr. Durban. "They're headed right
for us!"

"Then we'll stop them," declared the young inventor, as he raised
his gun.

"No! No!" begged the old hunter. "It's as much as our lives are
worth to try to stop a rush of wild buffaloes. You couldn't do it
with Gatling guns. We can kill a few, but the rest won't stop until
they've finished us and the aeroplane too."

"Then what's to be done?" demanded Mr. Anderson.

"Get into the airship!" cried Mr. Durban. "Send her up. It's the
only way to get out of their path. Then we can shoot them from
above, and drive them away!"

Quickly the adventurers leaped into the craft. On thundered the
buffaloes. Tom feared he could not get the motor started quickly
enough. He did not dare risk rising by means of the aeroplane
feature, but at once started the gas machine.

The big bag began to fill. Nearer came the wild creatures,
thundering over the ground, snorting and bellowing with rage.

"Quick, Tom!" yelled Ned, and at that instant the Black Hawk shot
upward, just as the foremost of the buffaloes passed underneath,
vainly endeavoring to gore the craft with their sweeping horns. The
air-travelers had risen just in time.

"Now it's our turn!" shouted Ned, as he began firing from above into
the herd of infuriated animals below him. Tom, after seeing that the
motor was working well, sent the airship circling about, while
standing in the steering tower, he guided his craft here and there,
meanwhile pouring a fusillade of his wireless bullets into the
buffaloes. Many of them dropped in their tracks, but the big herd
continued to rush here and there, crashing into the frail native
huts, tearing them down, and, whenever a black man appeared, chasing
after him infuriatedly.

"Keep at it!" cried Mr. Durban, as he poured more lead into the
buffaloes. "If we don't kill enough of them, and drive the others
away, there won't be anything left of this village."




CHAPTER XVIII

NEWS OF THE RED PYGMIES


Seldom had it been the lot of Tom and his companions to take part in
such a novel hunting scene as that in which they were now
participating. With the airship moving quickly about, darting here
and there under the guidance of the young inventor, the erratic
movements hither and thither of the buffaloes could be followed
exactly. Wherever the mass of the herd went the airship hovered over
them.

"Want any help, Tom?" called Ned, who was firing as fast as his gun
could be worked.

"I guess not," answered the steersman of the Black Hawk, who was
dividing his attention between managing the craft and firing his
electric rifle.

The others, too, were kept busy with their weapons, shooting down on
the infuriated animals. It seemed like a needless slaughter, but it
was not. Had it not been for the white men, the native village,
which consisted of only frail huts, would have been completely wiped
out by the animals. As it was they were kept "milling" about in a
circle in an open space, just as stampeded cattle on the western
ranges are kept from getting away, by being forced round and round.

Not a native was in sight, all being hidden away in the jungle or
dense grass. The white hunters in their airship had matters to
themselves.

At last the firing proved even too much for the buffaloes which, as
we have said, are among the most dreaded of African beasts. With
bellows of fear, the leading bulls of the herd unable to find the
enemy above their heads, darted of into the forest the way they had
come.

"There they go!" yelled Mr. Durban.

"Yes, and I'm glad to see the last of them," added Mr. Anderson,
with a breath of relief.

"Score another victory for the electric rifle," exclaimed Ned.

"Oh, you did as much execution as I did," declared the inventor of
the weapon.

"Bless my ramrod!" cried Mr. Damon. "I never shot so much in all my
life before."

"Yes, there is enough food to last the natives for a week," observed
Mr. Durban, as Tom adjusted the deflecting rudder to send the
airship down.

"It won't last much longer at the rate they eat," spoke the young
inventor with a laugh. "I never saw such fellows for appetites! They
seem to eat in their sleep."

There were many dead buffaloes, but there was no fear that the meat,
which was much prized by the Africans, would be wasted. Already the
natives were coming from their hiding places, knowing that the
danger was over. Once more they sang the praises of the mighty white
hunters, and the magical air craft in which they moved about.

With the elephants previously killed, the buffaloes provided
material for a great feast, preparations for which were at once
gotten under way, in spite of the fact that the blacks had hardly
stopped eating since the big hunt began. But it was about all they
had to do.

Some of the buffaloes were very large, and there were a number of
pairs of fine horns. Tom and Ned had some of the blacks cut them off
for trophies, and they were stored in the airship together with the
ivory.

Becoming rather tired of seeing so much feasting, our friends bade
the Africans farewell the next day, and once more resumed their
quest. They navigated through the air for another week, stopping at
several villages, and scanning the jungles and plains by means of
powerful telescopes, for a sight of the red pygmies. They also asked
for news of the sacking of the missionary settlement, but, beyond
meager facts, could learn nothing.

"Well, we've got to keep on, that's all," decided Mr. Durban. "We
may find them most unexpectedly."

"I'm sorry if I have taken you away from your work of gathering
ivory," spoke Mr. Anderson. "Perhaps you had better let me go, and
I'll see if I can't organize a band of friendly blacks, and search
for the red dwarfs myself."

"Not much!" exclaimed Tom warmly. "I said we'd help rescue those
missionaries, and we'll do it, too!"

"Of course," declared the old elephant hunter. "We have quite a lot
of ivory and, while we need more to make it pay well, we can look
for it after we rescue the missionaries as well as before. Perhaps
there will be a lot of elephants in the pygmies' land."

"I was only thinking that we can't go on forever in the airship."
said Mr. Anderson. "You'll have to go back to civilization soon,
won't you, Tom, to get gasolene?"

"No, we have enough for at least a month," answered the young
inventor. "I took aboard an unusually large supply when we started."

"What would happen if we ran out of it in the jungle?" asked Ned.
"Bless my pocketbook! What an unpleasant question!" exclaimed Mr.
Damon. "You are almost as cheerful, Ned, as was my friend Mr.
Parker, the gloomy scientist, who was always predicting dire
happenings."

"Well, I was only wondering," said Ned, who was a little abashed by
the manner in which his inquiry was received.

"Oh, it would be all right," declared Tom. "We would simply become a
balloon, and in time the wind would blow us to some white
settlement. There is plenty of material for making the lifting gas."

This was reassuring, and, somewhat easier in mind, Ned took his
place in the observation tower which looked down on the jungle over
which they were passing.

It was a dense forest. At times there could be seen, in the little
clearings, animals darting along. There were numbers of monkeys, an
occasional herd of buffaloes were observed, sometimes a solitary
stray elephant was noted, and as for birds, there were thousands of
them. It was like living over a circus, Ned declared.

They had descended one day just outside a large native village to
make inquiries about elephants and the red pygmies. Of the big
beasts no signs had been seen in several months, the hunters of the
tribe told Mr. Durban. And concerning the red pygmies, the blacks
seemed indisposed to talk.

Tom and the others could not understand this, until a witch-doctor,
whom the elephant hunter had met some time ago, when he was on a
previous expedition, told him that the tribe had a superstitious
fear of speaking of the little men.

"They may be around us--in the forest or jungle at any minute," the
witch-doctor said. "We never speak of them."

"Say, do you suppose that can be a clew?" asked Tom eagerly. "They
may be nearer at hand than we think."

"It's possible." admitted the hunter. "Suppose we stay here for a
few days, and I'll see if I can't get some of the natives to go off
scouting in the woods, and locate them, or at least put us on the
trail of the red dwarfs."

This was considered good advice, and it was decided to adopt it.
Accordingly the airship was put in a safe place, and our friends
prepared to spend a week, if necessary, in the native village. Their
presence with the wonderful craft was a source of wonder, and by
means of some trinkets judiciously given to the native king, and
also to his head subjects, and to the witch-doctors (who were a
power in the land), the good opinion of the tribe was won. Then, by
promising rewards to some of the bolder hunters, Mr. Durban finally
succeeded in getting them to go off scouting in the jungle for a
clew to the red pygmies.

"Now we'll have to wait," said Mr. Anderson, "and I hope we get good
news."

Our friends spent their time observing some of the curious customs
of the natives, and in witnessing some odd dances gotten up in their
honor. They also went hunting, and got plenty of game, for which
their hosts were duly grateful. Tom did some night stalking and
found his illuminating bullets a great success.

One hot afternoon Tom and Mr. Damon strolled off a little way into
the jungle, Tom with his electric weapon, in case he saw any game.
But no animals save a few big monkeys where to be seen, and the
young inventor scorned to kill them. It seemed too much like firing
at a human being he said, though the natives stated that some of the
baboons and apes were fierce, and would attack one on the slightest
provocation.

"I believe I'll sit down here and rest," said Tom, after a mile's
tramp, as he came to a little clearing in the woods.

"Very well, I'll go on," decided Mr. Damon. "Mr. Durban said there
were sometimes rare orchids in these jungles, and I am very fond of
those odd flowers. I'm going to see if I can get any."

He disappeared behind a fringe of moss-grown trees, and Tom sat
down, with his rifle across his knees. He was thinking of many
things, but chiefly of what yet lay before them--the discovery of
the red dwarfs and the possible rescue of the missionaries.

He might have been thus day-dreaming for perhaps a half hour, when
he suddenly heard great commotion in the jungle, in the direction in
which Mr. Damon had vanished. It sounded as though some one was
running rapidly. Then came the report of the odd man's gun.

"He's seen some game!" exclaimed Tom, jumping up, and preparing to
follow his friend. But he did not have the chance. An instant later
Mr. Damon burst through the bushes with every appearance of fright,
his gun held above his head with one hand, and his pith helmet
swaying to and fro in the other.

"They're coming!" he cried to Tom.

"Who, the red pygmies?"

"No, but a couple of rhinoceroses are after me. I wounded one, and
he and his mate are right behind. Don't let them catch me, Tom!"

Mr. Damon was very much alarmed, and there was good occasion for it,
as Tom saw a moment later, for two fierce rhinoceroses burst out of
the jungle almost on the heels of the fleeing man.

Thought was not quicker than Tom Swift. He raised his deadly rifle,
and pressed the button. A charge of wireless electricity shot toward
the foremost animal, and it was dropped in its tracks. The other
came on woofing and snorting with rage. It was the one Mr. Damon had
slightly wounded.

"Come on!" yelled the young inventor, for his friend was in front of
the beast, and in range with the rifle. "Jump to one side, Mr.
Damon."

Mr. Damon tried, but his foot slipped, and there was no need for
jumping. He fell and rolled over. The rhinoceros swerved toward him,
with the probable intention of goring the prostrate man with the
formidable horn, but it had no chance. Once more the young inventor
fired, this time with a heavier charge, and the animal instantly
toppled over dead.

"Are you hurt?" asked Tom anxiously, as he ran to his friend. Mr.
Damon got up slowly. He felt all over himself, and then answered:

"No, Tom, I guess I'm not hurt, except in my dignity. Never again
will I fire at a sleeping rhinoceros unless you are with me. I had a
narrow escape," and he shook Tom's hand heartily.

"Did you see any orchids?" asked the lad with a smile.

"No, those beasts didn't give me a chance! Bless my tape measure!
but they're big fellows!"

Indeed they were fine specimens, and there was the usual rejoicing
among the natives when they brought in the great bodies, pulling
them to the village with ropes made of vines.

After this Mr. Damon was careful not to go into the jungle alone,
nor, in fact, did any of our friends so venture. Mr. Durban said it
was not safe.

They remained a full week in the native village, and received no
news. In fact, all but one of the hunters came back to report that
there was no sign of the red pygmies in that neighborhood.

"Well, I guess we might as well move on, and see what we can do
ourselves," said Mr. Durban.

"Let's wait until the last hunter comes back," suggested Tom. "He
may bring word."

"Some of his friends think he'll never come back," remarked Mr.
Anderson.

"Why not?" asked Ned.

"They think he has been killed by some wild beast."

But this fear was ungrounded. It was on the second day after the
killing of the rhinoceroses that, as Tom was tinkering away in the
engine-room of the airship, and thinking that perhaps they had
better get under way, that a loud shouting was heard among the
natives.

"I wonder what's up now?" mused the young inventor as he went
outside. He saw Mr. Durban and Mr. Anderson running toward the ship.
Behind them was a throng of blacks, led by a weary man whom Tom
recognized as the missing hunter. The lad's heart beat high with
hope. Did the African bring news?

On came Mr. Durban, waving his hands to Tom.

"We've located 'em!" he shouted.

"Not the red pygmies?" asked Tom eagerly.

"Yes; this hunter has news of them. He has been to the border of
their country, and narrowly escaped capture. Then he was attacked by
a lion, and slightly wounded. But, Tom, now we can get on the
trail!"

"Good!" cried the young inventor. "That's fine news!" and he
rejoiced that once more there would be activity, for he was tired of
remaining in the African camp, and then, too, he wanted to proceed
to the rescue. Already it might be too late to save the unfortunate
missionaries.




CHAPTER XIX

AN APPEAL FOR HELP


The African hunter's story was soon told. He had gone on farther
than had any of his companions, and, being a bold and brave man, had
penetrated into the very fastness of the jungle where few would dare
to venture.

But even he had despaired of getting on the trail of the fierce
little red men, until one afternoon, just at dusk he had heard
voices in the forest. Crouching behind a fallen tree, he waited and
saw passing by some of the pygmy hunters, armed with bows and
arrows, and blowguns. They had been out after game. Cautiously the
hunter followed them, until he located one of their odd villages,
which consisted of little mud huts, poorly made.

The black hunter remained in the vicinity of the pygmies all that
night, and was almost caught, for some wild dogs which hung around
the village smelled him out, and attracted to him the attention of
the dwarf savages. The hunter took to a tree, and so escaped. Then,
carefully marking the trail, he came away in the morning. When near
home, a lion had attacked him, but he speared the beast to death,
after a hand-to-hand struggle in which his leg was torn.

"And do you think we can find the place?" asked Ned, when Mr. Durban
had finished translating the hunter's story.

"I think so," was the reply.

"But is this the settlement where the missionaries are?" asked Tom
anxiously.

"That is what we don't know," said Mr. Anderson. "The native scout
could not learn that. But once we get on the trail of the dwarfs, I
think we can easily find the particular tribe which has the
captives."

"At any rate, we'll get started and do something," declared Tom, and
the next day, after the African hunter had described, as well as he
could, where the place was, the Black Hawk was sent up into the air,
good-bys were called down, and once more the adventurers were under
way.

It was decided that they had better proceed cautiously, and lower
the airship, and anchor it, sometime before getting above the place
where the pygmy village was.

"For they may see us, and, though they don't know what our craft is,
they may take the alarm and hide deeper in the jungle with the
prisoners, where we can't find them," said Tom.

His plan was adopted, and, while it had taken the native hunter
several days to reach the borders of the dwarfs' land, those in the
airship made the trip in one day. That is, they came as far toward
it as they thought would be safe, and one night, having located a
landmark which Mr. Durban said was on the border, the nose of the
Black Hawk was pointed downward, and soon they were encamped in a
little clearing in the midst of the dense jungle which was all about
them.

With his electric rifle, Tom noiselessly killed some birds, very
much like chicken, of which an excellent meal was made and then, as
it became dark very early, and as nothing could be done, they
lighted a campfire, and retired inside their craft to pass the
night.

It must have been about midnight that Tom, who was a light sleeper
at times, was awakened by some noise outside the window near which
his stateroom was. He sat up and listened, putting out his hand to
where his rifle stood in the corner near his bunk. The lad heard
stealthy footsteps pattering about on the deck of the airship. There
was a soft, shuffling sound, such as a lion or a tiger makes, when
walking on bare boards. In spite of himself, Tom felt the hair on
his head beginning to creep, and a shiver ran down his back.

"There's something out there!" he whispered. "I wonder if I'd better
awaken the others? No, if it's a sneaking lion, I can manage to kill
him, but--"

He paused as another suggestion came to him.

The red pygmies! They went barefoot! Perhaps they were swarming
about the ship which they might have discovered in the darkness.

Tom Swift's heart beat rapidly. He got softly out of his bunk, and,
with his rifle in hand made his way to the door opening on deck. On
his way he gently awakened Ned and Mr. Durban, and whispered to them
his fear.

"If the red pygmies are out there we'll need all our force," said
the old elephant hunter. "Call Mr. Damon and Mr. Anderson, Ned, and
tell them to bring their guns."

Soon they were all ready, fully armed. They listened intently. The
airship was all in darkness, for lights drew a horde of insects. The
campfire had died down. The soft footsteps could still be heard
moving about the deck.

"That sounds like only one person or animal," whispered Ned.

"It does," agreed Tom. "Wait a minute, I'll fire an illuminating
charge, and we can see what it is."

The others posted themselves at windows that gave a view of the
deck. Tom poked his electric rifle out of a crack of the door, and
shot forth into the darkness one of the blue illuminations. The deck
of the craft was instantly lighted up brilliantly, and in the glare,
crouched on the deck, could be seen a powerful black man, nearly
naked, gazing at the hunters.

"A black!" gasped Tom, as the light died out. "Maybe it is one from
the village we just left. What do you want? Who are you?" called the
lad, forgetting that the Africans spoke only their own language. To
the surprise of all, there came his reply in broken English:

"Me Tomba! Me go fo' help for Missy Illingway--fo' Massy Illingway.
Me run away from little red men! Me Christian black man. Oh, if you
be English, help Missy Illingway--she most die! Please help. Tomba
go but Tomba be lost! Please help!"




CHAPTER XX

THE FIGHT


Surprise, for the moment, held Tom and the others speechless. To be
answered in English, poor and broken as it was, by a native African,
was strange enough, but when this same African was found aboard the
airship, in the midst of the jungle, at midnight, it almost passed
the bounds of possibility.

"Tomba!" mused Tom, wondering where he had heard that name before.
"Tomba?"

"Of course!" cried Mr. Anderson, suddenly. "Don't you remember?
That's the name of the servant of Mr. and Mrs. Illingway, who
escaped and brought news of their capture by the pygmies. That's who
Tomba is."

"Yes, but Tomba escaped," objected Mr. Durban. "He went to the white
settlements with the news. How comes he here?"

"We'll have to find out," said Tom, simply. "Tomba, are you there?"
he called, as he fired other illuminating charge. It disclosed the
black man standing up on the deck, and looking at them appealingly.

"Yes, Tomba here," was the answer. "Oh, you be English, Tomba know.
Please help Missy and Massy Illingway. Red devils goin' kill 'em
pretty much quick."

"Come in!" called Tom, as he turned on the electric lights in the
airship. "Come in and tell us all about it. But how did you get
here?"

"Maybe there are two Tombas," suggested Ned.

"Bless my safety razor!" cried Mr. Damon "perhaps Ned is right!"

But he wasn't, as they learned when they had questioned the African,
who came inside the airship, looking wonderingly around at the many
strange things he saw. He was the same Tomba who had escaped the
massacre, and had taken news of the capture of his master and
mistress to the white settlement. In vain after that he had tried to
organize a band to go back with him to the rescue, but the whites in
the settlement were too few, and the natives too timid. Then Tomba,
with grief in his heart, and not wanting to live while the
missionaries whom he had come to care for very much, were captives,
he went back into the jungle, determined, if he could not help them,
that at least he would share their fate, and endeavor to be of some
service to them in their captivity.

After almost unbelievable hardships, he had found the red pygmies,
and had allowed himself to be captured by them. They rejoiced
greatly in the possession of the big black man, and for some strange
reason had not killed him. He was allowed to share the captivity of
his master and mistress.

Time went on, and the pygmies did not kill their prisoners. They
even treated them with some kindness but were going to sacrifice
them at their great annual festival, which was soon to take place.
Mr. and Mrs. Illingway, Tomba told our friends in his broken
English, had urged him to escape at the first opportunity. They knew
if he could get away he would travel through the jungle. They could
not, even if they had not been so closely guarded that escape was
out of the question.

But Tomba refused to go until Mr. Illingway had said that perhaps he
might get word to some white hunters, and so send help to the
captives. This Tomba consented to do, and, watching his chance, he
did escape. That was several nights ago, and he had been traveling
through the jungle ever since. It was by mere accident that he came
upon the anchored airship, and his curiosity led him to board her.
The rest is known.

"Well, of all queer yarns, this is the limit!" exclaimed Tom, when
the black had finished. "What had we better do about it?"

"Get ready to attack the red pygmies at once!" decided Mr. Durban.
"If we wait any longer it may be too late!"

"My idea, exactly," declared Mr. Anderson.

"Bless my bowie-knife!" cried Mr. Damon. "It'd like to get a chance
at the red imps! Come on, Tom! Let's start at once."

"No, we need daylight to fight by," replied Tom, with a smile at his
friend's enthusiasm. "We'll go forward in the morning."

"In the airship?" asked Mr. Damon.

"I think so," answered Tom. "There can be no advantage now in trying
to conceal ourselves. We can move upon them from where we are so
quickly that they won't have much chance to get away. Besides it
will take us too long to make our way through the jungle afoot. For,
now that the escape of Tomba must be known, they may kill the
captives at once to forestall any rescue."

"Then we'll move forward in the morning," declared Mr. Durban.

They took Tomba with them in the airship the next day, though he
prayed fervently before he consented to it. But they needed him to
point out the exact location of the pygmies' village, since it was
not the one the hunter-scout had been near.

The Black Hawk sailed through the air. On board eager eyes looked
down for a first sight of the red imps. Tomba, who was at Tom's side
in the steering tower, told him, as best he could, from time to
time, how to set the rudders.

"Pretty soon by-em-by be there," said the black man at length. "Pass
ober dat hill, den red devils live."

"Well, we'll soon be over that hill," announced Tom grimly. "I guess
we'd better get our rifles ready for the battle."

"Are you going to attack them at once?" asked Mr. Damon.

"Well," answered the young inventor, "I don't believe we ought to
kill any of them if we can avoid it. I don't like to do such a thing
but, perhaps we can't help ourselves. My plan is to take the airship
down, close to the hut where the missionaries are confined. Tomba
can point it out to us. If we can rescue them without bloodshed, so
much the better. But we'll fight if we have to."

Grimly they watched as the airship sailed over the hill. Then
suddenly there came into view a collection of mud huts on a vast
plain, surrounded by dense jungle on every side. As the travelers
looked, they could see little creatures running wildly about. Even
without a glass it could be noted that their bodies were covered
with a curious growth of thick sandy hair.

"The red pygmies!" cried Tom. "Now for the rescue!"

Eagerly Tomba indicated the hut where his master and mistress were
held. Telling his friends to have their weapons in readiness, Tom
steered the airship toward the rude shelter whence he hoped to take
the missionaries. Down to the ground swiftly shot the Black Hawk.
Tom checked her with a quick movement of the deflecting rudder, and
she landed gently on the wheels.

"Mr. Illingway! Mrs. Illingway! We have come to rescue you!" yelled
the young inventor, as he stepped out on the deck, with his electric
rifle in his hand. "Where are you? Can you come out?"

The door of the hut was burst open, and a white man and woman,
recognizable as such, even in the rude skins that clothed them,
rushed out. Wonder spread over their faces as they saw the great
airship. They dropped on their knees.

The next instant a swarm of savage little red men surrounded them,
and rudely bore them, strugglingly, back into the hut.

"Come on!" cried Tom, about to leap to the ground. "It's now or
never! We must save them!"

Mr. Durban pulled him back, and pointed to a horde of the red-haired
savages rushing toward the airship. "They'd tear you to pieces in a
minute!" cried the old hunter. "We must fight them from the ship."

There was a curious whistling sound in the air. Mr. Durban looked
up.

"Duck, everybody!" he yelled. "They're firing arrows at us! Get
under shelter, for they may be poisoned!"

Tom and the others darted into the craft. The arrows rattled on deck
in a shower, and hundreds of the red imps were rushing up to give
battle. Inside the hut where the missionaries were, it was now
quiet. Tom Swift wondered if they still lived.

"Give 'em as good as they send!" cried Mr. Durban. "We will have to
fire at them now. Open up with your electric rifle, Tom!"

As he spoke the elephant hunter fired into the midst of the
screaming savages. The battle had begun.




CHAPTER XXI

DRIVEN BACK


What the travelers had heard regarding the fierceness and courage of
the red pygmies had not been one bit exaggerated. Never had such
desperate fighting ever taken place. The red dwarfs, scarcely one of
whom was more than three feet high, were strongly built, and there
were so many of them, and they battled together with such singleness
of purpose, that they were more formidable than a tribe of ordinary-
sized savages would have been.

And their purpose was to utterly annihilate the enemy that had so
unexpectedly come upon them. It did not matter to them that Tom and
the others had arrived in an airship. The strange craft had no
superstitious terror for them, as it had for the simpler blacks.

"Bless my multiplication tables!" cried Mr. Damon. "What a mob of
them!"

"Almost too many!" murmured Tom Swift, who was rapidly firing his
electric rifle at them. "We can never hope to drive them back, I'm
afraid."

Indeed from every side of the plain, and even from the depths of the
jungle the red dwarfs were now pouring. They yelled most horribly,
screaming in rage, brandishing their spears and clubs, and keeping
up an incessant fire of big arrows from their bows, and smaller ones
from the blowguns.

As yet none of our friends had been hit, for they were sheltered in
the airship, and as the windows were covered with a mesh of wire, to
keep out insects, this also served to prevent the arrows from
entering. There were loopholes purposely made to allow the rifles to
be thrust out.

Mercifully, Tom and the others fired only to disable, and not to
kill the red pygmies. Wounded in the arms or legs, the little
savages would be incapable of fighting, and this plan was followed.
But so fierce were they that some, who were wounded twice, still
kept up the attack.

Tom's electric rifle was well adapted for this work, as he could
regulate the charge to merely stun, no matter at what part of the
body it was directed. So he could fire indiscriminintly, whereas the
others had to aim carefully. And Tom's fire was most effective. He
disabled scores of the red imps, but scores of others sprang up to
take their places.

After their first rush the pygmies had fallen back before the well-
directed fire of our friends, but as their chiefs and head men urged
them to the attack again, they came back with still fiercer energy.
Some, more bold than the others, even leaped to the deck of the
airship, and tried to tear the screens from the windows. They partly
succeeded, and in one casement from which Ned was firing they made a
hole.

Into this they shot a flight of arrows, and one slightly wounded the
bank clerk on the arm. The wound was at once treated with
antiseptics, after the window had been barricaded, and Ned declared
that he was ready to renew the fight. Tom, too, got an arrow scratch
on the neck, and one of the barbs entered Mr. Durban's leg, but the
sturdy elephant hunter would not give up, and took his place again
after the wound had been bandaged.

From time to time as he worked his electric gun, which had been
charged to its utmost capacity, Tom glanced at the hut where the
missionaries were prisoners. There was no movement noticed about it,
and no sound came from it. Tom wondered what had happened inside--he
wondered what was happening as the battle progressed.

Fiercely the fight was kept up. Now the red imps would be driven
back, and again they would swarm about the airship, until it seemed
as if they must overwhelm it. Then the fire of the white adventurers
was redoubled. The electric rifle did great work, and Tom did not
have to stop and refill the magazine, as did the others.

Suddenly, above the noise of the conflict, Tom Swift heard an
ominous sound. It was a hissing in the air, and well he knew what it
was.

"The gas bag!" he cried. "They've punctured it! The vapor is
escaping. If they put too many holes in the bag it will be all up
with us!"

"What's to be done?" asked Mr. Durban.

"If we can't drive them back we must retreat ourselves!" declared
Tom desperately. "Our only hope is to keep the airship safe from
harm."

Once more came a rush of the savages. They had discovered that the
gas bag was vulnerable, and were directing their arrows against
that. It was punctured in several more places. The gas was rapidly
escaping.

"We've got to retreat!" yelled Tom. He hurried to the engine-room,
and turned on the power. The great propellers revolved, and sent the
Black Hawk scudding across the level plain. With yells of surprise
the red dwarfs scattered arid made way for it.

Up into the air it mounted on the broad wings. For the time being
our friends has been driven back, and the missionaries whom they had
come to rescue were still in the hands of the savages.




CHAPTER XXII

A NIGHT ATTACK


"Well, what's to be done?"

Tom Swift asked that question.

"Bless my percussion cap! They certainly are the very worst imps for
fighting that I ever heard of," commented Mr. Damon helplessly.

"Is the gas bag much punctured?" asked Ned Newton.

"Wait a minute," resumed the young inventor, as he pulled the speed
lever a trifle farther over, thereby sending the craft forward more
swiftly, "I think my question ought to be answered first. What's to
be done? Are we going to run away, and leave that man and woman to
their fate?"

"Of course not!" declared Mr. Durban stoutly, "but we couldn't stay
there, and have them destroy the airship."

"No, that's so," admitted Tom, "if we lost the airship it would be
all up with us and our chances of rescuing the missionaries. But
what can we do? I hate to retreat!"

"But what else is there left for us?" demanded Ned.

"Nothing, of course. But we've got to plan to get the best of those
red pygmies. We can't go back in the airship, and give them open
battle. There are too many of them, and, by Jove! I believe more are
coming every minute!"

Tom and the others looked down. From all sides of the plain,
hastening toward the village of mud huts, from which our friends
were retreating, could be seen swarms of the small but fierce
savages. They were coming from the jungle, and were armed with war
clubs, bows and arrows and the small but formidable blowguns.

"Where are they coming from?" asked Mr. Damon.

"From the surrounding tribes," explained Mr. Durban. "They have been
summoned to do battle against us."

"But how did the ones we fought get word to the others so soon?" Ned
demanded.

"Oh, they have ways of signaling," explained Mr. Anderson. "They can
make the notes of some of their hollow-tree drums carry a long
distance, and then they are very swift runners, and can penetrate
into the jungle along paths that a white man would hardly see. They
also use the smoke column as a signal, as our own American Indians
used to do. Oh, they can summon all their tribesmen to the fight,
and they probably will. Likely the sound of our guns attracted the
imps, though if we all had electric rifles like Tom's they wouldn't
make any noise."

"Well, my rifle didn't appear to do so very much good this tune,"
observed the young inventor, as he stopped the forward motion of the
ship now, and let it hover over the plain in sight of the village,
the gas bag serving to sustain the craft, and there was little wind
to cause it to drift. "Those fellows didn't seem to mind being hurt
and killed any more than if mosquitoes were biting them."

"The trouble is we need a whole army, armed with electric rifles to
make a successful attack," said Mr. Durban. "There are swarms of
them there now, and more coming every minute. I do hope Mr. and Mrs.
Illingway are alive yet."

"Yes," added Mr. Anderson solemnly, "we must hope for the best. But,
like Tom Swift, I ask, what's to be done?"

"Bless my thinking cap!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "It seems to me if we
can't fight them openly in the daytime, there's only one other thing
to do."

"What's that?" asked Tom. "Go away? I'll not do it!"

"No, not go away," exclaimed Mr. Damon, "but make a night attack. We
ought to be able to do something then, and with your illuminating
rifle, Tom, we'd have an advantage! What do you say?"

"I say it's the very thing!" declared Tom, with sudden enthusiasm.
"We'll attack them to-night, when they're off their guard, and we'll
see if we can't get the missionaries out of that hut. And to better
fool the savages, we'll just disappear now, and make 'em believe
we've flown away."

"Then the missionaries will think we're deserting them," objected
Mr. Anderson.

But there was no help for it, and so Tom once more turned on the
power and the craft sailed away.

Tomba, the faithful black, begged to be allowed to go down, and tell
his master and mistress that help would soon be at hand again, even
though it looked like a retreat on the part of the rescuers, but
this could not he permitted.

"They'd tear you in pieces as soon as you got among those red imps,"
said Tom. "You stay here, Tomba, and you can help us to-night."

"A'right, me glad help lick red fellows," said the black, with as
cheerful a grin as he could summon.

The Black Hawk circled around, with Tom and the others looking for a
good place to land. They were out of sight of the village now but
did not doubt but that they were observed by the keen eyes of the
little men.

"We want to pick out a place where they won't come upon us as we
descend," declared Tom. "We've got to mend some leaks in the gas
bag, for, while they are not serious, if we get any more punctures
they may become so. So we've got to pick out a good place to go
down."

Finally, by means of powerful glasses, a desolate part of the jungle
was selected. No files of the red dwarfs, coming from their
scattered villages to join their tribesmen, had been noted in the
vicinity picked out, and it was hoped that it would answer. Slowly
the airship settled to earth, coming to rest in a thick grove of
trees, where there was an opening just large enough to allow the
Black Hawk to enter.

Our friends were soon busy repairing the leaks in the bag, while Mr.
Damon got a meal ready. As they ate they talked over plans for the
night attack.

It was decided to wait until it was about two o'clock in the
morning, as at that hour the dwarfs were most generally asleep,
Tomba said. They always stayed up quite late, sitting around camp-
fires, and eating the meat which the hunters brought in each day.
But their carousings generally ended at midnight, the black said,
and then they fell into a heavy sleep. They did not post guards, but
since they knew of the presence of the white men in the airship,
they might do it this time.

"Well, we've got to take our chance," decided Tom. "We'll start off
from here about one o'clock, and I'll send the ship slowly along.
We'll get right over the hut where the captives are, if possible,
and then descend. I'll manage the ship, and one of you can work the
electric rifle if they attack us. We'll make a dash, get Mr. and
Mrs. Illingway from the hut, and make a quick get-away."

It sounded good, and they were impatient to put it into operation.
That afternoon Tom and his friends went carefully over every inch of
their craft, to repair it and have it in perfect working order. Guns
were cleaned, and plenty of ammunition laid out. Then, shortly after
one o'clock in the morning the ship was sent up, and with the
searchlight ready to be turned on instantly, and with his electric
rifle near at hand, Tom Swift guided his craft on to the attack.
Soon they could see the glow of dying fires in the dwarfs' village,
but no sound came from the sleeping hordes of red imps.




CHAPTER XXIII

THE RESCUE


"Can you make out the hut, Tom?" asked Ned, as he stood at his
chum's side in the steering tower, and gazed downward on the silent
village.

"Not very clearly. Suppose you take a look through the night-
glasses. Maybe you'll have better luck."

Ned peered long and earnestly.

"No, I can't see a thing." he said. "It all looks to be a confused
jumble of huts. I can't tell one from the other. We'll have to go
lower."

"I don't want to do that," objected Tom. "If this attack succeeds at
all, it will have to be sharp and quick. If we go down where they
can spot us, and work our way up to the hut where the captives are,
we'll run the chance of an attack that may put us out of business."

"Yes, we ought to get right over the hut, and then make a sudden
swoop down," admitted Ned, "but if we can't see it--"

"I have it!" cried Tom suddenly. "Tomba! That African can see in the
dark like a cat. Why, just before we started I dropped a wrench, and
I didn't have any matches handy to look for it. I was groping around
in the dark trying to get my hands on it, and you know it was pretty
black in the jungle. Well, along come Tomba. and he spotted it at
once and picked it up. We'll call him here and get him to point out
the hut. He can tell me how to steer."

"Good!" cried Ned, and the black was soon standing in the pilot
house. He comprehended what was wanted of him, and peered down,
seeking to penetrate the darkness.

"Shall I go down a little lower?" asked Tom.

For a moment Tomba did not answer. Then be uttered an exclamation of
pleasure.

"Me see hut!" he said, clutching Tom's arm. "Down dere!" He pointed,
but neither Tom nor Ned could see it. However, as Tomba was now
giving directions, telling Tom when to go to the left or the right,
as the wind currents deflected they were certain of soon reaching
the place where Mr. and Mrs. Illingway were concealed, if they were
still alive.

The Black Hawk was moving slowly, and was not under as good control
as if she had been making ninety miles an hour. As it was desired to
proceed as quietly as possible, the craft was being used as a
dirigible balloon, and the propellers were whirled around by means
of a small motor, worked by a storage battery. While not much power
was obtained this way, there was the advantage of silence, which was
very necessary. Slowly the Black Hawk sailed on through the night.
In silence the adventurers waited for the moment of action. They had
their weapons in readiness. Mr. Durban was to work the electric
rifle, as all Tom's attention would be needed at the machinery. As
soon as the craft had made a landing he was to leap out, carrying a
revolver in either hand, and, followed by Tomba, would endeavor to
gain entrance to the hut, break through the flimsy grass-woven
curtain over the doorway, and get Mr. and Mrs. Illingway out. Ned,
Mr. Damon and the other two men would stand by to fire on the red
pygmies as soon as they commenced the attack, which they would
undoubtedly do as soon as the guards of the captives raised the
alarm.

The airship was in darkness, for it would have been dangerous to
show a light. Some wakeful dwarf might see the moving illumination
in the sky, and raise a cry.

"Mos' dere," announced Tomba at length. And then, for the first
time, Ned and Tom had a glimpse of the hut. It stood away from the
others, and was easy to pick out in daylight, but even the darkness
offered no handicap to Tomba. "Right over him now," he suddenly
called, as he leaned out of the pilot house window, and looked down.
"Right over place. Oh, Tomba glad when he see Missy an' Massy!"

"Yes, I hope you do see them," murmured Tom, as he pulled the lever
which would pump the gas from the inflated bag, and compress it into
tanks, until it was needed again to make the ship rise. Slowly the
Black Hawk sank down.

"Get ready!" called Tom in a low voice.

It was a tense moment. Every one of the adventurers felt it, and all
but Tom grasped their weapons with tighter grips. They were ready to
spring out as soon as a landing was made. Tom managed the machinery
in the dark, for he knew every wheel, gear and lever, and could have
put his hand on any one with his eyes shut. The two loaded revolvers
were on a shelf in front of him. The side door of the pilot house
was ajar, to allow him quick egress.

Tomba, armed with a big club he had picked up in the jungle, was
ready to follow. The black was eager for the fray to begin, though
how he and the others would fare amid the savages was hard to say.

Still not a sound broke the quiet. It was very dark, for nearly all
the camp fires, over which the nightly feast had been prepared, were
out. The hut could be dimly made out, however.

Suddenly there was a slight tremor through the ship. She seemed to
shiver, and bound upward a little.

"We've landed!" whispered Tom. "Now for it! Come on, Tomba!"

The big black glided after the lad like a shadow. With his two
weapons held in readiness our hero went out on deck. The others,
with cocked rifles, stood ready for the attack to open. It had been
decided that as soon as the first alarm was given by the dwarfs,
which would probably be when Tom broke into the hut, the firing
would begin.

"Open!" called Tom to Tomba, and the big black dashed his club
through the grass curtain over the doorway of the hut. He fairly
leaped inside, with a cry of battle on his lips.

"Mr. Illingway! Mrs. Illingway!" called Tom, "We've come to save
you. Hurry out. The airship is just outside!"

He fired one shot through the roof of the hut, so that the flash
would reveal to him whether or not the two missionaries were in the
place. He saw two forms rise up in front of him, and knew that they
were the white captives he had observed daring the former attack.

"Oh, what is it?" he heard the woman ask.

"A rescue! Thank the dear Lord!" answered her husband fervently.
"Oh, whoever you are, God bless you!"

"Come quickly!" cried Tom, "we haven't a moment to lose!"

He was speaking to absolute blackness now, for it was darker
immediately following the revolver flash than before. But he felt a
man's hand thrust about his arm, and he knew it was Mr. Illingway.

"Take your wife's hand, and follow me," ordered Tom. "Come, Tomba!
Are there any of the red pygmies in here?"

He had not seen any at the weapon's flash, but his question was
answered a moment later, for there arose from within and without the
hut a chorus of wild yells. At the same time Tom felt small arms
grasp him about the legs.

"Come on!" he yelled. "They're awake and after us!"

The din outside increased. Tom heard the rifles of his friends
crack. He saw, through the torn door curtain, the flashes of fire.
Then came a blue glare, and Tom knew that Mr. Durban was using the
electric weapon.

By these intermittent gleams Tom managed to see sufficiently to
thrust Mr. and Mrs. Illingway ahead of him. Tomba was at their side.
The yells inside the hut were almost deafening. All the red dwarfs
left to guard the captives had awakened, and they could see well
enough to attack Tom. Fortunately they had no weapons, but they
fairly threw themselves upon the sturdy lad, trying to pull him
down.

"Go on! Go on!" he yelled to the captives, fairly pushing them
along. Then, knowing they were out of the way, he turned and fired
his two revolvers as fast as he could pull the triggers, into the
very faces of the red imps who were seeking to drag him down. Again
and again he fired, until he had emptied both cylinders of his
weapons.

He felt the grasps of the fiendish little men relax one by one. Tom
finally dragged himself loose, and staggered out of the hut. The
captives and Tomba were right in front of him. At the airship, which
loomed up in the flashes from the guns and electric rifle, Tom's
friends were giving battle. About them swarmed the hordes of
savages, with more of the imps pouring in every moment.

"Get aboard!" cried Tom to the missionaries. "Get on the airship,
and we'll move out of this!"

He felt a stinging pain in his neck, where an arrow struck him. He
tore the arrow out, and rushed forward. Fairly pushing Mr. and Mrs.
Illingway up on deck before him, Tom followed. Tomba was capering
about his master and mistress, and he swung his big club savagely.
He had not been idle, and many a red imp had gone down under his
blows.

"Rescued! Rescued!" murmured Mr. Illingway, as Tom hastened to the
pilot house to start the motor.




CHAPTER XXIV

TWO OTHER CAPTIVES


But the rescue was not yet accomplished. Those on the airship were
still in danger, and grave peril, for all about them were the red
savages, shouting, howling, yelling and capering about, as they were
now thoroughly aroused, and realized that their captives had been
taken away from them. They determined to get them back, and were
rallying desperately to battle. Nearly all of them were armed by
this time, and flight after flight of spears and arrows were thrown
or shot toward the airship.

Fortunately it was too dark to enable the pygmies to take good aim.
They were guided, to an extent, by the flashes of fire from the
rifles, but these were only momentary. Still some of our friends
received slight wounds, for they stood on the open deck of the
craft.

"Bless my eye-glasses!" suddenly exclaimed Mr. Damon. "I'm stuck!"

"Don't mind that!" advised Ned. "Keep on pouring lead into them.
We'll soon be away from here!"

"Don't fire any more!" called Mr. Durban. "The gun-flashes tell them
where to shoot. I'll use the electric rifle. It's better."

They followed his advice, and put aside their weapons. By means of
the electric flash, which he projected into the midst of the
savages, without the glare coming on the airship, Mr. Durban was
able to tell where to aim. Once he had a mass of red pygmies
located, he could keep on shooting charge after charge into their
midst.

"Use it full power!" called Tom, as he opened the gas machine to its
widest capacity, so the bag would quickly fill, and the craft be
sent forward, for it was so dark, and the ground near the huts so
uneven, that the Black Hawk could not rise as an aeroplane.

The elephant hunter turned on full strength in the electric gun and
the wireless bullets were sent into the midst of the attackers. The
result was surprising. They were so closely packed together that
when one was hit the electrical shock was sent through his nearly
naked body into the naked bodies of his tribesmen who pressed on
every side of him. In consequence whole rows of the savages went
down at a time, disabled from fighting any more.

Meanwhile Tom was working frantically to hasten the rising of the
airship. His neck pained him very much where the arrow had struck
him, but he dared not stop now to dress the wound. He could feel the
blood running down his side, but he shut his teeth grimly and said
nothing.

The two missionaries, scarcely able to believe that they were to be
saved, had been shown into an inner cabin by Tomba, who had become
somewhat used to the airship by this time, and who could find his
way about well in the dark, for no lights had yet been turned on.

Hundreds of pygmies had been disabled, yet still others came to take
their places. The gas bag was again punctured in several places, but
the rents were small, and Tom knew that he could make the gas faster
than it could escape, unless the bag was ripped open.

"They're climbing up the sides!" suddenly called Ned Newton, for he
saw several of the little men clambering up. "What shall we do?"

"Pound their fingers!" called Mr. Anderson. "Get clubs and whack
them!" It was good advice. Ned remembered on one occasion when he
and Tom were looking at Andy Foger's airship, how this method had
been proposed when the bank clerk hung on the back fence. As he
grabbed up a stick, and proceeded to pound the hands and bare arms
of the savages who were clinging to the railing, Ned found himself
wondering what had become of the bully. He was to see Andy sooner
than he expected.

Suddenly in the midst of the fighting, which was now a hand-to-hand
conflict, there was a tremor throughout the length of the airship.

"She's going up!" yelled Ned.

"Bless my check-book!" cried Mr. Damon, "if we don't look out some
of these red imps will go up with us, too!"

As he spoke he whacked vigorously at the hands of several of the
pygmies, who dropped off with howls of anguish.

The craft quickly shot upward. There were yells of terror from a few
of the red savages who remained clinging to different parts of the
Black Hawk and then, fearing they might be taken to the clouds,
they, too, dropped off. The rescuers and rescued mounted higher and
higher, and, when they were far enough up so that there was no
danger from the spears or arrows, Tom switched on the lights, and
turned the electric current into the search-lantern, the rays of
which beamed down on the mass of yelling and baffled savages below.

"A few shots for them to remember us by!" cried Mr. Durban, as he
sent more of the paralyzing electric currents into the red imps.
Their yell of rage had now turned to shouts of terror, for the
gleaming beam of light frightened them more than did the airship, or
the bullets of the white men. The red pygmies fled to their huts.

"I guess we gave them a lesson," remarked Tom, as he started the
propellers and sent the ship on through the night.

"Why, Tom! You're hurt!" cried Ned, who came into the pilot house at
that moment, and saw blood on his chum.

"Only a scratch," the young inventor declared.

"It's more than that," said Mr. Durban who looked at it a little
later. "It must be bound up, Tom."

And, while Ned steered the ship back to the jungle clearing whence
they had come to make the night attack, Tom's wound was dressed.

Meanwhile the two missionaries had been well taken care of. They
were given other garments, even some dresses being provided for Mrs.
Illingway, for when the voyage was begun Tom had considered the
possibility of having a woman on board, and had bought some ladies'
garments. Then, having cast down to earth the ill-smelling skins
which formed their clothes while captives, Mr. and Mrs. Illingway,
decently dressed, thanked Tom and the others over and over again.

"We had almost given up hope," said the lady, "when we saw them
drive you back after the first attack. Oh, it is wonderful to think
how you saved us, and in an airship!" and she and her husband began
their thanks over again.

A good meal was prepared by Mr. Damon, for the rescuers and rescued
ones were hungry, and since they had been held prisoners the two
missionaries had not been given very good food.

"Oh, it hardly seems possible that we are eating with white men
again," said Mr. Illingway, as he took a second cup of coffee,
"hardly possible!"

"And to see electric lights, instead of a camp-fire," added his
wife. "What a wonderful airship you have, Tom Swift."

"Yes, it's pretty good," he admitted. "It came in useful to-night,
all right."

They were now far enough from the savages, and the pygmies' fires,
which had been set aglow anew when the attack began, could no longer
be observed.

"We'll land at the place where we camped before," said Tom, who had
again assumed charge of the ship, "and in the morning we'll start
for civilization."

"No can get two other white men?" suddenly asked Tomba, who had been
sitting, gazing at his recovered master and mistress. "Fly-ship go
back, an' leave two white mans here?" the black asked.

"What in the world does he mean?" demanded Tom. "Of course we're not
going to leave any of our party behind!"

"Let me question him," suggested Mr. Illingway, and he began to talk
to the African in his own tongue. A rapid conversation followed, and
a look of amazement spread over the faces of the two missionaries,
as they listened.

"What is it?" asked Mr. Durban. "What does Tomba say?"

"Why the pygmies have two other white men in captivity," said Mr.
Illingway. "They were brought in yesterday, after you were driven
away. Two white men, or, rather a white man and a youth, according
to Tomba. They are held in one of the huts near where we were, but
tied so they couldn't escape in the confusion"

"How does Tomba know this?" asked Mr. Damon.

"He says," translated Mr. Illingway, after more questioning of the
black, "that he heard the red pygmies boasting of it after we had
escaped. Tomba says he heard them say that, though we were gone, and
could not be killed, or sacrificed, the other two captives would
meet that horrible fate."

"Two other white captives in the hands of the red imps!" murmured
Tom. "We must rescue them!"

"You're not going to turn back now, are you?" asked Mr. Durban.

"No, but I will as soon as I look the ship over. We'll come back to-
morrow. And we'll have to make a day attack or it will be too late
to save them. Two other white captives! I wonder who they can be."

There was a big surprise in store for Tom Swift.




CHAPTER XXV

THE ROGUE ELEPHANT--CONCLUSION


Early the next day the airship was again afloat. The night, what
little of darkness remained after the rescue, had been spent in the
clearing in the dense jungle. Some slight repairs had been made to
the craft, and it was once more in readiness to be used in battle
against the relentless savages.

"We can't wait for darkness," declared Tom. "In the first place
there isn't time, and again, we don't know in what part of the
village the other captives are. We'll have to hunt around."

"And that means going right down into the midst of the imps and
fighting them hand to hand," said Ned.

"That's what it means," assented Tom grimly, "but I guess the powder
bombs will help some."

Before starting they had prepared a number of improvised bombs,
filled with powder, which could be set off by percussion. It was the
plan to drop these down from the airship, into the midst of the
savages. When the bomb struck the ground, or even on the bodies of
the red dwarfs, it would explode. It was hoped that these would so
dismay the little men that they would desert the village, and leave
the way clear for a search to be made for the other captives.

On rushed the Black Hawk. There was to be no concealment this time,
and Tom did not care how much noise the motors made. Accordingly he
turned on full seed.

It was not long before the big plain was again sighted. Everything
was in readiness, and the bombs were at hand to be dropped
overboard. Tom counted on the natives gathering together in great
masses as soon as they sighted the airship, and this would give him
the opportunity wanted.

But something different transpired. No sooner was the craft above
the village, than from all the huts came pouring out the little red
men. But they did not gather together--at least just then. They ran
about excitedly, and it could be seen that they were bringing from
the huts the rude household utensils in which they did their
primitive cooking. The women had their babies, and some, not so
encumbered, carried rolls of grass matting. The men had all their
weapons.

"Bless my wagon wheel!" cried Mr. Damon. "What's going on?"

"It looks like moving day," suggested Ned Newton.

"That's just what it is!" declared Mr. Durban. "They are going to
migrate. Evidently they have had enough of us, and they're going to
get out of the neighborhood before we get a chance to do any more
damage. They're moving, but where are the white captives?"

He was answered a moment later, for a crowd of the dwarfs rushing to
a certain hut, came out leading two persons by means of bark ropes
tied about their necks. It was too far off to enable Tom or the
others to recognize them, but they could tell by the clothing that
they were white captives.

"We've got to save them!" exclaimed the young inventor.

"How?" asked Mr. Damon. And, indeed, it did seem a puzzle for, even
as Tom looked, the whole tribe of red imps took up the march into
the jungle, dragging the white persons with them. The captives
looked up, saw the airship, and made frantic motions for help. It
was too far off, yet, to hear their voices. But the distance was
lessening every moment, for Tom had speeded the motor to the highest
pitch.

"What are you going to do?" demanded Ned.

"I'll show you," answered his chum. "Take some of those bombs, and
be ready to drop them overboard when I give the word."

"But we may kill those white people," objected Ned.

"Not the way I'm going to work it. You drop them when I give the
word."

Tom steered the airship toward the head of the throng of blacks. The
captives were in the rear, and the van of the strange procession was
near the edge of the jungle now. Once the red dwarfs got into the
tangle of underbrush they could never be found, and their captives
would die a miserable death.

"We've got to stop them," murmured Tom. "Are you ready, Ned?"

"Ready!"

"Then drop the bombs!"

Ned dropped them. A sharp explosion was heard, and the head of the
procession was blown apart and thrown into confusion. The throng
halted.

"Drop more!" cried Tom, sending the ship about in a circle, and
hovering it over the middle of the press of savages.

More of the deadly tombs exploded. The pygmies were running about
wildly. Tom, who was closely watching the rear of the cavalcade,
suddenly called out:

"Now's our chance! They've let their captives go, and are running
into the jungle. We must swoop down, and get the prisoners!"

It was no sooner said than the nose of the Black Hawk was pointed
downward. Onward it flew, the two captives wildly waving their hands
to the rescuers. There was no more danger from the red savages. They
had been thrown into panic and confusion, and wore rapidly
disappearing into the forest. The terrible weapons of the whites had
been too much for them.

"Quick! Get on board!" called Tom, as he brought the machinery to a
stop. The airship now rested on the ground, close to the former
captives. "Get in here!" shouted the young inventor. "They may
change their minds and come back."

The two white persons ran toward the Black Hawk. Then one of them--
the smaller--halted and cried out:

"Why, it's Tom Swift!"

Tom turned and glanced at the speaker. A look of astonishment spread
over his face.

"Andy Foger--here!" gasped Tom. "How in the world--?"

"I dink besser as ve git on der board, und dalk aftervard!"
exclaimed Andy's companion, who spoke with a strong German accent.
"I like not dose red little mans."

In another minute the two rescued ones were safe on Tom Swift's
airship, and it had arisen high enough to be out of all danger.

"How in the world did you ever get here?" asked Tom of the lad who
had so often been his enemy.

"I'll tell you soon," spoke Andy, "but first, Tom, I want to ask
your forgiveness for all I've done to you, and to thank you, from
the bottom of my heart, for saving us. I thought we were going to be
killed by those dwarfs; didn't you, Herr Landbacher?"

"Sure I did. But ve are all right now. Dis machine is efen besser as
mine vot vos lost. Is dere anyt'ing to eats, on board, if you vill
excuse me for being so bolt as to ask?"

"Plenty to eat," said Tom, laughing, "and while you eat you can tell
us your story. And as for you, Andy, I hope we'll be friends from
now on," and Tom held out his hand.

There was not much to tell that the reader has not already guessed.
Andy and the German, as has been explained, went abroad to give
airship flights. They were in the lower part of Egypt, and a sudden
gale drove them into Africa.

For a long time they sailed on, and then their fuel gave out, and
they had to descend into the jungle. They managed to fall in with
some friendly blacks, who treated them well. The airship was useless
without gasolene, and it was abandoned.

Andy and the German inventor were planning to walk to some white
settlement, when the tribe they were with was attacked by the red
dwarfs and vanquished. Andy and his friend were taken prisoners, and
carried to the very village where the missionaries were, just before
the latter's rescue.

Then came the fight, and the saving of Andy and the German, almost
at the last minute.

"Well, you certainly had nearly as many adventures as we did," said
Tom. "But I guess they're over now."

But they were not. For several days the airship sailed on over the
jungles without making a descent. Mr. and Mrs. Illingway wished to
be landed at a white settlement where they had other missionary
friends. Tom would go with them. This was done, and Tom and the
others spent some time in this place, receiving so many kinds of
thanks that they had to protest.

Andy and Herr Landbacher asked to be taken back to the coast, where
they could get a steamer to America. Andy was a very different lad
now, and not the bully of old.

"Well, hadn't we better be thinking of getting back home?" asked Tom
one day.

"Not until we get some more ivory," declared Mr. Durban. "I think
we'll have to have another elephant hunt."

They did, about a week later, and got some magnificent tusks. Tom's
electric rifle did great work, to the wonder of Andy and Mr.
Landbacher, who had never before seen such a curious weapon. They
also did some night hunting.

"But we haven't got that pair of extra large tusks that I want,"
said the old hunter, as he looked at the store of ivory accumulated
after the last hunt. "I want those, and then I'll be satisfied.
There is one section of the country that we have not touched as yet,
and I'd like to visit that."

"Then let's go," proposed Tom, so, good-bys having been said to the
missionaries, who sent greetings to their friends in America, and to
the church people who had arranged for their rescue, the airship was
once more sent to the deepest part of a certain jungle, where Mr.
Durban hoped to get what he wanted.

They had another big hunt, but none of the elephants had any
remarkable tusks, and the hunter was about to give up in despair,
and call the expedition over, when one afternoon, as they were
sailing along high enough to merely clear the tops of the trees, Tom
heard a great crashing down below.

"There's something there," he called to Mr. Durban. "Perhaps a small
herd of elephants. Shall we go down?"

Before Mr. Durban could answer there came into view, in a small
clearing, an elephant of such size, and with such an enormous pair
of tusks, that the young inventor and the old hunter could not
repress cries of astonishment.

"There's your beast!" said Tom. "I'll go down and you can pot him,"
and, as he spoke, Tom stopped the propellers, so that the ship hung
motionless in the air above where the gigantic brute was.

Suddenly, as though possessed by a fit of rage, the elephant rushed
at a good-sized tree and began butting it with his head. Then,
winding his trunk around it he pulled it up by the roots, and began
trampling on it out of a paroxysm of anger.

"A rogue elephant!" exclaimed Mr. Durban. "Don't go down if you
value your life, or the safety of the airship. If we attacked that
brute on the ground, we would be the hunted instead of the hunters.
That's a rogue elephant of the worst kind, and he's at the height of
his rage."

This was indeed so, for the beast was tearing about the clearing
like mad, breaking off trees, and uprooting them in sheer
vantonness. Tom knew what a "rogue" elephant was. It is a beazt that
goes away from the herd, and lives solitary and alone, attacking
every living thing that comes in his way. It is a species of
masness, a disease which attacks elephants and sometimes passes
away. More often the afflicted creature gives battle to everything
and every animal he meets until he is killed or carried off by his
malady. It was sueh an elephant that Tom now saw, and he realized
what the hunter said about attacking one, as he saw the brute's mad
rushes.

"Well, if it's dangerous to attack him on the ground, we'll kill him
from up above," said the young inventor. "Here is the electric
rifle, Mr. Durban. I'll let you have the honor of getting those
tusks. My! But they're whoppers! Better use almost a full charge.
Don't take any chances on merely wounding him, and having him rush
off to the jungle."

"I won't," said the old hunter, and he adjusted the electric rifle
which Tom handed him.

As the great beast was tearing around, trumpeting shrilly and
breaking off trees Mr. Durban fired. The creature sank down,
instantly killed, and was out of his misery, for often it is great
pain which makes an otherwise peaceable elephant become a "rogue."

"He's done for," said Ned. "I guess you have the tusks you want now,
Mr. Durban."

"I think so," agreed the hunter, and when the airship was sent down,
and the ivory cut out, it was found that the tusks were even larger
than they had supposed. "It is a prize worth having," said Mr.
Durban. "I'm sure my customer will think so, too. Now I'm ready to
head for the coast."

Tom Swift went to the engine room, while the last big tusks were
being stored away with the other ivory. Several parts of the motor
needed oiling, and Ned was assisting in this work.

"Going to start soon?" asked Mr. Durban, appearing in the doorway.

"Yes; why?" inquired Tom, who noted an anxious note in the voice of
the hunter.

"Well, I don't like staying longer in this jungle than I can help.
It's not healthy in the first place, and then it's a wild and
desolate place, where all sorts of wild beasts are lurking, and
where wandering hands of natives may appear at any time."

"You don't mean that the red pygmies will come back; do you?" asked
Ned.

"There's no telling," replied Mr. Durban with a shrug of his
shoulders. "Only, as long as we've got what we're after, I'd start
off as soon as possible."

"Yes, don't run any chances with those little red men," begged Andy
Foger, who had given himself up for lost when he and his companion
fell into their hands.

"Radder vould I be mit cannibals dan dose little imps!" spoke the
German fervently.

"We'll start at once," declared Tom. "Are you all aboard, and is
everything loaded into the airship?"

"Everything. I guess." answered Mr. Anderson.

Tom looked to the motor, saw that it was in working order, and
shoved over the lever of the gas machine to begin the generating of
the lifting vapor. To his surprise there was no corresponding hiss
that told of the gas rushing into the bag.

"That's odd," he remarked. "Ned, see if anything is wrong with that
machine. I'll pull the lever again."

The bank clerk stood beside the apparatus, while Tom worked the
handle, but whatever was the matter with it was too intricate or
complicated for Ned to solve.

"I can't see what ails it," he called to his chum. "You better have
a peep."

"All right, I'll look if you work the handle."

The passengers on the airship, which now rested in a little clearing
in the dense jungle, gathered at the engine room door, looking at
Tom and Ned as they worked over the machine.

"Bless my pulley wheel!" exclaimed Mr. Damon "I hope nothing has
gone wrong."

"Well something has!" declared the young inventor in a muffled
voice, for he was down on his hands and knees peering under the gas
apparatus. "One of the compression cylinders has cracked," he added
dubiously. "It must have snapped when we landed this last time. I
came down too heavily."

"What does that mean?" asked Mr. Durban, who did not know much about
machinery.

"It means that I've got to put a new cylinder in," went on Tom.
"It's quite a job, too, but we can't make gas without it!"

"Well, can't you do it just as well up in the air as down here?"
asked Mr. Durban. "Make an ascension, Tom, and do the repairs up
above, where we've got good air, and where--"

He paused suddenly, and seemed to be listening.

"What is it?" asked the young inventor quickly. There was no need to
answer, for, from the jungle without, came the dull booming of the
war drums of some natives.

"That's what I was afraid of!" cried the old elephant hunter,
catching up his gun. "Some black scout has seen us and is summoning
his tribesmen. Hurry, Tom, send up the ship, and we'll take care of
the savages."

"But I CAN'T send her up!" cried Tom.

"You can't? Why not?"

"Because the gas machine won't work until I put in a new cylinder,
and that will take at least a half a day."

"Go up as an aeroplane then!" cried Mr. Damon. "Bless my monkey
wrench, Tom, you've often done it before."

For answer Tom waved his hand toward the thick jungle all about
them.

"We haven't room to get a running start of ten feet." he said, "and
without a start the airship can never rise as a mere aeroplane. The
only way we can get up from the jungle is like a balloon, and
without the gas--"

He paused significantly. The sound of the war drums became louder,
and to it was added a weird singing chant.

"The natives!" cried Mr. Anderson. "They're coming right this way!
We must fight them off if they attack us!"

"Where's the electric rifle?" asked Ned. "Get that out, Tom!"

"Wait!" suggested Mr. Durban. "This is serious! It looks as if they
were going to attack us, and they have us at a disadvantage. Our
only safety is in flight, but as Tom says we can't go up until the
gas machine is fixed, he will have to attend to that part of it
while we keep off the black men. Tom, we can't spare you to fight
this time! You repair the ship as soon as you can, and we'll guard
her from the natives. And you've got to work lively!"

"I will!" cried the young inventor. "It's luck we have a spare
cylinder!"

Suddenly there was a louder shout in the jungle and it was followed
by a riot of sound. War drums were beaten, tom-toms clashed and the
natives howled.

"Here they are!" cried Mr. Anderson.

"Bless my suspenders!" shouted Mr. Damon. "Where is my gun?"

"Here, you take mine, and I'll use the electric rifle," answered the
elephant hunter. As he spoke there was a hissing sound in the air
and a flight of spears passed over the airship.

The defenders slipped outside, while Tom, with Ned to help him,
worked feverishly to repair the break. They were in a serious
strait, for with the airship practically helpless they were at the
mercy of the natives. And as Tom glanced momentarily from the
window, he saw scores of black, half-naked forms slipping in and out
among the trees and trailing vines.

Soon the rifles of his friends began to crack, and the yells of the
natives were changed to howls of anguish. The electric weapon,
though it made no noise, did great execution.

"I only hope they don't puncture the gas bag," murmured Tom. as he
began taking the generating machine apart so as to get out the
cracked cylinder.

"If they do, it's all up with us," murmured Ned.

After their first rush, finding that the white men were on the
alert, the blacks withdrew some distance, where their spears and
arrows were not so effective. Our friends, including Andy Foger, and
the German, kept up a hot fire whenever a skulking black form could
be seen.

But, though the danger from the spears and arrows was less, a new
peril presented itself. This was from the blow guns. The curious
weapons shot small arrows, tipped with tufts of a cottony substance
in place of feathers, and could be sent for a long distance. The
barbs were not strong enough to pierce the tough fabric of the gas
bag, as a spear or arrow would have done, but there was more danger
from them to our friends who were on deck.

"Those barbs may be poisoned," said Mr. Durban, "and in case any one
is wounded, the wound, though it be but a scratch, must be treated
with antiseptics. I have some."

This course was followed, the elephant hunter being wounded twice,
and Andy Foger and Mr. Damon once each. There was not a native to be
seen now, for they were hiding behind the trees of the jungle, but
every now and then a blowgun barb would whizz out of the forest.

Finally Mr. Durban suggested that they erect improvised shelters,
behind which they could stand with their rifle, and breastworks were
made out of packing boxes. Then our friends were comparatively safe.
But they had to be on the alert, and it was nervous work, for they
could not tell what minute the blacks would rush from the jungle,
and, in spite of the fire from the electric rifle and other guns,
overwhelm the ship.

It was very trying to Tom and Ned, for they had to work hard and
rapidly in the close engine room. The sweat dripped down off them,
but they kept at it. It was three hours before the broken cylinder
was removed, and it was no light task to put in the other, for the
valves had to be made very tight to prevent leakage.

The two lads stopped to get something to eat, while the guards kept
sharp watch against a surprise. At intervals came a flight of barbs,
and occasionally a black form could be seen, when it was instantly
fired at. Several times the barbaric noise of the tom-toms and war
drums, with which the shouts of the natives mingled, broke out
deafeningly.

"Think you can repair it by night?" asked Mr. Durban anxiously of
Tom.

"I hope so," was the response.

"Because if we have to stay here after dark--well, I don't want to
do it if I can help it," finished the hunter.

Neither did the young inventor, and he redoubled his efforts to make
the repairs. It was getting dark when the last belt was in place,
and it was high time, too, for the natives were getting bolder,
creeping up through the forest to within shooting distance with
their arrows and spears.

"There!" cried Tom at length. "Now we'll see if she works!" Once
more he pulled the starting lever, and this time there was the
welcome hiss of the gas.

"Hurrah!" cried Ned.

The young inventor turned the machine on at full power. In a few
minutes the Black Hawk trembled through her length.

"She's going up! Bless my balloon basket! She's going up!" cried Mr.
Damon.

The natives must have suspected that something unusual was going on,
for they made a sudden rush, yelling and beating their drums. Mr.
Durban and the others hurried out on deck and fired at them, but
there vas little more need. With a bound the airship left the earth,
being rapidly carried up by the gas. The blacks sent a final shower
of spears after her, but only one was effective, slightly wounding
the German. Then Tom started the motor, the propellers whizzed, and
the Black Hawk was once more under way, just as night settled over
the jungle, and upon the horde of black and howling savages that
rushed around, maddened over the escape of their intended victims.

No further accidents marred the trip to the coast, which was reached
in due time, and very glad our friends were to be away from the
jungle and the land of the red pygmies.

A division was made of the ivory, and Tom's share was large enough
to provide him with a substantial amount. Ned and Mr. Damon were
also given a goodly sum from the sale of the tusks. The big ones,
from the "rogue," were shipped to the man who had commissioned Mr.
Durban to secure them for him.

"Well, now for home," said Tom, when the airship had been taken
apart for shipment. "I guess you'll be glad to get back to the
United States, won't you, friends?"

"That's what," agreed Andy Foger. "I think I'm done with airships.
Ugh! When I think of those red dwarfs I can't sleep nights!"

"Yah, dot iss so!" agreed the German.

"Well, I'm going to settle down for a time," declared Tom. "I've had
enough adventures for a while, but those in elephant land--"

"They certainly put it all over the things that happen to some
people!" interrupted Ned with a laugh.

"Bless my fish-line, that's so!" agreed Mr. Damon.

But Tom Swift was not done with adventures, and what farther
happened to him may be learned by reading the next volume of this
series, which will be entitled, "Tom Swift in the City of Gold; or,
Marvelous Adventures Underground."

They all made a safe and pleasant voyage home, and as news of the
rescue of the missionaries had been cabled to America, Tom and his
friends were met, as they left the steamer, by a crowd of newspaper
reporters, who got a good story of the battle with the red pygmies,
though Tom was inclined to make light of his part in the affair.

"Now for Shopton, home, Dad, Eradicate Sampson and his mule!"
exclaimed Tom, as they boarded a train in New York.

"And somebody else, too, I guess; eh?" asked Ned of his chum,
with a laugh.

"That's none of your affair!" declared Tom, as he blushed,
and then he, too, joined in the merriment.

And now, for a time, we will say good-by to the young inventor
and his friends.











Produced by Robert Rowe, Charles Franks
and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team




TOM SWIFT AND HIS PHOTO TELEPHONE

OR THE PICTURE THAT SAVED A FORTUNE

BY VICTOR APPLETON

AUTHOR OF "TOM SWIFT AND HIS MOTOR CYCLE," "TOM SWIFT AND HIS
GIANT CANNON," "THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS," "THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS
IN THE JUNGLE," "THE MOTION PICTURE CHUMS' FIRST VENTURE," ETC.





CONTENTS


     I. A MAN ON THE ROOF
    II. BAD NEWS
   III. TOM'S FAILURE
    IV. RUN DOWN
     V. SHARP WORDS
    VI. A WARNING
   VII. SOFT WORDS
  VIII. TOM IS BAFFLED
    IX. A GLEAM OF HOPE
     X. MIDNIGHT VISITORS
    XI. THE AIRSHIP IS TAKEN
   XII. A STRANGE DISAPPEARANCE
  XIII. THE TELEPHONE PICTURE
   XIV. MAKING IMPROVEMENTS
    XV. THE AIRSHIP CLUE
   XVI. SUCCESS
  XVII. THE MYSTERIOUS MESSAGE
 XVIII. ANOTHER CALL
   XIX. THE BUZZING SOUND
    XX. SETTING THE TRAP
   XXI. THE PHOTO TELEPHONE
  XXII. THE ESCAPE
 XXIII. ON THE TRAIL
  XXIV. THE LONELY HOUSE
   XXV. THE AIRSHIP CAPTURE





TOM SWIFT AND HIS PHOTO TELEPHONE





CHAPTER I

A MAN ON THE ROOF


"Tom, I don't believe it can be done!"

"But, Dad, I'm sure it can!"

Tom Swift looked over at his father, who was seated in an easy
chair in the library. The elderly gentleman--his hair was quite
white now--slowly shook his head, as he murmured again:

"It can't be done, Tom! It can't be done! I admit that you've made
a lot of wonderful things--things I never dreamed of--but this is
too much. To transmit pictures over a telephone wire, so that
persons cannot only see to whom they are talking, as well as hear
them--well, to be frank with you, Tom, I should be sorry to see
you waste your time trying to invent such a thing."

"I don't agree with you. Not only do I think it can be done, but
I'm going to do it. In fact, I've already started on it. As for
wasting my time, well, I haven't anything in particular to do, now
that my giant cannon has been perfected, so I might as well be
working on my new photo telephone instead of sitting around idle."

"Yes, Tom, I agree with you there," said Mr. Swift. "Sitting
around idle isn't good for anyone--man or boy, young or old. So
don't think I'm finding fault because you're busy."

"It's only that I don't want to see you throw away your efforts,
only to be disappointed in the end. It can't be done, Tom, it
can't be done," and the aged inventor shook his head in pitying
doubt.

Tom only smiled confidently, and went on:

"Well, Dad, all you'll have to do will be to wait and see. It
isn't going to be easy--I grant that. In fact, I've run up against
more snags, the little way I've gone so far, than I like to admit.
But I'm going to stick at it, and before this year is out I'll
guarantee, Father, that you can be at one end of the telephone
wire, talking to me, at the other, and I'll see you and you'll see
me--if not as plainly as we see each other now, at least plainly
enough to make sure of each other."

Mr. Swift chuckled silently, gradually breaking into a louder
laugh. Instead of being angry, Tom only regarded his father with
an indulgent smile, and continued:

"All right, Dad. Go ahead, laugh!"

"Well, Tom, I'm not exactly laughing at YOU--it's more at the
idea than anything else. The idea of talking over a wire and, at
the same time, having light waves, as well as electrical waves
passing on the same conductor!"

"All right, Dad, go ahead and laugh. I don't mind," said Tom,
good-naturedly. "Folks laughed at Bell, when he said he could send
a human voice over a copper spring; but Bell went ahead and to-day
we can talk over a thousand miles by wire. That was the telephone."

"Folks laughed at Morse when he said he could send a message over
the wire. He let 'em laugh, but we have the telegraph. Folks
laughed at Edison, when he said he could take the human voice--or
any other sound--and fix it on a wax cylinder or a hard-rubber
plate--but he did it, and we have the phonograph. And folks
laughed at Santos Dumont, at the Wrights, and at all the other
fellows, who said they could take a heavier-than-air machine, and
skim above the clouds like a bird; but we do it--I've done it--
you've done it."

"Hold on, Tom!" protested Mr. Swift. "I give up! Don't rub it in
on your old dad. I admit that folks did laugh at those inventors,
with their seemingly impossible schemes, but they made good. And
you've made good lots of times where I thought you wouldn't. But
just stop to consider for a moment. This thing of sending a
picture over a telephone wire is totally out of the question, and
entirely opposed to all the principles of science."

"What do I care for principles of science?" cried Tom, and he
strode about the room so rapidly that Eradicate, the old colored
servant, who came in with the mail, skipped out of the library
with the remark:

"Deed, an' Massa Tom must be pow'fully preragitated dis mawnin'!"

"Some of the scientists said it was totally opposed to all natural
laws when I planned my electric rifle," went on Tom. "But I made
it, and it shot. They said my air glider would never stay up, but
she did."

"But, Tom, this is different. You are talking of sending light
waves--one of the most delicate forms of motion in the world--over
a material wire. It can't be done!"

"Look here, Dad!" exclaimed Tom, coming to a halt in front of his
parent. "What is light, anyhow? Merely another form of motion;
isn't it?"

"Well, yes, Tom, I suppose it is."

"Of course it is," said Tom. "With vibrations of a certain length
and rapidity we get sound--the faster the vibration per second the
higher the sound note. Now, then, we have sound waves, or
vibrations, traveling at the rate of a mile in a little less than
five seconds; that is, with the air at a temperature of sixty
degrees. With each increase of a degree of temperature we get an
increase of about a foot per second in the rapidity with which
sound travels."

"Now, then, light shoots along at the rate of 186,000,000 miles a
second. That is more than many times around the earth in a second
of time. So we have sound, one kind of wave motion, or energy; we
have light, a higher degree of vibration or wave motion, and then
we come to electricity--and nobody has ever yet exactly measured
the intensity or speed of the electric vibrations."

"But what I'm getting at is this--that electricity must travel
pretty nearly as fast as light--if not faster. So I believe that
electricity and light have about the same kind of vibrations, or
wave motion."

"Now, then, if they do have--and I admit it's up to me to prove
it," went on Tom, earnestly--"why can't I send light-waves over a
wire, as well as electrical waves?"

Mr. Swift was silent for a moment. Then he said, slowly:

"Well, Tom, I never heard it argued just that way before. Maybe
there's something in your photo telephone after all. But it never
has been done. You can't deny that!"

He looked at his son triumphantly. It was not because he wanted to
get the better of him in argument, that Mr. Swift held to his own
views; but he wanted to bring out the best that was in his
offspring. Tom accepted the challenge instantly.

"Yes, Dad, it has been done, in a way!" he said, earnestly. "No
one has sent a picture over a telephone wire, as far as I know,
but during the recent hydroplane tests at Monte Carlo, photographs
taken of some of the events in the morning, and afternoon, were
developed in the evening, and transmitted over five hundred miles
of wire to Paris, and those same photographs were published in the
Paris newspapers the next morning."

"Is that right, Tom?"

"It certainly is. The photographs weren't so very clear, but you
could make out what they were. Of course that is a different
system than the one I'm thinking of. In that case they took a
photograph, and made a copper plate of it, as they would for a
half-tone illustration. This gave them a picture with ridges and
depressions in copper, little hills and valleys, so to speak,
according to whether there were light or dark tints in the
picture. The dark places meant that the copper lines stood up
higher there than where there were light colors."

"Now, by putting this copper plate on a wooden drum, and revolving
this drum, with an electrical needle pressing lightly on the
ridges of copper, they got a varying degree of electrical current.
Where the needle touched a high place in the copper plate the
contact was good, and there was a strong current. When the needle
got to a light place in the copper--a depression, so to speak--the
contact was not so good, and there was only a weak current."

"At the receiving end of the apparatus there was a sensitized film
placed on a similar wooden drum. This was to receive the image
that came over the five hundred miles of wire. Now then, as the
electrical needle, moving across the copper plate, made electrical
contacts of different degrees of strength, it worked a delicate
galvanometer on the receiving end. The galvanometer caused a beam
of light to vary--to grow brighter or dimmer, according as the
electrical current was stronger or weaker. And this light, falling
on the sensitive plate, made a picture, just like the one on the
copper plate in Monte Carlo."

"In other words, where the copper plate was black, showing that
considerable printing ink was needed, the negative on the other
end was made light. Then when that negative was printed it would
come out black, because more light comes through the light places
on a photograph negative than through the dark places. And so,
with the galvanometer making light flashes on the sensitive plate,
the galvanometer being governed by the electrical contacts five
hundred miles away, they transmitted a photograph by wire."

"But not a telephone wire, Tom."

"That doesn't make any difference, Dad. It was a wire just the
same. But I'm not going into that just now, though later I may
want to send photographs by wire. What I'm aiming at is to make an
apparatus so that when you go into a telephone booth to talk to a
friend, you can see him and he can see you, on a specially
prepared plate that will be attached to the telephone."

"You mean see him as in a looking-glass, Tom?"

"Somewhat, yes. Though I shall probably use a metal plate instead
of glass. It will be just as if you were talking over a telephone
in an open field, where you could see the other party and he could
see you."

"But how are you going to do it, Tom?"

"Well, I haven't quite decided. I shall probably have to use the
metal called selenium, which is very sensitive to light, and which
makes a good or a poor electrical conductor according as more or
less light falls on it. After all, a photograph is only lights and
shadows, fixed on sensitive paper or films."

"Well, Tom, maybe you can do it, and maybe you can't. I admit
you've used some good arguments," said Mr. Swift. "But then, it
all comes down to this: What good will it be if you can succeed in
sending a picture over a telephone wire?"

"What good, Dad? Why, lots of good. Just think how important it
will be in business, if you can make sure that you are talking to
the party you think you are. As it is now, unless you know the
person's voice, you can't tell that the man on the other end of
the wire is the person he says he is. And even a voice can be
imitated."

"But if you know the person yourself, he can't be imitated. If you
see him, as well as hear his voice, you are sure of what you are
doing. Why, think of the big business deals that could be made
over the telephone if the two parties could not only hear but see
each other. It would be a dead sure thing then. And Mr. Brown
wouldn't have to take Mr. Smith's word that it was he who was
talking. He could even get witnesses to look at the wire-image if
he wanted to, and so clinch the thing. It will prevent a lot of
frauds."

"Well, Tom, maybe you're right. Go ahead. I'll say no more against
your plans. I wish you all success, and if I can help you, call on
me."

"Thanks, Dad. I knew you'd feel that way when you understood. Now
I'm going--"

But what Tom Swift was going to do he did not say just then, for
above the heads of father and son sounded a rattling, crashing
noise, and the whole house seemed to shake Then the voice of
Eradicate was heard yelling:

"Good land! Good land ob massy! Come out yeah, Massa Tom! Come
right out yeah! Dere's a man on de roof an' he am all tangled up
suthin' scandalous! Come right out yeah befo' he falls and
translocates his neck! Come on!"





CHAPTER II

BAD NEWS


With startled glances at each other, Tom and his father rushed
from the library to the side of the house, whence came the cries
of Eradicate.

"What is it, Rad! what is it?" questioned Tom.

"Is someone hurt?" Mr. Swift wanted to know.

"He mighty soon will be!" exclaimed the colored man. "Look where
he am holdin' on! Lucky fo' him he grabbed dat chimbley!"

Tom and his father looked to where Eradicate pointed, and saw a
strange sight. A small biplane-airship had become entangled in
some of the aerials of Tom's wireless apparatus, and the craft had
turned turtle, being held from falling by some of the wire braces.

The birdman had fallen out, but had managed to cling to the
chimney, so that he had not reached the ground, and there he
clung, while the motor of his airship was banging away, and
revolving the propeller blades dangerously close to his head.

"Are you hurt?" cried Tom, to the unknown birdman.

"No, but I'm likely to be unless I get out of here!" was the
gasped-out answer.

"Hold fast!" cried Tom. "We'll have you down in a jiffy. Here,
Rad, you get the long ladder. Where's Koku? That giant is never
around when he's wanted. Find Koku, Rad, and send him here."

"Yas, sah, Massa Tom; directly, sah!" and the colored man hastened
off as fast as his aged legs would take him.

And while preparations are thus under way to rescue the birdman
from the roof, I will take just a few minutes to tell you a little
something more about Tom Swift and his numerous inventions, as set
forth in the previous books of this series.

"Tom Swift and His Motor Cycle" was the first book, and in that I
related how Tom made the acquaintance of a Mr. Wakefield Damon, of
the neighboring town of Waterford, and how Tom bought that
gentleman's motor cycle, after it had tried to climb a tree with
its rider in the saddle. Mr. Wakefield Damon was an odd man, whose
favorite expression was "Bless my shoelaces!" or something equally
absurd. Waterford was not far from Shopton, where Tom and his
father made their home.

Mr. Swift was also an inventor of note, and Tom soon followed in
his father's footsteps. They lived in a large house, with many
shops about it, for their work at times required much machinery.

Mrs. Baggert was the housekeeper who looked after Tom and his
father, and got their meals, when they consented to take enough
time from their inventive work to eat. Another member of the
household was Eradicate Sampson, a genial old colored man, who
said he was named Eradicate because he used to eradicate the dirt
about the place.

Koku, just referred to by Tom, was an immense man, a veritable
giant, whom Tom had brought back with him from one of his trips,
after escaping from captivity. The young inventor really brought
two giants, brothers they were, but one had gone to a museum, and
the other took service with our hero, making himself very useful
when it came to lifting heavy machinery.

Tom had a close friend in Ned Newton, who was employed in the
Shopton bank. Another friend was Miss Mary Nestor, a young lady
whose life Tom had once saved. He had many other friends, and some
enemies, whom you will meet from time to time in this story.

After Tom had had many adventures on his motor cycle he acquired a
motor boat, and in that he and Ned went through some strenuous
times on Lake Carlopa, near Tom's home. Then followed an airship,
for Tom got that craze, and in the book concerning that machine I
related some of the things that happened to him. He had even more
wonderful adventures in his submarine, and with his electric
runabout our hero was instrumental in saving a bank from ruin by
making a trip in the speediest car on the road.

After Tom Swift had sent his wireless message, and saved the
castaways of Earthquake Island, he thought he would give up his
inventive work for a time, and settle down to a life of ease and
quiet.

But the call of the spirit of adventure was still too strong for
him to resist. That was why he sought out the diamond makers, and
learned the secret of Phantom Mountain. And when he went to the
Caves of Ice, and there saw his airship wrecked, Tom was well-nigh
discouraged, But he managed to get back to civilization, and later
undertook a journey to elephant land, with his powerful electric
rifle.

Marvelous adventures underground did Tom Swift have when he went
to the City of Gold, and I have set down some of them in the book
bearing the latter title. Later on he sought the platinum treasure
in his air glider. And when Tom was taken captive, in giant land,
only his speedy airship saved him from a hard fate.

By this time moving pictures were beginning to occupy a large
place in the scientific, as well as the amusement world, and Tom
invented a Wizard Camera which did excellent work. Then came the
need of a powerful light, to enable Uncle Sam's custom officers on
the border to detect the smugglers, and Tom was successful in
making his apparatus.

He thought he would take a rest after that, but with the opening
of the Panama Canal came the need of powerful guns to protect that
important waterway, and Tom made a Giant Cannon, which enabled the
longest shots on record to be fired.

Now, some months had passed, after the successful trial of the big
weapon, and Tom longed for new activities. He found them in the
idea of a photo telephone, and he and his father were just talking
of this when interrupted by the accident to the birdman on the
roof of the Swift home.

"Have you got that ladder, Rad?" cried the young inventor,
anxiously, as he saw the dangerous position of the man from the
airship.

"Yas, sah, Massa Tom! I'se a-camin' wif it!"

"And where's Koku? We'll need him!"

"He's a-camin', too!"

"Here Koku!" exclaimed a deep voice, and a big man came running
around the corner of the house. "What is it, Master?"

"We must get him down, Koku!" said Tom, simply. "I will go up on
the roof. You had better come, too. Rad, go in the house and get a
mattress from the bed. Put it down on the ground where he's likely
to fall. Lively now!"

"Yas, sah, Massa Tom!"

"Me git my own ladder--dat one not strong 'nuff!" grunted Koku,
who did not speak very good English. He had a very strong ladder,
of his own make, built to hold his enormous bulk, and this he soon
brought and placed against the side of the house.

Meanwhile Tom and his father had raised the one Eradicate had
brought, though Tom did most of the lifting, for his father was
elderly, and had once suffered from heart trouble.

"We're coming for you!" cried the young inventor as he began to
ascend the ladder, at the same time observing that the giant was
coming with his. "Can you hold on a little longer?"

"Yes, I guess so. But I dare not move for fear the propellers will
strike me."

"I see. I'll soon shut off the motor," said Tom. "What happened,
anyhow?"

"Well, I was flying over your house. I was on my way to pay you a
visit, but I didn't intend to do it in just this way," and the
birdman smiled grimly. "I didn't see your wireless aerials until I
was plumb into them, and then it was too late. I hope I haven't
damaged them any."

"Oh, they are easily fixed," said Tom. "I hope you and your
biplane are not damaged. This way, Koku!" he called to the giant.

"Say, is--is he real, or am I seeing things?" asked the aviator,
as he looked at the big man.

"Oh, he's real, all right," laughed Tom. "Now, then, I'm going to
shut off your motor, and then you can quit hugging that chimney,
and come down."

"I'll be real glad to," said the birdman.

Making his way cautiously along the gutters of the roof, Tom
managed to reach the motor controls. He pulled out the electrical
switch, and with a sort of cough and groan the motor stopped. The
big propellers ceased revolving, and the aviator could leave his
perch in safety.

This he did, edging along until he could climb down and meet Tom,
who stood near the ladder.

"Much obliged," said the birdman, as he shook hands with Tom. "My
name is Grant Halling. I'm a newcomer in Mansburg," he added,
naming a town not far from Shopton. "I know you by reputation, so
you don't need to introduce yourself."

"Glad to meet you," said the young inventor, cordially. "Rather a
queer place to meet a friend," he went on with a laugh and a
glance down to the ground. "Can you climb?"

"Oh, yes, I'm used to that. The next thing will be to get my
machine down."

"Oh, we can manage that with Koku's help," spoke Tom. "Koku, get
some ropes, and see what you and Rad can do toward getting the
aeroplane down," he added to the giant. "Let me know if you need
any help."

"Me can do!" exclaimed the big man. "Me fix him!"

Tom and Mr. Halling made their way down the ladder, while the
giant proceeded to study out a plan for getting the airship off
the roof.

"You say you were coming over to see me, when you ran into my
wireless aerials?" asked Tom, curiously, when he had introduced
his father to the birdman.

"Yes," went on Mr. Halling. "I have been having some trouble with
my motor, and I thought perhaps you could tell me what was wrong.
My friend, Mr. Wakefield Damon, sent me to you."

"What! Do you know Mr. Damon?" cried Tom.

"I've known' him for some years. I met him in the West, but I
hadn't seen him lately, until I came East. He sent me to see you,
and said you would help me."

"Well, any friend of Mr. Damon's is a friend of mine!" exclaimed
Tom, genially. "I'll have a look at your machine as soon as Koku
gets it down. How is Mr. Damon, anyhow? I haven't seen him in over
two weeks."

"I'm sorry to say he isn't very well, Mr. Swift."

"Is he ill? What is the trouble?"

"He isn't exactly ill," went on Mr. Halling, "but he is fretting
himself into a sickness, worrying over his lost fortune."

"His lost fortune!" cried Tom, in surprise at the bad news
concerning his friend. "I didn't know he had lost his money!"

"He hasn't yet, but he's in a fair way to, he says. It's something
about bad investments, and he did speak of the trickery of one
man, I didn't get the particulars. But he certainly feels very
badly over it."

"I should think he would," put in Mr. Swift. "Tom, we must look
into this. If we can help Mr. Damon--"

"We certainly will," interrupted Tom. "Now come in the house, Mr.
Halling. I'm sure you must be quite shaken up by your upset."

"I am, to tell you the truth, though it isn't the first accident
I've had in my airship."

They were proceeding toward the house, when there came a cry from
Koku, who had fastened a rope about the airship to lower it.

"Master! Master!" cried the giant. "The rope am slippin'. Grab the
end of it!"





CHAPTER III

TOM'S FAILURE


"Come on!" cried Tom, quickly, as, turning', he saw the accident
about to happen. "Your craft will surely be smashed if she slips
to the ground, Mr. Halling!"

"You're right! This seems to be my unlucky day!" The birdman,
limping slightly from his fall, hurried with Tom to where a rope
trailed on the ground. Koku had fastened one end to the airship,
and had taken a turn of the cable about the chimney. He had been
lowering the biplane to the ground, but he had not allowed for its
great weight, and the rope had slipped from his big hands.

But Tom and Mr. Halling were just in time. They grabbed the
slipping hempen strands, and thus checked the falling craft until
Koku could get a better grip.

"All right now," said the giant, when he had made fast the rope.
"Me fix now. Master can go."

"Think he can lower it?" asked Mr. Halling, doubtfully.

"Oh, surely," said Tom. "Koku's as strong as a horse. You needn't
worry. He'll get it down all right. But you are limping."

"Yes, I jammed my leg a little."

"Don't you want a doctor?"

"Oh, no, not for a little thing like that."

But Tom insisted on looking at his new friend's wound, and found
quite a cut on the thigh, which the young inventor insisted on
binding up.

"That feels better," said the birdman, as he stretched out on a
couch. "Now if you can look my machine over, and tell me what's
the matter with it, I'll be much obliged to you, and I'll get on
my way."

"Not quite so fast as that!" laughed Tom. "I wouldn't want to see
you start off with your lame leg, and certainly I would not want
to see you use your aircraft after what she's gone through, until
we've given her a test. You can't tell what part you might have
strained."

"Well, I suppose you are right. But I think I'd better go to a
hotel, or send for an auto and go home."

"Now you needn't do anything of the kind," spoke Tom, hospitably.
"We've got lots of room here, and for that matter we have plenty
of autos and airships, too, as well as a motor boat. You just rest
yourself here. Later we'll look over your craft."

After dinner, when Mr. Halling said he felt much better, Tom
agreed to go out with him and look at the airship. As he feared,
he found several things the matter with it, in addition to the
motor trouble which had been the cause for Mr. Halling's call on
the young inventor.

"Can she be fixed?" asked the birdman, who explained that, as yet,
he was only an amateur in the practice of flying.

"Oh, yes, we can fix her up for you," said Tom. "But it will take
several days. You'll have to leave it here."

"Well, I'll be glad to do that, for I know she will be all the
better when you get through with her. But I think I am able to go
on home now, and I really ought to. There is some business I must
attend to."

"Speaking of business," remarked Tom, "can you tell me anything
more of Mr. Damon's financial troubles?"

"No, not much. All I know is that when I called on him the other
day I found him with his check book out, and he was doing a lot of
figuring. He looked pretty blue and downcast, I can tell you."

"I'm sorry about that," spoke Tom, musingly. "Mr. Damon is a very
good friend of mine, and I'd do anything to help him. I certainly
wouldn't like to see him lose his fortune. Bad investments, you
say it was?"

"Partly so, and yet I'm inclined to think if he does lose his
money it will be due to some trickery. Mr. Damon is not the man to
make bad investments by himself."

"Indeed he is not," agreed Tom. "You say he spoke of some man?"

"Yes, but not definitely. He did not mention any name. But Mr.
Damon was certainly quite blue."

"That's unlike him," remarked Tom. "He is usually very jolly. He
must be feeling quite badly. I'll go over and have a talk with
him, as soon as I can."

"Do. I think he would appreciate it. And now I must see about
getting home."

"I'll take you in one of my cars," said Tom, who had several
automobiles. "I don't want to see you strain that injured leg of
yours."

"You're very good--especially after I tangled up your wireless
aerials; but I didn't see them until I was right into them,"
apologized Mr. Halling.

"They're a new kind of wire," said Tom, "and are not very plain to
see. I must put up some warning signs. But don't worry about
damaging them. They were only up temporarily anyhow, and I was
going to take them down to arrange for my photo telephone."

"Photo telephone, eh? Is that something new?"

"It will be--if I can get it working," said Tom, with a smile.

A little later Tom had taken Mr. Halling home, and then he set
about making arrangements for repairing the damaged airship. This
took him the better part of a week, but he did not regret the
time, for while he was working he was busy making plans for his
newest invention--the photo telephone.

One afternoon, when Tom had completed the repairs to the airship,
and had spent some time setting up an experimental telephone line,
the young inventor received a call from his chum, Ned Newton.

"Well, well, what are you up to now?" asked Ned, as he saw his
chum seated in a booth, with a telephone receiver to his ear,
meanwhile looking steadily at a polished metal plate in front of
him. "Trying to hypnotize yourself, Tom?"

"Not exactly. Quiet, Ned, please. I'm trying to listen."

Ned was too familiar with his chum's work to take offense at this.
The young banker took a seat on a box, and silently watched Tom.
The inventor shifted several switches, pressed one button after
another, and tilted the polished metal plate at different angles.
Then he closed the door of the little telephone booth, and Ned,
through the ground glass door, saw a light shining.

"I wonder what new game Tom is up to?" Ned mused.

Presently the door opened, and Tom stuck out his head.

"Ned, come here," he invited. "Look at that metal plate and see if
you can notice anything on it. I've been staring at it so steadily
that my eyes are full of sticks. See what you can make out."

"What is this?" asked Ned. "No trick; is it? I won't be blown up,
or get my eyes full of pepper; will I?"

"Nonsense! Of course not. I'm trying to make a photo telephone. I
have the telephone part down pat, but I can't see anything of the
photo image. See if you can."

Ned stared at the polished plate, while Tom did things to it,
making electrical connections, and tilting it at various angles.

"See anything, Ned?" asked Tom.

The other shook his head.

"Whom am I supposed to see?" he asked.

"Why, Koku is at the other end of the wire. I'm having him help
me."

Ned gazed from the polished plate out of a side window of the
shop, into the yard.

"Well, that Koku is certainly a wonderful giant," said Ned, with a
laugh.

"How so?" asked Tom.

"Why he can not be in two places at once. You say he ought to be
at the other end of this wire, and there he is out there, spading
up the garden."

Tom stared for a second and then exclaimed:

"Well, if that isn't the limit! I put him in the telephone booth
in the machine shop, and told him to stay there until I was
through. What in the world is he doing out there?"

"Koku!" he called to the giant, "why didn't you stay at the
telephone where I put you? Why did you run away?"

"Ha!" exclaimed the giant, who, for all his great size was a
simple chap, "little thing go 'tick-tick' and then 'clap-clap!'
Koku no like--Koku t'ink bad spirit in telumfoam--Koku come out!"

"Well, no wonder I couldn't see any image on the plate!" exclaimed
Tom. "There was nobody there. Now, Ned, you try it; will you,
please?"

"Sure. Anything to oblige!"

"Then go in the other telephone booth. You can talk to me on the
wire. Say anything you like--the telephone part is all right. Then
you just stand so that the light in the booth shines on your face.
The machine will do the rest--if it works."

Ned hurried off and was soon talking to his chum over the wire
from the branch telephone in the machine shop. Ned stood in the
glare of an electric light, and looked at a polished plate similar
to the one in the other booth.

"Are you there, Ned?" asked Tom.

"Yes, I'm here."

"Is the light on?"

"Yes."

"And you're looking at the plate?"

"Sure. Can you see any reflection in your plate?"

"No, not a thing," answered Tom, and there was great
discouragement in his voice. "The thing is a failure, Ned. Come on
back," and the young banker could hear his chum hang up the
telephone receiver at the other end.

"That's too bad," murmured Ned, knowing how Tom must feel. "I'll
have to cheer him up a bit."





CHAPTER IV

RUN DOWN


When Ned Newton got back to where Tom sat in the small telephone
booth, the young banker found his chum staring rather moodily at
the polished metal plate on the shelf that held the talking
instrument.

"So it was no go; eh, Tom?"

"No go at all, Ned, and I thought sure I had it right this time."

"Then this isn't your first experiment?"

"Land no! I've been at it, off and on, for over a month, and I
can't seem to get any farther. I'm up against a snag now, good and
hard."

"Then there wasn't any image on your plate?"

"Not a thing, Ned. I don't suppose you caught any glimpse of me in
your plate?" asked Tom, half hopefully.

"No. I couldn't see a thing. So you are going to try and make this
thing work both ways, are you?"

"That's my intention, But I can fix it so that a person can
control the apparatus at his end, and only see the person he is
talking to, not being seen himself, unless he wishes it. That is,
I hope to do that. Just now nobody can see anybody," and Tom
sighed.

"Give it up," advised Ned. "It's too hard a nut to crack, Tom!"

"Indeed, I'll not give it up, Ned! I'm going to work along a new
line. I must try a different solution of selenium on the metal
plate. Perhaps I may have to try using a sensitized plate, and
develop it later, though I do want to get the machine down so you
can see a perfect image without the need of developing. And I
will, too!" cried Tom. "I'll get some new selenium."

Eradicate, who came into the shop just then, heard the end of
Tom's remarks. A strange look came over his honest black face, and
he exclaimed:

"What all am dat, Massa Tom? Yo'ah gwine t' bring de new millenium
heah? Dat's de end of de world, ain't it-dat millenium? Golly!
Dish yeah coon neber 'spected t' lib t' see dat. De millenium! Oh
mah landy!"

"No, Rad!" laughed Tom. "I was speaking about selenium, a sort of
metallic combination that is a peculiar conductor of electricity.
The more light that shines on it the better conductor it is, and
the less light, the poorer."

"It must be queer stuff," said Ned.

"It is," declared Tom. "I think it is the only thing to use in
this photo telephone experiment, though I might try the metal
plate method, as they did between Monte Carlo and Paris. But I am
not trying to make newspaper pictures."

"What is selenium, anyhow?" asked Ned. "Remember, Tom, I'm not up
on this scientific stuff as you are."

"Selenium," went on Tom, "was discovered in 1817, by J. J.
Berzelius, and he gave it that name from the Greek word for moon,
on account of selenium being so similar, in some ways, to
tellurium. That last is named after the Latin word tellus, the
earth."

"Do they dig it?" Ned wanted to know.

"Well, sometimes selenium is found in combination with metals, in
the form of selenides, the more important minerals of that kind
being eucharite, crooksite, clausthalite, naumannite and zorgite--"

"Good night!" interrupted Ned, with a laugh, holding up his hands.
"Stop it, Tom!" he pleaded. "You'll give me a headache with all
those big words."

"Oh, they're easy, once you get used to them," said the young
inventor, with a smile. "Perhaps it will be easier if I say that
sometimes selenium is found in native sulphur. Selenium is usually
obtained from the flue-dust or chamber deposits of some factory
where sulphuric acid is made. They take this dust and treat it
with acids until they get the pure selenium. Sometimes selenium
comes in crystal forms, and again it is combined with various
metals for different uses."

"There's one good thing about it. There are several varieties, and
I'll try them all before I give up."

"That's the way to talk!" cried Ned. "Never say die! Don't give up
the ship, and all that. But, Tom, what you need now is a little
fun. You've been poking away at this too long. Come on out on the
lake, and have a ride in the motor boat. It will do you good. It
will do me good. I'm a bit rusty myself--been working hard lately.
Come on--let's go out on the lake."

"I believe I will!" exclaimed Tom, after thinking it over for a
moment. "I need a little fresh air. Sitting in that telephone
booth, trying to get an image on a plate, and not succeeding, has
gotten on my nerves. I want to write out an order for Koku to take
to town, though. I want to get some fresh selenium, and then I'm
going to make new plates."

Tom made some memoranda, and then, giving Koku the order for the
chemist, the young inventor closed up his shop, and went with Ned
down to Lake Carlopa, where the motor boat was moored.

This was not the same boat Tom had first purchased, some years
ago, but a comparatively new and powerful craft.

"It sure is one grand little day for a ride," remarked Ned, as he
got in the craft, while Tom looked over the engine.

"Yes, I'm glad you came over, and routed me out," said the young
inventor. "When I get going on a thing I don't know enough to
stop. Oh, I forgot something!"

"What?" asked Ned.

"I forgot to leave word about Mr. Railing's airship. It's all
fixed and ready for him, but I put on a new control, and I wanted
to explain to him about it. He might not know how to work it. I
left word with father, though, that if he came for it he must not
try it until he had seen me. I guess it will be all right. I don't
want to go back to the house now."

"No, it's too far," agreed Ned.

"I have it!" exclaimed Tom. "I'll telephone to dad from here, not
to let Halling go up until I come back. He may not come for his
machine; but, if he does, it's best to be on the safe side Ned."

"Oh, sure."

Accordingly, Tom 'phoned from his boat-house, and Mr. Swift
promised to see the bird-man if he called. Then Ned and Tom gave
themselves up to the delights of a trip on the water.

The Kilo, which name Tom had selected for his new craft, was a
powerful boat, and comfortable. It swept on down the lake, and
many other persons, in their pleasure craft, turned to look at
Tom's fine one.

"Lots of folks out to-day," observed Ned, as they went around a
point of the shore.

"Yes, quite a number," agreed Tom, leaning forward to adjust the
motor. "I wonder what's got into her?" he said, in some annoyance,
as he made various adjustments. "One of the cylinders is missing."

"Maybe it needs a new spark plug," suggested Ned.

"Maybe. Guess I'll stop and put one in."

Tom slowed down the motor, and headed his boat over toward shore,
intending to tie up there for a while.

As he shifted the wheel he heard a cry behind him, and at the same
time a hoarse, domineering voice called out:

"Here, what do you mean, changing your course that way? Look out,
or I'll run you down! Get out of my way, you land-lubber, you!"

Startled, Ned and Tom turned. They saw, rushing up on them from
astern, a powerful red motor boat, at the wheel of which sat a
stout man, with a very florid face and a commanding air.

"Get out of my way!" he cried. "I can't stop so short! Look out,
or I'll run you down!"

Tom, with a fierce feeling of resentment at the fellow, was about
to shift the course of the Kilo, but he was too late.

A moment later there came a smashing blow on the stern port
quarter and the Kilo heeled over at a dangerous angle, while, with
a rending, splintering sound of wood, the big red motorboat swept
on past Tom and Ned, her rubstreak grinding along the side of the
Kilo.





CHAPTER V

SHARP WORDS


"Great Scott, Tom! What happened?"

"I know as much as you, Ned. That fellow ran us down, that's all."

"Are we leaking?" and with this question Ned sprang from his place
near the bow, and looked toward the stern, where the heaviest blow
had been struck.

The Kilo had swung back to an even keel again, but was still
bobbing about on the water.

"Any hole there?" cried Tom, as he swung the wheel over to point
his craft toward shore, in case she showed a tendency to sink.

"I can't see any hole," answered Ned. "But water is coming in
here."

"Then there's a leak all right! Probably some of the seams are
opened, or it may be coming in around the shaft stuffing-box.
Here, Ned, take the wheel, and I'll start up the engine again,"
for with the blow the motor had stopped.

"What are you going to do?" asked Ned, as he again made his way
forward.

"Take her to shore, of course. It's deep out here and I don't want
her to go down at this point."

"Say, what do you think of that fellow, anyhow, Tom?"

"I wouldn't like to tell you. Look, he's coming back."

This was so, for, as the boys watched, the big red motor boat had
swung about in a circle and was headed for them.

"I'll tell him what I think of him, at any rate," murmured Tom, as
he bent over his motor. "And, later on, I'll let the lawyers talk
to him."

"You mean you'll sue him, Tom?"

"Well, I'm certainly not going to let him run into me and spring a
leak, for nothing. That won't go with me!"

By this time Tom had the motor started, but he throttled it down
so that it just turned the propeller. With it running at full
speed there was considerable vibration, and this would further
open the leaking seams. So much water might thus be let in that
the craft could not be gotten ashore.

"Head her over, Ned," cried Tom, when he found he had sufficient
headway. "Steer for Ramsey's dock. There's a marine railway next
to him, and I can haul her out for repairs."

"That's the talk, Tom!" cried his chum.

By this time the big, red motor boat was close beside Tom's craft.

The man at the wheel, a stout-bodied and stout-faced man, with a
complexion nearly the color of his boat, glared at the two young
men.

"What do you fellows mean?" called out the man, in deep booming
tones--tones that he tried to make imposing, but which, to the
trained ears of Tom and Ned, sounded only like the enraged bellow
of some bully. "What do you mean, I say? Getting on my course like
that!"

Ned could see Tom biting his lips, and clenching his hands to keep
down his temper. But it was too much. To be run into, and then
insulted, was more than Tom could stand.

"Look here!" he cried, standing up and facing the red-faced man,
"I don't know who you are, and I don't care. But I'll tell you one
thing--you'll pay for the damage you did to my boat!"

"I'll pay for it? Come, that's pretty good! Ha! Ha!" laughed the
self-important man. "Why, I was thinking of making a complaint
against you for crossing my course that way. If I find my boat is
damaged I shall certainly do so anyhow. Have we suffered any
damage, Snuffin?" and he looked back at a grimy-faced mechinician
who was oiling the big, throbbing motor, which was now running
with the clutch out.

"No, sir, I don't think we're damaged, sir," answered the man,
deferentially.

"Well, it's a lucky thing for these land-lubbers that we aren't. I
should certainly sue them. The idea of crossing my course the way
they did. Weren't they in the wrong, Snuffin?"

The man hesitated for a moment, and glanced at Tom and Ned, as
though asking their indulgence.

"Well, I asked you a question, Snuffin!" exclaimed the red-faced
man sharply.

"Yes--yes, sir, they shouldn't have turned the way they did,"
answered the man, in a low voice.

"Well, of all the nerve!" murmured Tom, and stopped his motor.
Then, stepping to the side of his disabled and leaking boat, he
exclaimed:

"Look here! Either you folks don't know anything about navigation
rules, or you aren't heeding them. I had a perfect right to turn
and go ashore when I did, for I found my engine was out of order,
and I wanted to fix it. I blew the usual signal on the whistle,
showing my intention to turn off my course, and if you had been
listening you would have heard it."

"If you had even been watching you would have seen me shift, and
then, coming on at the speed you did, it was your place to warn me
by a whistle, so that I could keep straight on until you had
passed me."

"But you did not. You kept right on and ran into me, and the only
wonder is that you didn't sink me. Talk about me getting in your
way! Why, you deliberately ran me down after I had given the right
signal. I'll make a complaint against you, that's what I will."

If possible the red-faced man got even more rosy than usual. He
fairly puffed up, he was so angry.

"Listen to that, will you, Snuffin!" he cried. "Listen to that! He
says he blew his whistle to tell us he was going to turn in."

"That's what I did!" said Tom, calmly.

"Preposterous! Did you hear it, Snuffin?" puffed the important
man.

"Yes--yes, I think I did, sir," answered the machinist, in a
hesitating voice.

"You did? What! You mean to tell me you heard their whistle?"

"Yes--yes, sir!"

"Why--why--er--I--" the big man puffed and blew, but seemed to
find no words in which to express himself. "Snuffin, I'll have a
talk with you when we get home," he finally said. most
significantly. "The idea of saying you heard a whistle blown!
There was nothing of the kind! I shall make a complaint against
these land-lubbers myself. Do you know who they are, Snuffin?"

"Yes--yes, sir," was the answer, as the man glanced at Tom. "At
least I know one of them, sir."

"Very good. Give me his name. I'll attend to the rest."

Tom looked at the big man sharply. He had never seen him before,
as far as he could recall. As for the machinist, the young
inventor had a dim recollection that once the man might have
worked in his shop.

"Go ahead, Snuffin!" said the big man, mopping his face with a
large silk handkerchief, which, even at that distance, gave out a
powerful perfume. "Go ahead, Snuffin, and we will settle this
matter later," and, adjusting a large rose in his buttonhole, the
self-important individual took his place on the cushioned seat at
the wheel, while the big red motor boat drew off down the river.

"Well, of all the nerve!" gasped Ned. "Isn't he the limit?"

"Never mind," spoke Tom, with a little laugh. "I'm sorry I lost my
temper, and even bothered to answer him. We'll let the lawyers do
the rest of the talking. Take the wheel, Ned."

"But are you going to let him get away like this, Tom? Without
asking him to pay for the damage to your boat, when he was clearly
in the wrong?"

"Oh, I'll ask him to pay all right; but I'll do it the proper way.
Now come on. If we stay here chinning much longer the Kilo will go
down. I must find out who he is. I think I know Snuffin--he used
to work for me, I now recall."

"Don't you know who that big man is?" asked Ned, as he took the
wheel, while Tom again started the motor. The water was now almost
up to the lower rim of the fly wheel.

"No; who is he?" asked Tom.

"Shallock Peters."

"Well, I know as much as I did before," laughed Tom. "That doesn't
tell me anything."

"Why, I thought everybody in the town knew Shallock Peters," went
on Ned. "He tried to do some business with our bank, but was
turned down. I hear he's gone to the other one, though. He's what
we call a get-rich-quick schemer, Tom--a promoter."

"I thought he acted like that sort of a character."

"Well, that's what he is. He's got half a dozen schemes under way,
and he hasn't been in town over a month. I wonder you haven't seen
or heard of him."

"I've been too busy over my photo telephone."

"I suppose so. Well, this fellow Peters struck Shopton about a
month ago. He bought the old Wardell homestead, and began to show
off at once. He's got two autos, and this big motor boat. He
always goes around with a silk hat and a flower in his buttonhole.
A big bluff--that's what he is."

"He acted so to me," was Tom's comment. "Well, he isn't going to
scare me. The idea! Why, he seemed to think we were in the wrong;
whereas he was, and his man knew it, too."

"Yes, but the poor fellow was afraid to say so. I felt sorry for
him."

"So did I," added Tom. "Well, Kilo is out of commission for the
present. Guess we'll have to finish our outing by walking, Ned."

"Oh, I don't mind. But it makes me mad to have a fellow act the
way he did."

"Well, there's no good in getting mad," was Tom's smiling
rejoinder. "We'll take it out of him legally. That's the best way
in the end. But I can't help saying I don't like Mr. Shallock
Peters."

"And I don't either," added Ned.





CHAPTER VI

A WARNING


"There, she's about right now, Ned. Hold her there!"

"Aye, aye, Captain Tom!"

"Jove, she's leaking like a sieve! We only got her here just in
time!"

"That's right," agreed Ned.

Tom and his chum had managed to get the Kilo to Ramsey's dock, and
over the ways of the inclined marine railway that led from the
shop on shore down into the river. Then, poling the craft along,
until she was in the "cradle," Ned held her there while Tom went
on shore to wind up the windlass that pulled the car, containing
the boat, up the incline.

"I'll give you a hand, as soon as I find she sets level," called
Ned, from his place in the boat.

"All right--don't worry. There are good gears on this windlass,
and she works easy," replied Tom.

In a short time the boat was out of the water, but, as Tom grimly
remarked, "the water was not out of her," for a stream poured from
the stuffing-box, through which the propeller shaft entered, and
water also ran out through the seams that had been opened by the
collision.

"Quite a smash, Tom," observed the boat repairer, when he had come
out to look over the Kilo. "How'd it happen?"

"Oh, Shallock Peters, with his big red boat, ran into us!" said
Ned, sharply.

"Ha, Peters; eh?" exclaimed the boatman. "That's the second craft
he's damaged inside a week with his speed mania. There's Bert
Johnson's little speeder over there," and he pointed to one over
which some men were working. "Had to put a whole new stern in her,
and what do you think that man Peters did?"

"What?" asked Tom, as he bent down to see how much damage his
craft had sustained.

"He wouldn't pay young Johnson a cent of money for the repairs,"
went on Mr. Houston, the boatman. "It was all Peters's fault,
too."

"Couldn't he make him pay?" asked Tom.

"Well, young Johnson asked for it--no more than right, too; but
Peters only sneered and laughed at him."

"Why didn't he sue?" asked Ned.

"Costs too much money to hire lawyers, I reckon. So he played you
the same trick; eh. Tom?"

"Pretty much, yes. But he won't get off so easily, I can tell you
that!" and there was a grim and determined look on the face of the
young inventor. "How long will it take to fix my boat, Mr.
Houston?"

"Nigh onto two weeks, Tom. I'm terrible rushed now."

Tom whistled ruefully.

"I could do it myself quicker, if I could get her back to my
shop," he said. "But she'd sink on the home trip. All right, do
the best you can, Mr. Houston."

"I will that, Tom."

The two chums walked out of the boat-repair place.

"What are you going to do, Tom?" asked Ned, as they strolled
along.

"Well, since we can't go motor boating, I guess I may as well go
back and see if that new supply of selenium has come. I do want to
get my photo telephone working, Ned."

"And that's all the outing you're going to take--less than an
hour!" exclaimed Ned, reproachfully.

"Oh, well, all you wanted to do was to get me out of a rut, as you
called it," laughed Tom. "And you've done it--you and Mr. Peters
together. It jolted up my brain, and I guess I can think better
now. Come on back and watch me tinker away, Ned."

"Not much! I'm going to stay out and get some fresh air while I
can. You'd better, too."

"I will, later."

So Tom turned back to his workshop, and Ned strolled on into the
country, for his day's work at the bank was over. And for some
time after that--until far into the night--Tom Swift worked at the
knotty problem of the photo telephone.

But the young inventor was baffled. Try as he might, he could not
get the image to show on the metal plate, nor could he get any
results by using a regular photographic plate, and developing it
afterward.

"There is something wrong with the transmission of the light waves
over the wire," Tom confessed to his father.

"You'll never do it, Tom," said the aged inventor. "You are only
wasting a whole lot of time."

"Well, as I haven't anything else to do now, it isn't much loss,"
spoke Tom, ruefully. "But I'm going to make this work, Dad!"

"All right, son. It's up to you. Only I tell you it can't be
done."

Tom, himself, was almost ready to admit this, when, a week later,
he seemed to be no nearer a solution of the problem than he was at
first. He had tried everything he could think of, and he had
Eradicate and Koku, the giant, almost distracted, by making them
stay in small telephone booths for hours at a time, while the
young inventor tried to get some reflection of one face or the
other to come over the wire.

Koku finally got so nervous over the matter, that he flatly
refused to "pose" any longer, so Tom was forced to use Eradicate.
As for that elderly man of all work, after many trials, all
unsuccessful, he remarked:

"Massa Tom, I reckon I knows what's wrong."

"Yes, Rad? Well, what is it?"

"Mah face am too black--dat's de trouble. You done want a white-
complected gen'man to stand in dat booth an' look at dat lookin'
glass plate. I'se too black! I suah is!"

"No, that isn't it, Rad," laughed Tom, hopelessly. "If the thing
works at all it will send a black man's face over the wire as well
as a white man's. I guess the truth of it is that you're like
Koku. You're getting tired. I don't know as I blame you. I'm
getting a bit weary myself. I'm going to take a rest. I'll send
for another kind of selenium crystals I've heard of, and we'll try
them. In the meanwhile--I'll take a little vacation."

"Get out my small airship, Rad, and I'll take a little flight."

"Dat's de way to talk, Massa Tom," was the glad rejoinder.

"I'm going over to see Mr. Damon, Father," announced Tom to Mr.
Swift a little later, when his speedy monoplane was waiting for
him. "I haven't seen him in some time, and I'd like to get at the
truth of what Mr. Halling said about Mr. Damon's fortune being in
danger. I'll be back soon."

"All right, Tom. And say--"

"Yes, Dad, what is it?" asked Tom, as he paused in the act of
getting in the seat.

"If he wants any ready cash, you know we've got plenty."

"Oh, sure. I was going to tell him we'd help him out."

Then, as Koku spun the propeller blades, Tom grasped the steering
wheel, and, tilting the elevating rudder, he was soon soaring into
the air, he and his craft becoming smaller and smaller as they
were lost to sight in the distance, while the rattle and roar of
the powerful motor became fainter.

In a comparatively short time Tom had made a successful landing in
the big yard in front of Mr. Damon's house, and, walking up the
path, kept a lookout for his friend.

"I wonder why he didn't come out to meet me?" mused Tom, for
usually when the eccentric man heard the throbbing of Tom's motor,
he was out waiting for the young inventor. But this time it was
not the case.

"Is Mr. Damon in?" Tom asked of the maid who answered his ring.

"Yes, Mr. Swift. You'll find him in the library," and she ushered
him in.

"Oh, hello, Tom," greeted Mr. Damon, but the tone was so listless,
and his friend's manner so gloomy that the young inventor was
quite embarrassed.

"Have a chair," went on Mr. Damon. "I'll talk to you in a minute,
Tom. I've got to finish this letter, and it's a hard one to write,
let me tell you."

Now Tom was more astonished than ever. Not once had Mr. Damon
"blessed," anything, and when this did not happen Tom was sure
something was wrong. He waited until his friend had sealed the
letter, and turned to him with a sigh. Then Tom said boldly:

"Mr. Damon, is it true that you're having hard luck--in money
matters?"

"Why, yes, Tom, I'm afraid I am," was the quick answer. "But who
told you?"

"Grant Halling. He was over to get me to fix his airship," and Tom
briefly related what had happened.

"Oh, yes, I did mention the matter to him," went on Mr. Damon, and
his tone was still listless. "So he told you; did he? Well,
matters aren't any better, Tom. In fact, they're worse. I just had
to write to a man who was asking for help, and I had to refuse
him, though he needs it very much. The truth is I hadn't the
money. Tom, I'm afraid I'm going to be a very poor man soon."

"Impossible, Mr. Damon! Why, I thought your investments--"

"I've made some bad ones of late, Tom. I've been pretty foolish,
I'm afraid. I drew out some money I had in government bonds, and
invested in certain stocks sold by a Mr. Shallock Peters."

"Shallock Peters!" cried Tom, almost jumping out of his chair.
"Why, I know him--I mean I've met him."

"Have you, Tom? Well, then, all I've got to say is to steer clear
of him, my boy. Don't have anything to do with him," and, with
something of a return of his usual energy Mr. Damon banged his
fist down on his desk. "Give him a wide berth, Tom, and if you see
him coming, turn your back. He'd talk a miser into giving him his
last cent. Keep away from Shallock Peters, Tom. Bless my necktie,
he's a scoundrel, that's what he is!" and again Mr. Damon banged
his desk forcibly.





CHAPTER VII

SOFT WORDS


"Well, I'm glad of one thing!" exclaimed Tom, when the ink bottle
and the paper cutter on Mr. Damon's desk had ceased rattling,
because of the violence of the blow. "I'm glad of one thing."

"What's that, Tom?" asked his friend.

"I heard you bless something at last--the first time since I came
in."

"Oh!" and Mr. Damon laughed. "Well, Tom, I haven't been blessing
things lately--that's a fact. I haven't had the heart for it.
There are too many business complications. I wish I'd never met
this Peters."

"So do I," said Tom. "My motor boat would not have been damaged
then."

"Did he do that, Tom?"

"He certainly did, and then he accused me of being at fault."

"That would be just like him. Tell me about it, Tom."

When the young inventor finished the story of the collision Mr.
Damon sat silent for a moment. Then he remarked slowly:

"That's just like Peters. A big bluff--that's what he is. I wish
I'd discovered that fact sooner--I'd be money in pocket. But I
allowed myself to be deceived by his talk about big profits. At
first he seemed like a smart business man, and he certainly had
fine recommendations. But I am inclined to believe, now, that the
recommendations were forged."

"What did he do to you, Mr. Damon?" asked Tom, with ready
sympathy.

"It's too complicated to go into details over, Tom, but to make a
long story short, he got me to invest nearly all my fortune in
some enterprises that, I fear, are doomed to failure. And if they
do fail, I'll be a ruined man."

"No, you won't!" exclaimed Tom. "That's one reason why I came here
to-day. Father told me to offer you all the ready money you needed
to get out of your trouble. How much do you need, Mr. Damon?"

"Bless my collar button! That's like your father, Tom," and now
Mr. Damon seemed more like his old self. "Bless my shoes, a man
never knows who his real friends are until trouble comes. I can't
say how I thank you and your father, Tom. But I'm not going to
take advantage of him."

"It wouldn't be taking any advantage of him, Mr. Damon. He has
money lying idle, and he'd like to have you use it."

"Well, Tom, I might use it, if I had only myself to think about.
But there's no use in throwing good money after bad. If I took
yours now this fellow Peters would only get it, and that would be
the last of it."

"No, Tom, thank you and your father just the same, but I'll try to
weather the storm a bit longer myself. Then, if I do go down I
won't drag anybody else with me. I'll hang on to the wreck a bit
longer. The storm may blow over, or--or something may happen to
this fellow Peters."

"Has he really got you in his grip, Mr. Damon?"

"He has, and, to a certain extent, it's my own fault. I should
have been suspicious of him. And now, Tom, let me give you a
further word of warning. You heard me say to steer clear of this
Peters?"

"Yes, and I'm going to. But I'm going to make him pay for damaging
my boat, if I possibly can."

"Maybe it would be wiser not to try that, Tom. I tell you he's a
tricky man. And one thing more. I have heard that this man Peters
makes a specialty of organizing companies to take up new
inventions."

"Is that so?" asked Tom, interestedly.

"Yes, but that's as far as it goes. Peters gets the invention, and
the man, out of whose brain it came, gets nothing."

"In other words, he swindles them?"

"That's it, Tom. If not in one way, then in another. He cheats
them out of the profits of their inventions. So I want to warn you
to be on the lookout."

"Don't worry," said Tom. "Peters will get nothing from my father
or me. We'll be on our guard. Not that I think he will try it, but
it's just as well to be warned. I didn't like him from the moment
he ran into me, and, now that I know what he has done to you, I
like him still less. He won't get anything from me!"

"I'm glad to hear you say so, Tom. I wish he'd gotten nothing out
of me."

"Are you sure you won't let my father help you, financially, Mr.
Damon?"

"No, Tom, at least not for the present. I'm going to make another
fight to hold on to my fortune. If I find I can't do it alone,
then I'll call on you. I'm real glad you called. Bless my
shoestring! I feel better now."

"I'm glad of it," laughed Tom, and he saw that his friend was in a
better state of mind, as his "blessings" showed.

Tom remained for a little longer, talking to Mr. Damon, and then
took his leave, flying back home in the airship.

"Gen'man t' see yo', Massa Tom," announced Eradicate, as he helped
Tom wheel the monoplane back into the shed.

"Is that so, Rad? Where is he?"

"Settin' in th' library. Yo' father am out, so I asted him in
dere."

"That's right, Rad. Who is he, do you know?"

"No, sah, Massa Tom, I doan't. He shore does use a pow'ful nice
perfume on his pocket hanky, though. Yum-yum!"

"Perfume!" exclaimed Tom, his mind going back to the day he had
had the trouble with Mr. Peters. "Is he a big, red-faced man,
Rad?"

"No, sah, Massa Tom. He's a white-faced, skinny man."

"Then it can't be Peters," mused Tom. "I guess perhaps it's that
lawyer I wrote to about bringing suit to get back what it cost me
to have the Kilo fixed. I'll see him at once. Oh, by the way, it
isn't Mr. Grant Halling; is it? The gentleman who got tangled up
in our aerials with his airship? Is it he?"

"No, sah, Massa Tom. 'Tain't him."

"I thought perhaps he had gotten into more trouble," mused Tom, as
he took off his airship "togs," and started for the house. For Mr.
Halling had called for his repaired airship some time ago, and had
promised to pay Tom another and more conventional visit, some
future day.

Tom did not know the visitor whom he greeted in the library a
little later. The man, as Eradicate had said, was rather pale of
face, and certainly he was not very fleshy.

"Mr. Tom Swift, I think?" said the man, rising and holding out his
hand.

"That's my name. I don't believe I know you, though."

"No, I haven't your reputation," said the man, with a laugh that
Tom did not like. "We can't all be great inventors like you," and,
somehow, Tom liked the man less than before, for he detected an
undertone of sneering patronage in the words. Tom disliked praise,
and he felt that this was not sincere.

"I have called on a little matter of business," went on the man.
"My name is Harrison Boylan, and I represent Mr. Shallock Peters."

Instinctively Tom stiffened. Receiving a call from a
representative of the man against whom Mr. Damon had warned him
only a short time before was a strange coincidence, Tom thought.

"You had some little accident, when your motor boat and that of
Mr. Peters collided, a brief time ago; did you not?" went on Mr.
Boylan.

"I did," said Tom, and, as he motioned the caller to be seated Tom
saw, with a start, that some of the drawings of his photo
telephone were lying on a desk in plain sight. They were within
easy reach of the man, and Tom thought the sheets looked as though
they had been recently handled. They were not in the orderly array
Tom had made of them before going out.

"If he is a spy, and has been looking at them," mused Tom, "he may
steal my invention." Then he calmed himself, as he realized that
he, himself, had not yet perfected his latest idea. "I guess he
couldn't make much of the drawings," Tom thought.

"Yes, the collision was most unfortunate," went on Mr. Boylan,
"and Mr. Peters has instructed me to say--"

"If he's told you to say that it was my fault, you may as well
save your time," cut in Tom. "I don't want to be impolite, but I
have my own opinion of the affair. And I might add that I have
instructed a lawyer to begin a suit against Mr. Peters--"

"No necessity for that at all!" interrupted the man, in soft
accents. "No necessity at all. I am sorry you did that, for there
was no need. Mr. Peters has instructed me to say that he realizes
the accident was entirely his own fault, and he is very willing--
nay, anxious, to pay all damages. In fact, that is why I am here,
and I am empowered, my dear Mr. Swift, to offer you five hundred
dollars, to pay for the repairs to your motor boat. If that is not
enough--"

The man paused, and drew a thick wallet front his pocket. Tom felt
a little embarrassed over what he had said.

"Oh," spoke the young inventor, "the repair bill is only about
three hundred dollars. I'm sorry--"

"Now that's all right, Mr. Swift! It's all right," and the man,
with his soft words, raised a white, restraining hand. "Not
another word. Mr. Peters did not know who you were that day he so
unfortunately ran into you. If he had, he would not have spoken as
he did. He supposed you were some amateur motor-boatist, and he
was--well, he admits it--he was provoked."

"Since then he has made inquiries, and, learning who you were, he
at once authorized me to make a settlement in full. So if five
hundred dollars--"

"The repair bill," said Tom, and his voice was not very cordial,
in spite of the other's persuasive smile, "the bill came to three
hundred forty-seven dollars. Here is the receipted bill. I paid
it, and, to be frank with you, I intended bringing suit against
Mr. Peters for that sum."

"No need, no need at all, I assure you!" interrupted Mr. Boylan,
as he counted off some bills. "There you are, and I regret that
you and Mr. Peters had such a misunderstanding. It was all his
fault, and he wants to apologize to you."

"The apology is accepted," said Tom, and he smiled a trifle. "Also
the money. I take it merely as a matter of justice, for I assure
you that Mr. Peters's own machinist will say the accident was his
employer's fault."

"No doubt of it, not the least in the world," said the caller.
"And now that I have this disagreeable business over, let me speak
of something more pleasant."

Instinctively Tom felt that now the real object of the man's call
would be made plain--that the matter of paying the damages was
only a blind. Tom steeled himself for what was to come.

"You know, I suppose," went on Mr. Boylan, smiling at Tom, "that
Mr. Peters is a man of many and large interests."

"I have heard something like that," said Tom, cautiously.

"Yes. Well, he is an organizer--a promoter, if you like. He
supplies the money for large enterprises, and is, therefore, a
benefactor of the human race. Where persons have no cash with
which to exploit their--well, say their inventions. Mr. Peters
takes them, and makes money out of them."

"No doubt," thought Tom, grimly.

"In other cases, where an inventor is working at a handicap, say
with too many interests, Mr. Peters takes hold of one of his
ideas, and makes it pay much better than the inventor has been
able to do."

"Now, Mr. Peters has heard of you, and he would like to do you
good."

"Yes, I guess he would," thought Tom. "He would like to do me--and
do me good and brown. Here's where I've got to play a game
myself."

"And so," went on Mr. Boylan, "Mr. Peters has sent me to you to
ask you to allow him to exploit one, or several, of your
inventions. He will form a large stock company, put one of your
inventions on the market, and make you a rich man. Now what do you
say?" and he looked at Tom and smiled--smiled, the young inventor
could not help thinking, like a cat looking at a mouse. "What do
you say, Mr. Swift?"

For a moment Tom did not answer. Then getting up and opening the
library door, to indicate that the interview was at an end, the
young inventor smiled, and said:

"Tell Mr. Peters that I thank him, but that I have nothing for him
to exploit, or with which to form a company to market."

"Wha--what!" faltered the visitor. "Do you mean to say you will
not take advantage of his remarkable offer?"

"That's just what I mean to say," replied Tom, with a smile.

"You won't do business with Mr. Peters? You won't let him do you
good?"

"No," said Tom, quietly.

"Why--why, that's the strangest--the most preposterous thing I
ever heard of!" protested Mr. Boylan. "What--what shall I say to
Mr. Peters?"

"Tell him," said Tom, "tell him, from me, and excuse the slang, if
you like, but tell him there is--nothing doing!"





CHAPTER VIII

TOM IS BAFFLED


Amazement held Mr. Boylan silent for a moment, and then, staring
at Tom, as though he could not believe what he had heard the young
inventor say, the representative of Mr. Peters exclaimed:

"Nothing doing?"

"That's what I said," repeated Tom, calmly.

"But--but you don't understand, I'm afraid."

"Oh, but indeed I do."

"Then you refuse to let my friend, Mr. Peters, exploit some of
your inventions?"

"I refuse absolutely."

"Oh, come now. Take an invention that hasn't been very
successful."

"Well, I don't like to boast," said Tom with a smile, "but all of
my inventions have been successful. They don't need any aid from
Mr. Peters, thank you."

"But this one!" went on the visitor eagerly, "this one about some
new kind of telephone," and he motioned to the drawings on the
table. "Has that been a success? Excuse me for having looked at
the plans, but I did not think you would mind. Has that telephone
been a success? If it has not perhaps Mr. Peters could form a
company to--"

"How did you know those drawings referred to a telephone?" asked
Tom, suspiciously, for the papers did not make it clear just what
the invention was.

"Why, I understood--I heard, in fact, that you were working on a
new photo telephone, and--"

"Who told you?" asked Tom quickly.

"Oh, no one in particular. The colored man who sent me here
mentioned--"

"Eradicate!" thought Tom. "He must have been talking. That isn't
like him. I must look into this."

Then to his caller he said:

"Really, you must excuse me, Mr. Boylan, but I don't care to do
any business with Mr. Peters. Tell him, with my thanks, that there
is really nothing doing in his line. I prefer to exploit my own
inventions."

"That is your last word?"

"Yes," returned Tom, as he gathered up the drawings.

"Well," said Mr. Boylan, and Tom could not help thinking there was
a veiled threat in his tones, "you will regret this. You will be
sorry for not having accepted this offer."

"I think not," replied Tom, confidently. "Good-day."

The young inventor sat for some time thinking deeply, when his
visitor had gone. He called Eradicate to him, and gently
questioned the old colored man, for Eradicate was ageing fast of
late, and Tom did not want him to feel badly.

It developed that the servant had been closely cross-questioned by
Mr. Boylan, while he was waiting for Tom, and it was small wonder
that the old colored man had let slip a reference to the photo
telephone. But he really knew nothing of the details of the
invention, so he could have given out no secrets.

"But at the same time," mused Tom, "I must be on guard against
these fellows. That Boylan seems a pretty slick sort of a chap. As
for Peters, he's a big 'bluff,' to be perfectly frank. I'm glad I
had Mr. Damon's warning in mind, or I might have been tempted to
do business with him."

"Now to get busy at this photo telephone again. I'm going to try a
totally different system of transmission. I'll use an alternating
current on the third wire, and see if that makes it any better.
And I'll put in the most sensitive selenium plate I can make. I'm
going to have this thing a success."

Tom carefully examined the drawings of his invention, at which
papers Mr. Boylan had confessed to looking. As far as the young
inventor could tell none was missing, and as they were not
completed it would be hard work for anyone not familiar with them
to have gotten any of Tom's ideas.

"But at the same time I'm going to be on my guard," mused Tom.
"And now for another trial."

Tom Swift worked hard during the following week, and so closely
did he stick to his home and workshop that he did not even pay a
visit to Mr. Damon, so he did not learn in what condition that
gentleman's affairs were. Tom even denied himself to his chum Ned,
so taken up was the young inventor with working out the telephone
problem, until Ned fairly forced himself into the shop one day,
and insisted on Tom coming out.

"You need some fresh air!" exclaimed Ned. "Come on out in the
motor boat again. She's all fixed now; isn't she?"

"Yes," answered Tom, "but--"

"Oh, 'but me no buts,' as Mr. Shakespeare would say. Come on, Tom.
It will do you good. I want a spin myself."

"All right, I will go for a little while," agreed Tom. "I am
feeling a bit rusty, and my head seems filled with cobwebs."

"Can't get the old thing to come out properly; eh?"

"No. I guess dad was more than half right when he said it couldn't
be done. But I haven't given up. Maybe I'll think of some new plan
if I take a little run. Come along."

They went down to the boat house, and soon were out on the lake in
the Kilo.

"She runs better since you had her fixed," remarked Ned.

"Yes, they did a good job."

"Did you sue Peters?"

"Didn't have to. He sent the money," and Tom told of his interview
with Mr. Boylan. This was news to Ned, as was also the financial
trouble of Mr. Damon.

"Well," said the young banker, "that bears out what I had heard of
Peters--that he was a get-rich-quick chap, and a good one to steer
clear of."

"Speaking of steering clear," laughed Tom, "there he is now, in
his big boat," and he pointed to a red blur coming up the lake.
"I'll give him a wide enough berth this time."

But though Mr. Peters, in his powerful motor boat, passed close to
Tom's more modest craft, the big man did not glance toward our
hero and his chum. Nor did Mr. Boylan, who was with his friend,
look over.

"I guess they've had enough of you," chuckled Ned.

"Probably he wishes he hadn't paid me that money," said Tom. "Very
likely he thought, after he handed it over, that I'd be only too
willing to let him manage one of my inventions. But he has another
guess coming."

Tom and Ned rode on for some distance, thoroughly enjoying the
spin on the lake that fine Summer day. They stopped for lunch at a
picnic resort, and coming back in the cool of the evening they
found themselves in the midst of a little flotilla of pleasure
craft, all decorated with Japanese lanterns.

"Better slow down a bit," Ned advised Tom, for many of the
pleasure craft were canoes and light row boats. "Our wash may
upset some of them."

"Guess you're right, old man," agreed Tom, as he closed the
gasoline throttle, to reduce speed. Hardly had he done so than
there broke in upon the merry shouts and singing of the pleasure-
seekers the staccato exhaust of a powerful motor boat, coming
directly behind Tom's craft.

Then came the shrill warning of an electrical siren horn.

"Somebody's in a hurry," observed Tom.

"Yes," answered Ned. "It sound's like Peters's boat, too."

"It is!" exclaimed Tom. "Here he comes. He ought to know better
than to cut through this raft of boats at that speed."

"Is he headed toward us?"

"No, I guess he's had enough of that. But look at him!"

With undiminished speed the burly promoter was driving his boat
on. The big vibrating horn kept up its clamor, and a powerful
searchlight in front dazzled the eyes.

"Look out! Look out!" cried several.

Many of the rowers and paddlers made haste to clear a lane for the
big, speedy motor craft, and Peters and his friends (for there
were several men in his boat now) seemed to accept this as a
matter of course, and their right.

"Somebody'll be swamped!" exclaimed Ned.

Hardly had he spoken than, as the big red boat dashed past in a
smother of foam, there came a startled cry in girls' voices.

"Look!" cried Tom. "That canoe's upset! Speed her up, Ned! We've
got to get 'em!"





CHAPTER IX

A GLEAM OF HOPE


"Where are they?"

"Who are they?"

"Over this way! There's their canoe!"

"Look out for that motor boat!"

"Who was it ran them down? They ought to be arrested!"

These were only a few of the cries that followed the upsetting of
the frail canoe by the wash from the powerful red boat. On Tom's
Kilo there was a small, electrical searchlight which he had not
yet switched on. But, with his call to Ned Newton to speed up the
motor, that had been slowed down, Tom, with one turn of his
fingers, set the lamp aglow, while, with the other hand, he
whirled the wheel over to head his craft for the spot where he saw
two figures struggling in the water.

Fortunately the lanterns on the various canoes and row-boats, as
well as the light on the bow of Tom's Kilo, made an illumination
that gave the rescuers a good chance to work. Many other boats
besides Tom's had headed for the scene, but his was the more
practical, since the others--all quite small ones--were pretty
well filled.

"There they are, Ned!" Tom suddenly cried. "Throw out the clutch!
I'll get 'em!"

"Want any help?"

"No, you stay at the engine, and mind what I say. Reverse now!
We're going to pass them!"

Ned threw in the backing gear, and the screw churned the water to
foam under the stern of the Kilo.

Tom leaned over the bow, and made a grab for the gasping,
struggling figure of a girl in the water. At the same time he had
tossed overboard a cork life ring, attached to a rope which, in
turn, was made fast to the forward deck-cleat. "Grab that!" cried
Tom. "Hold on, and I'll have you out in a second! That's enough,
Ned! Shut her off!"

The Kilo came to a standstill, and, a second later, Tom had pulled
into his boat one of the girls. She would have collapsed, and
fallen in a heap on the bottom boards, had not Ned, who had come
forward from the engine, caught her.

Then Tom, again leaning over the side, pulled in the other girl,
who was clinging to the life ring.

"You're all right," Tom assured her, as she came up, gasping,
choking and crying hysterically. "You're all right!"

"Is--is Minnie saved?" she sobbed.

"Yes, Grace! I'm here," answered the one Ned was supporting.

"Oh, wasn't it terrible!" cried the second girl Tom had saved.

"I thought we would be drowned, even though we can swim."

"Yes, it--it was so--so sudden!" gasped her companion. "What
happened?"

"The wash from that big boat upset you," explained Tom. "That
fellow ought to be ashamed of himself, rushing along the way he
did. Now, can I take you girls anywhere? Your canoe seems to have
drifted off."

"I have it!" someone called. "It's turned over, but I can tow it
to shore."

"And I'll take the girls home," offered a gentleman in a large
rowboat. "My wife will look after them. They live near us," and he
mentioned his own name and the names of the two girls Tom had
saved. The young inventor did not know them, but he introduced
himself and Ned.

"This is the annual moonlight outing of our little boat club,"
explained the man who had offered to look after the girls, "and it
is the first time we ever had an accident. This was not our fault,
though."

"Indeed it was not," agreed Tom, after he had helped the two
dripping young ladies into the rowboat. "It was due to Mr.
Peters's speed mania."

"I shall make a complaint against him to the navigation
authorities," said Mr. Ralston, who was looking after the girls.
"He must think he, alone, has any rights on this lake."

With renewed thanks to Tom and Ned, the rescued girls were rowed
off to their homes, while the interrupted water carnival was
continued.

"Some little excitement; eh, Tom?" remarked Ned, when they were
once more under way.

"Yes. We seem to run into that fellow Peters, or some of his
doings, quite often lately."

"And it isn't a good sign, either," murmured Ned.

For some minutes after that Tom did not speak. In fact he was so
silent that Ned at last inquired:

"What's the matter, Tom--in love?"

"Far from it. But, Ned, I've got an idea."

"And I've got a wet suit of clothes where that nice young lady
fainted in my arms. I'm soaked."

"That's what gave me the idea--the water, I mean. I noticed how
everything was reflected in it, and, do you know, Ned, I believe I
have been working on the wrong principle for my photo telephone."

"Wrong, Tom, how is that?"

"Why, I've been using a dry plate, and I think I should have used
a wet one. You know how even in a little puddle of water on the
sidewalk you can see yourself reflected?"

"Yes, I've often seen that."

"Well then, 'bless my watch chain!' as Mr. Damon would say, I
think I've got just what I want. I'm going to try a wet plate now,
and I think it will work. Come on now. Speed up! I'm in a great
big hurry to get home and try it!"

"Well, Tom, I sure will be glad if you've got the right idea,"
laughed Ned. "It will be worth getting wet through for, if you
strike something. Good luck!"

Tom could hardly wait to fasten up his boat for the night, so
eager was he to get to his shop laboratory and try the new idea. A
gleam of hope had come to him.

It was still early evening, and Tom, when enticed out by Ned, had
left his photo telephone apparatus in readiness to go on with his
trials as soon as he should have come back.

"Now for it, Ned!" exclaimed the young inventor, as he took off
his coat. "First I'll sensitize a selenium plate, and then I'll
wet it. Water is always a good conductor of electricity, and it's
a wonder that I forgot that when I was planning this photo
telephone. But seeing the sparkle of lights, and the reflection of
ourselves in the lake to-night, brought it back to me. Now then,
you haven't anything special to do; have you?"

"Not a thing, Tom."

"That's good. Then you get in this other telephone closet--the one
in the casting shop. I'll put a prepared plate in there, and one
in the booth where I'm to sit. Then I'll switch on the current,
and we'll see if I can make you out, and you notice whether my
image appears on your plate."

It took some little time to make ready for this new test. Tom was
filled with enthusiasm, and he was sure it was going to be
successful this time. Ned watched him prepare the selenium plates
--plates that were so sensitive to illumination that, in the dark,
the metal would hardly transmit a current of electricity, but in
the light would do so readily, its conductivity depending on the
amount of light it received.

"There, I guess we're all ready, Ned," announced Tom, at last.
"Now you go to your little coop, and I'll shut myself up in mine.
We can talk over the telephone."

Seated in the little booth in one of the smaller of Tom's shops,
Ned proceeded with his part in the new experiment. A small shelf
had been fitted up in the booth, or closet, and on this was the
apparatus, consisting of a portable telephone set, and a small
box, in which was set a selenium plate. This plate had been wet by
a spray of water in order to test Tom's new theory.

In a similar booth, several hundred feet away, and in another
building, Tom took his place. The two booths were connected by
wires, and in each one was an electric light.

"All ready, Ned?" asked Tom, through the telephone.

"All ready," came the answer.

"Now then, turn on your switch--the one I showed you--and look
right at the sensitized plate. Then turn out your light, and
slowly turn it on. It's a new kind, and the light comes up
gradually, like gas or an oil lamp. Turn it on easily."

"I get you, Tom."

Ned did as requested. Slowly the illumination in the booth
increased.

"Do you get anything, Tom?" asked Ned, over the wire.

"Not yet," was the somewhat discouraged answer. "Go ahead, turn on
more light, and keep your face close to the plate."

Ned did so.

"How about it now?" he asked, a moment later.

"Nothing--yet," was the answer. And then suddenly Tom's voice rose
to a scream over the wire.

"Ned--Ned! Quick!" he called. "Come here--I--I--"

The voice died off into a meaningless gurgle.





CHAPTER X

MIDNIGHT VISITORS


Ned Newton never knew exactly how he got out of the telephone
booth. He seemed to give but one jump, tearing the clamped
receiver from his ear, and almost upsetting the photo apparatus in
his mad rush to help Tom. Certain it is, however, that he did get
out, and a few seconds later he was speeding toward the shop where
Tom had taken his position in a booth.

Ned burst in, crying out:

"Tom! What is it? What happened? What's the matter?"

There was no answer. Fearing the worst, Ned hurried to the small
booth, in one corner of the big, dimly lighted shop. He could see
Tom's lamp burning in the telephone compartment,

"Tom! Tom!" called the young banker.

Still there was no answer, and Ned, springing forward, threw open
the double, sound-proof door of the booth. Then he saw Tom lying
unconscious, with his head and arms on the table in front of him,
while the low buzzing of the electrical apparatus in the
transmitting box told that the current had not been shut off.

"Tom! Tom!" cried Ned in his chum's ear He shook him by the
shoulder,

"Are you hurt? What is the matter?"

The young inventor seemed unconscious, and for a moment Ned had a
wild idea that Tom had been shocked to death, possibly by some
crossed live wire coming in contact with the telephone circuit.

"But that couldn't have happened, or I'd have been shocked
myself," mused Ned.

Then he became aware of a curious, sweet, sickish odor in the
booth. It was overpowering. Ned felt himself growing dizzy.

"I have it--chloroform!" he gasped. "In some way Tom has been
overcome by chloroform. I've got to get him to the fresh air."

Once he had solved the puzzle of Tom's unconsciousness, Ned was
quick to act. He caught Tom under the arms, and dragged him out of
the booth, and to the outer door of the shop. Almost before Ned
had reached there with his limp burden, Tom began to revive, and
soon the fresh, cool night air completed the work.

"I--I," began the young inventor. "Ned, I--I--"

"Now take it easy, Tom," advised his chum. "You'll be all right in
a few minutes. What happened? Shall I call your father, or Koku?"

"No--don't. It would only--only alarm dad," faltered Tom. "I'm
getting all right now. But he--he nearly had me, Ned!"

"He had you? What do you mean, Tom? Who had you?"

"I don't know who it was, but when I was talking to you over the
wire, all of a sudden I felt a hand behind me. It slipped over my
mouth and nose, and I smelled chloroform. I knew right away
something was wrong, and I called to you. That's all I remember. I
guess I must have gone off."

"You did," spoke Ned. "You were unconscious when I got to you. I
couldn't imagine what had happened. First I thought it was an
electrical shock. Then I smelled that chloroform. But who could it
have been, Tom?"

"Give it up, Ned! I haven't the slightest idea."

"Could they have been going to rob you?"

"I haven't a thing but a nickel watch on me," went on Tom. "I left
all my cash in the house. If it was robbery, it wasn't me,
personally, they were after."

"What then? Some of your inventions?"

"That's my idea now, Ned. You remember some years ago Jake Burke
and his gang held me up and took one of dad's patents away from
me?"

"Yes, I've heard you mention that. It was when you first got your
motor cycle; wasn't it?"

"That's right. Well, what I was going to say was that they used
chloroform on me then, and--"

"You think this is the same crowd? Why, I thought they were
captured."

"No, they got away, but I haven't heard anything of them in years.
Now it may be they have come back for revenge, for you know we got
back the stolen property."

"That's right. Say, Tom, it might be so. What are you going to do
about it?"

"I hardly know. If it was Jake Burke, alias Happy Harry, and his
crowd, including Appleson, Morse and Featherton, they're a bad
lot. I wouldn't want father to know they were around, for he'd be
sure to worry himself sick. He never really got over the time they
attacked me, and got the patent away. Dad sure thought he was
ruined then."

"Now if I tell him I was chloroformed again to-night, and that I
think it was Burke and his crowd, he'd be sure to get ill over it.
So I'm just going to keep mum."

"Well, perhaps it's the best plan. But you ought to do something."

"Oh, I will, Ned, don't worry about that. I feel much better now."

"How did it happen?" asked Ned, his curiosity not yet satisfied.

"I don't know, exactly. I was in the booth, talking to you, and
not paying much attention to anything else. I was adjusting and
readjusting the current, trying to get that image to appear on the
plate. All at once, I felt someone back of me, and, before I could
turn, that hand, with the chloroform sponge, was over my mouth and
nose. I struggled, and called out, but it wasn't much use."

"But they didn't do anything else--they didn't take anything; did
they, Tom?"

"I don't know, Ned. We'll have to look around. They must have
sneaked into the shop. I left the door open, you see. It would
have been easy enough."

"How many were there?"

"I couldn't tell. I only felt one fellow at me; but he may have
had others with him."

"What particular invention were they after, Tom?"

"I'm sure I don't know. There are several models in here that
would be valuable. I know one thing, though, they couldn't have
been after my photo telephone," and Tom laughed grimly.

"Why not?" Ned wanted to know.

"Because it's a failure--that's what! It's a dead, sure failure,
Ned, and I'm going to give it up!" and Tom spoke bitterly.

"Oh, don't say that!" urged his chum. "You may be right on the
verge of perfecting it, Tom. Didn't you see any image at all on
the plate?"

"Not a shadow. I must be on the wrong track. Well, never mind
about that now. I'm going to look around, and see if those fellows
took anything."

Tom was feeling more like himself again, the effects of the
chloroform having passed away. He had breathed the fumes of it for
only a little while, so no harm had been done. He and Ned made an
examination of the shop, but found nothing missing.

There were no traces of the intruders, however, though the two
chums looked carefully about outside the building.

"You were too quick for them, Ned," said Tom. "You came as soon as
I called. They heard me speaking, and must have known that I had
given the alarm."

"Yes, I didn't lose any time," admitted Ned, "but I didn't see a
sign of anyone as I ran up."

"They must have been pretty quick at getting away. Well, now to
decide what's best to do to-night."

After some consultation and consideration it was decided to set
the burglar alarms in every building of the Swift plant. Some time
previous, when he had been working on a number of valuable
inventions, unscrupulous men had tried to steal his ideas and
models. To prevent this Tom had arranged a system of burglar
alarms, and had also fitted up a wizard camera that would take
moving pictures of anyone coming within its focus. The camera
could be set to work at night, in connection with the burglar
alarms.

The apparatus was effective, and thus an end was put to the
efforts of the criminals. But now it seemed Tom would have to take
new precautionary measures. His camera, however, was not
available, as he had loaned it to a scientific society for
exhibition.

"But we'll attach the burglar wires," decided Tom, "and see what
happens."

"It might be a good plan to have Koku on guard," said Tom's chum.
"That giant could handle four or five of the chaps as easily as
you and I could tackle one."

"That's right," agreed Tom. "I'll put him on guard. Whew! That
chloroform is giving me a headache. Guess I'll go to bed. I wish
you'd stay over to-night, Ned, if you haven't anything else to do.
I may need you."

"Then of course I'll stay, Tom. I'll telephone home that I won't
be in."

A little later Tom had put away his new photo telephone apparatus,
and had prepared for the warm reception of any unbidden callers.

"I wish I hadn't started on this new invention," said Tom, half
bitterly, as he locked up the main parts of his machine, "I know
it will never work."

"Oh, yes it will," spoke Ned, cheerfully. "You never failed yet,
Tom Swift, in anything you undertook, and you're not going to
now."

"Well, that's good of you to say, Ned, but I think you're wrong
this time. But I'm not going to think any more about it to-night,
anyhow. Now to find Koku and put him on watch."

The giant listened carefully to Tom's simple instructions.

"If any bad men come in the night, Koku," said the young inventor,
"you catch them!"

"Yes, master, me catch!" said Koku, grimly. "Me catch!" and he
stretched out his powerful arms, and clenched his big hands in a
way that boded no good to evildoers.

Nothing was said to Mr. Swift, to Mrs. Baggert, or to Eradicate
about what had happened, for Tom did not want to worry them. The
burglar alarms were set, Koku took his place where he could watch
the signals, and at the same time be ready to rush out, for,
somehow, Tom had an idea that the men who had attacked him would
come back.

Tom and Ned occupied adjoining rooms, and soon were ready for bed.
But, somehow, Tom could not sleep. He lay awake, tossing from side
to side, and, in spite of his resolution not to think about his
photo telephone invention, his mind ran on nothing but that.

"I can't see what next to do to make it work," he told himself,
over and over again. "Something is wrong--but what?"

At length he fell into a fitful doze, and he had a wild dream that
he was sliding down hill on a big mirror in which all sorts of
reflections were seen--reflections that he could not get to show
in the selenium plates.

Then Tom felt the mirror bobbing up and down like a motor boat in
a storm. He felt the vibration, and he heard a voice calling in
his ear:

"Get up, Tom! Get up!"

"Yes! What is it?" he sleepily exclaimed,

"Hush!" was the caution he heard, and then he realized that his
dream had been caused by Ned shaking him.

"Well?" whispered Tom, in tense tones.

"Midnight visitors!" answered his chum "The burglar alarm has just
gone off! The airship hangar drop fell. Koku has gone out. Come
on!"





CHAPTER XI

THE AIRSHIP IS TAKEN


Tom leaped silently out of bed, and stood for a moment half
dazed, so soundly had he been sleeping.

"Come on!" urged Ned softly, realizing that his chum had not fully
comprehended. "Koku will hold them until we get there. I haven't
roused anyone else."

"That's right," whispered Tom, as he began putting on his clothes.
"I don't want father to know. When did it happen?"

"Just a little while ago. I couldn't sleep very well, but I fell
into a doze, and then I heard the buzzer of the alarm go off. I
saw that the drop, showing that the hangar had been entered, had
fallen. I got to the window in time to see Koku going toward the
shed from his little coop. Then I came to you."

"Glad you did," answered Tom. "I didn't think I was sleeping so
soundly."

Together the two chums made their way from their rooms down the
dimly-lighted hall to a side door, whence they could reach the
airship hangar, or shed.

"Won't we need something--a gun or--" began Ned.

"Clubs are better--especially at night when you can't see to aim
very well," whispered back Tom. "I've got a couple of good ones
downstairs. I could use my electric rifle, and set it merely to
disable temporarily whoever the charge hit, but it's a little too
risky. Koku has a habit of getting in the way at the most
unexpected times. He's so big, you know. I think clubs will be
best."

"All right, Tom, just as you say," agreed Ned. "But who do you
think it can be?"

"I haven't the least idea. Probably the same fellows who were
after me before, though. This time I'll find out what their game
is, and what they're after."

The chums reached the lower hall, and there Tom picked out two
African war clubs which he had brought back with him from one of
his many trips into wild lands.

"These are just the thing!" exclaimed Ned, swinging his about.

"Careful," cautioned Tom, "If you hit something you'll rouse the
house, and I don't want my father and Mrs. Baggert, to say nothing
of Eradicate, awakened."

"Excuse me," murmured Ned. "But we'd better be getting a move on."

"That's right," agreed Tom. He dropped into a side pocket a small
but powerful electric flash lamp, and then he and Ned let
themselves out.

There had been a bright moon, but it was now overcast by clouds.
However, there was sufficient light to enable the two lads to see
objects quite clearly. All about them were the various buildings
that made up the manufacturing and experimental plant of Tom Swift
and his father. Farthest away from the house was the big shed
where once Tom had kept a balloon, but which was now given over to
his several airships. In front of it was a big, level grassy
space, needed to enable the aircraft to get a "running start"
before they could mount into the clouds.

"See anything of Koku?" whispered Ned.

"No," answered Tom, in the same cautious voice. "I guess he must
be hiding--"

"There he goes now!" hissed Ned, pointing to a big figure that was
approaching the hangar. It was undoubtedly that of the giant, and
he could be seen, in the dim light, stalking cautiously along.

"I wonder where the uninvited guests are?" asked Tom.

"Probably in the airship shed," answered Ned. "Koku was after them
as soon as the alarm went off, and they couldn't have gotten away.
They must be inside there yet. But what can their game be?"

"It's hard to say," admitted Tom. "They may be trying to get
something belonging to me, or they may imagine they can pick up
some valuable secrets. Or they may--" He stopped suddenly, and
then exclaimed:

"Come on, Ned! They're after one of the airships! That's it! My
big biplane is all ready to start, and they can get it in motion
inside of a few seconds. Oh, why didn't I hurry?" he added,
bitterly.

But the hangar was still some distance away, and it would take two
or three minutes of running to reach it.

Meanwhile, and at the instant Tom had his thought of the possible
theft of his biggest aircraft, something happened.

The doors of the shed were suddenly thrown open, and the two boys
could see the large airship being wheeled out. The hazy light of
the moon behind the clouds shone on the expanse of white planes,
and on the fish-tail rudder, one of Tom's latest ideas.

"Hey, there!" cried Tom, warningly.

"Leave that alone!" yelled Ned.

"Koku! Koku!" shouted Tom, shrilly. "Get after those fellows!"

"Me get!" boomed out the giant, in his deep voice.

He had been standing near the entrance to the hangar, probably
waiting for developments, and watching for the arrival of Tom and
Ned. The big form was seen to leap forward, and then several dark
shadows swarmed from around the airship, and were seen to fling
themselves upon the giant.

"That's a fight!" cried Ned. "They're attacking him!"

"Koku can take care of himself!" murmured Tom. "But come on. I
don't see what their game is."

He understood a moment later, however, for while several of the
midnight visitors were engaged in a hand-to-hand tussle with the
giant there came a sharp, throbbing roar of the airship motor in
motion. The propellers were being whirled rapidly about.

"Koku! Koku!" cried Tom, for he was still some distance off.
"Never mind them! Don't let the airship be taken!"

But Koku could only grunt. Big and strong as he was, half a dozen
men attacking him at once hampered him. He threw them from him,
one after another, and was gradually making his way toward the now
slowly-moving airship. But would he be in time?

Tom and Ned could not hope to reach the machine before Koku,
though they were running at top speed.

"Koku! Koku!" yelled Tom. "Don't let them get away!"

But Koku could only grunt--harder this time--for he fell heavily,
being tripped by a stick thrust between his legs. He lay for a
moment stunned.

"They're going to get away!" panted Tom, making an effort to
increase his speed.

"That's what!" agreed Ned.

Even as they spoke the roar of the airship motor increased.
Several of the dark forms which had been engaged in the struggle
with Koku were seen to pick themselves up, and run toward the
airship, that was now in motion, moving on the bicycle wheels over
the grass plot, preparatory to mounting upward in the sky.

"Stop! Stop!" commanded Tom. But it was all in vain.

The men leaped aboard the airship, which could carry six persons,
and a moment later, with a deafening roar, as the engine opened up
full, the big craft shot upward, taking away all but two of the
midnight visitors. These, who had seemingly been stunned by Koku,
now arose from the ground, and staggered off in the darkness.

"Get them!" cried Tom.

"We must see to Koku!" added Ned, "Look, there goes your airship,
Tom!"

"Yes, I know. But we can't stop that now. Let's see if we can get
a clue in these fellows!"

He pointed toward the two who had run off in the dark underbrush
surrounding the hangar plaza, and he and Ned trailed them as well
as they could. But from the first they knew it would be useless,
for there were many hiding places, and, a little way beyond, was a
clump of trees.

After a short search Tom gave up reluctantly, and came back to
where Koku was now sitting on the ground.

"Are you hurt?" he asked of the giant.

"My mind hurt--that all," said the big man.

"I guess he means his feelings are hurt," Tom explained. "Do you
know who they were, Koku?"

"No, master."

"But we must do something!" cried Ned. "They've got your airship,
Tom."

"I know it," said the young inventor, calmly. "But we can't do
anything now. You can hardly hear her, let alone see her. She's
moving fast!"

He pointed upward to the darkness. Like some black bird of prey
the airship was already lost to sight, though it would have seemed
as if her white planes might render her visible. But she had moved
so swiftly that, during the short search, she had already
disappeared.

"Aren't you going to do anything?" asked Ned.

"Certainly," spoke Tom. "I'm going to telephone an alarm to all
the nearby towns. This is certainly a queer game, Ned."





CHAPTER XII

A STRANGE DISAPPEARANCE


Disappointed and puzzled, Tom and Ned went to where Koku was
standing in rather a dazed attitude. The giant, like all large
bodies, moved slowly, not only bodily but mentally. He could
understand exactly what had happened, except that he had not
prevailed over the "pygmies" who had attacked him. They had been
too many for him.

"Let's take a look inside," suggested Tom, when, by another glance
upward, he had made sure that all trace of his big airship was
gone. "Maybe we can get a clue. Then, Koku, you tell us what
happened."

"It all happened to me," said the giant, simply. "Me no make
anything happen to them."

"That's about right," laughed Tom, ruefully. "It all happened to
us."

The lights in the hangar were switched on, but a careful search
revealed little. The men, half a dozen or more, had come evidently
well prepared for the taking away of Tom Swift's airship, and they
had done so.

Entrance had been effected by forcing a small side door. True, the
burglar alarm had given notice of the presence of the men, but Tom
and Ned had not acted quite quickly enough. Koku had been at the
hangar almost as soon as the men themselves, but he had watched
and waited for orders, instead of going in at once, and this had
given the intruders time to wheel out the craft and start the
motor.

"Why didn't you jump right in on them when you saw what they were
up to, Koku?" asked Tom.

"Me wait for master. Me think master want to see who men were. Me
go in--they run."

"Well, of course that's so, in a way," admitted Tom. "They
probably would have run, but they'd have run WITHOUT my airship
instead of WITH it, if they hadn't had time to get it outside the
hangar. However, there's no use in crying over lost biplanes. The
next thing is how to get her back. Did you know any of the men,
Koku?"

"No, master."

"Then we haven't any clue that way. They laid their plans well.
They just let you tangle yourself up with them, Koku, while the
head ones got the motor going; an easy matter, since it was all
ready to start. Then they tripped you, Koku, and as many of them
as could, made a jump for the machine. Then they were off."

"Well, what's the next thing to do?" asked Ned, when another look
about the shed had shown that not the slightest clue was
available.

"I'm going to do some telephoning," Tom stated. "A big airship
like mine can't go scooting around the country without being
noticed. And those fellows can't go on forever. They've got to
have gasoline and oil, and to get them they'll have to come down.
I'll get it back, sooner or later; but the question is: Why did
they take her?"

"To sell," suggested Ned.

"I think not," Tom said. "A big airship like mine isn't easy to
sell. People who would buy it would ask questions that might not
easily be answered. I'm inclined to think that some other reason
made them take her, and it's up to us to find out what it was.
Let's go into the house."

"Hark!" suddenly exclaimed Ned, holding up his hand for silence.
They all heard footsteps outside the hangar.

Tom sprang to the door, flashing his electric light, and a voice
exclaimed:

"Golly! Chicken thieves!"

"Oh, is it you, Eradicate?" asked the young inventor, with a
laugh. "No, it isn't chicken thieves--they were after bigger game
this time."

"Suffin happen?" asked the colored man. "Massa Swift he heah a
noise, an' see a light, an' he sent me out yeah t' see what all am
gwine on."

"Yes, something happened," admitted Tom. "They got the Eagle,
Rad."

"What! Yo' big airship?"

"Yes."

"Huh! Dat's too bad, Massa Tom. I suah am sorry t' heah dat. Who
done it?"

"We don't know, Rad."

"Maybe it was dat low-down cousin ob mine what tried t' git mah
chickens, onct!"

"No, Rad, it wasn't your cousin. But I'll telephone the alarm to
the police. They may be able to help me get the Eagle back."

Within the next hour several messages were sent to the authorities
of nearby towns, asking them to be on the watch for the stolen
airship. This was about all that could be done, and after Mr.
Swift had been told the story of the night's happenings, everyone
went back to bed again.

Further search the next morning brought forth no clues, though
Tom, Ned and the others beat about in the bushes where the men had
disappeared.

One or two reports were heard from surrounding towns, to the
effect that several persons had heard a strange throbbing sound in
the night, that, possibly, was caused by the passage of the
airship overhead. One such report came from Waterford, the home
town of Mr. Damon.

"Let's go over there," suggested Ned, to his chum. "I'd like to
see our friend, and maybe we can get some other clues by
circulating around there."

"Oh, I don't know," spoke Tom, rather listlessly.

"Why not?" Ned wanted to know.

"Well, I ought to be working on my photo telephone," was the
answer. "I've got a new idea now. I'm going to try a different
kind of current, and use a more sensitive plate. And I'll use a
tungsten filament lamp in the sending booth."

"Oh, let your experiments go for a little while, Tom," suggested
Ned. "Come on over to Mr. Damon's. The trouble with you is that
you keep too long at a thing, once you start."

"That's the only way to succeed," remarked Tom. "Really, Ned,
while I feel sorry about the airship, of course, I ought to be
working on my telephone. I'll get the Eagle back sooner or later."

"That's not the way to talk, Tom. Let's follow up this clue."

"Well, if you insist on it I suppose I may as well go. We'll take
the little monoplane. I've fixed her up to carry double. I guess--
"

Tom Swift broke off suddenly, as the telephone at his elbow rang.

"Hello," he said, taking off the receiver. "Yes, this is Tom
Swift. Oh, good morning, Mrs. Damon! Eh! What's that? Mr. Damon
has disappeared? You don't tell me! Disappeared! Yes, yes, I can
come right over. Be there in a few minutes. Eh? You don't know
what to make of it? Oh, well, maybe it can easily be explained.
Yes, Ned Newton and I will be right over. Don't worry."

Tom hung up the receiver and turned to his chum.

"What do you think of that?" he asked.

"What is it?"

"Why, Mr. Damon mysteriously vanished last night, and this morning
word came from his bankers that every cent of his fortune had
disappeared! He's lost everything!"

"Maybe--maybe--" hesitated Ned.

"No, Mr. Damon isn't that kind of a man," said Tom, stoutly. "He
hasn't made away with himself."

"But something is wrong!"

"Evidently, and it's up to us to find out what it is. I shouldn't
be surprised but that he knew of this coming trouble and started
out to prevent it if he could."

"But he wouldn't disappear and make his wife worry."

"No, that's so. Well, we'll have to go over there and find out all
about it."

"Say, Tom!" exclaimed Ned, as they were getting the small, but
swift monoplane ready for the flight, "could there be any
connection with the disappearance of Mr. Damon and the taking of
the Eagle?"

Tom started in surprise.

"How could there be?" he asked.

"Oh, I don't know," answered Ned. "It was only an idea."

"Well, we'll see what Mrs. Damon has to say," spoke the young
inventor, as he took his seat beside Ned, and motioned to Koku to
twirl the propeller.





CHAPTER XIII

THE TELEPHONE PICTURE


"Oh, Tom Swift! I'm so glad to see you!"

Mrs. Damon clasped her arms, in motherly fashion, about the young
inventor. He held her close, and his own eyes were not free from
tears as he witnessed the grief of his best friend's wife.

"Now, don't worry, Mrs. Damon," said Tom, sympathetically.
"Everything will be all right," and he led her to a chair.

"All right, Tom! How can it be?" and the lady raised a tear-
stained face. "My husband has disappeared, without a word! It's
just as if the earth had opened and swallowed him up! I can't find
a trace of him! How can it be all right?"

"Well, we'll find him, Mrs. Damon. Don't worry. Ned and I will get
right to work, and I'll have all the police and detectives within
fifty miles on the search--if we have to go that far."

"Oh, it's awfully good of you, Tom. I--I didn't know who else to
turn to in my trouble but you."

"And why shouldn't you come to me? I'd do anything for you and Mr.
Damon. Now tell me all about it."

Tom and Ned had just arrived at the Damon home in the airship, to
find the wife of the eccentric man almost distracted over her
husband's strange disappearance.

"It happened last night," Mrs. Damon said, when she was somewhat
composed. "Last night about twelve o'clock."

"Twelve o'clock!" cried Tom, in surprise "Why that's about the
time--"

He stopped suddenly.

"What were you going to say?" asked Mrs. Damon.

"Oh--nothing," answered Tom. "I--I'll tell you later. Go on,
please."

"It is all so confusing," proceeded Mrs. Damon. "You know my
husband has been in trouble of late--financial trouble?"

"Yes," responded Tom, "he mentioned it to me."

"I don't know any of the details," sighed Mrs. Damon, "but I know
he was mixed up with a man named Peters."

"I know him, too," spoke Tom, grimly.

"My husband has been very gloomy of late," went on Mrs. Damon. "He
foolishly entrusted almost his entire fortune to that man, and
last night he told me it was probably all gone. He said he saw
only the barest chance to save it, but that he was going to take
that chance."

"Did he go into details?" asked Tom.

"No, that was all he said. That was about ten o'clock. He didn't
want to go to bed. He just sat about, and he kept saying over and
over again: 'Bless my tombstone!' 'Bless the cemetery!' and all
such stuff as that. You know how he was," and she smiled through
her tears.

"Yes," said Tom. "I know. Only it wasn't like him to bless such
grewsome things. He was more jolly."

"He hasn't been, of late," sighed his wife. "Well, he sat about
all the evening, and he kept figuring away, trying, I suppose, to
find some way out of his trouble."

"Why didn't he come to my father?" cried Tom. "I told him he could
have all the money he needed to tide him over."

"Well, Mr. Damon was queer that way," said his wife. "He wanted to
be independent. I urged him to call you up, but he said he'd fight
it out alone."

"As I said, we sat there, and he kept feeling more and more blue,
and blessing his funeral, and the hearse and all such things as
that. He kept looking at the clock, too, and I wondered at that."

"'Are you expecting someone?' I asked him. He said he wasn't,
exactly, but I made sure he was, and finally, about half-past
eleven, he put on his hat and went out."

"'Where are you going?' I asked him."

"'Oh, just to get a breath of air. I can't sleep,' he said. I
didn't think much of that, as he often used to go out and walk
about a bit before going to bed. So he went out, and I began to
see about locking up, for I never trust the servants."

"It must have been about an hour later when I heard voices out in
front. I looked, and I saw Mr. Damon talking to a man."

"Who was he?" asked Tom, eagerly, on the alert for the slightest
clue.

"I thought at the time," said Mrs. Damon, "that it was one of the
neighbors. I have learned since, however, that it was not. Anyhow,
this man and Mr. Damon stood talking for a little while, and then
they went off together. I didn't think it strange at the time,
supposing he was merely strolling up and down in front with Mr.
Blackson, who lives next door, He often had done that before."

"Well, I saw that the house was locked up, and then I sat down in
a chair to wait for Mr. Damon to come back. I was getting sleepy,
for we don't usually stay up so late. I suppose I must have dozed
off, but I was suddenly awakened by hearing a peculiar noise. I
sat up in alarm, and then I realized that Mr. Damon had not come
in."

"I was frightened then, and I called my maid. It was nearly one
o'clock, and my husband never stays out as late as that. We went
next door, and found that Mr. Blackson had not been out of his
house that evening. So it could not have been he to whom Mr. Damon
was speaking."

"We roused up other neighbors, and they searched all about the
grounds, thinking he might have been overcome by a sudden faint.
But we could not find him. My husband had disappeared--
mysteriously disappeared!" and the lady broke into sobs.

"Now don't worry," said Tom, soothingly, as he put his arms about
her as he would have done to his own mother, had she been alive,
"We'll get him back!"

"But how can you? No one knows where he is."

"Oh, yes!" said Tom, confidently, "Mr. Damon himself knows where
he is, and unless he has gone away voluntarily, I think you will
soon hear from him."

"What do you mean by--voluntarily?" asked the wife.

"First let me ask you a question," came from Tom. "You said you
were awakened by a peculiar noise. What sort of a sound was it?"

"Why, a whirring, throbbing noise, like--like--"

She paused for a comparison.

"Like an airship?" asked Tom, with a good deal of eagerness.

"That was it!" cried Mrs. Damon. "I was trying to think where I
had heard the sound before. It was just like the noise your
airship makes, Tom!"

"That settles it!" exclaimed the young inventor.

"Settles what?" asked Ned.

"The manner of Mr. Damon's disappearance. He was taken away--or
went away--in my airship--the airship that was stolen from my shed
last night!"

Mrs. Damon stared at Tom in amazement.

"Why--why--how could that be?" she asked.

Quickly Tom told of what had happened at his place.

"I begin to see through it," he said. "There is some plot here,
and we've got to get to the bottom of it. Mr. Damon either went
with these men in the airship willingly, or he was taken away by
force. I'm inclined to think he went of his own accord, or you
would have heard some outcry, Mrs. Damon."

"Well, perhaps so," she admitted. "But would he go away in that
manner without telling me?"

"He might," said Tom, willing to test his theory on all sides. "He
might not have wanted you to worry, for you know you dislike him
to go up an airships."

"Yes, I do. Oh, if I only thought he did go away of his own
accord, I could understand it. He went, if he did, to try and save
his fortune."

"It does look as though he had an appointment with someone, Tom,"
suggested Ned. "His looking at the clock, and then going out, and all
that."

"Yes," admitted the young inventor, "and now I'm inclined to
change my theory a bit. It may have been some other airship than
mine that was used."

"How so?" asked Ned.

"Because the men who took mine were unprincipled fellows. Mr.
Damon would not have gone away with men who would steal an
airship."

"Not if he knew it," admitted Ned. "Well, then, let's consider two
airships--yours and the other that came to keep the appointment
with Mr. Damon. If the last is true, why should he want to go away
in an airship at midnight? Why couldn't he take a train, or an
auto?"

"Well, we don't know all the ins and outs," admitted Tom. "Taking
a midnight airship ride is rather strange, but that may have been
the only course open. We'll have to let the explanation go until
later. At any rate, Mrs. Damon, I feel sure that your husband did
go off through the air--either in my Eagle or in some other
craft."

"Well, I'm glad to hear you say so, Tom Swift, though it sounds a
dreadful thing to say. But if he did go off of his own accord, I
know he did it for the best. And he may not have told me, for fear
I would worry. I can understand that. But why isn't he back now?"

Tom had been rather dreading that question. It was one he had
asked himself, and he had found no good answer for it. If there
had been such need of haste, that an airship had to be used. why
had not Mr. Damon come back ere this? Unless, as Tom feared to
admit, even to himself, there had been some accident.

Half a dozen theories flashed through his mind, but he could not
select a good, working one,--particularly as there were no clues.
Disappearing in an airship was the one best means of not leaving a
trace behind. An auto, a motor boat, a train, a horse and
carriage--all these could be more or less easily traced. But an
airship--

If Mr. Damon wanted to cover up his tracks, or if he had been
taken away, and his captors wanted to baffle pursuit, the best
means had been adopted.

"Now don't you worry," advised Tom to Mrs. Damon. "I know it looks
funny, but I think it will come out all right. Ned and I will do
all we can. Mr. Damon must have known what he was about. But, to
be on the safe side, we'll send out a general alarm through the
police."

"Oh, I don't know what I'd done if you hadn't come to help me!"
exclaimed Mrs. Damon.

"Just you leave it to me!" said the young inventor, cheerfully.
"I'll find Mr. Damon!"

But, though he spoke thus confidently, Tom Swift had not the
slightest notion, just then, of how to set about his difficult
task. He had had hard problems to solve before, so he was not
going to give up this one. First he wanted to think matters out,
and arrange a plan of action.

He and Ned made a careful examination of the grounds of the Damon
homestead. There was little they could learn, though they did find
where an airship had landed in a meadow, not far away, and where
it had made a flying start off again.

Carefully Tom looked at the marks made by the wheels of the
airship.

"They're the same distance apart as those on the Eagle," he said
to his chum, "and the tires are the same. But that isn't saying
anything, as lots of airships have the same equipment. So we won't
jump to any conclusions that way."

Tom and Ned interviewed several of the neighbors, but beyond
learning that some of them had heard the throbbing of the midnight
airship, that was as far as they got on that line.

There was nothing more they could do in Waterford, and, leaving
Mrs. Damon, who had summoned a relative to stay with her, the two
chums made a quick trip back through the air to Shopton. As
Eradicate came out to help put away the monoplane Tom noticed that
the colored man was holding one hand as though it hurt him.

"What's the matter, Rad?" asked the young investor.

"Oh, nuffin--jest natcherly nuffin, Massa Tom."

But Eradicate spoke evasively and in a manner that roused Tom's
suspicions.

"Boomerang, your mule, didn't kick you; did he?"

"No, sah, Massa Tom, no sah. 'Twern't nuffin laik dat."

"But what was it? Your hand is hurt!"

"Well, Massa Tom, I s'pose I done bettah tell yo' all. I'se had a
shock!"

"A shock?"

"Yas, sah. A shock. A lickrish shock."

"Oh, you mean an electrical shock. That's too bad. I suppose you
must have touched a live wire."

"No, sah. 'Twern't dat way."

"How was it, then?"

"Well, yo' see, Massa Tom, I were playin' a joke on Koku."

"Oh, you were; eh? Then I suppose Koku shocked you," laughed Tom.

"No, sah. I--I'll tell you. Dat giant man he were in de telefoam
boof in de pattern shop--you know--de one where yo' all been
tryin' to make pishures."

"Yes, I know. Go on!" exclaimed Tom, impatiently.

"Well, he were in dere, Massa Tom, an' I slipped into de boof in
de next shop--de odder place where yo' all been 'speermentin'. I
called out on de telefoam, loud laik de Angel Gabriel gwine t'
holler at de last trump: 'Look out, yo' ole sinnah!' I yell it
jest t' scare Koku."

"I see," said Tom, a bit severely, for he did not like Eradicate
interfering with the instruments. "And did you scare Koku?"

"Oh, yas, sah, Massa Tom. I skeered him all right; but suffin else
done happen. When I put down de telefoam I got a terrible shock.
It hurts yit!"

"Well," remarked Tom, "I suppose I ought to feel sorry for you,
but I can't. You should let things alone. Now I've got to see if
you did any damage. Come along, Ned."

Tom was the first to enter the telephone booth where Eradicate had
played the part of the Angel Gabriel. He looked at the wires and
apparatus, but could see nothing wrong.

Then he glanced at the selenium plate, on which he hoped, some
day, to imprint an image from over the wire. And, as he saw the
smooth surface he started, and cried.

"Ned! Ned, come here quick!"

"What is it?" asked his chum, Crowding into the booth.

"Look at that plate! Tell me what you see!"

Ned looked.

"Why--why it's Koku's picture!" he gasped.

"Exactly!" cried Tom. "In some way my experiment has succeeded
when I was away. Eradicate must have made some new connection by
his monkeying. Ned, it's a success! I've got my first photo
telephone picture! Hurray!"





CHAPTER XIV

MAKING IMPROVEMENTS


Tom Swift was so overjoyed and excited that for a few moments he
capered about, inside the booth, and outside, knocking against his
chum Ned, clapping him on the back, and doing all manner of boyish
"stunts."

"It's a success, Ned! I've struck it!" cried Tom, in delight.

"Ouch! You struck ME, you mean!" replied Ned, rubbing his
shoulder, where the young inventor had imparted a resounding blow
of joy.

"What of it?" exclaimed Tom. "My apparatus works! I can send a
picture by telephone! It's great, Ned!"

"But I don't exactly understand how it happened," said Ned, in
some bewilderment, as he gazed at the selenium plate.

"Neither do I," admitted Tom, when he had somewhat calmed down.
"That is, I don't exactly understand what made the thing succeed
now, when it wouldn't work for me a little while ago. But I've got
to go into that. I'll have to interview that rascal Eradicate, and
learn what he did when he played that trick on Koku. Yes, and I'll
have to see Koku, too. We've got to get at the bottom of this,
Ned."

"I suppose so. You've got your hands full, Tom, with your photo
telephone, and the disappearance of Mr. Damon."

"Yes, and my own airship, too. I must get after that. Whew! A lot
of things to do! But I like work, Ned. The more the better."

"Yes, that's like you, Tom. But what are you going to get at
first?"

"Let me see; the telephone, I think. I'll have Rad and Koku in
here and talk to them. I say, you Eradicate!" he called out of the
door of the shop, as he saw the colored man going past, holding
his shocked arm tenderly.

"Yas, sah, Massa Tom, I'se comin'! What is it yo' all wants, Massa
Tom?"

"I want you to show me exactly what you did to the wires, and
other things in here, when you played that Angel Gabriel trick on
your partner Koku."

"Partner! He ain't mah partner!" exclaimed Eradicate with a scowl,
for there was not the best of feeling between the two. Eradicate
had served in the Swift family many years, and he rather resented
the coming of the giant, who performed many services formerly the
province of the colored man.

"Well, never mind what he is, Rad," laughed Tom. "You just show me
what you did. Come now, something happened in here, and I want to
find out what it was."

"Oh, suffin done happened all right, Massa Tom. Yas, sah! Suffin
done happened!" cried Eradicate, with such odd emphasis that Tom
and Ned both laughed.

"An' suffin happened to me," went on the colored man, rubbing his
shocked arm.

"Well, tell us about it," suggested Tom.

"It was dish yeah way," proceeded Eradicate. And he told more in
detail how, seeing Koku cleaning and sweeping out the other
telephone booth, he had thought of the trick to play on him. Both
telephones had what are called "amplifiers" attached, that could
be switched on when needed. These amplifiers were somewhat like
the horn of a phonograph--they increased, or magnified the sound,
so that one could hear a voice from any part of the shop, and need
not necessarily have the telephone receiver at his ear.

Seeing Koku near the instrument, Eradicate had switched on the
amplifier, and had called into his instrument, trying to scare the
giant. And he did startle Koku, for the loud voice, coming so
suddenly, sent the giant out of the booth on the run.

"But you must have done something else," insisted Tom. "Look here,
Rad," and the young inventor pointed to the picture on the plate.

"Mah gracious sakes!" gasped the colored man. "Why dat's Koku
hisse'f!" and he looked in awe at the likeness.

"That's what you did, Rad!"

"Me? I done dat? No, sah, Massa Tom. I neber did! No, sah!"
Eradicate spoke emphatically.

"Yes you did, Rad. You took that picture of Koku over my photo
telephone, and I want you to show me exactly what you did--what
wires and switches you touched and changed, and all that."

"Yo--yo' done say I tuck dat pishure, Massa Tom?"

"You sure did, Rad."

"Well--well, good land o' massy! An' I done dat!"

Eradicate stared in wonder at the image of the giant on the plate,
and shook his head doubtingly.

"I--I didn't know I could do it. I never knowed I had it in me!"
he murmured.

Tom and Ned laughed long and loud, and then the young inventor
said:

"Now look here, Rad. You've done me a mighty big service, though
you didn't know it, and I want to thank you. I'm sorry about your
arm, and I'll have the doctor look at it. But now I want you to
show me all the things you touched when you played that joke on
Koku. In some way you did what I haven't been able to do, You took
the picture. There's probably just one little thing I've
overlooked, and you stumbled on it by accident. Now go ahead and
show me."

Eradicate thought for a moment, and then said:

"Well, I done turned on de current, laik I seen you done, Massa
Tom."

"Yes, go on. You connected the telephone."

"Yas, sah. Den I switched on that flyer thing yo' all has rigged
up."

"You switched on the amplifier, yes. Go on."

"An'--an' den I plugged in dish year wire," and the colored man
pointed to one near the top of the booth.

"You switched on that wire, Rad! Why, great Scott, man! That's
connected to the arc light circuit--it carries over a thousand
volts. And you switched that into the telephone circuit?"

"Dat's what I done did, Massa Tom; yas, Bah!"

"What for?"

"Why, I done want t' make mah voice good an' loud t' skeer dat
rascal Koku!"

Tom stared at the colored man in amazement.

"No wonder you got a shock!" exclaimed the young inventor. "You
didn't get all the thousand volts, for part of it was shunted off;
but you got a good charge, all right. So that's what did the
business; eh? It was the combination of the two electrical
circuits that sent the photograph over the wire."

"I understand it now, Rad; but you did more than I've been able to
do. I never, in a hundred years, would have thought of switching
on that current. It never occurred to me. But you, doing it by
accident, brought out the truth. It's often that way in
discoveries. And Koku was standing in the other telephone booth,
near the plate there, when you switched in this current, Rad?"

"Yas, sah, Massa Tom. He were. An' yo' ought t' see him hop when
he heard mah voice yellin' at him. Ha! ha! ha!"

Eradicate chuckled at the thought. Then a pain in his shocked arm
made him wince. A wry look passed over his face.

"Yas, sah, Koku done jump about ten feet," he said. "An'--an' den
I jump too. Ain't no use in denyin' dat fact. I done jump when I
got dat shock!"

"All right, Rad. You may go now. I think I'm on the right track!"
exclaimed Tom. "Come on, Ned, we'll try some experiments, and
we'll see what we can do."

"No shocks though--cut out the shocks, Tom," stipulated his chum.

"Oh, sure! No shocks! Now let's bet busy and improve on
Eradicate's Angel Gabriel system."

Tom made a quick examination of the apparatus.

"I understand it, I think," he said. "Koku was near the plate in
the other booth when Rad put on the double current. There was a
light there, and in an instant his likeness was sent over the
wire, and imprinted on this plate. Now let's see what we can do.
You go to that other booth, Ned. I'll see if I can get your
picture, and send you mine. Here, take some extra selenium plates
along. You know how to connect them."

"I think so," answered Ned.

"This image is really too faint to be of much use," went on Tom,
as he looked at the one of Koku. "I think I can improve on it. But
we're on the right track."

A little later Ned stood in the other booth, while Tom arranged
the wires, and made the connections in the way accidently
discovered by Eradicate. The young inventor had put in a new
plate, carefully putting away the one with the picture of the
giant, This plate could be used again, when the film, into which
the image was imprinted, had been washed off.

"All ready, Ned," called Tom, over the wire, when he was about to
turn the switch. "Stand still, and I'll get you."

The connection was made, and Tom uttered a cry of joy. For there,
staring at him from the plate in front of him was the face of Ned.

It was somewhat reduced in size, of course, and was not extra
clear, but anyone who knew Ned could have told he was at the other
end of the wire.

"Do you get me, Tom?" called Ned, over the telephone.

"I sure do! Now see if you can get me."

Tom made other connections, and then looked at the sending plate
of his instrument, there being both a sending and receiving plate
in each booth, just as there was a receiver and a transmitter to
the telephone.

"Hurray! I see you, Tom!" cried Ned, over the wire. "Say, this is
great!"

"It isn't as good as I want it," went on Tom. "But it proves that
I'm right. The photo telephone is a fact, and now persons using
the wire can be sure of the other person they are conversing with.
I must tell dad. He wouldn't believe I could do it!"

And indeed Mr. Swift was surprised when Tom proved, by actual
demonstration, that a picture could be sent over the wire.

"Tom, I congratulate you!" declared the aged inventor. "It is good
news!"

"Yes, but we have bad news of Mr. Damon," said Tom, and he told
his father of the disappearance of the eccentric man. Mr. Swift at
once telephoned his sympathy to Mrs. Damon, and offered to do
anything he could for her.

"But Tom can help you more than I can," he said. "You can depend
on Tom."

"I know that," replied Mrs. Damon, over the wire.

And certainly Tom Swift had many things to do now. He hardly knew
at what to begin first, but now, since he was on the right road in
regard to his photo telephone, he would work at improving it.

And to this end he devoted himself, after he had sent out a
general alarm to the police of nearby towns, in regard to the
disappearance of Mr. Damon. The airship clue, he believed, as did
the police, would be a good one to work on.

For several days after this nothing of moment occurred. Mr. Damon
could not be located, and Tom's airship might still be sailing
above the clouds as far as getting any trace of it was concerned.

Meanwhile the young inventor, with the help of Ned, who was given
a leave of absence from the bank, worked hard to improve the photo
telephone.





CHAPTER XV

THE AIRSHIP CLUE


"Now Ned, we'll try again. I'm going to use a still stronger
current, and this is the most sensitive selenium plate I've turned
out yet. We'll see if we can't get a better likeness of you--one
that will be plainer."

It was Tom Swift who was speaking, and he and his chum had just
completed some hard work on the new photo telephone. Though the
apparatus did what Tom had claimed for it, still he was far from
satisfied. He could transmit over the wire the picture of a person
talking at the telephone, but the likeness was too faint to make
the apparatus commercially profitable.

"It's like the first moving pictures," said Tom. "They moved, but
that was about all they did."

"I say," remarked Ned, as he was about to take his place in the
booth where the telephone and apparatus were located, "this
double-strength electrical current you're speaking of won't shock
me; will it? I don't want what happened to Eradicate to happen to
me, Tom."

"Don't worry. Nothing will happen. The trouble with Rad was that
he didn't have the wires insulated when he turned that arc current
switch by mistake--or, rather, to play his joke. But he's all
right now."

"Yes, but I'm not going to take any chances," insisted Ned. "I
want to be insulated myself."

"I'll see to that," promised Tom. "Now get to your booth."

For the purpose of experiments Tom had strung a new line between
two of his shops, They were both within sight, and the line was
not very long; but, as I have said, Tom knew that if his apparatus
would work over a short distance, it would also be successful over
a long one, provided he could maintain the proper force of
current, which he was sure could be accomplished.

"And if they can send pictures from Monte Carlo to Paris I can do
the same," declared Tom, though his system of photo telephony was
different from sending by a telegraph system--a reproduction of a
picture on a copper plate. Tom's apparatus transmitted the
likeness of the living person.

It took some little time for the young inventor, and Ned working
with him, to fix up the new wires and switch on the current. But
at last it was complete, and Ned took his place at one telephone,
with the two sensitive plates before him. Tom did the same, and
they proceeded to talk over the wire, first making sure that the
vocal connection was perfect.

"All ready now, Ned! We'll try it," called Tom to his chum, over
the wire. "Look straight at the plate. I want to get your image
first, and then I'll send mine, if it's a success,"

Ned did as requested, and in a few minutes he could hear Tom
exclaim, joyfully:

"It's better, Ned! It's coming out real clear. I can see you
almost as plainly as if you were right in the booth with me. But
turn on your light a little stronger."

Tom could hear, through the telephone, his chum moving about, and
then he caught a startled exclamation.

"What's the matter?" asked Tom anxiously.

"I got a shock!" cried Ned. "I thought you said you had this thing
fixed. Great Scott, Tom! It nearly yanked the arm off me! Is this
a joke?"

"No, old man. No, of course not! Something must be wrong. I didn't
mean that. Wait, I'll take a look. Say, it does seem as if
everything was going wrong with this invention. But I'm on the
right track, and soon I'll have it all right. Wait a second. I'll
be right over."

Tom found that it was only a simple displacement of a wire that
had given Ned a shock, and he soon had this remedied.

"Now we'll try again," he said. This time nothing wrong occurred,
and soon Tom saw the clearest image he had yet observed on his
telephone photo plate.

"Switch me on now, Ned," he called to his chum, and Ned reported
that he could see Tom very plainly.

"So far--so good," observed Tom, as he came from the booth. "But
there are several things I want yet to do."

"Such as what?" questioned Ned.

"Well, I want to arrange to have two kinds of pictures come over
the wire. I want it so that a person can go into a booth, call up
a friend, and then switch on the picture plate, so he can see his
friend as well as talk to him. I want this plate to be like a
mirror, so that any number of images can be made to appear on it.
In that way it can be used over and over again. In fact it will be
exactly like a mirror, or a telescope. No matter how far two
persons may be apart they can both see and talk to one another."

"That's a big contract, Tom."

"Yes, but you've seen that it can be done. Then another thing I
want to do is to have it arranged so that I can make a photograph
of a person over a wire."

"Meaning what?"

"Meaning that if a certain person talks to me over the wire, I can
turn my switch, and get a picture of him here at my apparatus
connected with my telephone. To do that I'll merely need a sending
apparatus at the other end of the telephone line--not a receiving
machine."

"Could you arrange it so that the person who was talking to you
would have his picture taken whether he wanted it or not?" asked
Ned.

"Yes, it might be done," spoke Tom, thoughtfully. "I could conceal
the sending plate somewhere in the telephone booth, and arrange
the proper light, I suppose."

"That might be a good way in which to catch a criminal," went on
Ned. "Often crooks call up on the telephone, but they know they
are safe. The authorities can't see them--they can only hear them.
Now if you could get a photograph of them while they were
telephoning--"

"I see!" cried Tom, excitedly. "That's a great idea! I'll work on
that, Ned."

And, all enthusiasm, Tom began to plan new schemes with his photo
telephone.

The young inventor did not forget his promise to help Mrs. Damon.
But he could get absolutely no clue to her husband's whereabouts.
Mr. Damon had completely and mysteriously disappeared. His
fortune, too, seemed to have been swallowed up by the sharpers,
though lawyers engaged by Tom could fasten no criminal acts on Mr.
Peters, who indignantly denied that he had done anything unlawful.

If he had, he had done it in such a way that he could not be
brought to justice. The promoter was still about Shopton, as well
groomed as ever, with his rose in his buttonhole, and wearing his
silk hat. He still speeded up and down Lake Carlopa in his
powerful motor boat. But he gave Tom Swift a wide berth.

Late one night, when Tom and Ned had been working at the new photo
telephone, after all the rest of the household had retired, Tom
suddenly looked up from his drawings and exclaimed:

"What's that?"

"What's what?" inquired Ned.

"That sound? Don't you hear it? Listen!"

"It's an airship--maybe yours coming back!" cried the young
banker.

As he spoke Ned did hear, seemingly in the air above the house, a
curious, throbbing, pulsating sound.

"That's so! It is an airship motor!" exclaimed Tom. "Come on out!"

Together they rushed from the house, but, ere they reached the
yard, the sound had ceased. They looked up into the sky, but could
see nothing, though the night was light from a full moon.

"I certainly heard it," said Tom.

"So did I," asserted Ned. "But where is it now?"

They advanced toward the group of work-buildings. Something
showing white in the moonlight, before the hangar, caught Ned's
eyes.

"Look!" he exclaimed. "There's an airship, Tom!"

The two rushed over to the level landing place before the big
shed. And there, as if she had just been run out for a flight, was
the Eagle. She had come back in the night, as mysteriously as she
had been taken away.





CHAPTER XVI

SUCCESS


"Well, this gets me!" exclaimed Tom.

"It sure is strange," agreed Ned. "How did she come here?"

"She didn't come alone--that's sure," went on Tom. "Someone
brought her here, made a landing, and got away before we could get
out."

The two chums were standing near the Eagle, which had come back so
mysteriously.

"Just a couple of seconds sooner and we'd have seen who brought
her here," went on Tom. "But they must have shut off the motor
some distance up, and then they volplaned down. That's why we
didn't hear them."

Ned went over and put his hand on the motor.

"Ouch!" he cried, jumping back. "It's hot!"

"Showing that she's been running up to within a few minutes ago,"
said Tom. "Well, as I said before, this sure does get me. First
these mysterious men take my airship, and then they bring her back
again, without so much as thanking me for the use of her."

"Who in the world can they be?" asked Ned.

"I haven't the least idea. But I'm going to find out, if it's at
all possible. We'll look the machine over in the morning, and see
if we can get any clues. No use in doing that now. Come on, we'll
put her back in the hangar."

"Say!" exclaimed Ned, as a sudden idea came to him. "It couldn't
be Mr. Damon who had your airship; could it, Tom?"

"I don't know. Why do you ask that?"

"Well, he might have wanted to get away from his enemies for a
while, and he might have taken your Eagle, and--"

"Mr. Damon wouldn't trail along with a crowd like the one that
took away my airship," said Tom, decidedly. "You've got another
guess coming, Ned. Mr. Damon had nothing to do with this."

"And yet the night he disappeared an airship was heard near his
house."

"That's so. Well, I give up. This is sure a mystery. We'll have a
look at it in the morning. One thing I'll do, though, I'll
telephone over to Mr. Damon's house and see if his wife has heard
any news. I've been doing that quite often of late, so she won't
think anything of it. In that way we can find out if he had
anything to do with my airship. But let's run her into the shed
first."

This was done, and Koku, the giant, was sent to sleep in the
hangar to guard against another theft. But it was not likely that
the mysterious men, once having brought the airship back, would
come for it again.

Tom called up Mrs. Damon on the telephone, but there was no news
of the missing man. He expressed his sympathy, and said he would
come and see her soon. He told Mrs. Damon not to get discouraged,
adding that he, and others, were doing all that was possible. But,
in spite of this, Mrs. Damon, naturally, did worry.

The next morning the two chums inspected the airship, so
mysteriously returned to them. Part after part they went over, and
found nothing wrong. The motor ran perfectly, and there was not so
much as a bent spoke in the landing wheels. For all that could be
told by an inspection of the craft she might never have been out
of the hangar.

"Hello, here's something!" cried Tom, as he got up from the
operator's seat, where he had taken his place to test the various
controls.

"What is it?" asked Ned.

"A button. A queer sort of a button. I never had any like that on
my clothes, and I'm sure you didn't. Look!" and Tom held out a
large, metal button of curious design.

"It must have come off the coat of one of the men who had your
airship, Tom," said his chum. "Save it. You may find that it's a
clue."

"I will. No telling what it may lead to. Well, I guess that's all
we can find."

And it was. But Tom little realized what a clue the button was
going to be. Nothing more could be learned by staring at the
returned airship, so he and Ned went back to the house.

Tom Swift had many things to do, but his chief concern was for the
photo telephone. Now that he was near the goal of success he
worked harder than ever. The idea Ned had given him of being able
to take the picture of a person at the instrument--without the
knowledge of that person--appealed strongly to Tom.

"That's going to be a valuable invention!" he declared, but little
he knew how valuable it would prove to him and to others.

It was about a week later when Tom was ready to try the new
apparatus. Meanwhile he had prepared different plates, and had
changed his wiring system. In the days that had passed nothing new
had been learned concerning the whereabouts of Mr. Damon, nor of
the men who had so mysteriously taken away Tom's airship.

All was in readiness for the trial. Tom sent Ned to the booth that
he had constructed in the airship hangar, some distance away from
the house. The other booth Tom had placed in his library, an
entirely new system of wires being used.

"Now Ned," explained Tom, "the idea is this! You go into that
booth, just as if it were a public one, and ring me up in the
regular way. Of course we haven't a central here, but that doesn't
matter. Now while I'm talking to you I want to see you. You don't
know that, of course."

"The point is to see if I can get your picture while you're
talking to me, and not let you know a thing about it."

"Think you can do it, Tom?"

"I'm going to try. We'll soon know. Go ahead."

A little later Ned was calling up his chum, as casually as he
could, under the circumstances.

"All right!" called Tom to his chum. "Start in and talk. Say
anything you like--it doesn't matter. I want to see if I can get
your picture. Is the light burning in your booth?"

"Yes, Tom."

"All right then. Go ahead."

Ned talked of the weather--of anything. Meanwhile Tom was busy.
Concealed in the booth occupied by Ned was a sending plate. It
could not be seen unless one knew just where to look for it. In
Tom's booth was a receiving plate.

The experiment did not take long. Presently Tom called to Ned that
he need stay there no longer.

"Come on to the house," invited the young inventor, "and we'll
develope this plate." For in this system it was necessary to
develope the receiving plate, as is done with an ordinary
photographic one. Tom wanted a permanent record.

Eagerly the chums in the dark room looked down into the tray
containing the plate and the developing solution.

"Something's coming out!" cried Ned, eagerly.

"Yes! And it's you!" exclaimed Tom. "See, Ned, I got your picture
over the telephone. Success! I've struck it! This is the best
yet!"

At that moment, as the picture came out more and more plainly,
someone knocked on the door of the dark room.

"Who is it?" asked Tom.

"Gen'man t' see you," said Eradicate. "He say he come from Mistah
Peters!"

"Mr. Peters--that rascally promoter!" whispered Tom to his chum.
"What does this mean?"





CHAPTER XVII

THE MYSTERIOUS MESSAGE


Tom Swift and his chum looked at one another strangely for a
moment in the dim, red light of the dark room. Then the young
inventor spoke:

"I'm not going to see him. Tell him so, Rad!"

"Hold on a second," suggested Ned. "Maybe you had better see him,
Tom. It may have something to with Mr. Damon's lost fortune."

"That's so! I didn't think of that. And I may get a clue to his
disappearance, though I don't imagine Peters had anything to do
with that. Wait, Rad. Tell the gentleman I'll see him. Did he give
any name, Rad?"

"Yas, sah. Him done say him Mistah Boylan."

"The same man who called to see me once before, trying to get me
to do some business with Peters," murmured Tom. "Very well, I'll
see him as soon as this picture is fixed. Tell him to wait, Rad."

A little later Tom went to where his caller awaited in the
library. This time there were no plans to be looked at, the young
inventor having made a practice of keeping all his valuable papers
locked in a safe.

"You go into the next room, Ned," Tom had said to his chum. "Leave
the door open, so you can hear what is said."

"Why, do you think there'll be trouble? Maybe we'd better have
Koku on hand to--"

"Oh, no, nothing like that," laughed Tom. "I just want you to
listen to what's said so, if need be, you can be a witness later.
I don't know what their game is, but I don't trust Peters and his
crowd. They may want to get control of some of my patents, and
they may try some underhanded work. If they do I want to be in a
position to stop them."

"All right," agreed Ned, and he took his place.

But Mr. Boylan's errand was not at all sensational, it would seem.
He bowed to Tom, perhaps a little distantly, for they had not
parted the best of friends on a former occasion.

"I suppose you are surprised to see me," began Mr. Boylan.

"Well, I am, to tell the truth," Tom said, calmly.

"I am here at the request of my employer, Mr. Peters," went on the
caller. "He says he is forming a new and very powerful company to
exploit airships, and he wants to know whether you would not
reconsider your determination not to let him do some business for
you."

"No, I'm afraid I don't care to go into anything like that," said
Tom.

"It would be a good thing for you," proceeded Mr. Boylan, eagerly.
"Mr. Peters is able to command large capital, and if you would
permit the use of your airships--or one of them--as a model, and
would supervise the construction of others, we could confidently
expect large sales. Thus you would profit, and I am frank to admit
that the company, and Mr. Peters, also, would make money. Mr.
Peters is perfectly free to confess that he is in business to make
money, but he is also willing to let others share with him. Come
now, what do you say?"

"I am sorry, but I shall have to say the same thing I said
before," replied Tom. "Nothing doing!"

Mr. Boylan glanced rather angrily at the young inventor, and then,
with a shrug of his shoulders, remarked:

"Well, you have the say, of course. But I would like to remind you
that this is going to be a very large airship company, and if your
inventions are not exploited some others will be. And Mr. Peters
also desired me to say that this is the last offer he would make
you."

"Tell him," said Tom, "that I am much obliged, but that I have no
business that I can entrust to him. If he wishes to make some
other type of airship, that is his affair. Good-day."

As Mr. Boylan was going out Tom noticed a button dangling from the
back of his caller's coat. It hung by a thread, being one of the
pair usually sewed on the back of a cutaway garment.

"I think you had better take off that button before it falls,"
suggested Tom. "You may lose it, and perhaps it would be hard to
match."

"That's so. Thank you!" said Mr. Boylan. He tried to reach around
and get it, but he was too stout to turn easily, especially as the
coat was tight-fitting.

"I'll get it for you," offered Tom, as he pulled it off. "There is
one missing, though," he said, as he handed the button to the man.
And then Tom started as he saw the pattern of the one in his hand.

"One gone? That's too bad," murmured Mr. Boylan. "Those buttons
were imported, and I doubt if I can replace them. They are rather
odd."

"Yes," agreed Tom, gazing as if fascinated at the one he still
held. "They are rather odd."

And then, as he passed it over, like a flash it came to him where
he had seen a button like that before. He had found it in his
airship, which had been so mysteriously taken away and returned.

Tom could hardly restrain his impatience until Mr. Boylan had
gone. The young inventor had half a notion to produce the other
button, matching the one he had just pulled off his visitor's
coat, and tell where he had found it. But he held himself back. He
wanted to talk first to Ned.

And, when his chum came in, Tom cried:

"Ned, what do you think? I know who had my airship!"

"How?" asked Ned, in wonder.

"By that button clue! Yes, it's the same kind--they're as alike as
twins!" and Tom brought out the button which he had put away in
his desk. "See, Boylan had one just like this on the back of his
coat. The other was missing. Here it is--it was in the seat of my
airship, where it was probably pulled off as he moved about. Ned,
I think I've got the right clue at last."

Ned said nothing for several seconds. Then he remarked slowly:

"Well, Tom, it proves one thing; but not the other."

"What do you mean?"

"I mean that it may be perfectly true that the button came off Mr.
Boylan's coat, but that doesn't prove that he wore it. You can be
reasonably sure that the coat was having a ride in your Eagle, but
was Boylan in the coat? That's the question."

"In the coat? Of course he was in it!" cried Tom.

"You can't be sure. Someone may have borrowed his coat to take a
midnight ride in the airship."

"Mr. Boylan doesn't look to be the kind of a man who would lend
his clothes," remarked Tom.

"You never can tell. Someone may have borrowed it without his
knowledge. You'd better go a bit slow, Tom."

"Well, maybe I had. But it's a clue, anyhow."

Ned agreed to this.

"And all I've got to do is to find out who was in the coat when it
was riding about in my airship," went on Tom.

"Yes," said Ned, "and then maybe you'll have some clue to the
disappearance of Mr. Damon."

"Right you are! Come on, let's get busy!"

"As if we hadn't been busy all the while!" laughed Ned. "I'll lose
my place at the bank if I don't get back soon."

"Oh, stay a little longer--a few days," urged Tom. "I'm sure that
something is going to happen soon. Anyhow my photo telephone is
about perfected. But I've just thought of another improvement."

"What is it?"

"I'm going to arrange a sort of dictaphone, or phonograph, so I
can get a permanent record of what a person says over the wire, as
well as get a picture of him saying it. Then everything will be
complete. This last won't be hard to do, as there are several
machines on the market now, for preserving a record of telephone
conversations. I'll make mine a bit different, though."

"Tom, is there any limit to what you're going to do?" asked Ned,
admiringly.

"Oh, yes, I'm going to stop soon, and retire," laughed the young
inventor.

After talking the matter over, Tom and his chum decided to wait a
day or so before taking any action in regard to the button clue to
the takers of the airship. After all, no great harm had been done,
and Tom was more anxious to locate Mr. Damon, and try to get back
his fortune, as well as to perfect his photo telephone, than he
was to discover those who had helped themselves to the Eagle.

Tom and Ned put in some busy days, arranging the phonograph
attachment. It was easy, compared to the hard work of sending a
picture over the wire. They paid several visits to Mrs. Damon, but
she had no news of her missing husband, and, as the days went by,
she suffered more and more under the strain.

Finally Tom's new invention was fully completed. It was a great
success, and he not only secured pictures of Ned and others over
the wire, as he talked to them, but he imprinted on wax cylinders,
to be reproduced later, the very things they said.

It was a day or so after he had demonstrated his new attachment
for the first time, that Tom received a most urgent message from
Mrs. Damon.

"Tom," she said, over the telephone, "I wish you would call.
Something very mysterious has happened."

"Mr. Damon hasn't come back; has he?" asked Tom eagerly.

"No--but I wish I could say he had. This concerns him, however.
Can you come?"

"I'll be there right away."

In his speedy monoplane Tom soon reached Waterford. Ned did not
accompany him this time.

"Now what is it, Mrs. Damon?" asked the young inventor.

"About half an hour before I called you," she said, "I received a
mysterious message."

"Who brought it?" asked Tom quickly.

"No one. It came over the telephone. Someone, whose voice I did
not know, said to me: 'Sign the land papers, and send them to us,
and your husband will be released.'"

"That message came over the wire?" cried Tom, excitedly.

"Yes," answered Mrs. Damon. "Oh, I am so frightened! I don't know
what to do!" and the lady burst into tears.





CHAPTER XVIII

ANOTHER CALL


Tom Swift, for the moment, did not know what to do. It was a
strange situation, and one he had never thought of. What did the
mysterious message mean? He must think it all out, and plan some
line of action. Clearly Mrs. Damon was not able to do so.

"Now let's get at this in some kind of order," suggested the
youth, when Mrs. Damon had calmed herself. It was his habit to
have a method about doing things. "And don't worry," he advised.
"I am certain some good will come of this. It proves one thing,
that's sure."

"What is it, Tom?"

"That Mr. Damon is alive and well. Otherwise the message would not
have said he would be 'released.' It wasn't from anyone you know;
was it?"

"No, I'm sure I never heard the voice before."

Tom paused a moment to think how useful his photo telephone and
phonograph arrangement might have been in this case.

"How did the telephone call come in?" inquired the young inventor.

"In the usual way," answered Mrs. Damon. "The bell rang, and, as I
happened to be near the instrument, I answered it, as I often do,
when the maid is busy. A voice asked if I was Mrs. Damon, and of
course I said I was. Then I heard this: 'Sign the land papers, and
send them to us, and your husband will be released.'"

"Was that all?" Tom asked.

"I think so--I made a note of it at the time." Mrs. Damon looked
into a small red book. "No, that wasn't all," she said, quickly.
"I was so astonished, at hearing those strange words about my
husband, that I didn't know what to say. Before I could ask any
questions the voice went on to say, rather abruptly: 'We will call
you again.'"

"That's good!" cried Tom. "I only hope they do it while I am here.
Perhaps I can get some clue as to who it was called you. But was
this all you heard?"

"Yes, I'm sure that was all. I had forgotten about the last words,
but I see I have them written down in my note book."

"Did you ask any questions?" inquired Tom.

"Oh, indeed I did! As soon as I got over being stunned by what I
heard, I asked all sorts of questions. I demanded to know who was
speaking, what they meant, where they were, and all that. I begged
them to tell me something of my husband."

"And what did they say?"

"Not a thing. There wasn't a sound in the telephone. The receiver
was hung up, breaking the connection after that message to me--
that mysterious message."

"Yes, it was mysterious," agreed Tom, thoughtfully. "I can't
understand it. But didn't you try to learn from the central
operator where the call had come from?"

"Oh, yes, indeed, Tom! As soon as I found out the person speaking
to me had rung off, I got the girl in the exchange."

"And what did she say?"

"That the call came from an automatic pay station in a drug store
in town. I have the address. It was one of those telephones where
you put your money for the call in a slot."

"I see. Well, the first thing to do is for me to go to that drug
store and find out, if I can, who used the telephone about that
time. It's a slim chance, but we'll have to take it. Was it a
man's voice, or a woman's?"

"Oh, a man's, I'm sure. It was very deep and heavy. No woman could
speak like that."

"So much is settled, anyhow. Now about the land papers--what was
meant?"

"I'll tell you," said Mrs. Damon. "You know part of our property--
considerable land and some buildings--is in my name. Mr. Damon had
it fixed so a number of years ago, in order to protect me. No one
could get this property, and land, unless I signed the deeds, or
agreed to sign them. Now all of Mr. Damon's fortune is tied up in
some of Mr. Peters's companies. That is why my husband has
disappeared."

"He didn't disappear--he was taken away against his will; I'm
positive of that!" exclaimed Tom.

"Perhaps so," agreed Mrs. Damon, sadly. "But those are the papers
referred to, I'm sure."

"Probably," assented Tom. "The rascals want to get control of
everything--even your possessions. Not satisfied with ruining Mr.
Damon, they want to make you a beggar, too. So they are playing on
your fears. They promise to release your husband if you will give
them the land."

"Yes, that must be it, Tom. What would you advise me to do? I am
so frightened over this!"

"Do? Don't you do anything!" cried Tom. "We'll fool these rascals
yet. If they got those papers they might release Mr. Damon, or
they might not--fearing he would cause their arrest later. But
we'll have him released anyhow, and we'll save what is left of
your fortune. Put those land papers in a safe-deposit box, and let
me do the rest. I'm going to catch those fellows!"

"But how, Tom? You don't know who they are. And a mere message
over a telephone won't give you a clue to where they are."

"Perhaps not an ordinary message," agreed Tom. "But I'm going to
try some of my new inventions. You said they told you they were
going to call again?"

"That's what they said, Tom."

"Well, when they do, I want to be here. I want to listen to that
message. If you will allow me, I'll take up my residence here for
a while, Mrs. Damon."

"Allow you? I'll be only too glad if you will, Tom. But I thought
you were going to try to get some clue from the drug store where
the mysterious message came from."

"I'll let Ned Newton do that. I want to stay here."

Tom telephoned to Ned to meet him at Mrs. Damon's house, and also
to bring with him certain things from the laboratory. And when Ned
arrived in an auto, with various bits of apparatus, Tom put in
some busy hours.

Meanwhile Ned was sent to the drug store, to see if any clues
could be obtained there as to who had sent the message. As Tom had
feared, nothing could be learned. There were several automatic
'phones in the place, and they were used very often during the day
by the public. The drug clerks took little or no notice of the
persons entering or leaving the booths, since the dropping of a
coin in the slot was all that was necessary to be connected with
central.

"Well, we've got to wait for the second call here," said Tom, who
had been busy during Ned's absence. He had fitted to Mrs. Damon's
telephone a recording wax phonograph cylinder, to get a record of
the speaker's voice. And he had also put in an extension
telephone, so that he could listen while Mrs. Damon talked to the
unknown.

"There, I guess we're ready for them," said Tom, late that
afternoon. But no queer call came in that day. It was the next
morning. about ten o'clock, after Mrs. Damon had passed a restless
night, that the telephone bell rang. Tom, who was on the alert,
was at his auxiliary instrument in a flash. He motioned to Mrs.
Damon to answer on the main wire.

"Hello," she spoke into the transmitter. "Who is this?"

"Are you Mrs. Damon?" Tom heard come over the wire in a deep
voice, and by the manner in which Mrs. Damon signalled the young
inventor knew that, at the other end of the line, was the
mysterious man who had spoken before.





CHAPTER XIX

THE BUZZING SOUND


"Are you Mrs. Damon?" came the question again--rather more
impatiently this time, Tom thought.

"Yes," answered the lady, glancing over at Tom. The extension
telephone was in the same room. Softly Tom switched on the
phonograph attachment. The little wax cylinder began to revolve
noiselessly, ready to record the faintest word that came over the
wire.

"You got a message from me yesterday," went on the hoarse voice.
In vain Tom tried to recall whether or not he had heard it before.
He could not place it.

"Who are you?" asked Mrs. Damon. She and Tom had previously agreed
on a line of talk. "Tell me your name, please."

"There's no need for any names to be used," went on the unknown at
the other end of the wire. "You heard what I said yesterday. Are
you willing to send me those land title papers, if we release your
husband?"

"But where shall I send them?" asked Mrs. Damon, to gain time.

"You'll be told where. And listen--no tricks! You needn't try to
find out who I am, nor where I am. Just send those papers if you
want to see your husband again."

"Oh, how is he? Tell me about him! You are cruel to keep him a
prisoner like this! I demand that you release him!"

Tom had not told Mrs. Damon to say this. It came out of her own
heart--she could not prevent the agonized outburst.

"Never mind about that, now," came the gruff voice over the wire.
"Are you willing to send the papers?"

Mrs. Damon looked over to Tom for silent instructions. He nodded
his head in assent.

"Yes, I--I will send them if you tell me where to get them to you
--if you will release Mr. Damon," said the anxious wife. "But tell
me who you are--and where you are!" she begged.

"None of that! I'm not looking to be arrested. You get the papers
ready, and I'll let you know to-morrow, about this time, where to
send them."

"Wait a minute!" called Mrs. Damon, to gain more time. "I must
know just what papers you want."

"All right, I'll tell you," and he began to describe the different
ones.

It took a little time for the unknown to give this information to
Mrs. Damon. The man was very particular about the papers. There
were trust deeds, among other things, and he probably thought that
once he had possession of them, with Mrs. Damon's signature, even
though it had been obtained under a threat, he could claim the
property. Later it was learned that such was not the case, for
Mrs. Damon, with Tom's aid, could have proved the fraud, had the
scoundrels tried to get the remainder of the Damon fortune.

But at the time it seemed to the helpless woman that everything
she owned would be taken from her. Though she said she did not
care, as long as Mr. Damon was restored to her.

As I have said, the telephoning of the instructions about the
papers took some time. Tom had counted on this, and had made his
plans accordingly.

As soon as the telephone call had come in, Tom had communicated
with a private detective who was in waiting, and this man had gone
to the drug store whence the first call had come. He was going to
try to make the arrest of the man telephoning.

But for fear the scoundrel would go to a different instrument, Tom
took another precaution. This was to have one of the operators in
the central exchange on the watch. As soon as Mrs. Damon's house
was in connection with another telephone, the location of the
latter would be noted, and another private detective would be sent
there. Thus Tom hoped to catch the man at the 'phone.

Meanwhile Tom listened to the hoarse voice at the other end of the
wire, giving the directions to Mrs. Damon. Tom hoped that soon
there would be an arrest made.

Meanwhile the talk was being faithfully recorded on the phonograph
cylinder. And, as the man talked on, Tom became aware of a curious
undercurrent of sound. It was a buzzing noise, that Tom knew did
not come from the instrument itself. It was not the peculiar
tapping, singing noise heard in a telephone receiver, caused by
induced electrical currents, or by wire trouble.

"This is certainly different," mused Tom. He was trying to recall
where he had heard the noise before. Sometimes it was faint, and
then it would gradually increase, droning off into faintness once
more. Occasionally it was so loud that Mrs. Damon could not hear
the talk about the papers, and the man would have to repeat.

But finally he came to an end.

"This is all now," he said, sharply. Tom heard the words above the
queer, buzzing, humming sound. "You are keeping me too long. I
think you are up to some game, but it won't do you any good, Mrs.
Damon. I'll 'phone you to-morrow where to send the papers. And if
you don't send them--if you try any tricks--it will be the worse
for you and Mr. Damon!"

There was a click, that told of a receiver being placed back on
the hook, and the voice ceased. So, also, did the queer, buzzing
sound over which Tom puzzled.

"What can it have been?" he asked. "Did you hear it, Mrs. Damon?"

"What, Tom?"

"That buzzing sound."

"Yes, I heard, but I didn't know what it was. Oh, Tom, what shall
I do?"

"Don't worry. We'll see if anything happened. They may have caught
that fellow. If not I'll plan another scheme."

Tom's first act was to call up the telephone exchange to learn
where the second call had come from. He got the information at
once. The address was in the suburbs. The man had not gone to the
drug store this time.

"Did the detective get out to that address?" asked Tom eagerly of
the manager.

"Yes. As soon as we were certain that he was the party you wanted,
your man got right after him, Mr. Swift."

"That's good, I hope he catches him!" cried the young inventor. "We'll
have to wait and find out."

"He said he'd call up and let you know as soon as he reached the
place," the telephone manager informed Tom.

There was nothing to do but wait, and meanwhile Tom did what he
could to comfort Mrs. Damon. She was quite nervous and inclined to
be hysterical, and the youth thought it wise to have a cousin, who
had come to stay with her, summon the doctor.

"But, Tom, what shall I do about those papers?" Mrs. Damon asked
him. "Shall I send them?"

"Indeed not!"

"But I want Mr. Damon restored to me," she pleaded. "I don't care
about the money. He can make more."

"Well, we'll not give those scoundrels the satisfaction of getting
any money out of you. Just wait now, I'll work this thing out, and
find a way to catch that fellow. If I could only think what that
buzzing sound was--"

Then, in a flash, it came to Tom.

"A sawmill! A planing mill!" he cried. "That's what it was! That
fellow was telephoning from some place near a sawmill!"

The telephone rang in the midst of Tom's excited comments.

"Yes--yes!" he called eagerly. "Who is it--what is it?"

"This is Larsen--the private detective you sent."

"Oh, yes, you were at the drug store."

"Yes, Mr. Swift. Well, that party didn't call up from here."

"I know, Larsen. It was from another station. We're after him.
Much obliged to you. Come on back."

Tom was sure his theory was right. The man had called up the Damon
house from some telephone near a sawmill. And a little later Tom's
theory was proved to be true. He got a report from the second
detective. Unfortunately the man had not been able to reach the
telephone station before the unknown speaker had departed.

"Was the place near a sawmill?" asked Tom, eagerly.

"It was," answered the detective over the wire. "The telephone is
right next door to one. It's an automatic pay station and no one
seems to have noticed who the man was who telephoned. I couldn't
get a single clue. I'm sorry."

"Never mind," said Tom, as cheerfully as he could. "I think I'm on
the right track now. I'm going to lay a trap for this fellow."





CHAPTER XX

SETTING THE TRAP


Troublesome problems seemed to be multiplying for Tom Swift. He
admitted as much himself after the failure to capture the man who
had telephoned to Mrs. Damon. He had hoped that his plan of
sending detectives to the location of the telephones would
succeed. Since it had not the youth must try other means.

"Now, Ned," he said to his chum, when they were on their way from
Mrs. Damon's, it being impossible to do anything further there.
"Now, Ned, we've got to think this thing out together."

"I'm willing, Tom. I'll do what I can."

"I know you will. Now the thing to do is to go at this thing
systematically. Otherwise we'll be working around in a circle, and
won't get anywhere. In the first place, let's set down what we do
know. Then we'll put down what we don't know, and go after that."

"Put down what you don't know?" exclaimed Ned. "How are you going
to put down a thing when you don't know it?"

"I mean we can put a question mark after it, so to speak. For
instance we don't know where Mr. Damon is, but we want to find
out."

"Oh, I see. Well, let's start off with the things we do know."

The two friends were at Tom's house by now, having come from
Waterford in Tom's airship. After thinking over all the exciting
happenings of the past few days, Tom remarked: "Now, Ned, for the
things we do know. In the first place Mr. Damon is missing, and
his fortune is about gone. There is considerable left to Mrs.
Damon, however, but those scoundrels may get that away from her,
if we don't watch out. Secondly, my airship was taken and brought
back, with a button more than it had when it went away. Said
button exactly matched one off Mr. Boylan's coat."

"Thirdly, Mr. Damon was either taken away or went away, in an
airship--either in mine or someone else's. Fourthly, Mrs. Damon
has received telephonic communications from the man, or men, who
have her husband. Fifthly, Mr. Peters, either legally or
illegally, is responsible for the loss of Mr. Damon's fortune.
Now: there you are--for the things we do know."

"Now for the things we don't know. We don't know who has taken
Mr. Damon away, nor where he is, to begin with the most important."

"Hold on, Tom, I think you're wrong," broke in Ned.

"In what way?"

"About not knowing who is responsible for the taking away of Mr.
Damon. I think it's as plain as the nose on your face that Peters
is responsible."

"I can't see it that way," said Tom, quickly. "I will admit that
it looks as though Boylan had been in my airship, but as for
Peters taking Mr. Damon away--why, Peters is around town all the
while, and if he had a hand in the disappearance of Mr. Damon, do
you think he'd stay here, when he knows we are working on the
case? And would he send Boylan to see me if Boylan had been one of
those who had a hand in it? They wouldn't dare, especially as they
know I'm working on the case."

"Peters is a bad lot. I'll grant you, though, he was fair enough
to pay for my motor boat. I don't believe he had anything to do
with taking Mr. Damon away."

"Do you think he was the person who was talking to Mrs. Damon
about the papers?"

"No, Ned. I don't. I listened to that fellow's voice carefully. It
wasn't like Peters's. I'm going to put it in the phonograph, too,
and let you listen to it. Then see what you say."

Tom did this, a little later. The record of the voice, as it came
over the wire, was listened to from the wax cylinder, and Ned had
to admit that it was not much like that of the promoter.

"Well, what's next to be done?" asked the young banker.

"I'm going to set a trap," replied Tom, with a grin.

"Set a trap?"

"Yes, a sort of mouse-trap. I'm glad my photo telephone is now
perfected, Ned."

"What has that got to do with it?"

"That's going to be my trap, Ned. Here is my game. You know this
fellow--this strange unknown--is going to call up Mrs. Damon
to-morrow. Well, I'll be ready for him. I'm going to put in the booth
where he will telephone from, one of my photo telephones--that is, the
sending apparatus. In Mrs. Damon's house, attached to her telephone,
will be the receiving plate, as well as the phonograph cylinder."

"When this fellow starts to talk he'll be sending us his picture,
though he won't know it, and we'll be getting a record of his
voice. Then we'll have him just where we want him."

"Good!" cried Ned. "But, Tom, there's a weak spot in your mouse-
trap."

"What is it?"

"How are you going to know which telephone the unknown will call
up from? He may go to any of a hundred, more or less."

"He might--yes. But that's a chance we've got to take. It isn't so
much of a chance, though when you stop to think that he will
probably go to some public telephone in an isolated spot, and,
unless I'm much mistaken he will go to a telephone near where he
was to-day. He knows that was safe, since we didn't capture him,
and he's very likely to come back."

"But to make the thing as sure as possible, I'm going to attach my
apparatus to a number of public telephones in the vicinity of the
one near the sawmill. So if the fellow doesn't get caught in one,
he will in another. I admit it's taking a chance; but what else
can we do?"

"I suppose you're right, Tom. It's like setting a number of
traps."

"Exactly. A trapper can't be sure where he is going to get his
catch, so he picks out the place, or run-way, where the game has
been in the habit of coming. He hides his traps about that place,
and trusts to luck that the animal will blunder into one of them."

"Criminals, to my way of thinking, are a good bit like animals.
They seem to come back to their old haunts. Nearly any police
story proves this. And it's that on which I am counting to capture
this criminal. So I'm going to fit up as many telephones with my
photo and phonograph outfit, as I can in the time we have. You'll
have to help me. Luckily I've got plenty of selenium plates for
the sending end. I'll only need one at the receiving end. Now
we'll have to go and have a talk with the telephone manager, after
which we'll get busy."

"You've overlooked one thing, Tom."

"What's that, Ned?"

"Why, if you know about which telephone this fellow is going to
use, why can't you have police stationed near it to capture him as
soon as he begins to talk?"

"Well, I did think of that, Ned; but it won't work."

"Why not?"

"Because, in the first place this man, or some of his friends,
will be on the watch. When he goes into the place to telephone
there'll be a look-out, I'm sure, and he'd either put off talking
to Mrs. Damon, or he'd escape before we had any evidence against
him."

"You see I've got to get evidence that will stand in the courts to
convict this fellow, and if he's scared off before we get that,
the game will be up."

"That's what my photo telephone will do--it will get the evidence,
just as a dictaphone does. In fact, I'm thinking of working it out
on those lines, after I clear up this business."

"Just suppose we had detectives stationed at all the telephones
near the sawmill, where this fellow would be likely to go. In the
first place no one has seen him, as far as we know, so there's no
telling what sort of a chap he is. And you can't go up to a
perfect stranger and arrest him because you think he is the man
who has spirited away Mr. Damon."

"Another thing. Until this fellow has talked, and made his offer
to Mrs. Damon, to restore her husband, in exchange for certain
papers, we have no hold over him."

"But he has done that, Tom. You heard him, and you have his voice
down on the wax cylinder."

"Yes, but I haven't had a glimpse of his face. That's what I want,
and what I'm going to get. Suppose he does go into the telephone
booth, and tell Mrs. Damon an address where she is to send the
papers. Even if a detective was near at hand he might not catch
what was said. Or, if he did, on what ground could he arrest a man
who, very likely, would be a perfect stranger to him? The
detective couldn't say: 'I take you into custody for telephoning
an address to Mrs. Damon.' That, in itself, is no crime."

"No, I suppose not," admitted Ned. "You've got this all thought
out, Tom."

"I hope I have. You see it takes quite a combination to get
evidence against a criminal--evidence that will convict him.
That's why I have to be so careful in setting my trap."

"I see, Tom. Well, it's about time for us to get busy; isn't it?"

"It sure is. There's lots to do. First we'll go see the telephone
people."

Tom explained to the 'phone manager the necessity for what he was
about to do. The manager at once agreed to let the young inventor
have a free hand. He was much interested in the photo telephone,
and Tom promised to give his company a chance to use it on their
lines, later.

The telephone near the sawmill was easily located. It was in a
general store, and the instrument was in a booth. To this
instrument Tom attached his sending plate, and he also substituted
for the ordinary incandescent light, a powerful tungsten one, that
would give illumination enough to cause the likeness to be
transmitted over the wire.

The same thing was done to a number of the public telephones in
that vicinity, each one being fitted up so that the picture of
whoever talked would be transmitted over the wire when Tom turned
the switch. To help the plan further the telephone manager marked
a number of other 'phones, "Out of Order," for the time being.

"Now, I think we're done!" exclaimed the young inventor, with a
sigh, late that night. He and Ned and the line manager had worked
hard.

"Yes," answered the young banker, "the traps are set. The question
is: Will our rat be caught?"





CHAPTER XXI

THE PHOTO TELEPHONE


Tom Swift was taking, as he afterward confessed, "a mighty big
chance." But it seemed the only way. He was working against
cunning men, and had to be as cunning as they.

True, the man he hoped to capture, through the combination of his
photo telephone and the phonograph, might go to some other
instrument than one of those Tom had adjusted. But this could not
be helped. In all he had put his new attachment on eight 'phones
in the vicinity of the sawmill. So he had eight chances in his
favor, and as many against him as there were other telephones in
use.

"It's a mighty small margin in our favor," sighed Tom.

"It sure is," agreed Ned. They were at Mrs., Damon's house,
waiting for the call to come in.

"But we couldn't do anything else," went on Tom.

"No," spoke Ned, "and I have a great deal of hope in the
proverbial Swift luck, Tom."

"Well, I only hope it holds good this time!" laughed the young
inventor.

"There are a good many things that can go wrong," observed Ned.
"The least little slip-up may spoil your traps, Tom."

"I know it, Ned. But I've got to take the chance. We've just got
to do something for Mrs. Damon. She's wearing herself out by
worrying," he added in a low voice, for indeed the wife of his
friend felt the absence of her husband greatly. She had lost
flesh, she ate scarcely anything, and her nights were wakeful ones
of terror.

"What if this fails?" asked Ned.

"Then I'm going to work that button clue to the limit," replied
Tom. "I'll go to Boylan and see what he and Peters have to say."

"If you'd done as I suggested you'd have gone to them first,"
spoke Ned. "You'll find they're mixed up in this."

"Maybe; but I doubt it. I tell you there isn't a clue leading to
Peters--as yet."

"But there will be," insisted Ned. "You'll see that that I'm right
this time."

"I can't see it, Ned. As a matter of fact, I would have gone to
Boylan about that button I found in my airship only I've been so
busy on this photo telephone, and in arranging the trap, that I
haven't had time. But if this fails--and I'm hoping it won't--I'll
get after him," and there was a grim look on the young inventor's
face.

It was wearying and nervous work--this waiting. Tom and Ned felt
the strain as they sat there in Mrs. Damon's library, near the
telephone. It had been fitted up in readiness. Attached to the
receiving wires was a sensitive plate, on which Tom hoped would be
imprinted the image of the man at the other end of the wire--the
criminal who, in exchange for the valuable land papers, would give
Mr. Damon his liberty.

There was also the phonograph cylinder to record the man's voice.
Several times, while waiting for the call to come in, Tom got up
to test the apparatus. It was in perfect working order.

As before, there was an extension telephone, so that Mrs. Damon
could talk to the unknown, while Tom could hear as well. But he
planned to take no part in the conversation unless something
unforeseen occurred.

Mr. Damon was an enthusiastic photographer, and he had a dark room
adjoining his library. It was in this dark room that Tom planned
to develop the photo telephone plate.

On this occasion he was not going to use the metal plate in which,
ordinarily, the image of the person talking appeared. That record
was but a fleeting one, as in a mirror. This time Tom wanted a
permanent picture that could, if necessary, be used in a court of
justice.

Tom's plan was this: If the person who had demanded the papers
came to one of the photo telephones, and spoke to Mrs. Damon, Tom
would switch on the receiving apparatus. Thus, while the man was
talking, his picture would be taken, though he would not know of
the thing being done.

His voice would also be recorded on the wax cylinder, and he would
be equally unaware of this.

When Tom had imprinted the fellow's image on the prepared plate,
he would go quickly to the dark room and develop it. A wet print
could be made, and with this as evidence, and to use in
identification, a quick trip could be made to the place whence the
man had telephoned. Tom hoped thus to capture him.

To this end he had his airship in waiting, and as soon as he had
developed the picture he planned to rush off to the vicinity of
the sawmill, and make a prisoner of the man whose features would
be revealed to him over the wire.

It was a hazardous plan--a risky one--but it was the best that he
could evolve. Tom had instructed Mrs. Damon to keep the man in
conversation as long as possible, in order to give the young
inventor himself time to rush off in his airship. But of course
the man might get suspicious and leave. That was another chance
that had to be taken.

"If I had thought of it in time," said Tom, musingly, as he paced
up and down in the library waiting for the 'phone to ring, "if I
had thought of it in time I would have rigged up two plates--one
for a temporary, or looking-glass, picture, and the other for a
permanent one. In that way I could rush off as soon as I got a
glimpse of the fellow. But it's too late to do that now. I'll have
to develop this plate."

Waiting is the most wearisome work there is. Tom and Ned found
this to be the case, as they sat there, hoping each moment that
the telephone bell would ring, and that the man at the other end
of the wire would be the mysterious stranger. Mrs. Damon, too,
felt the nervous strain.

"This is about the hour he called up yesterday," said Tom, in a
low voice, after coming back from a trip to the window to see that
his airship was in readiness. He had brought over to help in
starting it, for he was using his most powerful and speedy craft,
and the propellers were hard to turn.

"Yes," answered Mrs. Damon. "It was just about this hour, Tom. Oh,
I do hope--"

She was interrupted by the jingle of the telephone bell. With a
jump Tom was at the auxiliary instrument, while Mrs. Damon lifted
off the receiver of her own telephone.

"Yes; what is it?" she asked, in a voice that she tried to make
calm.

"Do you know who this is?" Tom heard come over the wire.

"Are you the--er--the person who was to give me an address where I
am to send certain papers?"

"Yes. I'm the same one. I'm glad to see that you have acted
sensibly. If I get the papers all right, you'll soon have your
husband back. Now do as I say. Take down this address."

"Very well," assented Mrs. Damon. She looked over at Tom. He was
intently listening, and he, too, would note the address given. The
trap was about to be sprung. The game had walked into it. Just
which telephone was being used Tom could not as yet tell. It was
evidently not the one nearest the planing mill, for Tom could not
hear the buzzing sound. It was well he had put his attachment on
several instruments.

"One moment, please," said Mrs. Damon, to the unknown at the other
end of the wire. This was in accordance with the pre-arranged
plan.

"Well, what is it?" asked the man, impatiently. "I have no time to
waste."

Tom heard again the same gruff tones, and he tried in vain to
recognize them.

"I want you take down a message to Mr. Damon," said his wife.
"This is very important. It can do you no harm to give him this
message; but I want you to get it exact. If you do not promise to
deliver it I shall call all negotiations off."

"Oh, all right I'll take the message; but be quick about it. Then
I'll give you the address where you are to send the papers."

"This is the message," went on Mrs. Damon. "Please write it down.
It is very important to me. Have you a pencil?"

"Yes, I have one. Wait until I get a bit of paper. It's so dark in
this booth--wait until I turn on the light."

Tom could not repress a pleased and joyful exclamation. It was
just what he had hoped the man would do--turn on the light in the
booth. Indeed, it was necessary for the success of the trap that
the light be switched on. Otherwise no picture could be
transmitted over the wire. And the plan of having the man write
down a message to Mr. Damon was arranged with that end in view.
The man would need a light to see to write, and Tom's apparatus
must be lighted in order to make it work. The plot was coming
along finely.

"There!" exclaimed the man at the other end of the wire. "I have a
light now. Go ahead with your message, Mrs. Damon. But make it
short. I can't stay here long."

Then Mrs. Damon began dictating the message she and Tom had agreed
upon. It was as long as they dared make it, for they wanted to
keep the man in the booth to the last second.

"Dear Husband," began Mrs. Damon. What the message was does not
matter. It has nothing to do with this story. Sufficient to say
that the moment the man began writing it down, as Tom could tell
over the sensitive wire, by the scratching of the pencil--at that
moment Tom, knowing the light was on in the distant telephone
booth, switched on the picture-taking apparatus. His receiving
apparatus at once indicated that the image was being made on the
sensitive plate.

It took only a few seconds of time, and with the plate in the
holder Tom hastened to the dark room to develop it. Ned took his
chum's place at the telephone, to see that all worked smoothly.
The photo telephone had done it's work. Whose image would be found
imprinted on the sensitive plate? Tom's hands trembled so that he
could scarcely put it in the developing solution.





CHAPTER XXII

THE ESCAPE


Ned Newton, listening at the auxiliary telephone heard the man, to
whom Mrs. Damon was dictating her message to her husband, utter an
exclamation of impatience.

"I'm afraid I can't take down any more," he called. "That is
enough. Now you listen. I want you to send me those papers."

"And I am willing to," went on Mrs. Damon, while Ned listened to
the talk, the phonograph faithfully recording it.

"I wonder whose picture Tom will find," mused Ned.

The unknown, at the other end of the wire, began giving Mrs. Damon
a description of just what papers he wanted, and how to mail them
to him. He gave an address that Ned recognized as that of a cigar
store, where many persons received their mail under assumed names.
The postal authorities had, for a long time, tried to get evidence
against it

"That's going to make it hard to get him, when he comes for the
papers," thought Ned. "He's a foxy criminal, all right. But I
guess Tom will turn the trick."

Mrs. Damon was carefully noting down the address. She really
intended to send the papers, if it proved that there was no other
way in which she could secure the release of her husband. But she
did not count on all of Tom's plans. "Why doesn't he develop that
plate?" thought Ned. "He'll be too late, in spite of his airship.
That fellow will skip."

It was at that moment that Tom came into the library. He moved
cautiously, for he realized that a loud sound in the room would
carry to the man at the other end of the wire. Tom motioned for
Ned to come to him. He held out a dripping photographic plate.

"It's Peters!" said Tom, in a hoarse whisper.

"Peters?" gasped Ned. "How could it be? His voice--"

"I know. It didn't sound a bit like Peters over the 'phone, but
there's his picture, all right!"

Tom held up the plate. There, imprinted on it by the wonderful
power of the young inventor's latest appliance, was the image of
the rascally promoter. As plainly as in life he was shown, even to
his silk hat and the flower in his button-hole. He was in a
telephone booth--that much could be told from the photograph that
had been transmitted over the wire, but which booth could not be
said--they were nearly all alike.

"Peters!" gasped Ned. "I thought he was the fellow, Tom."

"Yes, I know. You were right, and I was wrong. But I did not
recognize his voice. It was very hoarse. He must have a bad cold."
Later this was learned to have been the case. "There's no time to
lose," whispered Tom, while Mrs. Damon was doing her best to
prolong the conversation in order to hold the man at the other end
of the wire. "Ned, get central on the other telephone, and see
where this call came from. Then we'll get there as fast as the
airship will take us."

A second and temporary telephone line had been installed in the
Damon home, and on this Ned was soon talking, while Tom, putting
the photographic plate away for future use, rushed out to get his
airship in shape for a quick flight. He had modified his plans.
Instead of having a detective take a print of the photo telephone
image, and make the arrest, Tom was going to try to capture Peters
himself. He believed he could do it. One look at the wet plate was
enough. He knew Peters, though it upset some of his theories to
learn that it was the promoter who was responsible for Mr. Damon's
disappearance.

The man at the other end of the wire was evidently getting
impatient. Possibly he suspected some trick. "I've got to go now,"
he called to Mrs. Damon. "If I don't get those papers in the
morning it will be the worse for Mr. Damon."

"Oh, I'll send you the papers," she said.

By this time Ned had gotten into communication with the manager of
the central telephone exchange, and had learned the location of
the instrument Peters was using. It was about a mile from the one
near the sawmill.

"Come on!" called Tom to his chum, as the latter gave him this
information. "The Firefly is tuned up for a hundred miles an hour!
We'll be there in ten minutes! We must catch him red-handed, if
possible!"

"He's gone!" gasped Mrs. Damon as she came to the outer door, and
watched Tom and Ned taking their places in the airship, while Koku
prepared to twirl the propellers.

"Gone!" echoed Tom, blankly.

"Yes, he hung up the receiver."

"See if you can't get him back," suggested the young inventor.
"Ask Central to ring that number again. We'll be there in a jiffy.
Maybe he'll come to the telephone again. Or he may even call up
his partners and tell them the game is working his way. Try to get
him back, Mrs. Damon."

"I will," she said.

And, as she hurried back to the instrument, Tom and Ned shot up
toward the blue sky in an endeavor to capture the man at the other
telephone.

"And to think it was Peters!" cried Tom into Ned's ear, shouting
to be heard above the roar of the motor exhaust.

"I thought he'd turn out to be mixed up in the affair," said Ned.

"Well, you were right. I was off, that time," admitted Tom, as he
guided his powerful craft above the trees. "I was willing to admit
that he had something to do with Mr. Damon's financial trouble,
but as for kidnapping him--well, you never can tell."

They drove on at a breath-catching pace, and it seemed hardly a
minute after leaving Mrs. Damon's house before Tom called:

"There's the building where the telephone is located."

"And now for that rascal Peters!" cried Ned.

The airship swooped down, to the great astonishment of some
workmen nearby.

Hardly had the wheels ceased revolving on the ground, as Tom made
a quick landing, than he was out of his seat, and running toward
the telephone. He knew the place at once from having heard Ned's
description, and besides, this was one of the places where he had
installed his apparatus.

Into the store Tom burst, and made a rush for the 'phone booth. He
threw open the door. The place was empty!

"The man--the man who was telephoning!" Tom called to the
proprietor of the place.

"You mean that big man, with the tall hat, who was in there so
long?"

"Yes, where is he?"

"Gone. About two minutes ago."

"Which way?"

"Over toward Shopton, and in one of the fastest autos that ever
scattered dust in this section."

"He's escaped us!" said Tom to Ned. "But we'll get him yet! Come
on!"

"I'm with you. Say, do you know what this looks like to me?"

"What?"

"It looks as if Peters was scared and was going to run away to
stay!"





CHAPTER XXIII

ON THE TRAIL


Such a crowd had quickly gathered about Tom's airship that it was
impossible to start it. Men and boys, and even some girls and
women, coming from no one knew where, stood about the machine,
making wondering remarks about it.

"Stand back, if you please!" cried Tom, good-naturedly. "We've
got to get after the fellow in the auto."

"You'll have hard work catching him, friend, in that rig,"
remarked a man. "He was fracturing all the speed laws ever passed.
I reckon he was going nigh onto sixty miles an hour."

"We can make a hundred," spoke Ned, quietly.

"A hundred! Get out!" cried the man. "Nothing can go as fast as
that!"

"We'll show you, if we once get started," said Tom. "I guess we'll
have to get one of these fellows to twirl the propellers for us,
Ned," he added. "I didn't think, or I'd have brought the self-
starting machine," for this one of Tom's had to be started by
someone turning over the propellers, once or twice, to enable the
motor to begin to speed. On some of his aircraft the young
inventor had attached a starter, something like the ones on the
newest autos.

"What are you going to do?" asked Ned, as Tom looked to the
priming of the cylinders.

"I'm going to get on the trail of Peters," he said. "He's at the
bottom of the whole business; and it's a surprise to me. I'm going
to trail him right down to the ground now, and make him give up
Mr. Damon and his fortune,"

"But you don't know where he is, Tom."

"I'll find out. He isn't such an easy man to miss--he's too
conspicuous. Besides, if he's just left in his auto we may catch
him before he gets to Shopton."

"Do you think he's going there?"

"I think so. And I think, Ned, that he's become suspicious and
will light out. Something must have happened, while he was
telephoning, and he got frightened, as big a bluff as he is. But
we'll get him. Come on! Will you turn over the propellers, please?
I'll show you how to do it," Tom went on to a big, strong man
standing close to the blades.

"Sure I'll do it," was the answer. "I was a helper once at an
airship meet, and I know how."

"Get back out of the way in time," the young inventor warned him.
"They start very suddenly, sometimes."

"All right, friend, I'll watch out," was the reply, and with Tom
and Ned in their seats, the former at the steering wheel, the
craft of the air was soon throbbing and trembling under the first
turn, for the cylinders were still warm from the run from Mrs.
Damon's house.

The telephone was in an outlying section of Waterford--a section
devoted in the main to shops and factories, and the homes of those
employed in various lines of manufacture. Peters had chosen his
place well, for there were many roads leading to and from this
section, and he could easily make his escape.

"But we'll get after him," thought Tom, grimly, as he let the
airship run down the straight road a short distance on the bicycle
wheels, to give it momentum enough so that it would rise.

Then, with the tilting of the elevation rudder, the craft rose
gracefully, amid admiring cheers from the crowd. Tom did not go up
very far, as he wanted to hover near the ground, to pick out the
speeding auto containing Peters.

But this time luck was not with Tom. He and Ned did sight a number
of cars speeding along the highway toward Shopton, but when they
got near enough to observe the occupants they were disappointed
not to behold the man they sought. Tom circled about for some
time, but it was of no use, and then he headed his craft back
toward Waterford.

"Where are you going?" asked Ned, yelling the words into the ear
of his chum.

"Back to Mrs. Damon's," answered Tom, in equally loud tones.

It was impossible to talk above the roaring and throbbing of the
motor, so the two lads kept silent until the airship had landed
near Mrs. Damon's home.

"I want to see if Mrs. Damon is all right," Tom explained, as he
jumped from the still moving machine. "Then we'll go to Shopton,
and cause Peters's arrest. I can make a charge against him now,
and the evidence of the photo telephone will convict him, I'm
sure. And I also want to see if Mrs. Damon has had any other
word."

She had not, however, though she was more nervous and worried than
ever.

"Oh, Tom, what shall I do?" she exclaimed. "I am so frightened!
What do you suppose they will do to Mr. Damon?"

"Nothing at all!" Tom assured her. "He will be all right. I think
matters are coming to a crisis now, and very likely he'll be with
you inside of twenty-four hours. The game is up, and I guess
Peters knows it. I'm going to have him arrested at once."

"Shall I send those land papers, Tom?"

"Indeed you must not! But I'll talk to you about that later. Just
put away that phonograph record of Peters's talk. I'll take along
the photo telephone negative, and have some prints made--or, I
guess, since we're going in the airship, that I'd better leave it
here for the present. We'll use it as evidence against Peters.
Come on, Ned."

"Where to now?"

"Peters's house. He's probably there, arranging to cover up his
tracks when he lights out."

But Shallock Peters did better than merely cover up his tracks. He
covered himself up, so to speak. For when Ned and Tom, after a
quick flight in the airship, reached his house, the promoter had
left, and the servants, who were quite excited, did not know where
he had gone.

"He just packed up a few clothes and ran out," said one of the
maids. "He didn't say anything about our wages, either, and he
owes me over a month."

"Me too," said another.

"Well, if he doesn't pay me some of my back wages soon, I'll sue
him!" declared the gardener. "He owes me more than three months,
but he kept putting me off."

And, so it seemed, Peters had done with several of his employes.
When the promoter came to Shopton he had taken an elaborate house
and engaged a staff of servants. Peters was not married, but he
gave a number of entertainments to which the wealthy men of
Shopton and their wives came. Later it was found that the bills
for these had never been paid. In short, Peters was a "bluff" in
more ways than one.

Tom told enough of his story to the servants to get them on his
side. Indeed, now that their employer had gone, and under such
queer circumstances, they had no sympathy for him. They were only
concerned about their own money, and Tom was given admittance to
the house.

Tom made a casual search, hoping to find some clue to the
whereabouts of Mr. Damon, or to get some papers that would save
his fortune. But the search was unsuccessful.

There was a safe in the room Peters used for an office, but when
Tom got there the strong box was open, and only some worthless
documents remained.

"He smelled a rat, all right," said Tom, grimly. "After he
telephoned to Mrs. Damon something happened that gave him an
intimation that someone was after him. So he got away as soon as
he could."

"But what are you going to do about it, Tom?"

"Get right after him. He can't have gotten very far. I want him
and I want Boylan. We're getting close to the end of the trail,
Ned."

"Yes, but we haven't found Mr. Damon yet, and his fortune seems to
have vanished."

"Well, we'll do the best we can," said Tom, grimly. "Now I'm going
to get a warrant for the arrest of Peters, and one for Boylan, and
I'm going to get myself appointed a special officer with power to
serve them. We've got our work cut out for us, Ned."

"Well, I'm with you to the end."

"I know you are!" cried Tom.





CHAPTER XXIV

THE LONELY HOUSE


The young inventor had little difficulty in getting the warrants
he sought. In the case of Boylan, who seemed to be Peters's right-
hand man, when it came to criminal work, Tom made a charge of
unlawfully taking the airship. This would be enough to hold the
man on until other evidence could be obtained against him.

As for Peters, he was accused of taking certain valuable bonds and
stocks belonging to Mr. Damon. Mrs. Damon gave the necessary
evidence in this case, and the authorities were told that later,
when Peters should have been arrested, other evidence so
skillfully gotten by Tom's photo telephone, would be brought
before the court.

"It's a new way of convicting a man--by a photo telephone--but I
guess it's a good one," said the judge who signed the warrants.

"Well, now that we've got what we want, the next thing to do is to
get the men--Peters, and the others," said Tom, as he and Ned sat
in Tom's library after several hours of strenuous work.

"How are you going to start?" the young banker wanted to know. "It
seems a strange thing that a man like Mr. Damon could be made away
with, and kept in hiding so long without something being heard of
him. I'm afraid, Tom, that something must have happened to him."

"I think so too, Ned. Nothing serious, though," Tom added,
quickly, as he saw the look of alarm on his chum's face. "I think
Mr. Damon at first went away of his own accord."

"Of his own accord?"

"Yes. I think Peters induced him to go with him, on the pretense
that he could recover his fortune. After getting Mr. Damon in
their power they kept him, probably to get the rest of his fortune
away from him."

"But you stopped that, Tom," said Ned, proud of his chum's
abilities.

"Well, I hope so," admitted the young inventor. "But I've still
got plenty to do."

"Have you a starting point?"

"For one thing," Tom answered, "I'm going to have Mrs. Damon mail
a fake package to the address Peters gave. If he, or any of his
men, call for it, we'll have a detective on the watch, and arrest
them."

"Good!"

"Of course it may not work," spoke Tom; "but it's something to
try, and we can't miss any chances."

Accordingly, the next day, a package containing only blank paper,
made up to represent the documents demanded by Peters as the price
of releasing Mr. Damon, was mailed to the address Mrs. Damon had
received over the wire from the rascally promoter. Then a private
detective was engaged to be on the watch, to take into custody
whoever called for the bundle. Tom, though, had not much hope of
anything coming of this, as it was evident that Peters had taken
the alarm, and left.

"And now," said Tom, when he had safely put away the wax record,
containing the incriminating talk of Peters, and had printed
several photographs, so wonderfully taken over the wire, "now to
get on the trail again."

It was not an easy one to follow. Tom began at the deserted home
of the alleged financier. The establishment was broken up, for
many tradesmen came with bills that had not been paid, and some of
them levied on what little personal property there was to satisfy
their claims. The servants left, sorrowful enough over their
missing wages. The place was closed up under the sheriff's orders.

But of Peters and his men not a trace could be found. Tom and Ned
traveled all over the surrounding country, looking for clues, but
in vain. They made several trips in the airship, but finally
decided that an automobile was more practical for their work, and
kept to that.

They did find some traces of Peters. As Tom had said, the man was
too prominent not to be noticed. He might have disguised himself,
though it seemed that the promoter was a proud man, and liked to
be seen in flashy clothes, a silk hat, and with a buttonhole
bouquet.

This made it easy to get the first trace of him. He had been seen
to take a train at the Shopton station, though he had not bought a
ticket. The promoter had paid his fare to Branchford, a junction
point, but there all trace of him was lost. It was not even
certain that he went there.

"He may have done that to throw us off," said Tom. "Just because
he paid his way to Branchford, doesn't say he went there. He may
have gotten off at the next station beyond Shopton."

"Do you think he's still lingering around here?" asked Ned.

"I shouldn't be surprised," was Tom's answer. "He knows that there
is still some of the Damon property left, and he is probably
hungry for that. We'll get him yet, Ned."

But at the end of several days Tom's hopes did not seem in a fair
way to be realized. He and Ned followed one useless clue after
another. All the trails seemed blind ones. But Tom never gave up.

He was devoting all his time now to the finding of his friend Mr.
Damon, and to the recovery of his fortune. In fact the latter was
not so important to Tom as was the former. For Mrs. Damon was on
the verge of a nervous collapse on account of the absence of her
husband.

"If I could only have some word from him, Tom!" she cried,
helplessly.

To Tom the matter was very puzzling. It seemed utterly impossible
that Mr. Damon could be kept so close a prisoner that he could not
manage to get some word to his friends. It was not as if he was a
child. He was a man of more than ordinary abilities. Surely he
might find a way to outwit his enemies.

But the days passed, and no word came. A number of detectives had
been employed, but they were no more successful than Tom. The
latter had given up his inventive work, for the time being, to
devote all his time to the solution of the mystery.

Tom and Ned had been away from Shopton for three days, following
the most promising clue they had yet received. But it had failed
at the end, and one afternoon they found themselves in a small
town, about a hundred miles from Shopton. They had been motoring.

"I think I'll call up the house," said Tom. "Dad may have received
some news, or Mrs. Damon may have sent him some word. I'll get my
father on the wire."

Connection to Tom's house was soon made, and Ned, who was
listening to his chum's remarks, was startled to hear him cry out:

"What's that you say? My airship taken again? When did it happen?
Yes, I'm listening. Go on, Father!"

Then followed a silence while Tom listened, breaking in now and
then with an excited remark, Suddenly he called:

"Good-by, Dad! I'm coming right home!"

Tom hung up the receiver with a bang, and turned to his chum.

"What do you think!" he cried. "The Eagle was taken again last
night! The same way as before. Nobody got a glimpse of the
thieves, though. Dad has been trying to get in communication with
me ever since. I'm glad I called up. Now we'll get right back to
Shopton, and see what we can do. This is the limit! Peters and his
crowd will be kidnapping us, next."

"That's right," agreed Ned.

He and Tom were soon off again, speeding in the auto toward
Shopton. But the roads were bad, after a heavy rain, and they did
not make fast time.

The coming of dusk found them with more than thirty miles to go.
They were in an almost deserted section of the country when
suddenly, as they were running slowly up a hill, there was a
sudden crack, the auto gave a lurch to one side of the roadway and
then settled heavily. Tom clapped on both brakes quickly, and gave
a cry of dismay.

"Broken front axle!" he said. "We're dished, Ned!"

They got out, being no more harmed than by the jolting. The car
was out of commission. The two chums looked around Except for a
lonely house, that bore every mark of being deserted, not a
dwelling was in sight where they might ask for aid or shelter.

And, as they looked, from that lonely house came a strange cry--a
cry as though for help!





CHAPTER XXV

THE AIRSHIP CAPTURE


"Did you hear that?" cried Ned.

"I certainly did," answered Tom. "What was it."

"Sounded to me like a cry of some sort."

"It was. An animal, I'd say."

The two chums moved away from the broken auto, and looked at each
other. Then, by a common impulse, they started toward the lonely
house, which was set back some distance from the road.

"Let's see who it was," suggested Tom, "After all, though it looks
deserted, there may be someone in the house, and we've got to have
some kind of help. I don't want to leave my car on the road all
night, though it will have to be repaired before I can use it
again."

"It sure is a bad break," agreed Ned.

As they walked toward the deserted House they heard the strange
cry again. It was louder this time, and following it the boys
heard a sound as if a blow had been struck.

"Someone is being attacked!" cried Tom. "Maybe some poor tramp has
taken shelter in there and a dog is after them. Come on, Ned,
we've got to help!"

They started on a run for the lonely house, but while still some
distance away a curious thing happened.

There was a sudden cry--an appeal for help it seemed--but this
time in the open. And, as Tom and Ned looked, they saw several men
running from the rear of the old house. Between them they carried
an inert form,

"Something's wrong!" exclaimed Tom, "There's crooked work going on
here, Ned."

"You're right! It's up to us to stop it! Come on!"

But before the boys had taken half a dozen more steps they heard
that which caused them great surprise. For from a shed behind the
house came the unmistakable throb and roar of a motor.

"They're going off in an auto!" cried Ned.

"And they're carrying someone with them!" exclaimed Tom.

By this time they had gotten to a point where they could see the
shed, and what was their astonishment to see being rolled from it
a big biplane. At the sight of it Tom cried:

"It's the Eagle! That's my airship, Ned!"

"You're right! How did it get here?"

"That's for us to find out. I shouldn't wonder, Ned, but what
we're at last on the trail of Peters and his crowd!"

The men--there were four or five of them, Ned guessed--now broke
into a run, still carrying among them the inert form of another.
The cries for help had ceased, and it seemed as if the unfortunate
one was unconscious.

A moment later, and before the boys could do anything, had they
the power, the men fairly jumped aboard Tom Swift's biggest
airship. The unconscious one was carried with them.

Then the motor was speeded up. The roar and throbbing were almost
deafening.

"Stop that! Hold on! That's my machine!" yelled Tom.

He might as well have spoken to the wind. With a rush and a roar
the big Eagle shot away and upward, carrying the men and their
mysterious, unconscious companion. It was getting too dark for Tom
and Ned to make out the forms or features of the strangers.

"We're too late!" said Ned, hopelessly.

"Yes, they got away," agreed Tom. "Oh, if only I had my speedy
little monoplane!"

"But who can they be? How did your airship get here? And who is
that man they carried out of the house?" cried Ned.

"I don't know the last--maybe one of their crowd who was injured
in a fight."

"What crowd?"

"The Peters gang, of course. Can't you see it, Ned?"

Unable to do anything, the two youths watched the flight of the
Eagle. She did not move at her usual speed, for she was carrying
too heavy a load.

Presently from the air overhead, and slightly behind them, the
boys heard the sound of another motor. They turned quickly.

"Look!" cried Ned. "Another airship, by all that's wonderful!"

"If we could only stop them!" exclaimed Tom. "That's a big
machine, and they could take us aboard. Then we could chase the
Eagle. We could catch her, too, for she's overloaded!"

Frantically he and Tom waved their caps at the man who was now
almost overhead in his airship. The boys did not call. They well
knew, with the noise of the motor, the occupant of the airship
could not hear them. But they waved and pointed to the slowly-
moving Eagle.

To their surprise and delight the man above them shut off his
engine, and seemed about to come down. Then Tom cried, knowing he
could be heard:

"Help us capture that airship? It's mine and they've stolen it!"

"All right! Be with you in a minute!" came back the answer from
above.

The second biplane came down to earth, ands as it ceased running
along on its bicycle wheels, the occupant jumped out.

"Hello, Tom Swift!" he called, as he took off his goggles.

"Why--why it's Mr. Halling!" cried the young inventor, in delight,
recognizing the birdman who had brought him the first news of Mr.
Damon's trouble, the day the airship became entangled in the
aerials of the wireless on Tom's house.

"What are you doing here, Tom?" asked Mr. Hailing. "What has
happened?"

"We're looking for Mr. Damon. That's a bad crowd there," and he
pointed toward the other aircraft. "They have my Eagle. Can you
help me catch them?"

"I certainly can--and will! Get aboard! I can carry four."

"Then you have a new machine?"

"Yes, and a dandy! All the latest improvements--self-starter and
all! I'm glad of a chance to show it to you."

"And I'm glad, too!" cried Tom. "It was providential that you
happened along. What were you doing here?"

"Just out on a trial spin. But come on, if we're going to catch
those fellows!"

Quickly Tom, Ned, and Mr. Halling climbed into the seats of the
new airship. It was started from a switch, and in a few seconds it
was on the wing, chasing after the Eagle.

Then began a strange race, a race in the air after the unknown
strangers who had Tom's machine. Had the Eagle not been so heavily
laden it might have escaped, for Tom's craft was a speedy one. But
this time it had to give the palm to Mr. Grant Halling's. Faster
and faster in pursuit flew the Star, as the new craft was called.
Faster and faster, until at last, coming directly over the Eagle,
Mr. Halling sent his craft down in such a manner as to "blanket"
the other. In an instant she began to sink, and with cries of
alarm the men shut off the motor and started to volplane to the
earth.

But they made an unskillful landing. The Eagle tilted to one side,
and came down with a crash. There were cries of pain, then
silence, and a few seconds later two men ran away from the
disabled airship. But there were three senseless forms on the
ground beside the craft when Tom, Ned and Mr. Halling ran up. In
the fading light Tom saw a face he knew--three faces in fact.

"Mr. Damon!" he cried. "We've found him, Ned!"

"But--too late--maybe!" answered Ned, in a low voice, as he, too,
recognized the man who had been missing so long.

Mr. Halling was bending over the unconscious form of his friend.

"He's alive!" he cried, joyfully. "And not much hurt, either. But
he has been ill, and looks half starved. Who are these men?"

Tom gave a hasty look.

"Shallock Peters and Harrison Boylan!" he cried. "Ned, at last
we've caught the scoundrels!"

It was true. Chance had played into the hands of Tom Swift. While
Mr. Halling was looking after Mr. Damon, reviving him, the young
inventor and Ned quickly bound the hands and feet of the two
plotters with pieces of wire from the broken airship.

Presently Mr. Damon opened his eyes.

"Where am I? What happened? Oh, bless my watch chain--it's Tom
Swift! Bless my cigar case, I--"

"He's all right!" cried Tom, joyfully. "When Mr. Damon blesses
something beside his tombstone he's all right."

Peters and Boylan soon revived, both being merely stunned, as was
Mr. Damon. They looked about in wonder, and then, feeling that
they were prisoners, resigned themselves to their fate. Both men
were shabbily dressed, and Tom would hardly have known the once
spick and span Mr. Peters. He had no rose in his buttonhole now.

"Well, you have me, I see," he said, coolly. "I was afraid we were
playing for too high a stake."

"Yes, we've got you," replied Tom,

"But you can't prove much against me," went on Peters. "I'll deny
everything."

"We'll see about that," added the young inventor, grimly, and
thought of the picture in the plate and the record on the wax
cylinder.

"We've got to get Mr. Damon to some place where he can be looked
after," broke in Mr. Halling. "Then we'll hear the story."

A passing farmer was prevailed on to take the party in his big
wagon to the nearest town, Mr. Hailing going on ahead in his
airship. Tom's craft could not be moved, being badly damaged.

Once in town Peters and Boylan were put in jail, on the charges
for which Tom carried warrants. Mr. Damon was taken to a hotel and
a doctor summoned. It was as Mr. Halling had guessed. His friend
had been ill, and so weak that he could not get out of bed. It was
this that enabled the plotters to so easily keep him a prisoner.

By degrees Mr. Damon told his story. He had rashly allowed Peters
to get control of most of his fortune, and, in a vain hope of
getting back some of his losses, had, one night--the night he
disappeared, in fact--agreed to meet Peters and some of his men to
talk matters over. Of this Mr. Damon said nothing to his wife.

He went out that night to meet Peters in the garden, but the
plotters had changed their plans. They boldly kidnapped their
victim, chloroformed him and took him away in Tom's airship, which
Boylan and some of his tools daringly stole a short time
previously. Later they returned it, as they had no use for it at
the lonely house.

Mr. Damon was taken to the house, and there kept a prisoner. The
men hoped to prevail on the fears of his wife to make her give up
the valuable property. But we have seen how Tom foiled Peters.

The experience of Mr. Damon, coupled with rough treatment he
received, and lack of good food, soon made him ill. He was so weak
that he could not help himself, and with that he was kept under
guard. So he had no chance to escape or send his wife or friends
any word.

"But I'm all right now, Tom, thanks to you!" said he. "Bless my
pocketbook, I don't care if my fortune is lost, as long as I'm
alive and can get back to my wife."

"But I don't believe your fortune will be lost," said Tom. "I
think I have the picture and other evidence that will save it,"
and he told of his photo telephone, and of what it had
accomplished.

"Bless my eyelashes!" cried Mr. Damon. "What a young man you are,
Tom Swift!"

Tom smiled gladly. He knew now that his old friend was himself
once more.

There is little left to tell. Chance had aided Tom in a most
wonderful way--chance and the presence of Mr. Halling with his
airship at just the right moment.

Tom made a diligent effort to find out who it was that had
chloroformed him in the telephone booth that time, but learned
nothing definite. Peters and Boylan were both examined as to this
on their trials, but denied it, and the young inventor was forced
to conclude that it must have been some of the unscrupulous men
who had taken his father's patent some time before.

"They may have heard of your prosperity, and thought it a good
chance to rob you," suggested Ned.

"Maybe," agreed Tom. "Well, we'll let it go at that. Only I hope
they don't come again."

Mr. Damon was soon home with his wife again, and Peters and Boylan
were held in heavy bail. They had secreted most of Mr. Damon's
wealth, falsely telling him it was lost, and they were forced to
give back his fortune. The evidence against them was clear and
conclusive. When Tom went into court with his phonograph record of
the talk of Peters, even though the man's voice was hoarse from a
cold when he talked, and when his picture was shown, in the
telephone booth, the jury at once convicted him.

Boylan, when he learned of the missing button in Tom's possession,
confessed that he and some of his men who were birdmen had taken
Tom's airship. They wanted a means of getting Mr. Damon to the
lonely house without being traced, and they accomplished it.

As Tom had surmised, Peters had become suspicious after his last
talk with Mrs. Damon, and had fled. He disguised himself and went
into hiding with the others at the lonely house. Then he learned
that the authorities of another city. where he had swindled many,
were on his trail, and he decided to decamp with his gang, taking
Mr. Damon with them. For this purpose Tom's airship was taken the
second time, and a wholesale escape, with Mr. Damon a prisoner,
was planned.

But fate was against the plotters. Two of them did manage to get
away, but they were not really wanted. The big fish were Peters
and Boylan, and they were securely caught in the net of the law.
Peters was greatly surprised when he learned of Tom's trap, and of
the photo telephone. He had no idea he had been incriminating
himself when he talked over the wire.

"Well, it's all over," remarked Ned to Tom, one day, when the
disabled auto and the airship had been brought home and repaired.
"The plotters are in prison for long terms, and Mr. Damon is
found, together with his fortune. The photo telephone did it,
Tom."

"Not all of it--but a good bit," admitted the young inventor, with
a smile.

"What are you going to do next, Tom?"

"I hardly know. I think--"

Before Tom could finish, a voice was heard in the hall outside the
library.

"Bless my overshoes! Where's Tom? I want to thank him again for
what he did for me," and Mr. Damon, now fully recovered, came in.
"Bless my suspender button, but it's good to be alive, Tom!" he
cried.

"It certainly is," agreed Tom. "And the next time you go for a
conference with such men as Peters, look out for airships."

"I will, Tom, I will!" exclaimed Mr. Damon. "Bless my watch chain,
I will!"

And now, for a time, we will say good-bye to Tom Swift, leaving
him to perfect his other inventions.




[Portions of this header are copyright (C) 2001 by Michael S. Hart
and may be reprinted only when these Etexts are free of all fees.]
[Project Gutenberg is a TradeMark and may not be used in any sales
of Project Gutenberg Etexts or other materials be they hardware or
software or any other related product without express permission.]





This etext was produced by John Mamoun <mamounjo@umdnj.edu>
with the Online Distributed Proofreading Team of Charles Franks.





Letters of Franz Liszt, Volume 1, "From Paris to Rome: Years of
Travel as a Virtuoso"

by Franz Liszt; letters collected by La Mara and translated by
Constance Bache




CONTENTS



BRIEF BIOGRAPHICAL SKETCH
DEDICATION
PREFACE TO THE ENGLISH EDITION, BY CONSTANCE BACHE
TABLE OF LETTER CONTENTS
THE LETTERS OF FRANZ LISZT, VOL. 1
INFO ABOUT THIS E-TEXT EDITION



BRIEF BIOGRAPHICAL SKETCH



The Austrian composer Franz Liszt (1811-1886) was a pianistic
miracle. He could play anything on site and composed over 400
works centered around "his" instrument. Among his key works are
his Hungarian Rhapsodies, his Transcendental Etudes, his Concert
Etudes, his Etudes based on variations of Paganinini's Violin
Caprices and his Sonata, one of the most important of the
nineteenth century. He also wrote thousands of letters, of which
260 are translated into English in this first of a 2-volume set
of letters.

Those who knew him were also struck by his extremely
sophisticated personality. He was surely one of the most
civilized people of the nineteeth century, internalizing within
himself a complex conception of human civility, and attempting to
project it in his music and his communications with people. His
life was centered around people; he knew them, worked with them,
remembered them, thought about them, and wrote about them using
an almost poetic language, while pushing them to reflect the high
ideals he believed in. His personality was the embodiment of a
refined, idealized form of human civility. He was the consummate
musical artist, always looking for ways to communicate a new
civilized idea through music, and to work with other musicians in
organizing concerts and gatherings to perform the music publicly.
He also did as much as he could to promote and compliment those
whose music he believed in.

He was also a superlative musical critic, knowing, with few
mistakes, what music of his day was "artistic" and what was not.
But, although he was clearly a musical genius, he insisted on
projecting a tonal, romantic "beauty" in his music, confining his
music to a narrow range of moral values and ideals. He would have
rejected 20th-century music that entertained cynical notions of
any kind, or notions that obviated the concept of beauty in any
way. There is no Prokofiev, Stravinsky, Shostakovich, Cage, Adams
and certainly no Schoenberg in Liszt's music. His music has an
ideological "ceiling," and that ceiling is "beauty." It never
goes beyond that. And perhaps it was never as "beautiful" as the
music of Mozart, Bach or Beethoven, nor quite as rational (Are
all the emotions in Liszt's music truly "controlled?"). But it
certainly was original and instructive, and it certainly will
linger.



DEDICATION



To the Memory of
MY BROTHER WALTER,
AND TO OUR
DEAR AND HONORED FRIEND
A.J. HIPKINS, ESQ.,
I DEDICATE THIS TRANSLATION.

--C.B.



PREFACE TO THE ENGLISH EDITION, BY CONSTANCE BACHE



In writing a few words of Preface I wish to express, first and
foremost, my appreciation of the extreme care and
conscientiousness with which La Mara has prepared these volumes.
In a spirit of no less reverence I have endeavored, in the
English translation, to adhere as closely as possible to all the
minute characteristics that add expression to Liszt's letters:
punctuation has, of necessity, undergone alteration, but italics,
inverted commas, dashes and other marks have been strictly
observed. It may be objected that unnecessary particularity has
been shown in the translation of various titles, names of
Societies or newspapers, quotations, etc.; but there are many
people who, while understanding French, do not read German, and
vice versa, and therefore it has seemed better to translate
everything. Where anything has been omitted in the printed
letters I have adhered to the sign .--. employed by La Mara to
indicate the hiatus. It has seemed best to preserve the spelling
of all proper names as written by Liszt, and not to Anglicise
any, as it is impossible to do all; and therefore, even at the
risk of a seeming affectation, the original form of the name has
been preserved. In the same spirit I have adhered to the correct
form of the name of our adopted composer Handel, and trust I may
be pardoned for so doing on the strength of a little joke of
Liszt's own "The English," he said, "always talk about Gluck and
Handel!"

La Mara says in her Preface that this collection can by no means
be considered a complete one, as there must exist other letters--
to Liszt's mother, to Berlioz, Tausig, etc.--which it is hoped
may yet be some day forthcoming. In like manner might there not
also be letters to his daughter Madame Ollivier (not to mention
his still-living daughter Madame Wagner)? [Another volume of
Liszt's letters, of a still more intimate character, addressed to
a lady friend, will be published later on.]

The English edition is increased by four letters one to Peter
Cornelius, No. 256A in Vol. I., which is interesting in its
reference to the "Barbier"; and, in Vol. II., a kind letter of
introduction which the Master gave me for Madame Tardieu, in
Brussels; one letter to Walter Bache, and one to the London
Philharmonic Society (Nos. 370A and 370B); one of these, it is
true, is partially quoted in a footnote by La Mara, but at this
distance of time there is no reason why these letters should not
be inserted entire, and they will prove of rather particular
interest, both to my brother's friends, and also as having
reference to that never-to-be-forgotten episode--Liszt's last
visit to England.

This visit, which took place in 1886, a few months before the
Master's death, was for the purpose of his being present at the
performance of his Oratorio of St. Elizabeth (see Letter 370 and
subsequent letters).

More than forty years had elapsed since Liszt's previous visit to
our shores; times had changed, and the almost unknown, and wholly
unappreciated, had become the acknowledged King in a realm where
many were Princes. Some lines embodying in words England's
welcome to this king--headed by a design in which the Hungarian
and the English coats-of-arms unite above two clasped hands, and
a few bars of a leading theme from the St. Elizabeth--were
written by me and presented to Liszt with a basket of roses
(emblematic of the rose miracle in the Oratorio) tied with the
Hungarian colors, on his entrance into St. James's Hall on April
6th, 1886.

As a memento of that occasion it has been chosen as frontispiece
to the Second Volume.

Constance Bache

London, December 1893



TABLE OF LETTER CONTENTS (LETTER NUMBER, FOLLOWED BY ADDRESSEE):



1.   Carl Czerny in Vienna. December 23rd, 1828
2.   De Mancy in Paris. December 23rd, 1829
3.   Carl Czerny. August 26th, 1830
4.   Alphonse Brot in Paris. Beginning of the 30th year
5.   Pierre Wolff in Geneva. May 2nd, 1832
6.   Ferdinand Hiller. June 20th, 1833
7.   Abbe de Lamennais, La Chenaie. January 14th, 1835
8.   Liszt's Mother 183-
9.   Abbe de Lamennais. May 28th, 1836
10.  Lydie Pavy in Lyons. August 22nd, 1836
11.  Abbe de Lamennais. December 18th, 1837
12.  Breitkopf and Hartel in Leipzig. April 5th, 1838
13.  Robert Schumann in Leipzig. May, 1838
14.  The Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde in Vienna. June 1st, 1815
15.  Simon Lowy in Vienna. September 22nd, 1838
16.  Pacini in Paris. September 30th, 1838
17.  Breitkopf and Hartel. January 3rd, 1839
18.  Princess Christine Belgiojoso in Paris. June 4th, 1839
19.  Robert Schumann. June 5th, 1820
20.  Breitkopf and Hartel. June, 1839
21.  The Beethoven Committee at Bonn. October 3rd, 1839
22.  Count Leo Festetics in Pest. November 24th, 1839
23.  Clara Wieck. December 25th, 1839
24.  Robert Schumann. March 27th, 1841
25.  Franz von Schober in Vienna. April 3rd, 1840
26.  Maurice Schlesinger in Paris. May 14th, 1840
27.  Franz von Schober. May or June, 1840
28.  the same. August 29th, 1840
29.  Buloz in Paris. October 26th, 1840
30.  Franz von Schober. December 5th, 1840
31.  Breitkopf and Hartel. May 7th, 1841
32.  Simon Lowy. May 20th, 1841
33.  Franz von Schober. March 3rd, 1842
34.  The Faculty of Philosophy at the University of Konigsberg.
March 18th, 1842
35.  Freiherr von Spiegel in Weimar. September 12th, 1842
36.  Carl Filitsch2 or 1843
37.  Franz von Schober. March 4th, 1844
38.  Franz Kroll. June 11th, 1844
39.  Freund. June 11th, 1844
40.  Franz von Schober. March 3rd, 1845
41.  Franz Kroll in Glogau. March 26th, 1845
42.  Abbe de Lamennais. April 28th, 1845
43.  Frederic Chopin. May 21st, 1845
44.  George Sand. May 21st, 1845
45.  Abbe de Lamennais. June 1st, 1845
46.  Gaetano Belloni in Paris. July 23rd, 1845
47.  Mme. Rondonneau in Sedan. February 11th, 1846
48.  Grillparzer 1846 (?)
49.  Franz von Schober in Weimar. April 11th, 1846
50.  the same. May 28th, 1846
51.  Alexander Seroff. September 14th, 1847
52.  Carl Haslinger in Vienna. December 19th, 1847
53.  Baron von Dornis in Jena. March 6th, 1848
54.  Franz von Schober. April 22nd, 1848
55.  Bernhard Cossmann in Baden-Baden. September 18th, 1848
56.  Carl Reinecke. March 25th, 1849
57.  Count Sandor Teleky(?) May 5th, 1849
58.  Belloni(?). May 14th, 1849
59.  Carl Reinecke. May 30th, 1849
60.  Robert Schumann. June 5th, 1849
61.  the same. July 27th, 1849
62.  the same. August 1st, 1849
63.  Carl Reinecke. September 7th, 1849
64.  Breitkopf and Hartel. January 14th, 1850
65.  the same. February 24th, 1850
66.  J. C. Lobe in Leipzig. July 10th, 1850
67.  Friedrich Wieck in Dresden. August 4th, 1850
68.  Simon Lowy. August 5th, 1850
69.  Mathilde Graumann. October 11th, 1850
70.  Carl Reinecke. January 1st, 1851
71.  Leon Escudier in Paris. February 4th, 1851
72.  Carl Reinecke. March 19th, 1851
73.  Dr. Eduard Liszt in Vienna1
74.  Count Casimir Esterhazy. June 6th, 1851
75.  Theodor Uhlig in Dresden. June 25th, 1851
76.  Rosalie Spohr in Brunswick. July 3rd, 1851
77.  the same. July 22nd, 1851
78.  Breitkopf and Hartel. December 1st, 1851
79.  Louis Kohler in Konigsberg. April 16th, 1852
80.  Carl Reinecke. April 16th, 1852
81.  Carl Czerny. April 19th, 1852
82.  Gustav Schmidt in Frankfort-on-the-Maine. May 18th, 1852
83.  Robert Schumann. June 8th, 1852 84.the same. June 26th, 1852
85.  Peter Cornelius. September 4th, 1852
86.  Clara Schumann. September 11th, 1852
87.  Carl Czerny. September or October, 1852
88.  Breitkopf and Hartel. October 30th, 1852
89.  the same. November 10th, 1852
90.  Julius Stern in Berlin. November 24th, 1852
91.  Wilhelm von Lenz in St. Petersburg. December 2nd, 1852
92.  Robert Radecke in Leipzig. December 9th, 1852
93.  Bernhard Cossmann. December, 1852
94.  Wilhelm Fischer in Dresden. January 13th, 1853
95.  Edmund Singer. January 15th, 1853
96.  To Frau Dr. Lidy Steche in Leipzig. February 14th, 1853
97.  Gustav Schmidt. February 27th, 1853
98.  Heinrich Brockhaus in Leipzig. March 22nd, 1853
99.  Dr. Franz Brendel in Leipzig. April 3rd, 1853
100. the same. April 30th, 1853
101. Louis Kohler. May 6th, 1853
102. the same. May 24th, 1853
103. the same. August 1st, 1853
104. Richard Pohl in Dresden. November 5th, 1853
105. Wilhelm Fischer. January 4th, 1854
106. Escudier in Paris. January 21st, 1854
107. the same. January 28th, 1854
108. Dr. Franz Brendel. February 20th, 1854
109. Louis Kohler. March 2nd, 1854
110. Dr. Franz Brendel. March 18th, 1854
111. Louis Kohler. April or May, 1854
112. Dr. Franz Brendel. April 26th, 1854
113. Louis Kohler. June 8th, 1854
114. Dr. Franz Brendel. June 12th, 1854
115. Carl Klindworth in London. July 2nd, 1854
116. Dr. Franz Brendel. July 7th, 1854
117. Anton Rubinstein. July 31st, 1854
118. Dr. Franz Brendel. August 12th, 1854
119. Anton Rubinstein. August, 1854
120. Alexander Ritter in Dresden. September 6th, 1854
121. Bernhard Cossmann. September 8th, 1854
122. Gaetano Belloni. September 9th, 1854
123. Dr. Eduard Liszt October 10th, 1854
124. Anton Rubinstein. October 19th, 1854
125. Dr. Franz Brendel. Beginning of November, 1854
126. Anton Rubinstein. November 19th, 1854	 215
127. Dr. Franz Brendel. December 1st, 1854
128. J. W. von Wasielecvski in Bonn. December 14th, 1854
129. William Mason in New York. December 14th, 1854
130. Rosalie Spohr. January 4th, 1855
131. To Alfred Dorffel in Leipzig. January 17th, 1855
132. Anton Rubinstein. February 1st, 1855
133. Louis Kohler. March 16th, 1855
134. Dr. Franz Brendel. March 18th, 1855
135. the same. April 1st, 1855
136. Anton Rubinstein. April 3rd, 1855
137. Freiherr Beaulieu-Marconnay. May 21st, 1855
138. Anton Rubinstein. June 3rd, 1855
139. Dr. Franz Brendel. June, 1855
140. the same. June 16th, 1855
141. Edmund Singer. August 1st, 1855
142. Bernhard Cossmann. August 15th, 1855
143. August Kiel in Detmold. September 8th, 1855
144. Moritz Hauptmann. September 28th, 1855
145. Dr. Eduard Liszt December 3rd, 1855
146. Frau Meyerbeer in Berlin. December 14th, 1855
147. Dr. Ritter von Seiler in Vienna. December 26th, 1855
148. Dr. Eduard Liszt February 9th, 1856
149. Dr. von Seiler. February loth, 1856
150. Dr. Franz Brendel. February 19th, 1856
151. Dionys Pruckner in Vienna. March 17th, 1856
152. Breitkopf and Hartel. May 15th, 1856
153. Louis Kohler. May 24th, 1856
154. the same. July 9th, 1856
155. Hoffmann von Fallersleben. July 14th, 1856
156. Wilhelm Wieprecht. July 18th, 1856
157. Edmund Singer. July 28th, 1856
158. Joachim Raff. July 31st, 1856
159. Anton Rubinstein. August 6th, 1856
160. Joachim Raff. August 7th, 1856
161. Anton Rubinstein. August 21st, 1856
162. Dr. Eduard Liszt September 5th, 1856
163. Louis Kohler. October 8th, 1856
164. Dr. Gille in Jena. November 14th, 1856
165. Dr. Adolf Stern in Dresden. November 14th, 18293
166. Louis Kohler. November 21st, 1856
167. Dr. Eduard Liszt November 24th, 1856
168. Alexander Ritter in Stettin. December 4th, 1856
169. L. A. Zellner in Vienna. January 2nd, 1857  299
170. Von Turanyi in Aix-la-Chapelle. January 3rd, 1830
171. J. W. von Wasielewski. January 9th, 1857
172. Alexis von Lwoff in St. Petersburg. January 10th, 1857
173. Johann von Herbeck in Vienna. January 12th, 1857
174. Franz Gotze in Leipzig. February 1st, 1857
175. Dionys Pruckner. February 11th, 1857
176. Joachim Raff. February, 1857
177. Ferdinand David. February 26th, 1857
178. Wladimir Stassoff in St. Petersburg. March 17th, 1857
179. Wilhelm von Lenz in St. Petersburg. March 24th, 1857
180. Dr. Eduard Liszt March 26th, 1857
181. Georg Schariezer in Pressburg. April 25th, 1857
182. Dr. Eduard Liszt April 27th, 1857
183. Frau von Kaulbach. May 1st, 1857
184. Fedor von Milde in Weimar. June 3rd, 1857
185. Johann von Herbeck. June 12th, 1857
186. Countess Rosalie Sauerma. June 22nd, 1857
187. Ludmilla Schestakoff in St. Petersburg. October 7th, 1857
188. Carl Haslinger. December 5th, 1857
189. Stein in Sondershausen. December 6th, 1857
190. Alexander Ritter. December 7th, 1857
191. Max Seifriz in Lowenberg. December 24th, 1857
192. Alexander Seroff. January 8th, 1858
193. Basil von Engelhardt. January 8th, 1858
194. Felix Draseke. January Loth, 1858
195. Louis Kohler. February 1st, 1858
196. L.A. Zellner. February 8th, 1858
197. Peter Cornelius. February 19th, 1858
198. Dionys Pruckner. March 9th, 1858
199. Dr. Eduard Liszt March Loth, 1858
200. Fran Dr. Steche. March 20th, 1858
201. L. A. Zellner. April 6th, 1858
202. Dr. Eduard Liszt April 7th, 1858
203. Adolf Reubke in Hausneinsdorf. June 10th, 1858
204. Prince Constantin von Hohenzollern-Hechingen. August 18th,
1858
205. Frau Rosa von Milde. August 25th, 1858
206. Dr. Franz Brendel. November 2nd, 1858
207. Johann von Herbeck. November 22nd, 1858
208. Felix Draseke. January 12th, 1859
209. Heinrich Porges. March loth, 18379
210. Max Seifriz. March 22nd, 1859
211. Dr. Eduard Liszt April 5th, 1859
212. Music-Director N. N. April 17th, 1859
213. Peter Cornelius. May 23rd, 1859
214. Dr. Franz Brendel. May 23rd, 1859
215. Felix Draseke. July 19th, 1859
216. Peter Cornelius. August 23rd, 1859
217. Dr. Franz Brendel. September 2nd, 1859
218. Louis Kohler. September 3rd, 1859
219. Dr. Franz Brendel. September 8th, 1859
220. Johann von Herbeck. October 11th, 1859
221. Felix Draseke. October 20th, 1859
222. Heinrich Porges. October 30th, 1859
223. Ingeborg Stark. November 2nd, 1859
224. Johann von Herbeck. November 18th, 1859
225. Dr. Franz Brendel. December 1st, 1859
226. Anton Rubinstein. December 3rd, 1859
227. Dr. Franz Brendel. December 6th, 1859
228. Dr. Eduard Liszt December 28th, 1859
229. Josef Dessauer. December 30th, 1859
230. Wilkoszewski in Munich. January 15th, 1860
231. Johann von Herbeck. January 26th, 1860
232. Dr. Franz Brendel. January 25th, 1860
233. Friedrich Hebbel. February 5th, 1860
234. Dr. Franz Brendel. February, 1860
235. the same March or April, 1860
236. Louis Kohler. July 5th, 1860
237. Dr. Eduard Liszt July 9th, 1860
238. Ingeborg Stark. Summer, 1860
239. Dr. Franz Brendel. August 9th, 1860
240. Princess C. Sayn-Wittgenstein. September 14th, 1860
241. Dr. Franz Brendel. September 20th, 1860
242. Dr. Eduard Liszt September 20th, 1860
243. Hoffmann von Fallersleben. October 3oth, 1860
244. Franz Gotze. November 4th, 1860
245. Dr. Franz Brendel. November 16th, 1860
246. the same. December 2nd, 1860
247. C.F. Kahnt in Leipzig. December 2nd, 1860
248. the same. December 19th, 1860
249. Dr. Franz Brendel. December 19th, 1860
250. Felix Draseke. December 3oth, 1860
251. Dr. Franz Brendel. Beginning of January, 1861
252. the same. January 20th, 1861
253. the same. March 4th, 1861
254. Peter Cornelius. April 18th, 1861.
255. Hoffmann von Fallersleben. April 18th, 1861
256. Peter Cornelius. July 12th, 1861
256A. the same. July 14th, 1861
257. Alfred Dorffel. July 18th, 1861
258. Edmund Singer in Stuttgart. August 17th, 1861
259. C.F. Kahnt. August 27th, 1861
260. Dr. Franz Brendel. September 16th, 1861



THE LETTERS OF FRANZ LISZT, VOL. 1



1. To Carl Czerny in Vienna.

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
The addressee was Liszt's former teacher, the celebrated Viennese
teacher of music and composer of innumerable instructive works
(1791-1857).]

My very dear Master,

When I think of all the immense obligations under which I am
placed towards you, and at the same time consider how long I have
left you without a sign of remembrance, I am perfectly ashamed
and miserable, and in despair of ever being forgiven by you!
"Yes," I said to myself with a deep feeling of bitterness, "I am
an ungrateful fellow; I have forgotten my benefactor, I have
forgotten that good master to whom I owe both my talent and my
success."...At these words a tear starts to my eyes, and I assure
you that no repentant tear was ever more sincere! Receive it as
an expiation, and pardon me, for I cannot any longer bear the
idea that you have any ill-feeling towards me. You will pardon
me, my dear Master, won't you? Embrace me then...good! Now my
heart is light.

You have doubtless heard that I have been playing your admirable
works here with the greatest success, and all the glory ought to
be given to you. I intended to have played your variations on the
"Pirate" the day after tomorrow at a very brilliant concert that
I was to have given at the theater of H.R.H. Madame, who was to
have been present as well as the Duchess of Orleans; but man
proposes and God disposes. I have suddenly caught the measles,
and have been obliged to say farewell to the concert; but it is
not given up because it is put off, and I hope, as soon as ever I
am well again, to have the pleasure of making these beautiful
variations known to a large public.

Pixis [a notable pianist (1788-1874)--lived a long time in Paris]
and several other people have spoken much to me of four concertos
that you have lately finished, and the reputation of which is
already making a stir in Paris. I should be very much pleased, my
dear Master, if you would commission me to get them sold. This
would be quite easy for me to do, and I should also have the
pleasure of playing them FROM FIRST HAND, either at the opera or
at some big concerts. If my proposition pleases you, send them to
me by the Austrian Embassy, marking the price that you would like
to have for them. As regards any passages to be altered, if there
are any, you need only mark them with a red pencil, according to
your plan which I know so well, and I will point them out to the
editor with the utmost care. Give me at the same time some news
about music and pianists in Vienna; and finally tell me, dear
Master, which of your compositions you think would make the best
effect in society.

I close by sending you my heartfelt greetings, and begging you
once more to pardon the shameful silence I have kept towards you:
be assured that it has given me as much pain as yourself!

Your very affectionate and grateful pupil,

F. Liszt

December 23rd, 1828

P.S.--Please answer me as soon as possible, for I am longing for
a letter from you; and please embrace your excellent parents from
me. I add my address (Rue Montholon, No. 7bis).



2. To De Mancy in Paris

[Autograph in the possession of M. Etienne Charavay in Paris.]

December 23rd, 1829

My Dear M. de Mancy,

I am so full of lessons that each day, from half-past eight in
the morning till 10 at night, I have scarcely breathing time.
Please excuse me therefore for not coming, as I should have liked
to do, to lunch with Madame de Mancy, but it is quite impossible.
The only thing I could do would be to come about 10 o'clock, if
that would not be too late for a wedding day, and in that case I
will beg M. Ebner [Carl Ebner, a Hungarian, a talented violinist
(1812-1836)] to come with me. I don't write you a longer letter,
for there is a pupil who has been waiting for me for an hour.
Besides, we are not standing on ceremony. Ever yours,

F. Liszt



3. To Carl Czerny

[Autograph in the Musical Society's Archives in Vienna. Printed
in a German translation: "La Mara, Letters of Musicians extending
over Five Centuries." II. Leipzig, B. and H. 1887.]

My dear and beloved Master,

It would be impossible to explain to you the why and wherefore of
my leaving you so long without news of me. Moreover, I have now
only five minutes in which to write to you, for Mr. Luden, a
pianist from Copenhagen, is starting shortly, and for fear of
delaying his journey I must be brief; but what is postponed is
not lost, so cheer up, for very soon you will get a great thick
letter from me, which I will take care to prepay, as I should not
like to ruin you.

Among all the circles of artists where I go in this country I
plead your cause tremendously: we all want you to come and stay
some time in Paris; it would certainly do you a great deal of
good, and you are so widely esteemed that you will doubtless be
well satisfied with the reception you will meet with here. If you
ever entertain this idea, write to me, I entreat you, for I will
do for you what I would do for my father. I have been making a
special study of your admirable sonata (Op. 7), and have since
played it at several reunions of connoisseurs (or would-be
connoisseurs): you cannot imagine what an effect it made; I was
quite overcome by it. It was in a burst of enthusiasm caused by
the Prestissimo, that Mr. Luden begged for a few words of
introduction to you; I know your kindness, indeed I could never
forget it. I therefore commend him in all confidence of your
goodness, until the time when I am so happy as to embrace you
myself and to show you (however feebly) all the gratitude and
admiration which fill me.

F. Liszt

Paris, August 26th, 1830



4. To Alphonse Brot in Paris

[Autograph in the possession of M. Etienne Charavay in Paris.]

(Paris, Beginning of the 30th year.)

It would give us great pleasure, my dear M. Brot, if you would
come and dine with us without ceremony tomorrow, Monday, about 6
o'clock; I do not promise you a good dinner,--that is not the
business of us poor artists; but the good company you will meet
will, I trust, make up for that. Monsieur Hugo [the poet] and
Edgard Quinet [French writer and philosopher] have promised to
come. So do try not to disappoint us, for we should miss you
much. My good mother told me to press you to come, for she is
very fond of you. Till tomorrow then! Kind regards and thanks.

F. Liszt

I have been at least six times to you without having the pleasure
of seeing you.

61, Rue de Provence.



5. Monsieur Pierre Wolff (Junior), Rue de la Tertasse, Geneva,
Switzerland

[Autograph in the possession of M. Gaston Calmann-Levy in Paris.]

Nous disons: "Il est temps. Executons, c'est l'heure." Alors nous
retournons les yeux--La Mort est la! Ainsi de mes projets.--Quand
vous verrai-je, Espagne, Et Venise et son golfe, et Rome et sa
campagne,

Toi, Sicile, que ronge un volcan souterrain, Grece qu'on connait
trop, Sardaigne qu'on ignore, Cites de l'Aquilon, du Couchant, de
l'Aurore, Pyramides du Nil, Cathedrales du Rhin! Qui sait?--
jamais peut-etre!

[We say: "Now it is time. Let's act, for 'tis the hour." Then
turn we but our eyes--lo! death is there! Thus with my plans.
When shall I see thee, Espagna, And Venice with her gulf, and
Rome with her Campagna; Thou, Sicily, whom volcanoes undermine;
Greece, whom we know too well, Sardinia, unknown one, Lands of
the north, the west, the rising sun, Pyramids of the Nile,
Cathedrals of the Rhine! Who knows? Never perchance!]

Earthly life is but a malady of the soul, an excitement which is
kept up by the passions. The natural state of the soul is rest!

Paris, May 2nd [1832]

Here is a whole fortnight that my mind and fingers have been
working like two lost spirits, Homer, the Bible, Plato, Locke,
Byron, Hugo, Lamartine, Chateaubriand, Beethoven, Bach, Hummel,
Mozart, Weber, are all around me. I study them, meditate on them,
devour them with fury; besides this I practice four to five hours
of exercises (3rds, 6ths, 8ths, tremolos, repetition of notes,
cadences, etc., etc.). Ah! provided I don't go mad, you will find
an artist in me! Yes, an artist such as you desire, such as is
required nowadays!

"And I too am a painter!" cried Michael Angelo the first time he
beheld a chef d'oeuvre...Though insignificant and poor, your
friend cannot leave off repeating those words of the great man
ever since Paganini's last performance. Rene, what a man, what a
violin, what an artist! Heavens! what sufferings, what misery,
what tortures in those four strings!

Here are a few of his characteristics:--

[Figure: Liszt here writes down several tiny excerpts from
musical scores of Paganini's violin music, such as his famous
"Caprices"]

As to his expression, his manner of phrasing, his very soul in
fact!----

May 8th [1832]

My good friend, it was in a paroxysm of madness that I wrote you
the above lines; a strain of work, wakefulness, and those violent
desires (for which you know me) had set my poor head aflame; I
went from right to left, then from left to right (like a sentinel
in the winter, freezing), singing, declaiming, gesticulating,
crying out; in a word, I was delirious. Today the spiritual and
the animal (to use the witty language of M. de Maistre) are a
little more evenly balanced; for the volcano of the heart is not
extinguished, but is working silently.--Until when?--

Address your letters to Monsieur Reidet, the receiver-general at
the port of Rouen.

A thousand kind messages to the ladies Boissier. I will tell you
some day the reasons which prevented me from starting for Geneva.
On this subject I shall call you in evidence.

Bertini is in London; Madame Malibran is making her round of
Germany; Messemaecker (how is he getting on?) is resting on his
laurels at Brussels; Aguado has the illustrious maestro Rossini
in tow.--Ah--Hi--Oh--Hu!!!



6. To Ferdinand Hiller

[This letter, published by F. Niecks ("F. Chopin, Man and
Musician," Vol. 1. German by Langhans. Leipzig, Leuckart, 1890),
was written by Liszt and Chopin jointly, and was also signed by
Chopin's friend Franchomme, the violoncellist. The part written
by Chopin is indicated here by parentheses ().--Addressed to the
well-known composer and author, afterwards Director of the
Conservatorium and Concert Society at Cologne (1811-1885).]

This is the twentieth time, at least, that we have tried to meet,
first at my house, then here, with the intention of writing to
you, and always some visit, or some other unforeseen hindrance,
has occurred. I don't know whether Chopin will be strong enough
to make excuses to you; for my part, it seems to me that we have
been so unmannerly and impertinent that no excuses are now
permissible or possible.

We sympathized most deeply in your bereavement, and more deeply
did we wish that we could be with you in order to soften, as far
as possible, the grief of your heart. [Hiller had lost his
father.]

(He has said it all so well that I have nothing to add to excuse
me specially for my negligence or idleness, or whim or
distraction, or--or--or--You know that I can explain myself
better in person, and, this autumn, when I take you home late by
the boulevards to your mother, I shall try to obtain your pardon.
I am writing to you without knowing what my pen is scribbling, as
Liszt is at this moment playing my Studies, and transporting me
away from all suitable ideas. I wish I could steal his manner of
rendering my own works. With regard to your friends who are
staying in Paris, I have often seen, during this winter and
spring, the Leo family [August Leo, banker in Paris], and all
that follows. There have been evenings at certain ambassadresses'
houses, and there was not a single one at which somebody living
at Frankfort was not mentioned. Madame Eichthal sends you many
kind messages--Plater [Count Plater, Chopin's countryman, and a
friend also of Liszt], the whole family were very sorry for your
departure, and begged me to give you their condolences.) Madame
d'Apponyi [Apponyi, the Austrian ambassador in Paris] was very
much vexed with me for not having taken you there before your
departure; she hopes that when you come back you will be sure to
remember the promise you made me. I will say as much of a certain
lady who is not an ambassadress.

Do you know Chopin's wonderful Studies?--(They are admirable! and
moreover they will last only until yours appear) = an author's
little piece of modesty!!! (A little piece of rudeness on the
part of the regent, for--to explain the matter fully--he is
correcting my spelling) according to the method of Monsieur
Marlet.

You will come back in the month of (September, isn't it? tr)y
[Tach]ez] to let us know the day; we have determined to give you
a serenade or charivari [mock serenade]. The company of the most
distinguished artists of the capital = M. Franchomme (present),
Madame Petzold, and the Abbe Bardin [passionate lover of music,
who had a great many artists to see him], the leaders of the Rue
d'Amboise (and my neighbors), Maurice Schlesinger [music
publisher], uncles, aunts, nephews, nieces, brothers-in-law,
sisters-in-law, and--and ("en plan du troisienae," etc.). ["in
the third row--i.e. less important people]. The responsible
editors,

F. Liszt

(F. Chopin)	(Aug. Franchomme.)

(By-the-bye, I met Heine yesterday, who begged me to grussen you
herzlich and herzlich.) [to send you his warmest and most
heartfelt greetings]

(By-the-bye, also, please excuse all the "you's" [Instead of the
more familiar "thee" and "thou."]--I do beg you to excuse them.
If you have a moment to spare, give us news of yourself, which
would be most welcome. Paris, Rue de la Chaussee d'Antin, No. 5.
At present I am occupying Franck's lodging [Dr. Hermann Franck,
author, friend of Chopin and of many other celebrities; editor
also for a short time, in the forties, of Brockhaus's "Deutsche
Allgemeine Zeitung"]--he is gone to London and Berlin. I am most
happy in the rooms which were so often our meeting-place. Berlioz
sends greetings.

As to pere Baillot, he is in Switzerland, at Geneva. So now you
can guess that I can't send you the Bach concerto.

June 20th, 1833)



7. To Abbe F. de Lamennais

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
Addressed to the celebrated French author (1782-1854), who
followed his brilliant apology of Catholicism, "Essai sur
l'Indifference en Matiere de Religion" (Essay on Indifference in
Matters of Religion, 1817-1823), by the "Paroles d'un Croyant"
(Words of a Believer, 1834), a veritable "Ode to revolution in
the sublimest biblical style," and sought to bring religious and
political liberty into accord with true religiousness. The latter
work made an unheard-of sensation, but brought upon him the
anathema of the Church. He obtained a great influence over Liszt,
who was on intimate terms with him.]

Four months have actually passed, dear Father, since we parted,
and I feel very sad at not getting a word from you!--at the same
time I do not wish to complain, for it seems to me that you can
never doubt my deep and filial affection...Much more, I even know
that you have been willing to accept it, and, however humble it
may be, to count it for something...What more then can I
desire?...

Eugene, whose brotherly friendship becomes dearer to me day by
day, has often given me good tidings of you. The last time I saw
him he told me confidentially that you were working at a sort of
Introduction, or developed Preface to your works.--Although I
know perfectly well that my interest counts for nothing in this
matter, I may be permitted nevertheless to tell you how glad I am
to know that you are occupied with this work. To yourself, first
of all, I think you owe it--your name and glory will shine out
all the more powerfully for it. And, secondly, for the public it
will be a work of art the more (and this commodity becomes rather
rare as time goes on), and which will besides have the double
advantage of aiding and fixing them in the understanding of your
past works, whilst at the same time preparing them for, and
initiating them into, your future thoughts.

And, lastly, for us who love you, and who would glory and be
proud to be one day called your disciples, we rejoice in it
because the world will learn to know you better by this means,
and because it will probably be another opportunity for us to
show our sympathetic admiration as well as our unalterable
devotion for you.

Unless something very unforeseen occurs, I shall come again and
beg you to receive me for a few days towards the middle of July;
I trust sufficiently to your sincerity to tell me that you would
rather not have me if my individuality would trouble or bother
you too much.--Before that, I shall have the honor of sending you
a little work, to which I have had the audacity to tack a great
name--yours.--It is an instrumental De profundis. The plain-song
that you like so much is preserved in it with the Faburden.
Perhaps this may give you a little pleasure, at any rate, I have
done it in remembrance of some hours passed (I should say
"lived") at La Chenaie.

Farewell, dear Father. I don't give you any news of Paris,--you
know all that. You know that Ballanche wants to be an
Academician, and accepts Salvandy and Dupaty as competitors,--you
know the little check of January,--the miserable petty intrigues
of court and newspaper and vestry;--in a word, you know how men
are wanting in noble and generous sentiments, and how they make
the most of their own ignoble ends and interests, to which their
words and actions yet give the lie.

Farewell once more, dear Father. Think as often as possible of
all the good you have done, and of that which men have a right to
expect of you. Think sometimes also of the help and the wealth of
affection that you have showered on me in particular, and may the
remembrance of this be sweet to you!...

Yours ever, for life--from heart and soul,

F. Liszt

January 14th, 1835

Tomorrow morning I have to leave for two months. If you should be
so good as to write to me before my return, please address
always, 61, Rue de Provence. My mother will take care that I have
your kind letter.



8. To his Mother

[From a copy, by Mr. Vladimir Stassoff of St. Petersburg, the
original of which is in Russia. The letter in itself is
unimportant, but it is the only one to Liszt's mother which the
editor could get, and gives a fresh proof of the devotion of the
artist to his mother.]

Dear Mother,

Please send me at once, without any delay, the Pianist's
Glossary, which you will get at Lemonier's, Rue de l'Echelle.

Simply put it in a cover, and put it in the post (General
Office), and I shall get it, at latest, by Monday or Tuesday.--

Address to Mr. Hermann Cohen, Grande Rue, No. 8.

[Cohen was a frequently mentioned pupil and favorite of Liszt's
who was born at Hamburg in 1820, much thought of as a pianist in
Paris, and immortalised as "Puzzi" by George Sand ("Lettres d'un
Voyageur"); he followed Liszt to Geneva, and gave lessons there.
In 1850 he entered the order of Carmelites, and, under the name
of Pater Augustin, died in Berlin in January 1871, whither he had
gone with French prisoners.]

I have an immense deal to do this morning, so that I have barely
time to tell you that I love you with all my heart, and that I
rejoice above everything at the prospect of seeing you again
soon--that is to say, in six or eight months.

F. Liszt

You will hear of me from Mr. Pinondel, who passed a day with us.



9. To the Abbe F. de Lamennais, La Chenaie

[Autograph in the possession of Mr. Marshall in London.]

[Paris, May 28th, 1836--according to the stamp of the post
office]

Dear and venerable Father,

I shall expect you. Whatever sorrow there is in the depth of my
soul, it will be sweet and consoling to me to see you again.

You are so wonderfully good to me! and I should suffer so much by
being so long away from you!--

Au revoir then, once more--in eight days at latest it will be,
will it not? I do nothing else than keep expecting you.

Yours, with the deepest respect and most sincere devotion,

F. Liszt



10. To Mademoiselle Lydie Pavy, of La Glaciere, Lyons

[Autograph in the possession of M. Etienne Charavay in Paris.]

St. Gervais, August 22nd [1836].

Your postscript deserves a punishment, and here it comes dated
from St. Gervais. I do not know whether your charming sister-in-
law, Madame Pavy, will consider this stamp of St. Gervais worthy
to appear in her collection; be that as it may, it gives me no
less a pleasure to converse a little with you who are always so
charming, so versatile, so excellent, and, permit me to say, so
kind to me.

Mademoiselle Merienne, whom I saw only quite lately (for you must
know that during the whole month of July, of glorious memory, I
have barely condescended to go down once or twice to Geneva; I
was living in a little bit of a house on the mountain, whence,
let me say parenthetically, it would have been quite easy for me
to hurl sermons and letters at you); Mademoiselle Merienne (what
shall I say to you after such an enormous parenthesis?), somewhat
like (by way of a new parenthesis) those declaimed discourses of
Plantade or Lhuillier, which put a stop to music whilst
nevertheless admitting that there is such a thing, whether at the
beginning or at the end--Mademoiselle Merienne--au diable
Mademoiselle Merienne! You guess by this time that she gave me
tidings of you, that she is a delightful and enchanting person,
that she makes admirable portraits, and that mine, amongst
others, has been a wonderful success. Etc., etc., and always
etc...

And yet I do wish to talk to you about this good Mademoiselle
Merienne, for she said a heap of charming things to me for your
sake, which will certainly not astonish you. But how to set about
it after all this preamble of parentheses? Ah, I have it!--In
three or four weeks I shall come and knock at your door.--And
then? Well, then we will chatter away at our ease. So much the
worse for you if you are not satisfied with my cunning stratagem.
Now let us talk business; yes, seriously, let us talk business!

Has your brother returned from his journey? And is he well? And
has no accident happened to him on the way? You are surprised,
perhaps, at my anxiety; but by-and-bye you will understand it
without difficulty, when I have explained to you how terribly
interested I am in the fact of his journey being safely
accomplished.

Just imagine that at this moment I have only 200 fr. in my purse
(a ridiculously small sum for a traveler), and that it is M. Pavy
who is to be my financial Providence, considering that it is to
him that my mother has confided my little quarterly income of a
thousand francs. Now at this point I must entrust you with a
little secret, which at present is only known to two individuals,
Messrs. Paccard and Roger (charming names for confidants, are not
they?), and which I beg you to make known as quickly as possible
to your brother. It concerns a little scrap of paper (which these
rogues of bankers call a draft, I believe), for a thousand
francs, by which Messrs. Paccard and Roger are authorized by my
signature, which is at the bottom, to demand the above sum of a
thousand francs (which my mother entrusted to M. Pavy in Paris)
from M. Pavy, junior, living at La Glaciere at Lyons, after the
22nd of August, 1836.

A thousand pardons for troubling you with these details, but I
should never have had the courage to write direct to your
brother, on account of my profound ignorance in money matters.

You tell me that you passed part of the fine season in the
country--why did not you arrange so as to tour for a little among
the mountains of Switzerland? I should have had such pleasure in
doing the honors, and Mademoiselle Merienne also...but don't let
us speak any more of Mademoiselle Merienne (who, be it observed
in parenthesis, must have already appeared a dozen times in this
letter), for fear of again falling into inextricable parentheses.

Au revoir then; in five weeks at latest I shall come and warm
myself at your "glacier."

F. Liszt



11. To Abbe de Lamennais

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.]

My friend Louis de Ronchaud writes me word that he has had the
honor of seeing you, dear Father, and that you were kind enough
to give him a message of affectionate remembrance for me. I am
very happy to know that you continue to keep this precious and
friendly feeling for me, of which you have already given me so
many proofs, and which I shall endeavour always to deserve as far
as is in my power.

I am still not very far advanced in my Italian journey. The
beauty of these parts, the necessity of writing with some little
continuance, and also, if all be said, some altogether unexpected
successes, have kept me in Milan and the neighborhood (Como and
the delicious shores of the lake) much longer than I had
foreseen. As regards musical matters, the presence of Rossini,
whom I frequently see, gives a certain impetus to this country. I
have been singularly well received here, so I shall probably pass
the greater part of the winter here, and shall not start for
Venice till towards the beginning of March. Thence I shall go to
Florence and Rome, where I expect I shall stay a good long time.

D. has no doubt talked to you of our stay at Nohant last summer.
I think that he got rid there of a good many old prejudices about
me. It was a sweet satisfaction to me to learn through him how
good and indulgent you have been towards me on several occasions,
even so far as to contradict and defend me warmly against him and
against others who knew me still less. I had charged our secret
friend to defend me in his turn from a slight wrong which I had,
only apparently, committed, but even "apparently" is too much,
and I think I have entirely justified myself with regard to it. I
don't know whether in his noble carelessness he will have thought
of it. However that may be, I shall always count on your paternal
affection more than all the rest.

What can I say to you of Italy that you do not know, and that you
have not said in such manner as to cause despair for ever to the
makers of observations!--It is always the same status quo, the
excellent and perfectly happy government that you know.--I am
hoping and longing ardently for your next book [probably "Le
Livre du Peuple": Paris, 1837], which I shall read with my whole
heart and soul, as I have read all that you have written for four
years. I shall owe you just so many more good and noble emotions.
Will they remain for ever sterile? Will my life be for ever
tainted with this idle uselessness which weighs upon me? Will the
hour of devotion and of manly action never come? Am I condemned
without respite to this trade of a Merry Andrew and to amuse in
drawing-rooms?

Whatever may be my poor and humble destiny, do not ever doubt my
heart. Do not ever doubt the deep respect and unalterable
devotion with which you have inspired me.

Yours for ever,

F. Liszt

Como, December 18th, 1837



12. To Breitkopf and Hartel in Leipzig

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Hermann Scholtz,
Kammervirtuoso in Dresden.]

I thank you much, gentlemen, for the obliging letter that you
have written me. Up to the present time I have had none but the
most pleasant business relations with Mr. Hofmeister, who has the
kindness to publish the greater part of my works in Germany. As I
do not know very much of the laws which regulate literary and
musical proprietorship in Saxony, I had spoken to him about the
Beethoven Symphonies, of which I have undertaken the arrangement,
or, more correctly speaking, the pianoforte score. To tell the
truth, this work has, nevertheless, cost me some trouble; whether
I am right or wrong, I think it sufficiently different from, not
to say superior to, those of the same kind which have hitherto
appeared. The recent publication of the same Symphonies, arranged
by Mr. Kalkbrenner, makes me anxious that mine should not remain
any longer in a portfolio. I intend also to finger them
carefully, which, in addition to the indication of the different
instruments (which is important in this kind of work), will most
certainly make this edition much more complete. If, then, as I
imagine, it is impossible for Mr. Hofmeister to publish them, I
shall be very grateful if you will undertake it. The reputation
of your house is European, and I perfectly remember having had
the pleasure of seeing Mr. Raymond Hartel in Paris. It will be a
pleasure to me to conclude this little business with you, at the
rate of eight francs a page. Up to the present time I have only
finished three Symphonies (that in A major), but I could promise
to let you have the others successively, according as you might
wish, or I could limit my work to the four most important
Symphonies (if I may express my opinion), namely, the Pastoral, C
minor, A major, and the Eroica. I think those are the ones which
are most effective on the piano.

I start tomorrow for Vienna, where I expect to remain till the
end of April. Please address to me to the care of Mr. Tobias
Haslinger till the 25th of April, and after that to Mr. Ricordi,
Milan, who has undertaken to forward me all my letters while I am
in Italy. My compliments and affectionate thanks.

F. Liszt



13. To Robert Schumann

[Addressed to the celebrated German Tone-poet (1810-1856). Liszt
had spoken of Schumann's Op. 5, 11, and 14 in the Gazette
Musicale, 1837, with equal enthusiasm and understanding, which
soon brought the two together.]

[Without a date; received by R. S. May 5th, 1838.]

My dear Monsieur Schumann,

I shall not attempt to tell you how grateful and touched I am by
your friendly letter. Mademoiselle Wieck, whom I have been so
happy as to meet here, will express to you, better than I can,
all the sympathy, all the admiring affection I have for you. I
have been such a nomad latterly that the pieces you were kind
enough to address to me at Milan only reached me on the eve of my
departure from Venice about a fortnight ago; and since then we
have been talking so much of you, day and night, that it hardly
occurred to me to write to you. Today, however, to my great
astonishment, I get a fresh token of your friendly remembrance,
and I certainly will not delay thanking you many times for it, so
I have just left a charming party of very pretty women in order
to write these few lines to you. But the truth is you need hardly
thank me for this little sacrifice, for it is a great pleasure to
me to be able to have a little chat with you.

The "Carneval" and the "Fantasiestucke" have interested me
excessively. I play them really with delight, and God knows that
I can't say as much of many things. To speak frankly and freely,
it is absolutely only Chopin's compositions and yours that have a
powerful interest for me.

The rest do not deserve the honor of being mentioned...at least,
with a few exceptions,--to be conciliatory, like Eusebius.

In six weeks to two months I shall send you my twelve Studies and
a half-dozen of "Fantasiestucke" ("Impressions et Poemes")--I
consider them less bad than others of my making. I shall be happy
to think that they do not displease you.

May I confess to you that I was not very much struck with
Henselt's Studies, and that I found them not up to their
reputation? I don't know whether you share my opinion, but they
appear to me, on the whole, very careless. They are pretty to
listen to, they are very pretty to look at, the effect is
excellent, the edition (thanks to our friend Hofmeister) is most
carefully done; but, all counted, I question whether H. is
anything but a distinguished mediocrity. [How highly Liszt
thought, later on, of Henselt's Concerto and other of his
compositions is well known, and is spoken of in a subsequent
letter to Baroness Wrangel, in May, 1883.] For the rest, he is
very young, and will doubtless develop. Let us, at least, hope
so.

I am extremely sorry that I cannot come and pay you a little
visit at Leipzig at present. It is one of my keenest desires to
make your personal acquaintance and to pass some days with you.
But as that is not possible now, let us, at least, try not to be
entirely separated, and let us combat, as far as we can, the
laziness about writing, which is, I think, equally in us both.

In a fortnight I am returning to Venice. I shall be back in Milan
at the time of the coronation (towards the end of August). Next
winter I expect to pass in Rome, if the cholera or some other
plague does not stop it. I will not induce you to come to Italy.
Your sympathies would be too deeply wounded there. If they have
even heard that Beethoven and Weber ever existed, it is as much
as they have done.

Will you not have what you have sent me printed? Haslinger would
have it gladly, I think, and it would be a great pleasure to me
to see my name associated with yours.

If I might make a request, I would ask you to write some trios,
or a quintet or septet. It seems to me that you would do that
admirably, and for a long time nothing remarkable in that line
has been published. If ever you determine to do so, let me know
at once, as I should be anxious to have the honor of making them
known to the public. Adieu, my dear Monsieur Schumann; keep me
always in affectionate remembrance, and accept once more my warm
sympathy and devotion.

F. Liszt



14. To the "Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde" in Vienna

[Society of Musical Dilettanti, or Amateur Musical Society.
Autograph in the Archives of the Society in Vienna]

Gentlemen,

I am extremely grateful for the honor you have done me in
admitting me among you as a member of the Vienna Musik-Verein
[Musical Union]. I cannot, unfortunately, flatter myself that I
have as yet deserved this distinction, but allow me to say that
it will not be my fault if I do not become worthy of it.

If ever the occasion should offer in which I can be agreeable or
useful to the Society of the Musik-Verein, be assured that I
shall gladly avail myself of it, and that you will henceforth
have a claim on my gratitude and devotion.

I have the honor to be, gentlemen,

Yours faithfully,

F. Liszt

Venice, June 1st, 1838



15. To Simon Lowy in Vienna

[Autograph in the possession of Herr O. A. Schulz, bookseller in
Leipzig.--Addressed to a Vienna banker, an intimate friend of
Liszt The "Soirees de Vienne," composed on Schubert Valses, are
dedicated to him.]

I am very sensible, my dear sir, of your friendly remembrance.
Your kind letter found me in the midst of the official hurly-
burly of the coronation fetes. What business on earth had I to do
with such an affair? I have not the least idea. Thank Heaven we
are now at the end of it all, safe and sound, rejoicing, and
sated with amusement!

I found at Milan a certain number of my Vienna connections. One
or two of the persons whom you will not mention to me (and whose
anonymity I respect) were also there. I know that a great many of
the people who approach me with a smile on their lips, and
protestations of friendship on their tongues, have nothing better
to do than to pull me to pieces as best they can as soon as they
are outside my door. It is, moreover, the fate of all the world.
I resign myself to it willingly, as I do to all the absurd and
odious necessities of this lower world. There is, besides, just
this much good in these sad experiences of various relations with
men--which is, that one learns to relish and appreciate better
the devotion of the few friends whom chance has thrown in your
path.

In a few days from now I shall start for Bologna, Florence, and
Rome. In spite of all my desire to return to Vienna, where people
have been so kind and indulgent to me, I do not yet see when I
shall be able to get there. However this journey may be put off,
I hope, nevertheless, my dear sir, that you will continue till
then the affectionate feelings you so kindly entertain towards
me. Receive in return my assurances of consideration and
affectionate devotion.

F. Liszt

Milan, September 22nd, 1838

Will you be so good as to give the enclosed note to the charming
woman who is good enough to remember me so kindly?



16. To M. Pacini, Music Publisher in Paris

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.]

My Dear Monsieur Pacini,

In two or three days at latest from now you will receive the
manuscript for which you asked me for the book of the Hundred and
One. [A collective work with contributions by celebrities of the
day.] Mr. Hugot has kindly undertaken to bring it to you.

As the title implies, it is an Etude (di Bravura) after Paganini.
[Bravura Studies on Paganini's Capricci, arranged for the
pianoforte, brought out by Haslinger, Vienna, in 1839. A second,
newly arranged edition, dedicated to Clara Schumann, "Grandes
Etudes de Paganini," was brought out by Breitkopf and Hartel in
1851.] You will oblige me by recommending the engraver to engrave
it very spaciously. In addition, you had better, I think, reprint
directly afterwards this Etude facilitee, which I have also sent
you. This second arrangement is by M. Schumann, a young composer
of very great merit. It is more within the reach of the general
public, and also more exact than my paraphrase.

Many apologies for having kept you waiting so long for such a
small thing, and kind remembrances to Emilien.

Yours affectionately,

F. Liszt

Please send the corrected proofs of this study to Haslinger,
musical editor to the Court, at Graben, Vienna.

I must have at least two corrected proofs. Prego! Prego!! [I
beg!] leave only such mistakes as are absolutely necessary in
order that an edition may be supposed to be correct.

Padua, September 30th, 1838



17. To Breitkopf and Hartel.

[This is the first of the Liszt letters extant in the archives of
the firm.]

I am really grieved, gentlemen, at the trouble you have been good
enough to take about these unlucky Symphonies, and I hardly know
how to express my acknowledgments. As I have already had the
honor of telling you, Mr. Mori had been previously engaged to
publish these Symphonies, and, as the steps you have taken have
not been crowned with success, I will keep to this first
publisher, with whom I have every reason to be satisfied up to
now.

You can then publish this work in two or three months from now.
[Pianoforte scores of the C minor and Pastoral Symphonies of
Beethoven.] Only it is essential that I should correct the last
proof, so that the edition may be absolutely correct. I also wish
to add the fingering to several passages, to make them easier for
amateurs. Be so good, therefore, as to send me, through the
Embassy (or by any other opportunity which is not too expensive),
two proofs to Rome, where I shall be in about twelve days, and
where I expect to remain till the middle of March.

I hope, gentlemen, that you will not have cause to regret the
obliging advances that you have made to me in this matter, and
for which I am sincerely grateful to you. If you will be so good
as to add to the proofs of the Beethoven Symphonies such of the
songs of Beethoven (or Weber) as you would like me to transcribe
for piano solo, I will then give you a positive answer as to that
little work, which I shall be delighted to do for you, but to
which I cannot assent beforehand, not knowing of which songs you
are the proprietors. If "Leyer und Schwert" was published by you,
I will do that with pleasure. I think that these songs, or at any
rate four or five of them, would be rather satisfactory for the
piano.

Accept, gentlemen, the expression of my high esteem.

F. Liszt

Florence, January 3rd, 1839



18. To Princess Christine Belgiojoso in Paris

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
Addressed to the celebrated writer and patriot. In 1837 a charity
concert took place in her salons, at which Liszt and Thalberg
both played.]

It would be self-conceit in me, Princess, to complain of your
silence. Your letters have always been for me a favor, a charm. I
am not meaning to say that I have the slightest right to them.
Nevertheless, as you do not reply to me any more, I hope you will
at least permit me to tell you how very much I feel the very
slightest marks of your kindness, and what a price I set upon
your remembrance.

Some numbers of the Gazette or Revue Musicale, which have
accidentally fallen into my hands at the house of one of my
Russian friends (for in this happy country of the Arts, and of
music in particular, you can well imagine that no one is foolish
enough to spend a thirty francs' subscription on the Revue
Musicale), have informed me that you had decidedly raised altar
for altar, and made your charming salon echo with magnificent
harmonies. I confess that this is perhaps the one regret of my
winter. I should so immensely have liked to be there to admire
you, to applaud you. Several people who had the honor of being
present at these choice evenings have spoken to me about them
with enthusiasm.

What a contrast to the tiresome musical soliloquies (I do not
know what other name to give to this invention of mine) with
which I contrived to gratify the Romans, and which I am quite
capable of importing to Paris, so unbounded does my impudence
become! Imagine that, wearied with warfare, not being able to
compose a programme which would have common sense, I have
ventured to give a series of concerts all by myself, affecting
the Louis XIV. style, and saying cavalierly to the public, "The
concert is--myself." For the curiosity of the thing I copy one of
the programmes of the soliloquies for you:--

1. Overture to William Tell, performed by M. L.

2. Reminiscences of the Puritani. Fantaisie composed and
performed by the above-mentioned!

3. Etudes and fragments by the same to the same!

4. Improvisation on themes given--still by the same. And that was
all; neither more nor less, except lively conversation during the
intervals, and enthusiasm if there was room for it.

A propos of enthusiasm, I ought at least to talk to you of St.
Peter's. That is the proper thing to do when one writes from
Rome. But, in the first place, I am writing to you from Albano,
whence I can only discern the dome, and, secondly, this poor St.
Peter's has been so disguised, so embellished by papier-mache
wreaths, horrid curtains at alcoves, etc., etc., all in honor of
the five or six last saints whom His Holiness has canonised, that
I try to put away the recollection of it. Happily there have not
been any workers of miracles to glorify at the Coliseum and the
Campo Vaccino, otherwise it would have been impossible to live in
Rome.

If nothing occurs to prevent it, I expect to pass the end of next
winter (March and April) in Paris. Will you permit me then to
fill up all the gaps in my correspondence from the Rue d'Anjou?
[Here the Princess lived.] I count always upon your friendly and
indulgent kindness. But shall you extend this so far as to give
me a sign of life before the close of my stay in Italy? I do not
know. In any case, letters addressed poste restante, Florence,
will reach me till the 1st of next September.

I beg you, Madame la Princesse, to accept the expression of my
profound and most devoted respect.

F. Liszt

Albano, June 4th, 1839

Will you be good enough to remember me affectionately to (Madame)
your sister and to Mr. d'Aragon?



19. To Robert Schumann

[From a copy from the Royal Library in Berlin.]

Albano, June 5th, 1839

My dear Monsieur Schumann,

At the risk of appearing very monotonous, I must again tell you
that the last pieces you were so kind as to send me to Rome
appear to me admirable both in inspiration and composition. The
"Fantaisie" dedicated to me is a work of the highest kind--and I
am really proud of the honor you have done me in dedicating to me
so grand a composition.

Op. 17, C dur. With the motto:--

"Durch alle Tone tonet
Im bunten Erdentraum
Ein leiser Ton gezogen
Fur den, der heimlich lauschet."

("Through all the sounds of nature,
In earth's fair dream of joy,
An under-current soundeth
For him whose ears can hear."]

I mean, therefore, to work at it and penetrate it through and
through, so as to make the utmost possible effect with it.

As to the "Kinderscenen," I owe to them one of the greatest
pleasures of my life. You know, or you don't know, that I have a
little girl of three years old, whom everybody agrees in
considering angelic (did you ever hear such a commonplace?). Her
name is Blandine-Rachel, and her surname Moucheron. [Pet name;
literally, "little fly."] It goes without saying that she has a
complexion of roses and milk, and that her fair golden hair
reaches to her feet just like a savage. She is, however, the most
silent child, the most sweetly grave, the most philosophically
gay in the world. I have every reason to hope also that she will
not be a musician, from which may Heaven preserve her!

Well, my dear Monsieur Schumann, two or three times a week (on
fine and good days!) I play your "Kinderscenen" to her in the
evening; this enchants her, and me still more, as you may
imagine, so that often I go over the first repeat twenty times
without going any further. Really I think you would be satisfied
with this success if you could be a witness of it!

I think I have already expressed to you, in one of my former
letters, the desire I felt to see you write some ensemble pieces,
Trios, Quintets, or Septets. Will you pardon me for pressing this
point again? It seems to me that you would be more capable of
doing it than any one else nowadays. And I am convinced that
success, even commercial success, would not be wanting.

If between now and next winter you could complete some ensemble
work, it would be a real pleasure to me to make it known in
Paris, where that sort of composition, when well played, has more
chance of success than you perhaps think. I would even gladly
undertake to find a publisher for it, if you liked, which would
moreover in no wise prevent you from disposing of it for Germany.

In the interim I mean to play in public your "Carnaval," and some
of the "Davidsbundlertanze" and of the "Kinderscenen." The
"Kreisleriana," and the "Fantaisie" which is dedicated to me, are
more difficult of digestion for the public. I shall reserve them
till later.

Up to the present time I only know the following works of
yours:--

Impromptus on a theme by Clara Wieck.
Pianoforte Sonata, dedicated to Clara.
Concerto without orchestra.
"Etudes Symphoniques"
"Davidsbundlertanze"
"Kreisleriana."
"Carnaval."
"Kinderscenen" and my "Fantaisie."

If you would have the kindness to complete your works to me it
would be a great pleasure to me; I should like to have them bound
all together in three or four volumes. Haslinger, on his side,
will send you my Etudes and my other publications as they come
out.

What you tell me of your private life has interested and touched
me deeply. If I could, I know not how, be in the least pleasant
or useful to you in these circumstances, dispose of me as you
will. Whatever happens, count on my absolute discretion and
sincere devotion. If I am not asking too much, tell me if it is
Clara of whom you speak. But if this question should seem to you
misplaced, do not answer it.

Have you met at Leipzig Mr. Frank, [Dr. Hermann Frank edited
Brockhaus' Allgemeine Zeitung for a year.] at the present moment
editor of the Leipzig Allgemeine Zeitung? From the little I know
of him (for he has been much more intimate with Chopin and Hiller
than with me) I think he is capable of understanding you. He has
left a charming impression behind him in Rome. If you see him,
give him my affectionate regards.

My plans remain the same. I still intend to be in Vienna at the
beginning of December, and in Paris at the end of February. I
shall be capable of coming to look you up in Leipzig if you will
let me make the journey from Paris with you. Try! Adieu, my dear
Monsieur Schumann; write soon (address care of Ricordi, Florence:
I shall be in the neighborhood of Lucca till the middle of
September), and depend always on my sincere esteem and lively
affection.

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt



20. To Breitkopf and Hartel

[Milan, June, 1839]

Gentleman,

About three weeks ago I gave to Mr. Ricordi (who was on his way
to Rome) the proofs of the two Symphonies you addressed to me. I
hope they have reached you by now. Forgive me for having kept
them so long, and also for having corrected them with so much
care. But, firstly, they did not reach me till about the 20th of
February, and then I did not know how to send them to you direct,
for the diligences in this happy country are so insecure. I am
therefore of necessity (though very unwillingly) behindhand.

Allow me to ask you for a second proof (for it is of great
consequence to me that the edition should be as correct as
possible), and this time I will beg you to send me three proofs
of each Symphony, so that I may forward one to Paris and the
other to London. Probably there will not be any more corrections
to make in this second proof, and in that case I will let you
know in two words (without returning your proof), telling you at
the same time the date of publication.

My intention being to visit Vienna, Munich, and perhaps Leipzig
at the beginning of next year (before going to England in the
month of April), I shall take advantage of this opportunity to
let the Symphonies be heard at my concerts, so as to give them a
certain publicity.

I have looked through the Lieder you have been good enough to
send me. I shall certainly do the "Adelaide," however difficult
it may seem to me to transcribe simply and elegantly. As regards
the others, I am afraid I cannot find the necessary time.
Moreover, that good Haslinger overwhelms me with Schubert. I have
just sent him twenty-four more new songs ("Schwanengesang" and
"Winterreise"), and for the moment I am rather tired with this
work.

Would you be so kind as to send me, at the same time with the
proofs of the Beethoven Symphonies, Mr. Mendelssohn's "Preludes
and Fugues"? It is an extremely remarkable work, and it has been
impossible to get it in Italy. I shall be greatly obliged if you
will send it me.

When you see Mr. Schumann please remember me very kindly to him.
I have received the "Fantaisie" which he has done me the honor to
dedicate to me, and the "Kinderscenen." Don't you think you ought
to publish a book of Studies by him? I should be extremely
curious to make acquaintance with them. All his works interest me
in a high degree. It would be difficult for me to say as much of
many of the compositions of my respected colleagues, with some
exceptions.

I beg to remain, Gentlemen,

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Address the Symphonies to Mr. Ricordi, Florence. From the 15th of
June till the 1st of September I shall be in the neighborhood of
Lucca. Ricordi's address is the safest.



21. To the Beethoven Committee at Bonn

[Printed in L. Ramann's Biography of Liszt, vol. 1]

Gentlemen,

As the subscription for Beethoven's monument is only getting on
slowly, and as the carrying out of this undertaking seems to be
rather far distant, I venture to make a proposal to you, the
acceptance of which would make me very happy. [In Bonn,
Beethoven's birthplace, a committee had been formed to erect a
Beethoven monument. Yet, in spite of the assent which met the
proposal, the contributions flowed in so meagrely--Paris, for
example, contributed only 424 francs 90 centimes--that Liszt, on
reading this in a paper, immediately formed the noble resolution
mentioned in the above letter. "Such a niggardly almsgiving, got
together with such trouble and sending round the hat, must not be
allowed to help towards building our Beethoven's monument!" he
wrote to Berlioz. Thus the German nation has in great measure to
thank Franz Liszt for the monument erected to its greatest
composer at Bonn.]

I offer myself to make up, from my own means, the sum still
wanting for the erection of the monument, and ask no other
privilege than that of naming the artist who shall execute the
work. That artist is Bartolini of Florence, who is universally
considered the first sculptor in Italy.

I have spoken to him about the matter provisionally, and he
assures me that a monument in marble (which would cost about
fifty to sixty thousand francs) could be finished in two years,
and he is ready to begin the work at once. I have the honor to
be, etc.,

Franz Liszt

Pisa, October 3rd, 1839



22. To Count Leo Festetics in Pest

[Printed in F. von Schober's "Letters about Liszt's Sojourn in
Hungary."]

Dear Count,

Shall you like to have me again at Pest this year? I know not. In
any case you are threatened with my presence from the 18th to the
22nd of next December. I shall come to you a little older, a
little more matured, and, permit me to say, more finished an
artist, than I was when you saw me last year, for since that time
I have worked enormously in Italy. I hope you have kept me in
remembrance, and that I may always count on your friendship,
which is dear to me.

What joy, what an immense happiness it will be to be once more in
my own country, to feel myself surrounded by such noble and
vigorous sympathies, which, thank God, I have done nothing to
forfeit in my distant and wandering life. What feelings, what
emotions will then fill my breast! All this, dear Count, I will
not attempt to express to you, for in truth I should not know
how. Let it suffice you to know that the love of my country, of
my chivalrous and grand country, has ever lived most deeply in my
heart; and that, if unhappily it does not seem likely that I can
ever show to my country what a love and devotion I feel for it,
the sentiments will remain none the less unchanged in my heart.

But I will not tire you any longer with myself and my sentiments.

I forgot to tell you that for nearly a week I have been confined
to my bed with a very severe fever, which might easily have
become more serious still. My second concert was obliged to be
put off on account of it. Today my doctor has given me permission
to play on Wednesday. I don't really know whether I shall be able
to do it, for my hand trembles fearfully. Excuse this horrible
writing, but I did want to send you a few words. It is a sort of
anticipation of Pest, which is sweet to me.

A revoir then very soon, dear Count; meanwhile believe me, as
ever, yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

November 24th, 1839, in bed



23. To Clara Wieck

[The great pianist, afterwards Schumann's wife.]

Pest, December 25th, 1839

How grateful I am, Mademoiselle, for the kind remembrance you
keep of me! And how much I am already rejoicing at the thought of
seeing you and hearing you again soon in Leipzig! I was so vexed
not to be in Paris last winter when I knew you were going to
spend some time there. Perhaps I should have been able to be of
some little use to you there. You know that, at all times and in
every country, I shall always be at your service. I should become
too lengthy if I allowed myself to reply in detail to your kind
questions about my new compositions. I worked immensely hard in
Italy. Without exaggeration I think I have written four to five
hundred pages of pianoforte music. If you have patience to hear
half a quarter of them I shall be delighted to play them to you,
so so.

The "Studies after Paganini," which are dedicated to you, will
only appear in two months' time; but I will bring you the proofs,
which have long been corrected, to Leipzig.

Once more many thanks, and many tender and respectful wishes for
everything that can contribute to your happiness. And above all a
bientot.

Yours in admiration and sympathy,

F. Liszt



24. To Robert Schumann in Leipzig

[Autograph in the Royal Library in Berlin.]

Dresden, March 27th, 1840

My dear Schumann,

It is all splendid. Only I should prefer to play the "Hexameron"
last, so as to finish with orchestra. Please, therefore, have the
"Etudes" and the "Carnaval" put after the Mendelssohn Concerto!
[Refers to Liszt's third concert in Leipzig, on March 30th, 1840,
for the benefit of the Orchestral Pension Fund.]

Best remembrances to Mendelssohn and Hiller; and believe me yours
ever,

F. Liszt

I shall certainly return Monday morning, for on Sunday I am
giving a concert for the poor here. But if it should de possible
for me to come on Sunday...but I doubt it. [Together with this
letter a friend, Carl K[ragen?], writes to Schumann: "He [Liszt]
has played me the glorious Mendelssohn Concerto. It was divine!
Tomorrow Tieck is to read Faust for Liszt at my mother's house,
and Liszt is to play at our house with Lipinski!, Do come for it!
Ah, if you could only induce Mendelssohn and his wife to come
too!"]



25. To Franz von Schober in Vienna

[The autographs of all the letters in this collection to Schober
are in the possession of Fran Babette Wolf at Dresden.-Addressed
to the poet and writer, an intimate and worthy friend of Franz
Schubert. He became Councillor of Legation to Weimar, and died at
Dresden in 1882.]

Metz, April 3rd, 1840

I did not get any news from you at Leipzig, dear Schober, as I
expected. I am afraid I was very indiscreet in asking you to be
so good as to undertake this work, which I should have valued so
much, coming from you. [In answer to the distorted reports in
various newspapers of Liszt's visit to Hungary (January, 1840),
Schober, who had been an eyewitness, thought it right to clear up
the misrepresentations, which he did in the form of "Letters
about Liszt's Sojourn in Hungary"; these he published, but much
later (Berlin, Schlesinger, 1843)] But I will not speak of it any
more. If by any chance you have already done it I should be
grateful to you to send it me--otherwise we will not speak of it
any more.

Do you know that I have been pursued by one constant regret
during my journey, the regret not to have induced you to
accompany me? Your society has always been beneficial and
strengthening to me: I do not know why, but I imagine that we
should live smoothly together. Your qualities, your faults (if
you have any), your character and temper, all please me and
attach me to you. You know that I flatter myself I can understand
and appreciate you...Should you see any great difficulty in
joining me somewhere next autumn-at Venice, for example--and in
making a European tour with me? Answer me frankly on this matter.
And once more, the question of money need not be considered. As
long as we are together (and I should like you to have at least
three free years before you) my purse will be yours, on the sole
condition that you consent to undertake the management of our
expenses,--and that you are thoroughly convinced beforehand of
the gratitude I shall feel towards you.

Excuse me, my dear good friend, for entering so plainly into
matters, but we have talked together too openly, it seems to me,
for it to be possible that your delicate feeling on certain
points should be wounded by this.

I have sent back Kiss, of Dresden. He is a good fellow, but a
little awkward, and wanting in a certain point of honor, without
which a man is not a man as I understand the word. So I am alone
now, and am not going to have any one tacked on to me. A former
pupil of mine, Monsieur Hermann, has undertaken to arrange my
concerts, which is a great relief to me. A propos of concerts, I
gave six (in nine days!) at Prague, three at Dresden, and the
same number at Leipzig (in twelve days)--so I am perfectly tired
out, and feel great need of rest. That was good, wasn't it?
Adieu, my dear good friend-let me hear from you soon (address 19,
Rue Pigalle, Paris), and depend entirely upon me--nunc et semper.

Yours ever sincerely,

F. Liszt

Will you be so good as to go to Diabelli's [Music publisher in
Vienna] when you pass by, and advise him again not to publish the
third part of the Hungarian Melodies (which I sent him by Hartel)
without first sending me a proof to Paris to correct. Adieu.

Best remembrances to Kriehuber [A well-known Vienna painter and
lithographer, from whom a number of Liszt portraits have come.]
and Lowy. Why does not the latter write to me?



26. To Maurice Schlesinger, Editor of the Gazette Musicale in
Paris

[Given by L. Ramann, "Franz Liszt," vol. ii., i.]

Sir,

Allow me to protest against an inexact assertion in your last
number but one:--

"Messieurs Liszt and Cramer have asked for the Legion of Honor,"
etc.

I do not know if M. Cramer (who has just been nominated) has
obtained the cross.

In any case I think that you, like every one else, will approve
of a nomination so perfectly legitimate.

As to myself, if it be true that my name has figured in the list
of candidates, this can only have occurred entirely without my
knowledge. It has always seemed to me that distinctions of this
sort could only be accepted, but never "asked for."

I am, sir, etc.,

F. Liszt

London, May 14th, 1840



27. To Franz von Schober

[London, May or June, 1840]

My worthy friend,

A fortnight ago my mother wrote me word that she had given
several letters, which had come for me from Germany, to a
gentleman who was to bring them to me to London. I suppose there
was one from you among the number, but up to now I have not
received anything.

Allow me to repeat once more the request, which I have already
made to you, to come for some time with me (a year or two, and
more if you can); for I feel deeply that, the more we are
separated by time and space, the more my thoughts and my heart go
out to you. I have rarely felt this so strongly, and my wish to
feel you settled with me grows daily stronger.

Moreover the persuasion that I feel that we should pass a happy
and serious life together, makes me again press you further.

Try then to be at liberty as soon as possible, and once for all
make a frank and friendly resolve. I assure you that it will not
be difficult to ameliorate, by each other, our two lives, which
in their different ways are sad and bad thus separated.

Let me have two words in reply on this point--which, to tell the
truth, is the only important one for us both at this moment.
Speak quite freely to me, and depend on me thoroughly.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Address care of Erard, 18, Great Marlborough Street.

Need I again assure you that any question will not be a question
between us?



28. To Franz von Schober

Stonehenge, Salisbury, August 29th, 1840

It is with an unspeakable feeling of sadness and vexation that I
write to you today, my dear good friend! Your letter had done me
so much good; I was so happy at the thought of our meeting at the
end of the autumn at latest; I wanted so to feel that I could
rest on your arm, and that your heart, so full of kindness and
brotherly help, was near me,--and, lo and behold! I am obliged to
give it up, or at least to put it off...

An unfortunate engagement which I have just renewed, and which
will keep me in England till the end of January, makes it
impossible for me to say to you the one word which I wish to say,
"Come!"--

England is not like any other country; the expenses are enormous.
I really dare not ask you to travel with me here, for it would
almost ruin us. Moreover we should hardly be able to be together,
for I have three or four compulsory companions, from whom it is
impossible for me to separate. I hoped to have done with all that
by the beginning of October, but now I have to begin again in the
middle of November. If I have time to make my journey to Russia
this year it will be the utmost I can do, but it is a journey
that I am in a way obliged to make after the gracious invitation
of Her Majesty the Empress at Ems. On the 15th of next May I
return again to London, probably by the steamer coming direct
from St. Petersburg.

Where shall I find you in a year--fifteen months? It is very
possible that I shall come and look for you in Vienna, but then I
shall assuredly not leave without taking you with me.

I have some thoughts of spending the following winter at
Constantinople. I am tired of the West; I want to breathe
perfumes, to bask in the sun, to exchange the smoke of coal for
the sweet smoke of the narghileh [Turkish pipe]. In short, I am
pining for the East! O my morning land! O my Aborniko!--

My uncle writes that you have been very good and obliging to him.
I thank you warmly.--Do you meet Castelli from time to time? When
you see him beg him from me to translate the article I published
in the Paris "Revue Musicale" (of August 23rd) on Paganini, and
to get it put into the "Theater-Zeitung". I should be very glad
also if it could be translated into Hungarian, for the Hirnok
(excuse me if I make a mess of the word!), but I do not know who
could do it.

A propos of Hungarian! I shall always value highly the work on my
sojourn in Pest. Send it me as soon as you possibly can, and
address it to Madame la Comtesse d'Agoult, 10, Rue Neuve des
Mathurins, Paris. Most affectionate remembrances to Kriehuber.
His two portraits of me have been copied in London. They are
without doubt the best.

Adieu, my dear excellent Schober. In my next letter I shall ask
you about a matter of some consequence. It is about a Cantata for
Beethoven, which I should like to set to music and to have it
given at the great Festival which we expect to organize in 1842
for the inauguration of the Statue at Bonn.

Yours ever most affectionately,

F. Liszt



29. To Buloz

[Published in Ramann's "Franz Liszt," vol. ii., I.]

Editor of the Revue des Deux Mondes.

Sir,

In your Revue Musicale for October last my name was mixed up with
the outrageous pretensions and exaggerated success of some
executant artists; I take the liberty to address a few remarks to
you on this subject. [The enthusiastic demonstrations which had
been made to him in Hungary, his native land, had been put into a
category with the homage paid to singers and dancers, and the
bestowal of the sabre had been turned into special ridicule.
Liszt repelled this with justifiable pride.]

The wreaths thrown at the feet of Mesdemoiselles Elssler and
Pixis by the amateurs of New York and Palermo are striking
manifestations of the enthusiasm of a public; the sabre which was
given to me at Pest is a reward given by a NATION in an entirely
national form. In Hungary, sir, in that country of antique and
chivalrous manners, the sabre has a patriotic signification. It
is the special token of manhood; it is the weapon of every man
who has a right to carry a weapon. When six of the chief men of
note in my country presented me with it among the general
acclamations of my compatriots, whilst at the same moment the
towns of Pest and Oedenburg conferred upon me the freedom of the
city, and the civic authorities of Pest asked His Majesty for
letters of nobility for me, it was an act to acknowledge me
afresh as a Hungarian, after an absence of fifteen years; it was
a reward of some slight services rendered to Art in my country;
it was especially, and so I felt it, to unite me gloriously to
her by imposing on me serious duties, and obligations for life as
man and as artist.

I agree with you, sir, that it was, without doubt, going far
beyond my deserts up to the present time. Therefore I saw in that
solemnity the expression of a hope far more than of a
satisfaction. Hungary hailed in me the man from whom she expects
artistic illustriousness, after all the illustrious soldiers and
politicians she has so plentifully produced. As a child I
received from my country precious tokens of interest, and the
means of going abroad to develop my artistic vocation. When grown
up, and after long years, the young man returns to bring her the
fruits of his work and the future of his will, the enthusiasm of
the hearts which open to receive him and the expression of a
national joy must not be confounded with the frantic
demonstrations of an audience of amateurs.

In placing these two things side by side it seems tome there is
something which must wound a just national pride and sympathies
by which I am honored.

Be so kind as to insert these few lines in your next issue, and
believe me, sir,

Yours obediently,

Franz Liszt

Hamburg, October 26th, 1840



30. To Franz von Schober

I will write German to you, dear Schober, in order to tell you
all the quicker how much your letter pleased me. I have to thank
it for a really happy hour; and that comes so rarely in my
intolerable, monotonous life! For a fortnight past I have again
put my neck into the English yoke. Every day which God gives--a
concert, with a journey, previously, of thirty to fifty miles.
And so it must continue at least till the end of January. What do
you say to that?--

If I am not more than half-dead, I must still go at the end of
February to Berlin and Petersburg,--and come back to London by
the first steamer at the beginning of May. Then I think I shall
take a rest. Where and how I do not yet know, and it depends
entirely upon the Pecuniary results of my journeys. I should like
to go to Switzerland, and thence to Venice, but I can't yet say
anything definite.

.--. I have today written a long letter to Leo Festetics. I am
hungering and thirsting to go back to Hungary. Every recollection
of it has taken deep root in my soul...And yet I cannot go back!

I am grieved that you can tell me nothing better of Lannoy. I
cannot understand how that is possible. The news of the Queen has
given me great pleasure--if you hear anything more about her let
me know. I have a kind of weakness for her.

About the Cantata I will write to you fully later.

Farewell, and be happy if possible, dear Schober; write again
soon, and remain ever my friend.

F. L.

Excuse the spelling and writing of these lines! You know that I
never write German; Tobias [Tobias Haslinger, the Vienna music
publisher.] is, I think, the only one who gets German letters
from me.

Manchester, December 5th, 1840



31. To Breitkopf and Hartel

London, May 7th, 1841

Schlesinger has just told me that Mendelssohn's Melodies which I
sent you from London have come out. I can't tell you, my dear Mr.
Hartel, how much I am put out by this precipitate publication.
Independently of the material wrong it does me (for before
sending them to you these Melodies were sold in London and
Paris), I am thus unable to keep my word to Beale and Richault,
who expected to publish them simultaneously with you.

The evil being irremediable I have only thought how to get a
prompt vengeance out of it. You will tell me later on if you
think it was really a Christian vengeance.

The matter is this: I have just added a tremendous cadenza, three
pages long, in small notes, and anentire Coda, almost as long, to
Beethoven's "Adelaide". I played it all without being hissed at
the concert given at the Paris Conservatoire for the Beethoven
Monument, and I intend to play it in London, and in Germany and
Russia. Schlesinger has printed all this medley, such as it is.
Will you do the same? In that case, as I care chiefly for your
edition, I will beg you to have the last Coda printed in small
notes as an Ossia, without taking away anything from the present
edition, so that the purists can play the integral text only, if
the commentary is displeasing to them.

It was certainly a very delicate matter to touch "Adelaide", and
yet it seemed to me necessary to venture. Have I done it with
propriety and taste? Competent judges will decide.

In any case I beg you not to let any one but Mr. Schumann look
over your edition.

In conclusion allow me to remind you that I was rather badly paid
for "Adelaide" formerly, and if you should think proper to send
me a draft on a London bank, fair towards you and myself, I shall
always receive it with a "new pleasure"--to quote the favorite
words of His Majesty the King of the French.

With kind regards, believe me, my dear sir, yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Be so kind as to remember me very affectionately to Mendelssohn.
As for Schumann, I shall write to him direct very shortly.



32. To Simon Lowy In Vienna

[Autograph in the possession of Madame Emilie Dore in Vienna.]

London, May 20th, 1841

I am still writing to you from England, my dear friend. Since my
last letter (end of December, I think) I have completed my tour
of the three kingdoms (by which I lose, by the way, 1000 pounds
sterling net, on 1500 pounds which my engagement brought me!),
have ploughed my way through Belgium, with which I have every
reason to be satisfied, and have sauntered about in Paris for six
weeks. This latter, I don't hide it from you, has been a real
satisfaction to my self-love. On arriving there I compared myself
(pretty reasonably, it seems to me) to a man playing ecarte for
the fifth point. Well, I have had king and vole,--seven points
rather than five! [The "fifth" is the highest in this game, so
Liszt means that he won.]

My two concerts alone, and especially the third, at the
Conservatoire, for the Beethoven Monument, are concerts out of
the ordinary run, such as I only can give in Europe at the
present moment.

The accounts in the papers can only have given you a very
incomplete idea. Without self-conceit or any illusion, I think I
may say that never has so striking an effect, so complete and so
irresistible, been produced by an instrumentalist in Paris.

A propos of newspapers, I am sending you, following this, the
article which Fetis (formerly my most redoubtable antagonist) has
just published in the "Gazette Musicale". It is written very
cleverly, and summarises the question well. If Fischhof [A
musician, a Professor at the Vienna Conservatorium.] translated
it for Bauerle [Editor of the Theater-Zeitung (Theatrical
Times).] it would make a good effect, I fancy. However, do what
you like with it.

I shall certainly be on the Rhine towards the end of July, and
shall remain in that neighborhood till September. If Fischhof
came there I should be delighted to see him and have a talk with
him. Till then give him my most affectionate compliments, and
tell him to write me a few lines before he starts.

In November I shall start for Berlin, and shall pass the whole of
next winter in Russia.

Haslinger's behaviour to me is more than inexcusable. The dear
man is doing a stupidity of which he will repent soon. Never
mind; I will not forget how devoted he was to me during my first
stay in Vienna.

Would you believe that he has not sent me a word in reply to four
consecutive letters I have written to him? If you pass by Graben
will you be so kind as to tell him that I shall not write to him
any more, but that I expect from him, as an honest man of
business, if not as a friend, a line to tell me the fate of two
manuscripts ("Hongroises," and "Canzone Veneziane") which I sent
him.

I have just discovered a new mine of "Fantaisies"--and I am
working it hard. "Norma," "Don Juan," "Sonnambula," "Maometto,"
and "Moise" heaped one on the top of the other, and "Freischutz"
and "Robert le Diable" are pieces of 96, and even of 200, like
the old canons of the Republic of Geneva, I think. When I have
positively finished my European tour I shall come and play them
to you in Vienna, and however tired they may be there of having
applauded me so much, I still feel the power to move this public,
so intelligent and so thoroughly appreciative,--a public which I
have always considered as the born judge of a pianist.

Adieu, my dear Lowy--write soon, and address, till June 15th, at
18, Great Marlborough Street, and after that Paris.

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Is the Ungher [Caroline Ungher, afterwards Ungher-Sabatier, a
celebrated singer.] at Vienna? Will you kindly give or send to
her the letter which follows?

Have you, yes or no, sent off the two amber pieces which I gave
you at the time of my departure? I have been to fetch them from
the Embassy, but they were not there. Let me have two words in
reply about this.



33. To Franz von Schober

Truly, dear friend, I should like pages, days, years, to answer
your dear letter. Seldom has anything touched me so deeply. Take
heart for heart, and soul for soul,--and let us be for ever
friends.

You know how I am daily getting more concise; therefore nothing
further about myself, nothing further about Berlin. Tomorrow,
Thursday, at 2 o'clock, I start for Petersburg.

I have spoken to A. It is impossible on both sides. When we meet
and you are perfectly calm, we will go into details. I still hope
to meet you next autumn, either in Florence or on the Rhine.

Leo [Count Festetics] has written to me again. Write to me at
once to Konigsberg, to tell me where to address my next letter to
you. But write directly-simply your address.

I have sent all the proofs of your pamphlet to Brockhaus. Be so
good as to give him direct your final orders in regard to this
publication. I shall be so pleased to have some copies of it
while I am in	 Petersburg. The subject is very congenial to
me; I thank you once more most warmly for it.

One more shake of the hand in Germany, dearest friend, and in
heartfelt love yours ever,

F. Liszt

Remember me kindly to Sabatier, [The husband of Caroline Ungher,
the celebrated singer previously mentioned.] and don't quarrel
with him about me. To Caroline always the same friendship and
devotion.

Berlin, March 3rd, 1842.



34. To the faculty of philosophy at the university of Konigsberg.

[Printed in L. Ramann's "Franz Liszt," vol. ii., I.]

Much Esteemed and Learned Gentlemen,

It is in vain for me to attempt to express to you the deep and
heartfelt emotion you have aroused in me by your rare mark of
honor. The dignity of Doctor, granted by a Faculty in which, as
in yours, men of European celebrity assemble, makes me happy, and
would make me proud, were I not also convinced of the sense in
which it is granted to me.

I repeat that, with the honorable name of Teacher of Music (and I
refer to music in its grand, complete, and ancient
signification), by which you, esteemed gentlemen, dignify me, I
am well aware that I have undertaken the duty of unceasing
learning and untiring labour.

In the constant fulfillment of this duty-to maintain the dignity
of Doctor in a right and worthy manner, by propagating in word
and deed the little portion of knowledge and technical skill
which I can call my own, as a form of, and a means to, the True
["The beautiful is the glory of the true, Art is the radiancy of
thought." (Author's note.)] and the Divine--

In the constant fulfillment of this duty, and in any results
which are granted to me, the remembrance of your good wishes, and
of the touching manner in which a distinguished member of your
Faculty [Professors Rosenkranz and Jacobi invested Liszt with the
Doctor's Diploma.] has informed me of them, will be a living
support to me.

Accept, gentlemen, the expression of my highest esteem and
respect.

F. Liszt

Mittau, March 18th, 1842



35. To Court-Marshal Freiherr von Spiegel at Weimar

[Given by L. Ramann, "Franz Liszt," vol. ii., 1.]

Monsieur le Baron,

It is very difficult to reply to so gracefully flattering a
letter as your Excellency has been good enough to write to me.

I must nevertheless say that I wish with all my heart and in all
ways that I could answer it. I shall reach Weimar, bag and
baggage, towards the middle of October, and if I succeed in
communicating to others a little of the satisfaction I cannot
fail to find there, thanks to the gracious kindness of their
Highnesses and the friendly readiness of your Excellency, I shall
be only too glad.

Meanwhile I beg to remain, Monsieur le Baron, with respectful
compliments,

Yours obediently,

Cologne; September 12th, 1862.	F. Liszt



36. To Carl Filitsch.

[Autograph in the possession of Count Albert Amadei in Vienna.--
Addressed to the talented young pianist, born at Hermannstadt in
the Siebenburgen in 1830, died at Venice 1845, studied with
Chopin and Liszt in Paris in 1842-43, and created a sensation
with his concerts both there and in London, Vienna, and Italy.
According to Lenz, Liszt said of him, "When the youngster goes
travelling I shall shut up shop!"]

Compiegne, Wednesday Morning [1842 or 1843].

Dearly beloved conjurer,

How sorry I am to disappoint [Literally. "to make a false skip,"
a play-of-words with the next sentence.] you of our usual lesson
tomorrow! Your "false skips" would be a great deal pleasanter to
me! but, unless we could manage to put you where we could hear
you from the towers of Notre Dame to the Cathedral of Cologne,
there is a material impossibility in continuing our sort of
lessons, considering that by tomorrow evening I shall already be
at Cologne.

If I return, or when I return--I really don't know. Whatever
happens, keep a little corner of remembrance of me, and believe
me ever yours affectionately,

F. Liszt

Affectionate remembrances to your brother Joseph. Farewell again.
I embrace you affectionately.



37. To Franz von Schober in Paris

Berlin, March 4th, 1844

You are a dear, faithful friend, and I thank you with all my
heart for your kind letter. God reward you for your love to such
a jaded, worn-out creature as I am! I can only assure you that I
feel it deeply and gratefully, and that your words soothe many
spasmodic annoyances.

At the end of this month we shall certainly see each other in
Paris. Villers [Alexander von Villers, a friend of Liszt's,
attache of the Saxon Embassy in Vienna.] is coming also. In case
Seydlitz is still there make my excuses to him, and tell him
that, owing to my delay at Dresden, I only got his letter
yesterday. I will answer him immediately, and will address to
Lefebre, as he tells me to do. I have had several conferences
with the H[ereditary] G[rand] D[uke] and Eckermann. [The editor
of Goethe's "Gesprachen"] Our business seems to me to stand on a
firm footing. Next autumn the knots will be ready to tie. [Refers
probably to Schober's subsequent appointment at Weimar.]

My room is too full. I have got a tremendous fit of Byron on. Be
indulgent and kind as ever!

Remember me to the Sabatiers, and stick to me! Yours most
affectionately,

F. Liszt



38. To Franz Kroll

[Pupil and friend of Liszt's (1820-1877); since 1849 settled in
Berlin as a pianoforte teacher; rendered great service by his
edition of Bach's "Das wohltemperirte Clavier."]

My dear good Kroll,

What a first-rate man you are to me, and what pleasure your
letter has given me! Probably you already know that I also have
been figuring as an invalid these last five weeks.--God be
thanked and praised that I am already pretty fairly on my legs
again, without rheumatism in the joints or gout! In a few days I
shall begin my provincial tour (Lyons, Marseilles, Toulouse,
Bordeaux), and then towards the end of August by steamer to
Stockholm and Copenhagen. Weymar, our good, dear Weymar, will
again be our Christmas Day! Oh what beautiful apples and trifles
we will hang on our Christmas tree! and what talks and
compositions, and projects and plans! Only don't you disappoint
me, and mind you come fresh and well. Leave the bad looks to me,
and see that you fill out your cheeks properly. This winter	 we
must be industrious, and struggle through much work.

Your Mazurkas are most excellent and talented. You have put a
great deal into them--and, if you will allow me to speak quite
freely--perhaps too much into them, for much of it halts.
Although the dedication to me is both pleasing and gratifying, I
cannot help thinking that it would be to your interest not to
publish anything before next spring. Take advantage of being as
yet unknown, and give to the public from the beginning a proper
opinion of your talent by a collective publication. Write a
couple of pleasing, brilliant Studies--perhaps also a Notturno
(or something of that sort), and an effective Fantasia on some
conspicuous theme. Then let Schlesinger, Hartel, or Mechetti (to
whom I will most gladly speak about your works beforehand)
publish the six pieces--your Concerto and the C major Study,
together with the later pieces--all together, so that publisher,
critic, artist, and public all have to do with them at the same
time. Instead of dishing up one little sweetmeat for the people,
give them a proper dinner. I am very sorry I did not follow this
plan myself; for, after much experience, I consider it far the
best, especially for pianoforte works. In Weymar we will talk
more fully and definitely about this. Conradi [Musician and
friend in Berlin] is also to come. I don't require the Huguenot
Fantasia at present. He will have time enough for it in Weymar.
En attendant, [A German letter, so Liszt's own French expression
is kept] Schlesinger will give him a modest payment for the work
he has begun. Please kindly see about the enclosed letters for
Freund as soon as possible.

With all good wishes, I am, dear Kroll,

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Port Marly, June 11th, 1844



39. To Freund

[Autograph in the possession of Professor Hermann Scholtz in
Dresden.]

I am shockingly behindhand with you, my dear Freund, but I won't
make any excuses, although an illness of more than a month comes
rather a propos to justify me fully and even more.

Herewith letters and cards for Baron Lannoy (Haslinger will give
you the address), for Prince Fritz Schwarzenberg, and for Doctor
Uwe, Kriehuber, and Simon Lowy, who will soon be back in Vienna.
I shall be glad if you will give them in any case, whether now or
later. If you want to give me a pleasure you will go and see my
uncle Eduard Liszt, and try to distract him a little.

I detest repeating myself in letters so much that I can't write
over again to you my plans of travel up to the beginning of
winter; these I have just told Kroll in full, and you already
know them from Hanover.

Teleky, Bethlen (Friends of Liszt's), and Corracioni are here,
and form a kind of colony which I call the Tribe of the Huns!

Probably Teleky will come and pick me up at Weymar towards the
middle of February, and we shall go together to Vienna and Pest--
not forgetting Temesvar, Debreczin, and Klausenburg!

I hope then to find you in Vienna, and shall perhaps be able to
give you a good lift.

Meanwhile acknowledge the receipt of these lines: enjoy yourself,
and remain to me always friend Freund. [A play on his name
Freund, which means friend.]

Yours most sincerely and affectionately,

F. Liszt

Port Marly, June 11th, 1844.



40. To Franz Von Schober.

Gibraltar, March 3rd, 1845.

Your letter pleases me like a child, my dear good Schober!
Everything comes to him who can wait. But I scarcely can wait to
congratulate you and to see you again in Weymar [as Councillor of
Legation there]. Unhappily it is not probable that I can get
there before the end of next autumn. Keep me in your good books,
therefore, until then, and accept my best thanks in advance for
all you will have done for me and fought for me till then, both
in Weymar and in Hungary!

With regard to Vienna, Lowy writes me almost exactly the same as
you. To tell the truth I am extremely thankful to the Vienna
public, for it was they who, in a critically apathetic moment,
roused and raised me [When he came from Venice to Vienna in the
spring of 1838, to give a concert for the benefit of his
Hungarian compatriots after the inundations, on which occasion,
although Thalberg, Clara Wieck, and Henselt had been there before
him, he aroused the utmost enthusiasm.]; but still I don't feel
the slightest obligation to return there a year sooner or later.
My Vienna journey will pretty much mark the end of my virtuoso
career. I hope to go thence (in the month of August, 1846) to
Constantinople, and on my return to Italy to pass my dramatic
Rubicon or Fiasco.

So much for my settled plans.

What precisely is going to become of me this coming spring and
summer I do not exactly know. In any case to Paris I will not go.
You know why. My incredibly wretched connection with _____ has
perhaps indirectly contributed more than anything to my Spanish-
Portuguese tour. I have no reason to regret having come, although
my best friends tried to dissuade me from it. Sometimes it seems
to me that my thoughts ripen and that my troubles grow
prematurely old under the bright and penetrating sun of Spain...

Many kind messages to Eckermann and Wolff. [Professor Wolff,
editor of "Der poetische Hausschatz."] I will write to the latter
from the Rhine, where I shall at any rate spend a month this
summer (perhaps with my mother and Cosima). If he is still
inclined to return to his and your countries (Denmark and
Sweden), we can make a nice little trip there as a holiday treat.

Good-bye, my dear excellent friend. Allow me to give you as true
a love as I feel is a necessity of my heart! Ever yours,

F. Liszt

What is Villers doing? If you see him tell him to write me a line
to Marseilles, care of M. Boisselot, Pianoforte Maker.



41. To Franz Kroll at Glogau

Weymar, March 26th, 1845

My very dear Kroll,

The arrival of your letter and the packet which accompanied it
decided a matter of warm contest between our friend Lupus
[Presumably Liszt's friend, Professor Wolff (1791-1851).] and
Farfa-Magne-quint-quatorze! [For whom this name was intended is
not clear.] It consisted in making the latter see the difference
between the two German verbs "verwundern" (to amaze) and
"bewundern" (to admire), and to translate clearly, according to
her wits, which are sometimes so ingeniously refractory, what
progress there is from Verwundern (amazement) to Erstaunen
(astonishment). Imagine, now, with what a wonderful solution of
the difficulty your packet and letter furnished us, and how
pleased I was at the following demonstration:--

"We must admire (bewundern) Kroll's fine feeling of friendship;
we may be amazed (verwundern) at the proof he has given of his
industry in copying out the Mass; should this industry continue
we shall first of all be astonished (erstaunen), and by degrees,
through the results he will bring about, we again attain to
admiration (Bewunderung)."

I don't know how you will judge, critically, of this example, but
what is certain is that it appeared to be quite conclusive to our
auditory.

Ernst [The celebrated violinist (1814-65)] has just been spending
a week here, during which he has played some hundred rubbers of
whist at the "Erbprinz." His is a noble, sweet, and delicate
nature, and more than once during his stay I have caught myself
regretting you for him, and regretting him for you. Last Monday
he was good enough to play, in his usual and admirable manner, at
the concert for the Orchestral Pension Fund. The pieces he had
selected were his new "Concerto pathetique" (in F~ minor) and an
extremely piquant and brilliant "Caprice on Hungarian Melodies."
(This latter piece is dedicated to me.) The public was in a good
humor, even really warm, which is usually one of its least
faults.

Milde, who is, as you know, not much of a talker, has
nevertheless the tact to say the right thing sometimes. Thus,
when we went to see Ernst off at the railway, he expressed the
feeling of us all--"What a pity that Kroll is not here!"

For the most part you have left here the impression which you
will leave in every country--that of a man of heart, talent,
tact, and intellect. One of these qualities alone is enough to
distinguish a man from the vulgar herd; but when one is so well
born as to possess a quartet of them it is absolutely necessary
that the will, and an active will, should be added to them in
order to make them bring out their best fruits,--and this I am
sure you will not be slow to do.

Your brother came through here the day before yesterday, thinking
he should still find you here. I have given him your address, and
told him to inquire about you at Schlesinger's in Berlin, where
he expects to be on the 8th of April; so do not fail to let
Schlesinger know, in one way or another, when you get to Berlin.
As M. de Zigesar [The Intendant at Weimar.] I was obliged to
start in a great hurry for The Hague, in the suite of the
Hereditary Grand Duchess, I will wait till his return to send you
the letters for Mr. de Witzleben. I will address them to
Schlesinger early in April.

We are studying hard at the Duke of Coburg's opera "Toni, oder
die Vergellung," ["Toni, or the Requital"] which we shall give
next Saturday. The score really contains some pretty things and
which make a pleasing effect; unluckily I cannot say as much for
the libretto.

Your castle in the air for May we will build up on a solid basis
in Weymar; for I am quite calculating on seeing you then,
together with our charming, good, worthy friend Conradi. Will you
please, dear Kroll, tell Mr. Germershausen and his family how
gratified I am with their kind remembrance? When I go to Sagan I
shall certainly give myself the pleasure of calling on him.

Believe me ever your very sincere and affectionate friend,

F. Liszt



42. To Abbe de Lamennais

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.]

Permit me, illustrious and venerable friend, to recall myself to
your remembrance through M. Ciabatta, who has already had the
honor of being introduced to you last year at my house. He has
just been making a tour in Spain and Portugal with me, and can
give you all particulars about it. I should have been glad also
to get him to take back to you the score, now completed, of the
chorus which you were so good as to entrust to me ("The iron is
hard, let us strike!"), but unfortunately it is not with music as
with painting and poetry: body and soul alone are not enough to
make it comprehensible; it has to be performed, and very well
performed too, to be understood and felt. Now the performance of
a chorus of the size of that is not an easy matter in Paris, and
I would not even risk it without myself conducting the
preliminary rehearsals. While waiting till a favorable
opportunity offers, allow me to tell you that I have been happy
to do this work, and that I trust I have not altogether failed in
it. Were it not for the fear of appearing to you very indiscreet,
I should perhaps venture to trespass on your kindness for the
complete series of these simple, and at the same time sublime,
compositions, of which you alone know the secret. Three other
choruses of the same kind as that of the Blacksmiths, which
should sum up the most poetical methods of human activity, and
which should be called (unless you advise otherwise) Labourers,
Sailors, and Soldiers, would form a lyric epic of which the
genius of Rossini or Meyerbeer would be proud. I know I have no
right to make any such claim, but your kindness to me has always
been so great that I have a faint hope of obtaining this new and
glorious favor. If, however, this work would give you even an
hour's trouble, please consider my request as not having been
made, and pardon me for the regret which I shall feel at this
beautiful idea being unrealized.

As business matters do not necessarily call me to Paris, I prefer
not to return there just now. I expect to go to Bonn in the month
of July, for the inauguration of the Beethoven Monument, and to
have a Cantata performed there which I have written for this
occasion. The text, at any rate, is tolerably new; it is a sort
of Magnificat of human Genius conquered by God in the eternal
revelation through time and space,--a text which might apply
equally well to Goethe or Raphael or Columbus, as to Beethoven.
At the beginning of winter I shall resume my duties at the Court
of Weymar, to which I attach more and more a serious importance.

If you were to be so very good as to write me a few lines, I
should be most happy and grateful. If you would send them either
to my mother's address, Rue Louis le Grand, 20; or to that of my
secretary, Mr. Belloni, Rue Neuve St. George, No. 5, I should
always get them in a very short time.

I have the honor to be, sir, yours very gratefully,

F. Liszt

Marseilles, April 28th, 1845



43. To Frederic Chopin

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
The great Polish tone-poet (1809-49) was most intimate with Liszt
in Paris. The latter, in his work "F. Chopin" 1851, second
edition 1879, Breitkopf and Hartel; German translation by La
Mara, 1880), raised an imperishable monument to him.]

Dear Chopin,

M. Benacci, a member of the Maison Troupenas, and in my opinion
the most intelligent editor, and the most liberal in business
matters, in France, asks me for a letter of introduction to you.
I give it all the more willingly, as I am convinced that under
all circumstances you will have every reason to be satisfied with
his activity and with whatever he does. Mendelssohn, whom he met
in Switzerland two years ago, has made him his exclusive editor
for France, and I, for my part, am just going to do the same. It
would be a real satisfaction to me if you would entrust some of
your manuscripts to him, and if these lines should help in making
you do so I know he will be grateful to me.

Yours ever, in true and lively friendship,

F. Liszt

Lyons, May 21st, 1845



44. To George Sand.

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
A friendship of long years subsisted between Liszt and France's
greatest female writer, George Sand. At her home of Nohant he was
a frequent guest, together with the Comtesse d'Agoult. Three
letters which he wrote (in 1835 and 1837) for the Gazette
Musicale--clever talks about Art, Nature, Religion, Freedom,
etc.--bear George Sand's address.]

Without wishing to add to your other inevitable troubles that of
a correspondence for which you care little, allow me, dear
George, to claim for myself your old indulgence for people who
write to you without requiring an answer, and let me recall
myself to you by these few lines through M. Benacci. Their
ostensible object is to recommend the above-mentioned Benacci, so
that you, in your turn, may recommend him more particularly to
Chopin (and I may add in parenthesis that I should abstain from
this negotiation were I not firmly persuaded that Chopin will
never regret entering into business relations with Benacci, who,
in his capacity of member of the firm of Troupenas, is one of the
most important and most intelligent men of his kind); but the
real fact of the matter is that I am writing to you above all--
and why should I not confess it openly?--for the pleasure of
conversing with you for a few moments. Therefore don't expect
anything interesting from me, and if my handwriting bothers you,
throw my letter into the fire without going any further.

Do you know with whom I have just had endless conversations about
you, in sight of Lisbon and Gibraltar? With that kind, excellent,
and original Blavoyer, the Ahasuerus of commerce, whom I had
already met several times without recognising him, until at last
I remembered our dinners at the "Ecu" (Crown) at Geneva, and the
famous Pipe!

During the month's voyage from Lisbon to Barcelona we emptied I
cannot tell you how many bottles of sherry in your honor and
glory; and one fine evening he confided to me in so simple and
charming a manner his vexation at being unable to find several
letters that you had written to him in Russia, I think, and which
have been stolen from him, that I took a liking to him, and he
did the same to me. The fact is that there could not possibly be
two Blavoyers under the sun, and his own person is the only
pattern of which he cannot furnish goods wholesale, for there is
no sort of thing that he does not supply to all parts of the
globe.

A propos of Lisbon and supplies, have you a taste for camellias?
It would be a great pleasure to me to send you a small cargo of
them from Oporto, but I did not venture to do it without knowing,
in case you might perhaps have a decided antipathy to them.

In spite of the disinterestedness with which I began this letter,
I come round, almost without knowing how, to beg you to write to
me. Don't do more than you like; but in any case forgive me for
growing old and arriving at the point when noble recollections
grow in proportion as the narrowing meannesses of daily life find
their true level. Yes, even if you thought me more of a fool than
formerly, it would be impossible for me to hold your friendship
cheap, or not to prize highly the fact that, somehow or other, it
has not come to be at variance nor entirely at an end.

As the exigencies of my profession will not allow me leisure to
return so soon to Paris, I shall probably not have the
opportunity of seeing you for two years. Towards the middle of
July I go to Bonn for the inauguration of the Beethoven Monument.
Were it not that a journey to the Rhine is so commonplace, I
should beg you to let me do the honors of the left and of the
right bank to you, as well as to Chopin (a little less badly than
I was able to do the honors of Geneva!). My mother and my
children are to join me at Cologne in five or six weeks, but I
cannot hope for such good luck as that we might meet in those
parts, although after your winters of work and fatigue a journey
of this kind would be a refreshing distraction for you both.

At the close of the autumn I shall resume my duties at Weymar;
later on I shall go to Vienna and Hungary, and proceed thence to
Italy by way of Constantinople, Athens, and Malta.

If, therefore, one of these fine days you should happen to be in
the humor, send me a word in reply about the camellias; if you
will send your letter to my mother (20, Rue Louis le Grand) I
shall get it immediately. In every way, count upon my profound
friendship and most respectful devotion always and everywhere.

Lyons, May 21st, 1845

F. Liszt



45. T Abbe De Lamennais

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.]

Oh no, there is not, and there never could be, any indiscretion
from you towards me. Believe me that I do not deceive myself as
to the motive which determined you to write to me with such great
kindness, and if it happened that I replied too sanguinely and at
too great length I beg you to excuse me. Above all do not punish
me by withdrawing from me the smallest particle of your sacred
friendship.

M. de Lamartine, with whom I have been spending two or three days
at Montceau, told me that you had read to him "Les Forgerons," so
I played him the music. Permit me still to hope that some day you
may be willing to complete the series, and that I, on my side,
may not be unworthy of this task.

Yours most heartily,

Dijon, June 1st, 1845

F. Liszt



46. To Gaetano Belloni in Paris

[Autograph in the possession of M. Etienne Charavay in Paris.--
Addressed to Liszt's valued secretary during his concert tours in
Europe from 1841-1847.]

Dear and Most Excellent Belloni,

Everything is moving on, and shall not stop either. Bonn is in a
flutter since I arrived and I shall easily put an end to the
paltry, under-hand opposition which had been formed against me.
By the time you arrive I shall have well and duly conquered my
true position.

[This refers to the Festival in Bonn, of several days' duration,
for the unveiling of the Beethoven Monument (by Hahnel), in which
Liszt, the generous joint-founder of the monument, took part as
pianist, composer, and conductor.]

Will you please add to the list of your commissions:

The cross of Charles III.

and the cross of Christ of Portugal, large size? You know it is
worn on the neck.

Don't lose time and don't be too long in coming.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

July 23rd, 1845.

Kindest regards to Madame Belloni.--I enclose a few lines for
Benacci, which you will kindly give him.



47. To Madame Rondonneau at Sedan

[Autograph in the possession of M. Etienne Charavay in Paris.]

In spite of rain, snow, hail, and frost, here I am at last,
having reached the hotel of the Roman Emperor at Frankfort after
forty-eight hours' travelling, and I take the first opportunity
of telling you anew, though not for the last time, how much I
feel the charming and affectionate reception which you have given
me during my too short, and, unhappily for me, too unfortunate
stay at Sedan. Will you, dear Madame, be so kind as to be my
mouthpiece and special pleader to Madame Dumaitre, who has been
so uncommonly kind and cordial to me? Assuredly I could not
confide my cause (bad as it may be) to more delicate hands and to
a more persuasive eloquence, if eloquence only consists in
reality of "the art of saying the right thing, the whole of the
right thing, and nothing but the right thing," as La
Rochefoucauld defined it; a definition from which General Foy
drew a grand burst of eloquence--"The Charter, the whole Charter
(excepting, however, Article 14 and other peccadilloes!), and
nothing but the Charter."

"But don't let us talk politics any longer," as Lablache so
happily remarked to Giulia Grisi, who took it into her head one
fine day to criticize Don Juan!

Let us talk once more of Sedan, and let me again say to you how
happy I should be to be able one day to show those whose
acquaintance I have made through you in what grateful remembrance
I keep it.

Will you, Madame, give my best and most affectionate thanks to M.
Rondonneau, and accept my very respectful and devoted homage?

F. Liszt

Frankfurt, February 11th, 1846

P.S.--Being pressed for time, and owing, perhaps, to a stupid
feeling of delicacy, I came away without paying my doctor.

If you think well, would you be so kind as to credit me with a
napoleon and give it him from me: Madame Kreutzer will be my
banker in Paris. Adieu till we meet again.



48. To Monsieur Grillparzer

[Original, without date, in the possession of the Baroness
Mayrhofer-Grunbuhel at Klagenfurt. It might belong to the year
1846, during which Liszt arranged ten concerts in Vienna, from
March 1st to May 17th, and lived there during a great part of the
summer. From the same year dates a poem of homage to the
incomparable magician of the piano from the great poet. This
slight and unimportant letter is the only one of Liszt's found
among Grillparzer's effects.]

Will you do me the favor, my dear sir, to come and dine, without
ceremony, with several of your friends and admirers on Friday
next at 3 o'clock (at the "Stadt Frankfurt")? I should be very
much gratified at this kindness on your part. M. Bauernfeld leads
me to hope that you will not refuse me. Permit me to think that
he is not mistaken, and allow me to express once more my high
esteem and admiration.

F. Liszt

Tuesday Morning. [1846?]



49. To Franz von Schober, Coucillor of Legation in Weimar

Prague, April 11th, 1846. [According to the postal stamp.]

Dear Friend,

Your commissions have been attended to. The Wartburg has been
sent through Bauernfeld to the Allgemeine, and will, I trust, not
have to warten [Wait; a play on the words Wartburg and warten. A
treatise on the proposed completion of the Wartburg.] too long. I
have sent a second copy of this article to Paris, where it is to
appear in French garb. The report figures already in the Vienna
Theater-Zeitung, a paper with a wide circulation (and none the
better on that account!), where it makes quite a good appearance.

You would get the best connection with Frankfort through O. L. B.
Wolff (and through his medium, which is at any rate an honest and
proper one, with the German Frankfurtes Journal, or the
Oberpostamts-Zeitung, and even with the Didaskalia).

Talk this over with Wolff!

The same with the "illustrated" Leipzig Journal, in which the
article on the Wartburg should appear as soon as possible with an
illustration. Wolff can also arrange that, and in case it were
necessary, why, in Heaven's name, the sketch can be paid for. The
State of Weimar will not be ruined by it. Pereat Philistia and
its powerless foolery!!!

You have only to write a line to Brockhaus, and the columns of
the Deutsche Allgemeine stand open to you. Your personal and
official position in Weimar entitle you to this. Later on, in
passing through Leipzig, you can very easily consolidate this
connection. My stay in Hungary (Pest) will probably be limited to
the first half of May. I shall in any case see Schwab.
"Sardanapalus" [An opera planned by Liszt] (Italian) will most
probably be produced next season (May) in Vienna.

My stay in Weimar this summer...?? [The continuation of the
letter is missing.]

50. To Franz von Schober, Councillor of Legation in Weimar

Castle Gratz (at Prince Lichnowsky's)

May 28th, 1846

You are curious people at Weimar. You stride on towards a
possibility, and as soon as the thing is well in train you take
fright at it! However that may be, here are the instructions I
have received from Paris, and if you still wish an article on the
Wartburg to appear in a French paper you must conform to them,
and therefore send to my mother's address (20, Rue Louis le
Grand) the indispensable little notice.

The note from my Paris correspondent is as follows:--

"The article in its present form would not be suitable for
publication in any French paper; it will be necessary to write
another, explaining in a few words in what and how the Wartburg
is historically interesting to Europe, and why Europe ought to
interest herself in its restoration; then make a short
architectural description of the castle; but above all do not
forget that the article is to be read by Frenchmen, careless of
what is happening in Germany, and utterly ignorant of German
history and legend."

I continue:--

1st.--A short account, historical and legendary, of the Wartburg.

2nd.--How it has been allowed to fall into ruins.

3rd.--How it is to be restored.

Finally, plenty of facts and proper names, as M. de Talleyrand so
well said. Agreed then! As soon as you have got this sketched out
on the lines above mentioned (it will serve also for the
illustrated), send it to my mother by Weyland. My mother will
already know through me to whom she has to give it.

There is nothing to be done with Schwab. His "Delirium" (as I
call it) [It was a "Tellurium"] stood in my room for a week, and
we stood there not knowing what to make of it. But never and no
how could we bring that good Schwab to try to make us see any
basis or proof of his calculation. My opinion is that, in order
to take away the incognito from his discovery, he ought to send a
sample to the Vienna Academy, and two others to the Berlin and
Paris Academies, for trial and discussion. If I can help him in
this matter with letters to Humboldt and Arago I will do it right
gladly; but it is as plain as day that incompetent private
sympathies are of no import in such a sensitive discovery, and
therefore can do nothing. Meanwhile they have made a subscription
of eight hundred guldens in money, and have bought the machine
for the Pest Museum.

The relic with authentic verification is in the locked-up box at
Wolff's. Beg the Herr Librarian (it would really make me ill if
he is not appointed) to be so good as to find this relic--he will
have no difficulty in recognising it--and to send it me to
Haslinger's address, Graben, Vienna.

About my law-suit more anon in Weimar. Meanwhile thank my
excellent advocate (does he take snuff?) warmly, and beg him to
continue to keep me in his good graces.

If I know that it will be agreeable to his Grace [The former
Hereditary Grand Duke and present Grand Duke of Saxony.] to see
me in Weimar this summer, I shall come, in spite of the upset
which this journey will occasion to me. You know how I am,
heartily and personally, in his favor without any interest. I
should like also to tell him many things, and for this a stay
there in the summer with walks (which as a rule I can't abide, as
you know) would be pleasanter and more convenient.

My stay in Pest might bear serious fruit, were it not that the
Byronic element, which you combat in me, becomes ever more and
more predominant.

Farewell and work hard! I cannot arrange any meeting with you. I
am not my own master. In August I mean to make a peregrination to
Oedenburg, and thence to Leo and Augusz (the latter in Szegzard).
If I come to Weimar it will be in July.

Address always to Haslinger's.

Adieu, my dear excellent Schober. Remain as good to me as you are
dear!

Yours ever affectionately,

F. Liszt

Remember me most kindly to Ziegesar and Wolff.



51. To Alexander Seroff

[Russian musical critic and composer (1820-71)]

I am most grateful, my dear sir, for the kind remembrance you
keep of me since Petersburg, [Seroff was at that time in the
Crimea.] and I beg you to excuse me a thousand times for not
having replied sooner to your most charming and interesting
letter. As the musical opinions on which you are kind enough to
enlarge have for long years past been completely my own, it is
needless for me to discuss them today with you. There could, at
most, be only one point in which we must differ perceptibly, but
as that one point is my own simple individuality you will quite
understand that I feel much embarrassed with my subject, and that
I get out of it in the most ordinary manner, by thanking you very
sincerely for the too flattering opinion that you have formed
about me.

The Overture to "Coriolanus" is one of those masterpieces sui
generis, on a solid foundation, without antecedent or sequel in
analogous works. Does it remind you of Shakespeare's exposition
of the tragedy of the same name (Act i., Scene I)? It is the only
pendant to it that I know in the productions of human genius.
Read it again, and compare it as you are thinking of it. You are
worthy of those noble emotions of Art, by the fervent zeal with
which you worship its creed. Your piano score of the Overture to
Coriolanus does all honor to your artist conscience, and shows a
rare and patient intelligence which is indispensable to bringing
this task to a satisfactory end. If I should publish my version
of the same Overture (it must be among my papers in Germany) I
shall beg your permission to send you, through Prince Dolgorouki
[Prince Argontinski-Dolgorouki, a devoted lover of music. A
friend of Liszt's: had rich property in the Crimea.] (I can't
tell you half the good I think of him), an annotated copy, which
I will beg you to add to the insignificant autograph which you
really estimate too highly in attaching so affectionate a price
to it! Accept once more, my dear sir, my most affectionate
regards.

F. Liszt

Elisabethgrad, September 14th. 1847



52. To Carl Haslinger in Vienna

[The original (without address) in the possession of M. Alfred
Bovet at Valentigney.--There is no doubt that it was written to
the above music publisher (son of the well-known Tobias H.), who
was a pupil of Czerny, and at the same time a pianist and
composer (1816-68), and friend of Liszt]

Woronino, December 19th, 1847

My dear Karolus,

I am delighted to hear from you of the arrival of my box from
Galatz. Will you be so good as to send it off speedily and safely
to Weymar, so that I may find it when I arrive there (at the end
of this month)? and, as I am away, address it to M. le Baron de
Ziegesar, Chamberlain to H.R.H. the Hereditary Grand Duchess. Beg
Lowy to take the same opportunity of sending me the other boxes
belonging to me, which remained behind, whether with him or
elsewhere, to my Weymar address, unless he prefers to bring them
with him when he comes to see me.

In my last letter to my uncle I gave him a commission for you--
namely, to beg you to send me the Melodies and Rhapsodies
Hongroises complete; also the Schwanengesang and the Winterreise
(transcriptions), large size edition, made into a book. As you
have had some proofs made of my new Rhapsodies, make up a parcel
of it all, which will be an agreeable surprise to me on my
arrival.

I have worked pretty well these last two months, between two
cigars in the morning, at several things which do not displease
me; but I want to go back to Germany for some weeks in order to
put myself in tune with the general tone, and to recreate myself
by the sight and hearing of the wonderful things produced there
by...Upon my word I don't know by whom in particular, if not the
whole world in general.

If you want me to...[editor's note: impossible to decipher this
word in Liszt's original letter] anything for you, tell me, and
give me your ideas as to cut and taste.

Send me also the Schumann Opus (Kreisleriana, etc.) published by
yourself and Mechetti, together with Bach's six Pedal Fugues, in
which I wish to steep myself more fully. If the three Sonnets
(both voice and pianoforte editions) are already re-corrected,
kindly send me also an author's copy.

Adieu, dear Karolus. I commend my box to you, and commend myself
to you also

As your sincere friend,

F. Liszt

I need not say that of course you shall be repaid immediately for
sending the box--only hurry on the sending.

Best regards to your wife.

Lowy will tell you what I wish in regard to the credit for my
uncle Eduard.



53. To The Hochwohlgeboren Herr Baron von Dornis, Jena.

[Autograph in the possession of Herr C. Geibel, bookseller in
Leipzig.--The addressee was a sculptor.]

The confidence which you place in me, most esteemed Herr Baron,
is naturally very flattering; but in order to meet it according
to your wishes, I ought to have quite other means at my disposal
than those I have.

It would of course be very gratifying to me to possess one of
your valued works; yet I cannot help taking this opportunity of
remarking that, in view of the far too many busts, medallions,
statuettes, caricatures, medals, and portraits of all kinds
existing of my humble self, I long ago resolved not to give
occasion to any further multiplication of them.

Accept, esteemed Herr Baron, my expressions of great regret that
I cannot meet your kind proposal as you wish, and with the
assurance of my highest esteem,

Believe me yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 6th, 1848



54. To Franz von Schober, Councillor of Legation at Weimar.

Castle Gratz, April 22nd, 1848.

My Dear and Honored Friend,

Your dear letter has brought me still nearer to you in the crisis
of the estro poetico, which the "Hungaria" [One of Liszt's
symphonic poems.] brought forth in me; and, thanks to this good
influence, I hope you will not be dissatisfied with the
composition.

Since my Beethoven Cantata I have written nothing so striking and
so spontaneous. One of these next days the instrumentation will
be completed, and when we have an opportunity we can have it
performed in Weimar in your honor and that of "Weimar's dead."
[Refers to a poem entitled "Weimar's Todten."]

Regardless of the blocking of the Russian frontier the Princess
Wittgenstein has safely passed through Radziwillow and Brody with
a special official outrider, and established herself at Castle
Gratz four days ago with her very charming and interesting
daughter. As it is still somewhat early for the German bath
season, I should like to persuade her to spend a couple of weeks
in Weimar before her Carlsbad "cure" (which, alas! is very
necessary for her). If my wishes should be successful I shall
arrive at Weimar between the 10th and 15th of May, in order to
prepare a suitable house or suite of apartments for the Princess.

I should be so pleased if you had an opportunity of getting to
know the P. W. She is without doubt an uncommonly and thoroughly
brilliant example of soul and mind and understanding (with
immense esprit as well).

It won't take you long to understand that henceforth I can dream
of very little personal ambition and future wrapped up in myself.
In political relations serfdom may have an end, but the dominion
of one soul over another in the region of spirit, is not that
indestructible?...You, my dear, honored friend, will assuredly
not answer this question with a negative.

In three weeks I hope we shall see each other again. Be so good
as to present my respects to our young Duke. What you tell me of
him pleases me. As soon as possible you shall hear more, and more
fully, from me, but do not write to me till then, as my address
meanwhile will be very uncertain. But continue to love me, as I
love and honor you.

F. Liszt



55. To Bernhard Cossmann in Baden-Baden

[The addressee became in 1850 solo-violoncellist and chamber
virtuoso in Weimar, and, later, in Moscow, and has been, since
1878, a Professor at the Hoch Conservatorium at Frankfort-on-
Maine.]

Circumstances! Conditions! My dear sir, these are now the very
ceremonious expressions and excuses of theatrical and directorial
beings. Unfortunately that is the case here too, although our
dear Weymar continuing free, not only from the real cholera, but
also from the slighter, but somewhat disagreeable, periodical
political cholerina, may peacefully dream by its elm,
yet...yet...I am sorry to say I am obliged not to answer your
kind letter affirmatively. Should circumstances and conditions,
however, turn out as I wish, then the Weymar band would consider
it an honor and a pleasure to possess you, my dear sir, as soon
as possible as one of its members.

Meanwhile accept the assurance of high regard of yours very
sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 18th, 1848



56. To Carl Reinecke

[The present conductor of the Gewandhaus Concerts in Leipzig
(born 1824), and celebrated composer, pianist, and conductor]

Dear Sir,

Your kind letter has given me much pleasure, and the prospect
which you hold out to me, of seeing you soon again at Weymar, is
very agreeable to me. But come soon, and if possible for a few
days; I on my side shall certainly do all I can to prolong your
stay here and make it seem short to you. The promised Concerto
interests me keenly; it will be sure to give us ample material
for musical talks, and perhaps after many a talk we shall set to
work again and both write a new Concerto.

Would not the best results of criticism altogether be to incite
to new creation?

However that may be, do not put off too long taking up your
quarters at the Erbprinz, and rest assured that your visit is
much desired by me.

Yours very sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 25th, 1849

My very best thanks for the splendid stuff for the coat, which
will give me quite an important, well-to-do, stately appearance!



57. To Count Sandor Teleky(?)

[The original (without address) in the possession of Count Albert
Amadei in Vienna.--The recipient of this letter was presumably
Count Teleky, a friend of Liszt's, who often accompanied the
latter on his triumphal European journeys, and who was himself an
active musician and literary man. He died in June, 1892.]

I have to give you threefold thanks, dear Count, and I feel that
I can undisguisedly do so! Your verses, in addition to your prose
and music, are three times welcome to me at Weymar, and the
Fantaisie dedicated to the royal hours of leisure of H.R.H. has
also charmed my leisure hours, as rare as they are modest.

If it would not be a trouble to you to come to Weymar, it would
be most kind of you to give us the pleasure of your company for a
day or two during our theatrical season, which concludes on the
15th of June. We could then chat and make music at our ease (with
or without damages, ad libitum), and if the fantasy took us, why
should we not go to some new Fantasie of leisure on the "Traum-
lied (dream song) of Tony, [No doubt meaning Baron Augusz,
Liszt's intimate friend at Szegzard, who died in 1878.] for
instance, at the hour when our peaceable inhabitants are
sleeping, dreaming, or thinking of nothing? We two should at
least want to make a pair.

May I beg you, dear Count, to recall me most humbly to the
indulgent remembrance of your charming and witty neighbor
[Nachbarin, feminine.] of the Erbprinz, and accept once more my
most cordial expressions for yourself?

F. Liszt

Weymar, May 5th, 1849



58. To Belloni(?)

[The letter written apparently to Belloni (who has already been
mentioned) was, like the present one, published by Wilhelm
Tappert, in a German translation and in an incomplete form, in
the Neue Musik-Zeitung (Cologne, Tonger) of October 1st, 1881.
The editor unfortunately could not obtain possession of it
complete and in the original. According to Tappert, a Belgian
musical paper pronounced it spurious, for reasons unknown to the
former.]

Weimar, May 14th, 1849

Dear B.,

Richard Wagner, a Dresden conductor, has been here since
yesterday. That is a man of wonderful genius, such a brain-
splitting genius indeed as beseems this country,--a new and
brilliant appearance in Art. Late events in Dresden have forced
him to a decision in the carrying out of which I am firmly
resolved to help him with all my might. When I have had a long
talk with him, you shall hear what we have devised and what must
also be thoroughly realized. In the first place we want to create
a success for a grand, heroic, enchanting musical work, the score
of which was completed a year ago. [Lohengrin.] Perhaps this
could be done in London? Chorley, [Chorley (1808-72) had
considerable influence in London as author, critic, and writer in
the Athenoeum.] for instance, might be very helpful to him in
this undertaking. If Wagner next winter could go to Paris backed
up by this success, the doors of the Opera would stand open to
him, no matter with what he might knock. It is happily not
necessary for me to go into long further discussions with you;
you understand, and must learn whether there is at this moment in
London an English theater (for the Italian Opera would not help
our friend!), and whether there is any prospect that a grand and
beautiful work from a master hand could have any success there.

[It was not in London, but in Weimar, as is well known, that the
first performance of "Lohengrin" took place (on August 28th,
1850). It was not until twenty-five years later that London made
acquaintance with Wagner's work on the stage, in the Italian
Opera and with Nicolini in the title-role; and the composer
himself heard it for the first time in Vienna on May 15th, 1861.]

Let me have an answer to this as quickly as possible. Later on--
that is, about the end of the month--Wagner will pass through
Paris. You will see him, and he will talk with you direct about
the tendency and expansion of the whole plan, and will be
heartily grateful for every kindness. Write soon and help me as
ever. It is a question of a noble end, toward the fulfillment of
which everything must tend.



59. To Carl Reinecke

Weymar, May 30th, 1849

Thank you much, dear M. Reinecke, for your welcome lines, and I
am glad to hope that you are happily arrived at Bremen, which
ought to be proud to possess you. The musical taste of that town
has always been held up to me, and I feel assured that the
inhabitants will have the good taste to appreciate you at your
full value, and that you will create a good and fine position for
yourself there without many obstacles.

Wagner, who will probably be obliged to lose his post at Dresden
in consequence of recent events, has been spending some days with
me here. Unluckily the news of the warrant against him arrived
the day of the performance of "Tannhauser", which prevented him
from being present. By this time he must have arrived in Paris,
where he will assuredly find a more favorable field for his
dramatic genius. With the aid of success he will end, as I have
often said, by being acknowledged as a great German composer in
Germany, on condition that his works are first heard in Paris or
London, following the example of Meyerbeer, to say nothing of
Gluck, Weber, and Handel!

Wagner expressed his regret to me that he had not been able to
send a better reply to the few lines of introduction which I had
given you for him. If ever you should be in the same place with
him do not fail to go and see him for me, and you may be sure of
being well received.

I am very much obliged to you for having spoken of me to Schumann
in such a manner as he at least ought to think of me. It
interested me much to make acquaintance with his composition of
the epilogue to "Faust". If he publishes it I shall try to have
it performed here, either at the Court or at the theater. In
passing lately through Frankfort I had a glance at the score of
"Genoveva", a performance of which had been announced to me at
Leipzig for the middle of May at latest. I am very much afraid
that Schumann will have a struggle with the difficulties and
delays which usually occur in trying to get any lofty work
performed. One would say that a bad fairy, in order sometimes to
counterbalance the works of genius, gives a magic success to the
most vulgar works and presides over the propagation of them,
favoring those whom inspiration has disdained, in order to push
its elect into the shade. That is no reason for discouragement,
for what matters the sooner or the later?

A thousand thanks for your exact and obliging packet of cigars.
If you should have the opportunity of sending me some samples of
a kind neither too thin nor too light, at about twenty to twenty-
five thalers the thousand, I shall willingly give an order for
some, which might be followed by a larger order.

Schuberth of Hamburg has just sent me your transcriptions of the
Schumann songs, which have given me real pleasure. If you publish
other things kindly let me know, for you know the sincere
interest I feel both in yourself and in your works,--an interest
I hope to have the opportunity of showing you more and more.

Meanwhile believe me yours affectionately,

F. Liszt

P.S.--I have not forgotten the little commission you gave me
relative to the "Fantasie-Stucke," and in a few weeks I will let
you have a copy of the new edition.



60. To Robert Schumann

[original in the Royal Library in Berlin]

Dear, esteemed Friend,

Before everything allow me to repeat to you what, next after
myself, you ought properly to have known best a long time ago--
namely, that no one honors and admires you more truly than my
humble self.

When opportunity occurs we can certainly have a friendly
discussion on the importance of a work, a man, even a town
indeed. For the present I am specially rejoicing in the prospect
of an early performance of your opera, and beg you most urgently
to let me know about it a few days beforehand, as I shall most
certainly come to Leipzig on that occasion, and then we can also
arrange for it to be studied in Weymar as soon as possible
afterwards. Perhaps you will also find time there to make me
acquainted with your "Faust." For this composition I am anxiously
waiting, and your resolution to give this work a greater length
and breadth appears to me most judicious. A great subject demands
generally a grand treatment. Although the Vision of Ezekiel
attains in its small dimensions the culminating point of
Raphael's greatness, yet he painted the School of Athens and the
entire frescoes in the Vatican.

"Manfred" is glorious, passionately attractive! Don't let
yourself be stopped in it; it will refresh you for your "Faust"--
and German art will point with pride to these twin productions.

Schuberth has sent me your "Album fur die Jugend" [Album for the
Young], which, to say the least, pleases me much. We have played
your splendid trio here several times, and in a pretty
satisfactory manner.

Wagner stayed some days here and at Eisenach. I am expecting
tidings from him daily from Paris, where he will assuredly
enlarge his reputation and career in a brilliant manner.

Would not your dear wife (to whom I beg to be kindly remembered)
like for once to make a romantic country excursion into the
Thuringer Wald [the Thuringian Forest]? The neighborhood is
charming, and it would give me great pleasure to see her again at
Weymar. A very good grand piano, and two or three intelligent
people who cling to you with true sympathy and esteem, await you
here.

But in any case there will appear in Leipzig as a claqueur
[clapper (to applaud)]

Your unalterably faithful friend,

F. Liszt Weymar, June 5th, 1849



61. To Robert Schumann

[original in the Royal Library in Berlin]

Best thanks, dear friend, for your kind information about the
performance of your "Faust" on the 28th of August.

To draw "das Ewig-Weibliche" rightly upwards ["Das Ewig-Weibliche
zicht uns hinan" ("The Eternal-Womanly draws us upwards").--
Goethe's "Faust"] by rehearsing the chorus and orchestra would
have afforded me great pleasure--and would probably have
succeeded. ["Gelangen" and "gelingen"--untranslatable little
pun.] But unfortunately obstacles which cannot be put aside have
intervened, and it will be utterly impossible for me to be
present at the Goethe Festival, as I have to betake myself in a
few days' time to an almost unknown but very efficacious bath
resort, and my doctor's orders are most strict that I must not
make any break in my "cure" during six weeks.

Notwithstanding this very deplorable contretemps for me, I
immediately informed Herr Councillor A. Scholl, as head of the
Goethe Committee, of your friendly proposal. Herewith his answer.

Allow me meanwhile to refresh your memory with an old French
proverb, "Ce qui est differe n'est pas perdu" [What is put off is
not given up], and give me the hope that soon after my return to
Weymar we may occupy ourselves seriously with the performance of
your "Faust."...

Hearty greetings to your dear wife, and believe me yours ever
most sincerely,

F. Liszt Weymar July 27th, 1849



62. To Robert Schumann

[autograph in the Royal Library in Berlin]

Dear Friend,

A summons which cannot be put off obliges me to be present at the
Goethe Festival here on the 28th of August, and to undertake the
direction of the musical part.

My first step is naturally to beg you to be so good as to send us
soon the score of your "Faust." If you should be able to spare
any of the voice or orchestral parts it would be a saving of time
to us; but if not we shall willingly submit to getting the parts
copied out as quickly as possible.

Kindly excuse me, dear friend, for the manner in which this
letter contradicts my last. I am very seldom guilty in such a
way, but in this case it does not lie in me, but in the
particulars of the matter itself.

For the rest I can assure you that your "Faust" shall be studied
with the utmost sympathy and accuracy by the orchestra and
chorus.--Herr Montag, the conductor of the Musik-Verein [Musical
Union], is taking up the chorus rehearsals with the greatest
readiness, and the rest will be my affair!--Only, dear friend,
don't delay sending the score and, if possible, the parts.

Sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Weymar, August 1st, 1849

If your opera is given not later than the 1st of September I
shall certainly come to Leipzig.



63. To Carl Reinecke

Heligoland, September 7th, 1849

I am very sorry, my dear M. Reinecke, not to have met you at
Hamburg. It would have been such a real pleasure to me to make
acquaintance again with your Nonet, and it seems to me, judging
from its antecedents in the form of a Concerto, that by this
decisive transformation it ought to be a most honorably
successful work.

The "Myrthen Lieder" have never been sent to me. If you happen to
have a copy I should be very much obliged if you would send it me
to Schuberth's address.

With regard to the article which has appeared in "La Musique" I
have all sorts of excuses to make to you. The editors of the
paper thought fit, I do not know why, to give it a title which I
completely disavow, and which would certainly have never entered
into my mind. Moreover the printer has not been sparing of
changing several words and omitting others. Such are the
inevitable disadvantages of articles sent by post, and of which
the proof correctors cannot read the writing.

Anyhow, such as it is, I am glad to think that it cannot have
done you any harm in the mind of the French public, which has
customs and requirements that one must know well when one wishes
above all things to serve one's friends by being just to them.

Two numbers of your "Kleine Fantasie-Stucke" have been
distributed, up to about a thousand copies, with the paper "La
Musique," under the title of "Bluettes,"--a rather ill-chosen
title to my idea,--but, notwithstanding this title and the words
"adopted by F. Liszt," which the editors have further taken the
responsibility of putting, I am persuaded that this publication
is a good opening (in material) into the musical world of France,
and, looking at this result only, I am charmed to have been able
to contribute to it.

I shall return to Hamburg by the last boat from Heligoland on the
27th of September, in order to go to the baths of Eilsen, where I
expect to spend all the month of October. In November I shall be
back in Weymar for the rest of the winter.

If you would have the kindness to send to Schuberth's address a
case of 250 cigars of a pretty	 good size from the Bremen
Manufactory, I should be very much obliged to you, and would take
care to let you have the money (which in any case will not be a
very great sum) through Schuberth. The samples you sent me to
Weymar did reach me, but at a moment when I was extremely
occupied, so that I forgot them. Pray let me hear from you from
time to time, my dear M. Reinecke, and regard me as a friend who
is sincerely attached to you.

F. Liszt



64. To Breitkopf and Hartel

My dear Sir,

The arrival of your piano is one of the most pleasant events in
my peacefully studious life at Weymar, and I hasten to send you
my best thanks. Although, to tell the truth, I don't intend to do
much finger-work in the course of this year, yet it is no less
indispensable for me to have from time to time a perfect
instrument to play on. It is an old custom that I should regret
to change; and, as you kindly inquire after the ulterior
destination of this piano, allow me to tell you quite frankly
that I should like to keep it as long as you will leave it me for
my private, personal, and exclusive use at Weymar. In being
guilty of the so-called indiscretion I committed in claiming of
your courtesy the continued loan of one of your instruments I
thought that, under the friendly and neighborly relations which
are established between us (for a long time to come, I hope), it
would not be unwelcome to your house that one of its productions
should play the hospitable to me, whilst receiving my hospitality
at the same time. However retired and sheltered I live from stir
and movement at Weymar, yet from time to time it does happen that
I receive illustrious visitors, or curious and idle ones who come
and trouble one for this or that; henceforth I shall be delighted
to be able to do the honors of your piano both to the one and to
the other, and that will be, besides, the best proof of the
strength of the recommendation that I have had the pleasure of
making, for a long time past, of your manufactory. If however,
contrary to expectation, it should happen that you were in
pressing need of an instrument, very little played upon, the one
at Weymar would be at your disposal at any moment.

With regard to the Beethoven Lieder-Cyclus I have just received a
letter from Mr. Haslinger which I do not communicate in full
because of the personal details it contains, but this is the
passage, as laconic as it is satisfactory, with regard to this
publication:--

"I give you with pleasure my fullest consent to the edition of
the Beethoven Liederkreis by Breitkopf and Hartel."

So by tomorrow's post I shall have the honor of returning you the
proofs of the Lieder-Cyclus, which forms a continuation to the
Beethoven Lieder which you have already edited, and which you
will publish when you think well. .--.

With the proofs of my third piece on the "Prophete" I will also
send you all the pieces on it (piano and voice) which you have
been so good as to lend me, as well as the piano score, which I
don't require any more; for, unless I should have a success which
I dare not hope for (for these three pieces), and an express
order from you for another series of three pieces, which I could
easily extract from that vast score, I shall make this the end of
my work on the "Prophete." I come at last to a question, not at
all serious, but somewhat embarrassing for me,--that of fixing
the price of the manuscripts that you are so good as to print. I
confess that this is my "quart d'heure de Rabelais!" [The "quart
d'heure de Rabelais" refers to an incident in his life, and
means, in round terms, the moment of paying--i.e., any
disagreeable moment.] In order not to prolong it for you, allow
me to tell you without further ceremony that the whole of the six
works together, which are as follows:--

Lieder of Beethoven, Lieder-Cyclus of Beethoven, Consolations
(six numbers), Illustrations of the "Prophete" (three numbers),
published by your house, are worth, according to my estimation,
80-100 louis d'or.

If this price does not seem disproportionate to you, as I am
pleased to think it will not, and if it suits you to publish
other pieces of my composition, I shall have the pleasure of
sending you in the course of the year:--

1. A "Morceau de Concert"(for piano without orchestra), composed
for the competition of the Paris Conservatoire, 1850.

2. The complete series of the Beethoven Symphonies, of which you
have as yet only published the "Pastorale" and the "C minor." (In
the supposition that this publication will suit your house, I
will beg you to make the necessary arrangements from now onwards
with Mr. Haslinger; perhaps it will even be expedient that the
Symphony in A (7th), which Haslinger published several years ago
from the arrangement that I had made, should reappear in its
proper place in the complete series of the symphonies.)

3. Bach's six fugues (for organ with pedals), arranged for piano
alone.

In the middle of February I shall send you the complete
manuscript of my little volume on Chopin, and a little later in
the same month we shall set ourselves to work here on the study
of Schubert's opera, the performance of which will take place in
the first days of April. If, as I do not doubt, the performance
of the "Prophete" draws you to Dresden, I shall certainly have
the pleasure of seeing you there, for I have just begged Mr. de
Luttichau to be so good as to reserve me a place for that
evening, and I shall not fail to be there. Meanwhile, my dear M.
Hartel, believe me,

Yours sincerely and affectionately,

F. Liszt Weymar, January 14th, 1850

On the occasion of Schubert's opera I shall probably set to work
on the arrangement of the symphony, of which, meanwhile, I hold
the score.--Compliments and best regards to Madame Hartel, which
I know you will be kind enough to convey to her.



65. To Breitkopf and Hartel

February 24th, 1850

My dear Sir,

.--. With regard to Schubert's opera ["Alfonso and Estrella." It
was given for the first time on June 24th, 1854, the birthday of
the Grand Duke (but not without some necessary cuts)], a recent
experience has entirely confirmed me in the opinion I had already
formed at the time of the first rehearsals with piano which we
had last spring--namely, that Schubert's delicate and interesting
score is, as it were, crushed by the heaviness of the libretto!
Nevertheless, I do not despair of giving this work with success;
but this success appears possible only on one condition--namely,
to adapt another libretto to Schubert's music. And since, by a
special fate, of which I have no reason to complain, a part of
Schubert's heritage has become my domain, I shall willingly busy
myself, as time and place offer, with the preparatory work and
the mise-en-scene of this opera, for which it would be
advantageous, in my opinion, if it could be first produced in
Paris. Belloni informs me that it will be pretty easy for you to
ensure me the entire rights of this work for France. If such be
the case I would take suitable measures for the success of this
work, on occasion of which I should naturally have to make a
considerable outlay of time and money, so that I should not be
disposed to run any risk without the guarantee of proportionate
receipts from the sale of the work in France, and author's rights
which I shall have to give up to the new poet.

This matter, however, is not at all pressing, for I shall only be
able to set to work in the matter in the course of next year
(1851); but I shall be very much obliged to you not to lose sight
of it, and to put me in possession, when you are able, of the
cession of the French and English rights, in consideration of
which I will set to work and try to get the best possible chances
of success.

Many thanks to you for so kindly sending the score of Schubert's
Symphony. That of the "Prophete" not being wanted by me any
longer, I enclose it in the parcel of proofs and manuscripts
which I beg you to undertake to send off to Mr. Belloni's address
in Paris.

On Easter Monday we shall give the first performance of "Comte
Ory." [By Rossini] Would you not feel tempted to come and hear
it? It is a charming work, brimming over and sparkling with
melody like champagne, so that at the last rehearsal I christened
it the "Champagner-Oper" ["Champagne Opera."] and in order to
justify this title our amiable Intendant proposes to regale the
whole theater with a few dozens of champagne in the second act,
in order to spirit up the chorus.

"Qu'il avait de bon vin le Seigneur chatelain!"

Cordial remembrances from yours affectionately,

F. Liszt

I should be glad for the publication of No. 3 of the pieces on
the "Prophete," and the "Consolations," not to be put off long.



66. To Professor J. C. Lobe in Leipzig

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
The addressee (1797-1881), a writer on music (formerly Court
Musician at Weimar), lived from 1846 in Leipzig.]

My esteemed Friend,

It is with much pleasure I send you the good news that H.R.H. the
Grand Duchess has graciously accepted the dedication of your
"System of Composition." [Published in 1850.] Our gracious
protector [feminine] started yesterday for The Hague, and will
not be back till towards the middle of August.

I hope you will be sure not to fail us at the Herder Festival in
Weymar (August 25th), as well as at the "Lohengrin" evening
(28th); we have been already waiting for you so long!

Between the performances of the "Messiah" and "Lohengrin" (to say
nothing of my "Prometheus" choruses) will also be the best
opportunity for you to present your work in person to the Grand
Duchess.

Remember me kindly to your dear family, and remain my friend as I
am yours

Most truly,

F. Liszt Weymar, July 10th, 1850



67. To Friedrich Wieck in Dresden

[published in the "Neue Musik-Zeitung" in 1888.--The addressee
was the well-known pianoforte master, the father of Clara
Schumann (1785-1873).]

Esteemed Sir,

It will be a real pleasure to me to welcome you here, and your
daughter [Marie Wieck, Hohenzollern Court Pianist in Dresden],
whom I have already heard so highly commended. Weymar, as you
know it of old, offers no brilliant resources for concerts; but
you may rest assured beforehand that I, on my side, shall do
everything that is possible in this connection to make things
easy for you. To me it seems especially desirable that you should
wait until the return of H.R.H. the Grand Duchess, which will be
within a fortnight; should you, however, be tied by time and come
here before that date, I bid you heartily welcome, dear sir, and
place myself at your disposal.

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, August 4th, 1850



68. To Simon Lowy in Vienna.

[Autograph in the Royal Library in Vienna. Printed in a German
translation, La Mara, "Letters of Musicians during Five
Centuries," vol. ii.]

Weymar, August 5th, 1850

Dear Friend,

My cousin Edward writes me word that you are a little piqued at
my long silence,--and I, shall I tell you frankly? am a little
piqued that you have not yet thought of coming to see me, and of
transferring your bath season to some place in the neighborhood
of Weymar. Will you make peace with me?--

Accept as a friend the invitation I give you in all friendship.
Arrive at Weymar the 23rd of August, and stay till the 30th at
least. You will find several of your friends here,--Dingelstedt,
Jules Janin, Meyerbeer (?), etc.,--and you will hear, firstly, on
the evening of the 24th, a good hour and a half of music that I
have just composed (Overture and Choruses) for the "Prometheus"
of Herder, which will be given as a Festal Introduction to the
inauguration of his statue in bronze by Schaller of Munich, which
is fixed for the 25th; secondly, on the evening of the 25th,
Handel's "Messiah"; thirdly, on the 28th, the anniversary of
Goethe's birth, a remarkably successful Prologue made, ad hoc,
for that day by Dingelstedt, followed by the first performance of
Wagner's "Lohengrin." This work, which you certainly will not
have the opportunity of hearing so soon anywhere else, on account
of the special position of the composer, and the many
difficulties in its performance, is to my idea a chef-d'oeuvre of
the highest and most ideal kind! Not one of the operas which has
entertained the theaters for the past twenty years can give any
approximate idea of it.

So don't be piqued any longer, or rather, dear friend, be piqued
with curiosity to be one of the first to hear such a beautiful
thing. Sulk with Vienna, for a few weeks at least, instead of
sulking with me, which is all nonsense, and believe me always and
ever your most sincerely attached, but very much occupied, very
much pre-occupied, and oftentimes very absorbed friend,

F. Liszt



69. To Mathilde Graumann

[Given by the addressee, subsequently celebrated as Mathilde
Marchesi, teacher of singing, in "Aus meinem Leben" (Bagel,
Dusseldorf)]

Mademoiselle,

Here is the letter for the Grand Master de Luttichau, which M. de
Ziegesar has just written in your honor and glory, with all the
good grace and obligingness which he keeps for you.

As regards introductions to Berlin there is a provoking
contretemps for you. H.R.H. the Princess of Prussia will pass the
winter at Coblentz.

Meyerbeer, to whom I beg you to remember me respectfully, will
certainly be your best patron with the Court, and I have no doubt
that he will receive you with sympathy and interest.

I will also send you, in the course of the week, a letter for the
Chamberlain of H.R.H. Princess Charles of Prussia, which Ziegesar
has promised me.

As to our concert, fixed for the 19th (Saturday next), I assure
you frankly that I should not have ventured to speak to you of
it, and that I hardly venture now.

The receipts are to be devoted to some pension fund, always so
low in funds in our countries; consequently I am not in a
position to propose any suitable terms. Now as, on the occasion
of the performance of the "Messiah," you have already been only
too kind to us, it really would not do for me to return to the
charge, unless you were to authorize me to do so quite directly
and positively, by writing me an epistolary masterpiece somewhat
as follows:--

"I will sing in a perfunctory manner, but with the best
intentions and the best will in the world, the air from...(here
follows the name of the piece), and the duet from "Semairamide"
with Milde or Mademoiselle Aghte, next Saturday; and in order not
to put anybody out, I will arrive at the exact time of the
rehearsal, on Friday at four o'clock."

If any such idea as this should come into your head please let me
know (by telegram if need be), so that by Monday night, or, at
latest, Tuesday midday, I may be able to make the programme,
which must appear by Wednesday morning at latest.

With homage and friendship,

F. Liszt

Friday, October 11th, 1850  Be so kind as to give a friendly
shake of the hand from me to Joachim; recommend him not to be too
late in arriving at Weimar, where we expect him for the evening
of the 14th.

P.S.--At the moment when I was going to send my letter to the
post the following lines reached me. I send them to you intact,
and you will see by them that you could not have friends better
disposed towards you than those of Weimar.

Please do not fail to write direct to Ziegesar to thank him for
his kindness, of which you have been sensibly informed by me
(without alluding to his letter, which you will return to me),
and at the same time say exactly which week you will arrive in
Berlin; unless, however, you prefer to come and tell him this
verbally on Friday or Saturday evening at the Altenburg, after
you have again chanted to us and enchanted us. [Literal
translation, on account of play on words.]



70. To Carl Reinecke

Dear Reinecke,

Here are the letters for Berlioz and Erard that I offered you. I
add a few lines for the young Prince Eugene Wittgenstein, with
whom you will easily have pleasant relations; he is an
impassioned musician, and is remarkably gifted with artistic
qualities. In addition, I have had a long talk about your stay in
Paris, and the success which you ought to obtain, with Belloni,
who came to me for a few days. You will find him thoroughly well
disposed to help you by all the means in his power, and I would
persuade you to have complete confidence in him. Go and look for
him as soon as ever you arrive, and ask him for all the practical
information you require. Make your visit to Messrs. Escudier with
him. (N.B.--He will explain why I have not given you a letter for
Brandus.)

The greater number of your pieces have hitherto been printed
exclusively by Escudier, and in my opinion you would do well to
keep well with them in consequence. In your position it is not at
all necessary to make advances to everybody--and, moreover, it is
the very way to have no one for yourself. Look, observe, and keep
an intelligent reserve, and don't cast yourself, German-wise,
precipitately into politeness and inopportune modesty.

In one of your leisure hours Belloni will take you to Madame
Patersi, who is entrusted with the education of my two daughters,
for whom I beg a corner of your kind attention. Play them your
Polonaise and Ballade, and let me hear, later on, how their very
small knowledge of music is going on. Madame Patersi, as I told
you, will have much pleasure in introducing you to her former
pupil, Madame de Foudras, whose salon enjoys an excellent
reputation.

Need I renew to you here the request of my four cardinal points?-
-No, I am sure I need not!--Accept then, dear Reinecke, all my
heartiest wishes for this new year, as well as for your journey
to Paris. Let me hear of you through Belloni, if you have not
time to write to me yourself, and depend in all circumstances on
the very cordial attachment of

Yours sincerely and affectionately,

F. Liszt January 1st, 1851  My return to Weymar is unfortunately
again postponed for twenty days, by the doctor's orders, to which
I submit, although not personal to myself. [They referred to
Princess Wittgenstein, who was ill.]



71. To Leon Escudier, Music Publisher in Paris

[autograph in the possession of M. Arthur Pougin in Paris.--The
addressee was at that time the manager of the periodical "La
France Musicale," in which Liszt's Memoir of Chopin first
appeared in detached numbers (beginning from February 9th,
1851).]

Weymar, February 4th, 1851

My dear Sir,

The proofs of the two first articles of my biographical study of
Chopin ought to have reached you some days ago, for I corrected
and forwarded them immediately on my return to Weymar. You will
also find an indication of how I want them divided, which I shall
be obliged if you will follow. Both on account of the reverence
of my friendship for Chopin, and my desire to devote the utmost
care to my present and subsequent publications, it is important
to me that this work should make its appearance as free from
defects as possible, and I earnestly request you to give most
conscientious attention to the revision of the last proofs. Any
alterations, corrections, and additions must be made entirely in
accordance with my directions, so that the definitive
publication, which it would be opportune to begin at once in your
paper, may satisfy us and rightly fulfill the aim we have in
view. If therefore your time is too fully occupied to give you
the leisure to undertake these corrections, will you be so good
as to beg M. Chavee [an eminent Belgian linguist, at that time a
collaborator on the "France Musicale"] (as you propose) to do me
this service with the scrupulous exactitude which is requisite,
for which I shall take the opportunity of expressing to him
personally my sincere thanks?

In the matter of exactitude you would have some right to reproach
me (I take it kindly of you to have passed it over in silence,
but I have nevertheless deserved your reproaches, apparently at
least) with regard to Schubert's opera ["Alfonso and Estrella,"
which Liszt produced at Weimar in 1854]. I hope Belloni has
explained to you that the only person whom I can employ to make a
clear copy of this long work has been overwhelmed, up to now,
with pressing work. It will therefore be about three months
before I can send you the three acts, the fate of which I leave
in your hands, and for which, by the aid of an interesting
libretto, we may predict good luck at the Opera Comique. I will
return to this matter more in detail when I am in the position to
send you the piano score (with voice), to which, as yet, I have
only been able to give some too rare leisure hours, but which I
promise you I will not put off to the Greek Calends!

As far as regards my opera, allow me to thank you for the
interest you are ready to take in it. For my own part I have made
up my mind to work actively at the score. I expect to have a copy
of it ready by the end of next autumn. We will then see what can
be done with it, and talk it over.

Meanwhile accept, my dear sir, my best	thanks and compliments.

F. Liszt

The proofs of the third and fourth articles on Chopin will be
posted to you tomorrow.

Has Belloni spoken to you about F. David's "Salon Musical"
(twenty-four pieces of two pages each, very elegantly written and
easy to play)?--I can warmly recommend this work to you, both
from the point of view of art, and of a profitable, and perhaps
even popular, success. [Presumably Ferdinand David's "Bunte
Reihe," Op. 30, which Liszt transcribed for piano alone.]



72. To Carl Reinecke

My dear Mr. Reinecke,

I am still writing to you from Eilsen; your two kind and charming
letters found me here and have given me a very real pleasure. You
may rest quite assured during your life of the sincere and
affectionate interest I feel for you, an interest of which I
shall always be happy to give you the best proofs as far as it
depends on me.

Madame Patersi is loud in her praises both of your talent and of
yourself,--and I thank you sincerely for having so well fulfilled
my wishes with regard to the lessons you have been so kind as to
give to Blandine and Cosima. [Liszt's daughters. Blandine (died
1872) became afterwards the wife of Emile Ollivier; Cosima is the
widow of Wagner.] Who knows? Perhaps later on these girls will do
you honor in a small way by coming out advantageously with some
new composition by their master Reinecke, to the great applause
of Papa!

Hiller shows tact and taste in making sure of you as a coadjutor
at the Rhenish Conservatorium, which seems to be taking a turn
not to be leaky everywhere. Cologne has much good,
notwithstanding its objectionable nooks. Until now the musical
ground there has been choked up rather than truly cultivated!
People are somewhat coarse and stupidly vain there; I know not
what stir of bales, current calculations, and cargoes incessantly
comes across the things of Art. It would be unjust, however, not
to recognize. the vital energy, the wealth of vigor, the
praiseworthy activity of this country, in which a group of
intelligent men, nobly devoted to their task, may bring about
fine results, more easily than elsewhere.

At any rate I approve of what you have done, and compliment you
on having accepted Hiller's offer, [Namely, a position as
Professor at the Conservatorium of Cologne, which Reinecke
occupied from 1851 to 1854.] and shall have pleasure in sending
to your new address some of my latest publications, which will
appear towards the end of May (amongst others a new edition,
completely altered and well corrected, I hope, of my twelve great
Etudes, the Concerto without orchestra dedicated to Henselt, and
the six "Harmonies Poetiques et Religieuses"). I have also
written a very melancholy Polonaise, and some other trifles which
you will perhaps like to look over.

Let me hear from you soon, my dear Mr. Reinecke, and depend,
under all circumstances, on the faithful attachment of

Yours affectionately and sincerely,

F. Liszt

Eilsen, March 19th, 1851



73. To Dr. Eduard Liszt in Vienna

[An uncle of Liszt's (that is, the younger half-brother of his
father), although Liszt was accustomed to call him his cousin: a
noble and very important man, who became Solicitor-General in
Vienna, where he died February 8th, 1879. Franz Liszt clung to
him with ardor, as his dearest relation and friend, and in March,
1867, made over to him the hereditary knighthood.]

[Weimar, 1851]

Dear, excellent Eduard ,

It will be a real joy to me to take part in your joy, and I thank
you very cordially for having thought first of me as godfather to
your child. I accept that office very willingly, and make sincere
wishes that this son may be worthy of his father, and may help to
increase the honor of our name. Alas! it has been only too much
neglected and even compromised by the bulk of our relations, who
have been wanting either in noble sentiments, or in intelligence
and talent--some even in education and the first necessary
elements--to give a superior impulse to their career and to
deserve serious consideration and esteem. Thank God it is
otherwise with you, and I cannot tell you what a sweet and noble
satisfaction I derive from this. The intelligent constancy which
you have used to conquer the numerous difficulties which impeded
your way; the solid instruction you have acquired; the
distinguished talents you have developed; the healthy and wise
morality that you have ever kept in your actions and speech; your
sincere filial piety towards your mother; your attachment,
resulting from reflection and conviction, to the precepts of the
Catholic religion; these twenty years, in fine, that you have
passed and employed so honorably,--all this is worthy of the
truest praises, and gives you the fullest right to the regard and
esteem of honest and sensible people. So I am pleased to see that
you are beginning to reap the fruits of your care, and the
distinguished post to which you have just been appointed [He had
been made Assistant Public Prosecutor in 1850.] seems to justify
the hopes that you confided to me formerly, and which I treated,
probably wrongly, as so much naive ambition. At the point at
which you have arrived it would be entirely out of place for me
to poke advice and counsel out of season at you. Permit me, for
the sake of the lively friendship I bear you, and the ties of
relationship which bind us together, to make this one and only
recommendation, "Remain true to yourself!" Remain true to all you
feel to be highest, noblest, most right and most pure in your
heart! Don't ever try to be or to become something (unless there
were opportune and immediate occasion for it), but work
diligently and with perseverance to be and to become more and
more some one.--Since the difficult and formidable duty has
fallen upon you of judging men, and of pronouncing on their
innocence or guilt, prove well your heart and soul, that you may
not be found guilty yourself at the tribunal of the Supreme
Judge,--and under grave and decisive circumstances learn not to
give ear to any one but your conscience and your God!--

Austria has shown lately a remarkable activity, and a military
and diplomatic energy the service of which we cannot deny for the
re-establishment of her credit and political position. Certainly
by the prevision of a great number of exclusive Austrians--a
prevision which, moreover, I have never shared--it is probable
that the Russian alliance will have been a stroke of diplomatic
genius very favorable to the Vienna Cabinet, and that, in
consequence of this close alliance, the monarchical status quo
will be consolidated in Europe, notwithstanding all the
democratic ferments and dissolving elements which are evidently,
whatever people may say, at their period of ebb. I do not
precisely believe in a state of tranquility and indefinite peace,
but simply in a certain amount of order in the midst of disorder
for a round dozen of years, the main spring of this order being
naturally at Petersburg. From the day in which a Russian
battalion had crossed the Austrian frontier my opinion was fixed,
and when my friend Mr. de Ziegesar came and told me the news I
immediately said to him, "Germany will become Russian, and for
the great majority of Germans there is no sort of hesitation as
to the only side it remains to them to take."

The Princess having very obligingly taken the trouble to tell you
my wishes with regard to my money matters, I need not trouble you
further with them, and confine myself to thanking you very
sincerely for your exactness, and for the discerning integrity
with which you watch over the sums confided to your care. May
events grant that they may prosper, and that they may not become
indispensable to us very soon.--

Before the end of the winter I will send you a parcel of music
(of my publications), which will be a distraction for your
leisure hours. I endeavour to work the utmost and the best that I
can, though sometimes a sort of despairing fear comes over me at
the thought of the task I should like to fulfill, for which at
least ten years more of perfect health of body and mind will be
necessary to me.

Give my tender respects to Madame Liszt; you two form henceforth
my father's entire family; and believe in the lively and
unalterable friendship of

Your truly devoted,

F. Liszt



74. To Count Casimir Esterhazy

[Autograph (without address) in the possession of Herr Albert
Cohn, bookseller in Berlin.--The addressee was presumably Count
Esterhazy, whose guest Liszt was in Presburg in 1840.]

Let me thank you very sincerely for your kind remembrance, dear
friend, and let me also tell you how much I regret that my
journey to Hohlstein cannot come to pass during your short stay
there. But as by chance you already find yourself in Germany,
will you not push on some fine day as far as Weymar?--I should
have very great pleasure in seeing you there and in receiving
you--not in the manorial manner in which you received me at
Presburg, but very cordially and modestly as a conductor, kept by
I know not what strange chance of fate at a respectful distance
from storms and shipwrecks!--

For three weeks past a very sad circumstance has obliged me to
keep at Eilsen, where I had already passed some months of last
winter. The reigning Prince is, as you have perhaps forgotten,
the present proprietor of one of your estates,--the Prince of
Schaumburg-Lippe. If by chance you are owing him a debt of
politeness, the opportunity of putting yourself straight would be
capital for me. Nevertheless I dare not count too much on the
attractions of the grandeur and charms of Buckeburg! and I must
doubtless resign myself to saying a longer farewell to you.

Let me know by Lowy of Vienna where I shall address to you some
pieces in print which you can look over at any leisure hour, and
which I shall be delighted to offer you. I will add to them later
the complete collection of my "Hungarian Rhapsodies," which will
now form a volume of nearly two hundred pages, of which I shall
prepare a second edition next winter. Hearty and affectionate
remembrances from

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Eilsen, June 6th, 1851



75. To Theodor Uhlig, Chamber Musician in Dresden

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Hermann Scholtz, Chamber
virtuoso in Dresden.--The addressee, who was an intimate friend
of Wagner's (see "Wagner's Letters to Uhlig, Fischer, Heine"--
London: H. Grevel & Co., 1890), gained for himself a lasting name
by his pianoforte score of Lohengrin. He died January, 1853.]

The perusal of your most kind and judicious article in Brendel's
Musical Gazette on the "Goethe Foundation" [By Liszt, 1850. See
"Gesammelte Schriften," vol. v.] confirms me in the belief that I
could not fail to be understood by you in full intelligence of
the cause. Allow me then, my dear Mr. Uhlig, to thank you very
cordially for this new proof of your obligingness and of your
sympathy--in French, as this language becomes more and more
familiar and easy to me, whereas I am obliged to make an effort
to patch up more or less unskillfully my very halting German
syntax.

The very lucid explanation that you have made of my pamphlet, as
well as the lines with which you have prefaced and followed it,
have given me a real satisfaction, and one which I did not expect
to receive through that paper, which, if I am not mistaken, had
hitherto shown itself somewhat hostile to me personally, and to
the ideas which they do me the small honor to imagine I possess.
This impression has been still further increased in me by reading
Mr. Brendel's following article on R. Wagner, which seems to me a
rather arranged transition between the former point of view of
the Leipzig school or pupils and the real point of view of
things. The quotation Brendel makes of Stahr's article on the
fifth performance of "Lohengrin" at Weymar, evidently indicates a
conversion more thought than expressed on the part of the former,
and at the performance of "Siegfried" I am persuaded that Leipzig
will not be at all behindhand, as at "Lohengrin."

I do not know whether Mr. Wolf (the designer) has had the
pleasure of meeting you yet at Dresden; I had commissioned him to
make my excuses to you for the delay in sending the manuscript of
Wiland. Unfortunately it is impossible for me to think of
returning to Weymar before the end of July, and the manuscript is
locked up among other papers which I could not put into strange
hands. Believe me that I am really vexed at these delays, the
cause of which is so sad for me.

If by chance you should repass by Cologne and Minden, it would be
very nice if you could stay a day at Buckeburg (Eilsen), where I
am obliged to stay till the 15th of July. I have not much
pleasure to offer you, but in return we can talk there at our
ease of the St. Graal...

My pamphlet "Lohengrin and Tannhauser" will appear in French at
Brockhaus' towards the end of July. It will have at least the
same circulation as the "Goethe Foundation," and I will send you
by right one of the first copies.

Kind regards to Wagner, about whom I have written a great deal
lately without writing to him; and believe me yours very
sincerely,

F. Liszt

Eilsen (Buckeburg), June 25th, 1851.



76. To Rosalie Spohr in Brunswick

[niece of Louis Spohr, and an incomparable harpist,--"The most
ideal representative of her beautiful instrument," according to
Bulow; after her marriage with Count Sauerma she retired from
public life and now lives in Berlin.]

After your amiable authorization to do so, Mademoiselle, I have
had your concert announced at Eilsen for Tuesday next, July 8th,
and you may rest assured that the best society of Buckeburg and
of the Badegaste [visitors who go for the baths] will be present.

The price of the tickets has been fixed for 1 florin, which is
the maximum customary in this country. With regard to the
programme, I await your reply, in which I shall be glad if you
will tell me the four or five pieces you will choose, amongst
which will be, I hope,	Parish Alvars' Fantaisie on motives from
"Oberon" and the "Danse des Fees."

A distinguished amateur, Monsieur Lindemann of Hanover, has
promised me to play one or two violoncello solos, and the rest of
the programme will be easily made.

As to your route, you had better take the Schnellzug [express]
next Monday, which starts about 11 in the morning from Brunswick,
and brings you to Buckeburg in less than three hours. From here
it will only take you thirty-five minutes to get to Eilsen. The
most simple plan for you would be not to write to me beforehand
even, but to improvise your programme according to your fancy
here. Only let me beg you not to arrive later than Monday
evening, so that the public may be free from anxiety, and to set
my responsibility perfectly at rest in a corner of your harp-
case.

May I beg you, Mademoiselle, to remember me affectionately to
your father? and be assured of the pleasure it will be to see
you, hear you, and admire you anew, to your sincere and devoted
servant,

F. Liszt

Eilsen, July 3rd, 1851

I beg you once more not to be later than next Monday, July 7th,
in coming to Eilsen.



77. To Rosalie Spohr

I am deeply sensible of your charming lines, Mademoiselle, the
impression of which is the completion for me of the harmonious
vibrations of your beautiful talent,--vibrations which are still
resounding in the woods and in your auditors at Eilsen. While
expressing to you my sincere thanks I should reproach myself were
I to forget the piquant and substantial present that your father
has sent me, and I beg you to tell him that we have done all
honor to the savory product of Brunswick industry. The Buckeburg
industry having a certain reputation in petto in the matter of
chocolate, the Princess, who sends her best regards to you and
your family, wishes me to send you a sample, which you will
receive by tomorrow's post. The chocolate, in its quality of a
sedative tonic, will, moreover, not come amiss in the intervals
of your study.

May I beg you, Mademoiselle, to give my affectionate compliments
to your parents as well as to the clever drawing-historiographer
[The younger sister of the addressee, Ida Spohr, at that time
sixteen years old, who was a most gifted creature, both in
poetry, painting, and music. She died young, at the age of
twenty-four] whom you know? and receive once more the best wishes
of yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Eilsen, July 22nd, 1851



78. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Allow me, my dear Mr. Hartel, to make known to you, as a kind of
curiosity, a very long piece I composed last winter on the
chorale "Ad Nos" from the "Prophete." If by chance you should
think well to publish this long Prelude, followed by an equally
long Fugue, I could not be otherwise than much obliged to you;
and I shall take advantage of the circumstance to acquit myself,
in all reverence and friendship, of a dedication to Meyerbeer,
which it has long been my intention to do; and it was only for
want of finding among my works something which would suit him in
some respect, that I have been obliged to defer it till now. I
should be delighted therefore if you would help me to fill up
this gap in the recognition I owe to Meyerbeer; but I dare not
press you too much for fear you may think that my Fugue has more
advantage in remaining unknown to the public in so far that it is
in manuscript, than if it had to submit to the same fate after
having been published by your care.

In accordance with your obliging promise, I waited from week to
week for the preface that Mr. Wagner has added to his three opera
poems. I should be glad to know how soon you expect to bring them
out, and beg you to be so good as to send me immediately three
copies.

Believe me, my dear Mr. Hartel,

Yours affectionately and most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 1st, 1851

P.S.--Would it perhaps do to bring out my Fugue on the "Prophete"
as No. 4 of my "Illustrations du Prophete"? That was at least my
first intention. [It was published in that form by Breitkopf and
Hartel.] In the same parcel you will find the piano score of the
"Prophete," which I am very much obliged to you for having lent
me.



79. To Louis Kohler in Konigsberg

[An important piano teacher and writer on music, and composer of
valuable instructive works (1820-86).]

Dear Sir,

The friendly kindness with which you have spoken of a couple of
my latest compositions lays me under an obligation of warm
thanks, which I must no longer delay having the pleasure of
expressing to you. I should be very glad if you find anything
that suits you in my next impending piano publication (the new,
entirely revised edition of my Studies, the "Harmonies Poetiques
et Religieuses," and the two years of "Annees de Pelerinage,
Suite de Compositions," etc.). In any case I shall venture to
send this work, with the request that you will accept it as a
token of my gratitude for the favorable opinion which you
entertain of my artistic efforts.

At this moment I have to compliment you also very much on your
arrangement of the Hungarian "Volkslieder" [Folk Songs]. For
several years past I have been occupied with a similar work, and
next winter I think of publishing the result of my national
studies in a pretty big volume of "Hungarian Rhapsodies." Your
transcriptions have interested me much through the correct
perception of the melodies, and their elegant though simple
style.

Senff [The well-known Leipzig music publisher.] showed me also in
manuscript a book of Russian melodies, that seemed to me most
successful. When will it come out?

If by any chance you have a spare copy of your new work, the
exact title of which I do not remember, but it is somewhat as
follows, "Opern am Clavier" [Operas at the Piano] or "Opern fur
Clavierspieler" [Operas for Pianoforte Players] (or, in French,
"Repertoire d'Opera pour les Pianistes"), I should be much
obliged if you would let me have one.

Accept, dear sir, my best respects, and believe me

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, April 16th, 1852



80. To Carl Reinecke

My dear Mr. Reinecke,

A very good friend of mine, Professor Weyden of Cologne, who has
just been spending a few days with me here, kindly promises to
give you these few lines and to tell you what pleasure your
present of the "Variations on a Theme of Bach" has given me. It
is a very eminent work, and perfectly successful in its actual
form. While complimenting you sincerely upon it, I must also add
my thanks that you have joined my name to it.

I should have liked to be able to send you some of my new works
for piano, of which I spoke to you before; but, as I have been
altering them and touching them up, the publication of them has
been delayed; nevertheless, I expect that in the course of this
summer the twelve "Grandes Etudes" (definitive edition) and the
"Harmonies Poetiques et Religieuses" will successively appear,
and in December or January next the "Annees de Pelerinage, Suite
de Compositions pour le Piano," and the complete collection of my
"Hungarian Rhapsodies." Meanwhile, let me offer you the "Concert
Solo" and the two Polonaises which were written at Eilsen shortly
after your visit to me there.

Joachim starts tomorrow for London, and I have commissioned him
to persuade you to come and see me at Weymar on his return. I
have been much attached to him this winter, and I hold his talent
as well as himself in high esteem and true sympathy.--

Try not to delay too long the pleasure I should have in hearing
your trio; I shall be delighted to make the acquaintance of
Madame Reinecke, and would not wish to be among the last to
congratulate you on your happiness.

In cordial friendship, yours ever,

F. Liszt

Weymar, April 16th, 1852



81. To Carl Czerny

[Autograph in the archives of the Musik-Verein in Vienna.]

My dearest and most honored Master and Friend,

A melancholy event which has thrown our Court into deep mourning-
-the sudden death of the Duchess Bernard of Saxe-Weimar--has not
allowed of my presenting your letter to Her Imperial Highness the
Grand Duchess until a day or two ago. She has been pleased to
receive your letter and your intentions with marked kindness, the
expression of which you will find in the accompanying letter
which she charged Baron de Vitzthum to write you in her name.

May I beg you then to advise Mr. Schott to send me immediately on
the publication of your "Gradus ad Parnassum" a dedication copy,
which I will get suitably bound in velvet here, and which I will
immediately remit to H.I.H.--As regards the form of dedication, I
advise you to choose the most simple:--

Gradus ad Parnassum, etc.,

Compose et tres respectueusement dedie a Son Altesse Imperiale et
Royale Madame la Grande Duchesse de Saxe-Weimar-Eisenach Marie
Paulowna, par Ch. Czerny.

[Composed and most respectfully dedicated to Her Royal and
Imperial Highness Marie Paulowna, Grand Duchess of Saxe-Weimar-
Eisenach by Ch. Czerny.]

Or if the title be in German:--

Componirt und I. kais. kon. Hoheit der Frau Grossherzogin zu
Sachsen-Weimar-Eisenach Marie Paulowna, in tiefster Ehrfurcht
gewidmet, von C. Cz.

What you tell me of the prodigious activity of your Muse obliges
me to make a somewhat shameful acknowledgment of my relative
slowness and idleness. The pupil is far from the master in this
as in other points. Nevertheless I think I have made a better use
of the last three years than of the preceding ones; for one thing
I have gone through a rather severe work of revision, and have
remodeled entirely several of my old works (amongst others the
Studies which are dedicated to you, and of which I will send you
a copy of the definitive edition in a few weeks, and the "Album
d'un Voyageur," which will reappear very considerably corrected,
increased, and transformed under the title of "Annees de
Pelerinage, Suite de Compositions pour le Piano-Suisse et
Italie"): for another thing I have been continuing writing in
proportion as ideas came to me, and I fancy I have arrived at
last at that point where the style is adequate to the thought.
Unfortunately my outside occupations absorb much of my time. The
orchestra and opera of Weymar were greatly in need of reform and
of stirring up. The remarkable and extraordinary works to which
our theater owes its new renown--"Tannhauser," "Lohengrin,"
"Benvenuto Cellini"--required numerous rehearsals, which I could
not give into the hands of anybody else. The day before yesterday
a very pretty work, in an elegant and simple melodic style, was
given for the first time--"Der lustige Rath," [The Merry
Councillor (or counsel)] by Mr. de Vesque, which met with
complete success. Carl Haslinger, who had arrived for the first
performance of "Cellini," was also present at this, and can tell
you about it. In the interval between these two works, on Sunday
last, he had his Cantata-Symphony "Napoleon" performed, and
conducted it himself (as a rather severe indisposition has
obliged me to keep my room for several days).

In the course of the month of June my mother, who proposes to pay
a visit to her sister at Gratz, will have the privilege of going
to see you, dear master, and of renewing to you, in my name and
her own, our expressions of sincere gratitude to you for the
numerous kindnesses you have shown me. Believe me that the
remembrance of them is as lively as it is constant in my heart.

I owe you still further thanks for the trouble you have taken to
make Mr. de Hardegg study Schubert's Fantasia, scored by me, and
I beg you to give him my best compliments. It is perhaps to be
regretted that this work, which contains many fine details,
should have been played for the first time in the Salle de
Redoute, so "redoutable" and ungrateful a room for the piano in
general; in a less vast space, such as the salle of the Musik-
Verein, the virtuoso and the work would assuredly have been heard
more to advantage, and if I did not fear to appear indiscreet I
should ask Mr. de Hardegg to play it a second time, in a concert
room of moderate size.

I have inquired several times as to the talent and the career of
Mr. de Hardegg, in whom I naturally feel an interest from the
fact of the interest you take in him. If by chance he should be
thinking of making a journey to this part of Germany, beg him
from me not to forget me at Weymar. I shall be delighted to make
his acquaintance, and he may be assured of a very affectionate
reception from me.

Accept, my dear and honored friend, every assurance of my high
esteem, and believe that I shall ever remain

Your very faithful and grateful

F. Liszt

Weymar, April 19th, 1852



82. To Gustav Schmidt, Capellmeister at Frankfort-on-the-Maine

[Autograph (without address) in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet
at Valentigney.--The addressee was, in any case, the above-
mentioned (1816-82), finally Court-Capellmeister (conductor) at
Darmstadt, the composer of the operas "Prinz Eugen," "Die Weiber
von Weinsberg," and others.]

Dear Friend,

.--. The idea of a Congress of Capellmeisters is indeed a very
judicious one, and from a satisfactory realization of it only
good and better things could result for the present divided state
of music. There is no question that in the insulation and
paralyzing of those who are authorities in Art lies a very
powerful hindrance, which, if it continues, must essentially
injure and endanger Art. Upon certain principles an union is
necessary, so that the results of it may be actively applied, and
it especially behooves Capellmeisters worthily to maintain the
interests of music and musicians. A meeting such as you propose
would be a timely one; only you will approve of my reasons when I
renounce the honor of proposing this meeting for Weimar, and
indicate Spohr to you as the proper head. The master Spohr is our
senior; he has always furthered the cause of music as far as
circumstances at Cassel permitted--the "Fliegender Hollander" was
given at Cassel under his direction earlier than "Tannhauser" was
given at Weymar. Talk it over with him, which from the near
vicinity of Frankfort you can easily do, and if, as I do not
doubt, he enters into your project, fix the date and let me know.
I shall gladly take part in the matter, and will make it my
business to do my share towards bringing about the desired
results.

"Tannhauser" is announced for the 31st of this month (on occasion
of the presence of Her Majesty the Empress of Russia). Beck takes
the title-role at this performance. We shall give Schumann's
"Manfred" a few days later. For next season the "Fliegender
Hollander" and Spohr's "Faust," with the new Recitatives which he
wrote for London, are fixed.

Farewell, and happiness attend you, dear friend; remember me
kindly to your wife, and believe me ever

Yours most sincerely, F. Liszt

Weymar, May 18th, 1852.



83. To Robert Schumann

[Autograph in the Royal Library in Berlin.]

My very dear Friend,

It is with great pleasure that I am able to announce to you the
first performance of "Manfred" for next Sunday, June 13th, and to
invite you to come to it. ["Manfred" was put on the stage for the
first time by Liszt] I hope that, at this time of year, your
Dusseldorf duties will allow of your coming here for a couple of
days, and that probably you will bring Clara with you, to whom
please remember me very kindly. Should you, however, come alone,
I beg that you will stay with me at the Altenburg, where you can
make yourself perfectly at home. The last rehearsal is fixed for
Friday afternoon; perhaps it would be possible for you to be
present at it, which of course would be very agreeable to me.
Your Leipzig friends will see the announcement of this
performance in the papers, and I think you will consider it your
bounden duty not to be absent from us at this performance.

Wishing you always from my heart the best spirits for your work,
good health, and "every other good that appertains thereto," I
remain unalterably

Yours most sincerely, F. Liszt

Weymar, June 8th, 1852.



84. To Robert Schumann

[Autograph in the Royal Library in Berlin.]

My very dear Friend,

I regret extremely that you could not come to the second
performance [This might perhaps also be read "first
performance."] of your "Manfred," and I believe that you would
not have been dissatisfied with the musical preparation and
performance of that work (which I count among your greatest
successes). The whole impression was a thoroughly noble, deep,
and elevating one, in accordance with my expectations. The part
of Manfred was taken by Herr Potsch, who rendered it in a manly
and intelligent manner. With regard to the mise-en-scene
something might be said; yet it would be unfair not to speak in
praise of the merits of the manager, Herr Genast. It seems to me
therefore that it would be nice of you to write a friendly line
of thanks to Herr Genast, and commission him to compliment Herr
Potsch (Manfred) and the rest of the actors from you.

One only remark I will permit myself: the introduction music to
the Ahriman chorus (D minor) is too short. Some sixty to a
hundred bars of symphony, such as you understand how to write,
would have a decidedly good effect there. Think the matter over,
and then go fresh to your desk. Ahriman can stand some polyphonic
phrases, and this is an occasion where one may rant and rage away
quite comfortably.

Shall I send you your manuscript score back, or will you make me
a lovely present of it? I am by no means an autograph-collector,
but the score, if you don't require it any longer, would give me
pleasure.

A thousand friendly greetings to Clara, and beg your wife to let
me soon hear something of you.

In truest esteem and friendship,

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Weymar, June 26th, 1852



85. To Peter Cornelius

[The exquisite poet-composer of the operas "The Barber of
Baghdad," "The Cid," and "Gunlod," which have at last attained
due recognition (1824-74).]

Weymar, September 4th, 1852

It has been a great pleasure to me, my dear Mr. Cornelius, to
make the acquaintance of your brother, and I only regret that he
passed several days here without letting me know of his stay.
Your letter, which reached me through him, has given me a real
pleasure, for which I thank you very affectionately. Short though
our acquaintance has been, I am pleased to think that it has been
long enough to establish between us a tie which years will
strengthen without changing the natural and reciprocal charm. I
congratulate you very sincerely in having put the fine season to
so good a use by finishing the church compositions you had
planned. That is an admirable field for you, and I strongly
advise you not to give in till you have explored it with love and
valor for several years. I think that, both by the elevation and
the depth of your ideas, the tenderness of your feelings, and
your deep studies, you are eminently fitted to excel in the
religious style, and to accomplish its transformation so far as
is nowadays required by our intelligence being more awake and our
hearts more astir than at former periods. You have only to
assimilate Palestrina and Bach--then let your heart speak, and
you will be able to say with the prophet, "I speak, for I
believe; and I know that our God liveth eternally."

We spoke with your brother about your vocation for composing
religious--Catholic music. He enters thoroughly into this idea,
and will give you help to realize it under outer conditions
favorable to you. Munster, Cologne, and Breslau appeared to us to
be the three places for the present where you would find the
least obstacles in the way of establishing your reputation and
making a position. But before you go to the Rhine I hope you will
do me the pleasure of coming to see me here. The room adjoining
that which Mr. de Bulow occupies is entirely at your service, and
it will be a pleasure to me if you will settle yourself there
without any ceremony, and will come and dine regularly with us
like an inhabitant of the Altenburg. The theatrical season
recommences on Sunday next, September 12th, with Verdi's
"Ernani." In the early days of October (at the latest)
"Lohengrin" will be given again; and on the 12th of November I
expect a visit from Berlioz, who will spend a week at Weymar.
Then we shall have "Cellini," the Symphony of Romeo and Juliet,
and some pieces from the Faust Symphony.

Kindest regards from yours ever,

F. Liszt



86. To Clara Schumann

Weymar, September 11th, 1852.

It is not without regret that I obey your wish, Madame, in
returning to you the autograph score of "Manfred," for I confess
that I had flattered myself a little in petto that Robert would
leave it with me in virtue of possession in a friendly manner.
Our theater possesses an exact copy, which will serve us for
subsequent performances of "Manfred;" I was tempted to send you
this copy, which, for revision of proofs, would be sufficient,
but I know not what scruple of honor kept me from doing so.
Perhaps you will find that it is possible generously to encourage
my slightly wavering virtue, and in that case you will have no
trouble in guessing what would be to me a precious reward...

How is Robert's health? Have the sea baths done him good? I hope
he will soon be restored all right to his home circle--and to his
composing desk.--

It would have been very pleasant to me to renew our visit of last
year to you at Dusseldorf, and I was indeed touched by the
gracious remembrance of it which your letter gives me; but, alas!
an unfortunate accident which has happened to my mother, by which
she nearly broke her leg in coming downstairs, has obliged her to
keep her bed for more than nine weeks, and even now she can only
walk with the help of crutches, and it will be some months before
she is all right again.

Forced as she was to remain at Weymar, I have not liked to leave
her all this summer, and had to give up the pleasure of a holiday
excursion.--The Princess Wittgenstein, and her daughter (who has
become a tall and charming young girl), desire me to give their
very affectionate remembrances to you and Robert, to which 1 add
my most sincere wishes for the speedy restoration of our friend,
and cordial assurances of my constant friendship.

F. Liszt



87. To Carl Czerny

[Autograph in the archives of the Musik-Verein in Vienna. The
date is wanting; it may be placed, judging from Liszt's letter of
October 30th, 1852, at the above-mentioned date.]

[September or October, 1852]

My Dear, Honored Master And Friend,

Permit me to recommend particularly to you Professor Jahn [The
afterwards celebrated biographer of Mozart], with whose many
interesting works of criticism and musical literature you are
doubtless familiar (among others his Introduction to the original
score of Beethoven's "Leonora," published by Hartel in Leipzig).

Mr. Jahn's object in going to Vienna is to collect documents for
a biography of Beethoven, which will, I am persuaded, supply a
want so much felt hitherto by the public and by artists. May I
beg you--in honor of the great man whom you have had the merit of
comprehending and admiring, long before the common herd joined in
chorus around his name--to open the treasures of your
reminiscences and knowledge to Mr. Jahn, and accept beforehand my
sincere thanks for the good service you will render to Art in
this matter?

It is with unchangeable attachment that I remain, dear master,
your very grateful and devoted

F. Liszt

P.S.--When will the "Gradus ad Parnassum" come out?--You will
receive the copy of my Studies, which are dedicated to you,
through Mr. Lowy in a few days.



88. To Breitkopf and Hartel

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney]

Weymar, October 30th, 1852

My Dear Mr. Hartel,

I have given up to a friend the piano which you have been so good
as to lend me for some years, and he (as I have already informed
you verbally) asks me to let him defer the payment of it till the
end of this month. I therefore take this opportunity of proposing
to you either to let you immediately have the sum fixed upon for
the piano (400 thalers), or else to make a settlement of
reciprocal terms up to now, by which we shall be quits towards
each other. The pleasure and advantage which I find in my
relations with your house are too valuable to me for me not to do
all in my power properly to maintain them, by conforming to your
wishes and intentions. Of my works published by your house there
are, if I mistake not, five--

12 Etudes d'execution transcendante (2 books), 6 Etudes d'apres
Paganini (2 books), Grand Concerto Solo, Fantaisie and Fugue on
the Chorale from the Prophete (No. 4 of the "Illustrations du
Prophete"), Mass (with Pater Noster and Ave Maria) for four male
voices with organ accompaniment

--upon which we have deferred putting a price until now. Without
trying to deceive myself as to the moderate returns which these
(as it happens, rather voluminous) works may bring to your house,
I should venture however to flatter myself that they have not
been an expense to you, and that they are even works not unsuited
to your catalogue. However things may be, I beg you to be so good
as to use towards me the same sincerity that I employ towards
you, persuaded as I am that sincerity is the only basis of any
lasting connection, especially when one has to do with things
which divers circumstances may render more delicate and
complicated. Allow me then at last, my dear Mr. Hartel, to
propose to you to square our accounts by my keeping your piano in
exchange for the above-mentioned five manuscripts, which should
also acquit me for the works of Marx and Kiesewetter that you
have sent me, so that, if my proposition suits you, we should be
entirely quits.

I was glad to hear that Mr. Jahn had had occasion to be satisfied
with his journey to Vienna, and I beg you to assure him that I am
entirely at his disposal with regard to any steps to be taken to
help on his work on Beethoven, for which I am delighted to be of
any service to him.

In a fortnight's time I am expecting Mr. Berlioz here. The
performances of "Benvenuto Cellini" will take place on the 18th
and 20th November, and on the 21st the Symphonies of "Romeo and
Juliet" and "Faust" will be performed, which I proposed to you to
publish. If your numerous occupations would allow of your coming
here for the 20th and 21st I am certain that it would be a great
interest to you to hear these exceptional works, of which it is a
duty and an honor to me not to let Weymar be in ignorance.

Will you, my dear Mr. Hartel, accept this information as an
invitation, and also tell your brother, Mr. Raymond, what
pleasure a visit from him would give me during the Berlioz week?
We shall, moreover, be at that time in good and romantic company
of artists and critics from all points, meeting at Weymar.

I will send you shortly my Catalogue, which you will greatly
oblige me by bringing out without very much delay. The dispersion
and confusion through which my works have had to make their way
hitherto have done them harm, over and above any wrong that they
already had by themselves; it is therefore of some importance to
classify them, and to present to the public a categorical insight
into what little I am worth. As I have promised to send this
catalogue to many people living in all sorts of countries, I beg
that you will put to my account, not gratis, some sixty copies,
which I fear will not be enough for me, but which will at least
serve to lessen the cost of printing.

In this connection allow me to recur to a plan of which I have
already spoken to you--the publication in German of my book on
Chopin. Has Mr. Weyden of Cologne written to you, and have you
come to terms with him on this subject? The last time he wrote to
me he told me that he had not yet had an answer from you. As he
is equally master of French and German, and as he thoroughly
succeeded in his translation of my pamphlet on "Tannhauser and
Lohengrin," I should be glad for the translation of Chopin to be
done by him; and in case you decide to publish his work please
put me down for fifty copies.

Pray excuse this long letter, my dear Mr. Hartel, and believe me
very sincerely,

Yours affectionately and devotedly,

F. Liszt



89. To Breitkopf and Hartel

[Autograph in the possession of M. J. Crepieux-Jamin at Rouen.]

My dear Mr. Hartel,

I thank you very heartily for the fresh proof of your kind
intentions towards me which your last letter gives me, and I
hasten to return to you herewith the two papers with my signature
by which our little accounts are thus settled. With regard to the
extra account of about eighty crowns, which I thank you for
having sent me by the same opportunity, I will not delay the
paying of it either. Only, as it contains several things which
have been got by the theater management (such as "Athalie," the
piano scores of "Lohengrin," Schubert's Symphony, etc.), you will
allow me to leave it a few days longer, so that I may get back
the sum which is due to me,--and which, till the present time, I
was not aware of having been placed to my account, thinking
indeed that these various works for which I had written for the
use of the theater had long ago been paid for by the
management.--

I beg that you will kindly excuse this confusion, of which I am
only guilty quite unawares.

With regard to the publication of the "Pater Noster" and of the
"Ave Maria," please do it entirely to your own mind, and I have
no other wish in the matter but that the "Pater" should not be
separated from the "Ave," on account of the former being so small
a work; but whether you publish these two pieces with the Mass,
or whether they appear separately (the two being in any case kept
together), either of these arrangements will suit me equally
well. For more convenience I have had them bound in one, as
having been written at the same time and as belonging to the same
style.--Berlioz has just written me word that he will probably
arrive here two or three days sooner--and the proprietors of our
repertoire have fixed the 17th November (instead of the 18th) for
the first performance of the revival of "Cellini." Immediately
after he is gone I will put in order the Catalogue that you are
kindly bringing out, and which I should be glad to be able to
distribute about before the end of the winter. You shall have the
manuscript before Christmas.--

As Mr. Weyden has been a friend of mine for several years I may
be permitted to recommend him to you, and have pleasure in hoping
that your relations with him, on occasion of the translation of
the Chopin volume, will be of an easy and agreeable nature. [The
German translation of the work was not done until it appeared, by
La Mara, in 1880, after the publication of a second edition.]

Pray accept once more, my dear Mr. Hartel, my best thanks,
together with every assurance of the sincere affection of

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

November l0th, 1852



90. To Professor Julius Stern in Berlin

[1820-83; founder of the Stern Vocal Union (which he conducted
from 1847-74), and of the Stern Conservatorium (1850), which he
directed, firstly with Marx and Kullak, and since 1857 alone.]

November 24th, 1852.

My dear Mr. Stern,

I hope you will excuse my delay in replying to your friendly
lines, for which I thank you very affectionately. Mr. Joachim was
absent when they reached me, and all this last week has been
extremely filled up for Weymar (and for me in particular) by the
rehearsals and performance of Berlioz's works. Happily our
efforts have been rewarded by a success most unanimous and of the
best kind. Berlioz was very well satisfied with his stay at
Weymar, and I, for my part, felt a real pleasure in being
associated with that which he experienced in the reception
accorded to him by the Court, our artists, and the public. As
this week has, according to my idea, a real importance as regards
Art, allow me, my dear Mr. Stern, to send you, contrary to my
usual custom, the little resume that the Weymar Gazette has made
of the affair, which will put you very exactly au courant of what
took place. You will oblige me by letting Schlesinger see it
also, and he will perhaps do me the pleasure of letting the
Berlin public have it through his paper (The Echo).

I did not fail to conform to the wish expressed in your last
letter, immediately that Joachim returned to Weymar, and I urged
him much to accept the proposition you have made him to take part
in the concert of the 13th of December. You know what high esteem
I profess for Joachim's talent, and when you have heard him I am
certain you will find that my praises of him latterly are by no
means exaggerated. He is an artist out of the common, and one who
may legitimately aspire to a glorious reputation.

Moreover he has a thoroughly loyal nature, a distinguished mind,
and a character endowed with a singular charm in its rectitude
and earnestness.

The question of fee being somewhat embarrassing for him to enter
into with you, I have taken upon myself to speak to you about it
without any long comment, and to mention to you the sum of twenty
to twenty-five louis d'or as what seems to me fair. If Joachim
had already been in Berlin, or if his stay there could take place
at the same time with some other pecuniary advantage, I feel sure
that he would take a pleasure in offering you his co-operation
for nothing; but in the position he is in now, not intending at
present to give concerts in Berlin, and not having as yet any
direct relations with you, I think you will appreciate the
motives which lead me to fix this sum with you...

If, as I hope, you do not consider it out of proportion, please
simply to be so good as to write a few lines to Joachim direct,
to tell him what day he ought to be in Berlin for the rehearsal
of your concert, so that he may ask a little beforehand for his
holiday from here.

Will you also please give my best regards to Th. Kullak? I have
had the opportunity of talking rather fully about him these last
days with two of his pupils, Princesses Anne and Louise (of
Prussia), and also with their mother, Princess Charles. Mr. Marx
(to whom I beg you to remember me kindly, until I write more
fully to him about the performance of his "Moses") will shortly
receive a letter from Mr. Montag, whom I have begged to bring
with him the arrangements relating to the song parts, which Mr.
Marx will be so kind as to lend us. Probably this oratorio can be
given here towards the end of next January or the middle of next
February, and as soon as the rehearsals are sufficiently advanced
I shall write to Marx to give him positive tidings and to invite
him to pay us a short visit at Weymar.

A thousand frank and cordial regards from

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

You probably already know that Joachim is leaving Weymar to
settle in Hanover at the beginning of next year.



91. To Wilhelm von Lenz in St. Petersburg

[A well-known writer on music and especially on Beethoven;
Imperial Russian Councillor of State (1809-83).]

I am doubly in your debt, my dear Lenz (you will allow me, will
you not, to follow your example by dropping the Mr.?), firstly
for your book, ["Beethoven and his Three Styles" (St. Petersburg,
1852).] so thoroughly imbued with that sincere and earnest
passion for the Beautiful without which one can never penetrate
to the heart of works of genius; and, secondly, for your friendly
letter, which reached me shortly after I had got your book, the
notice of which had very much excited my curiosity. That I have
put off replying to you till now is not merely on account of my
numerous occupations, which usually preclude my having the
pleasure of correspondence, but chiefly on account of you and
your remarkable work, which I wanted to read at leisure, in order
to get from it the whole substance of its contents. You cannot
find it amiss that it has given me much to reflect upon, and you
will easily understand that I shall have much to say to you on
this subject--so much that, to explain all my thoughts, I should
have to make another book to match yours--or, better still,
resume our lessons of twenty years ago, when the master learned
so much from the pupil,--discuss pieces in hand, the meaning,
value, import, of a large number of ideas, phrases, episodes,
rhythms, harmonic progressions, developments, artifices;--I
should have to have a good long talk with you, in fact, about
minims and crotchets, quavers and semi-quavers,--not forgetting
the rests which, if you please, are by no means a trifling
chapter when one professes to go in seriously for music, and for
Beethoven in particular.

The friendly remembrance that you have kept of our talks, under
the name of lessons, of the Rue Montholon, is very dear to me,
and the flattering testimony your book gives to those past hours
encourages me to invite you to continue them at Weymar, where it
would be at once so pleasant and so interesting to see you for
some weeks or months, ad libitum, so that we might mutually edify
ourselves with Beethoven. Just as we did twenty years ago, we
shall agree all at once, I am certain, in the generality of
cases; and, more than we were then, shall we each of us be in a
position to make further steps forward in the exoteric region of
Art.--For the present allow me, at the risk of often repeating
myself hereafter, to compliment you most sincerely on your
volume, which will be a chosen book and a work of predilection
for people of taste, and particularly for those who feel and
understand music. Artists and amateurs, professors and pupils,
critics and virtuosi; composers and theorists--all will have
something to gain from it, and a part to take in this feast of
attractive instruction that you have prepared for them. What
ingenious traits, what living touches, what well-dealt blows,
what new and judiciously adapted imagery should I not have to
quote, were I to enter in detail into your pages, so different
from what one usually reads on similar subjects! In your
arguments, and in the intrinsic and extrinsic proofs you adduce,
what weight--without heaviness, what solidity--without stiffness,
of strong and wholesome criticism--without pedantry! Ideas are
plentiful in this by turns incisive, brilliant, reflected, and
spontaneous style, in which learning comes in to enhance and
steady the flow of a lively and luxuriant imagination. To all the
refinement and subtle divination common to Slavic genius, you
ally the patient research and learned scruples which characterize
the German explorer. You assume alternately the gait of the mole
and of the eagle--and everything you do succeeds wonderfully,
because amid your subterranean maneuvers and your airy flights
you constantly preserve, as your own inalienable property, so
much wit and knowledge, good sense and free fancy. If you had
asked me to find a motto for your book I should have proposed
this,

"Inciter et initier,"

as best summing up, according to my ideas, the aim that you
fulfill by your twofold talent of distinguished writer and
musician ex professo. It is really curious to observe how the
well-known saying, "It is from the north that light comes to us
today," has been verified lately with regard to musical
literature. After Mr. Oulibicheff had endowed us with a Mozart,
here come you with a Beethoven. Without attempting to compare two
works which are in so many respects as different and separate as
the two heroes chosen by their respective historiographers, it is
nevertheless natural that your name should be frequently
associated with that of Mr. Oulibicheff--for each is an honor to
Art and to his country. This circumstance, however, does not do
away with your right to lecture Mr. Oulibicheff very wittily, and
with a thorough knowledge of the subject, for having made of
Mozart a sort of Dalai-Lama, [The head of the temporal and
spiritual power in Thibet (Translator's note)] beyond which there
is nothing. In all this polemical part (pp. 26, 27, etc.), as in
many other cases, I am entirely of your opinion, with all due
justice to the talents and merits of your compatriot. From a
reading of the two works, Mozart and Beethoven, it is evident
that, if the studies, predilections, and habits of mind of Mr.
Oulibicheff have perfectly predisposed him to accomplish an
excellent work in its entirety, yours, my dear Lenz, have led you
to a sort of intimacy, the familiarity of which nourished a sort
of religious exaltation, with the genius of Beethoven. Mr.
Oulibicheff in his method proceeds more as proprietor and
professor; you more as poet and lawyer. But, whatever may be said
about this or that hiatus in your work, the plan of which has
confined you disadvantageously to the analysis of the piano
sonatas, and however much people may think themselves justified
in cavilling at you about the distribution of your materials, the
chief merit, which none could refuse you without injustice, is
that you have really understood Beethoven, and have succeeded in
making your imagination adequate to his by your intuitive
penetration into the secrets of his genius.

For us musicians, Beethoven's work is like the pillar of cloud
and fire which guided the Israelites through the desert--a pillar
of cloud to guide us by day, a pillar of fire to guide us by
night, "so that we may progress both day and night." His
obscurity and his light trace for us equally the path we have to
follow; they are each of them a perpetual commandment, an
infallible revelation. Were it my place to categorize the
different periods of the great master's thoughts, as manifested
in his Sonatas, Symphonies, and Quartets, I should certainly not
fix the division into three styles, which is now pretty generally
adopted and which you have followed; but, simply recording the
questions which have been raised hitherto, I should frankly weigh
the great question which is the axis of criticism and of musical
aestheticism at the point to which Beethoven has led us--namely,
in how far is traditional or recognized form a necessary
determinant for the organism of thought?--

The solution of this question, evolved from the works of
Beethoven himself, would lead me to divide this work, not into
three styles or periods,--the words "style" and "period" being
here only corollary subordinate terms, of a vague and equivocal
meaning,--but quite logically into two categories: the first,
that in which traditional and recognized form contains and
governs the thought of the master; and the second, that in which
the thought stretches, breaks, recreates, and fashions the form
and style according to its needs and inspirations. Doubtless in
proceeding thus we arrive in a direct line at those incessant
problems of "authority" and "liberty." But why should they alarm
us? In the region of liberal arts they do not, happily, bring in
any of the dangers and disasters which their oscillations
occasion in the political and social world; for, in the domain of
the Beautiful, Genius alone is the authority, and hence, Dualism
disappearing, the notions of authority and liberty are brought
back to their original identity.--Manzoni, in defining genius as
"a stronger imprint of Divinity," has eloquently expressed this
very truth.--

This is indeed a long letter, my dear Lenz, and as yet I am only
at the preliminaries. Let us then pass on to the Deluge,--and
come and see me at Weymar, where we can chat as long and fully as
we like of these things in the shade of our fine park. If a
thrush chances to come and sing I shall take advantage of the
circumstance to make, en passant, some groundless quarrels with
you on some inappropriate terms which one meets with here and
there in your book,--as, for example, the employment of the word
"scale" (ut, fa, la, etc.) instead of arpeggio chord; or, again,
on your inexcusable want of gallantry which leads you maliciously
to bracket the title of "Mamselle" (!) on to such and such a
Diva, a proceeding which will draw down upon you the wrath of
these divinities and of their numerous admirers. But I can assure
you beforehand that there are far more nightingales than thrushes
in our park; and, similarly, in your book the greater number of
pages, judiciously thought out and brilliantly written, carry the
day so well in worth and valor over any thinly scattered
inattentions or negligences, that I join with my whole heart in
the concert of praise to which you have a right.

Pray accept, my dear Lenz, the most sincere expressions of
feeling and best thanks of

Your very affectionate and obliged

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 2nd, 1852

As Madame Bettina d'Arnim has been passing some weeks at Weymar,
I let her know about your book. Feeling sure that the good
impression it has made on her would be a pleasure to you to hear,
I begged her to confirm it by a few lines, which I enclose
herewith.--



92. To Robert Radecke in Leipzig

[Printed in the Neue Berliner Musik-Zeitung, November 20th,
1890.--The addressee, afterwards Conductor of the Royal Opera,
and present Director of the Royal Academical Institute for Church
Music in Berlin, was formerly Vice-director of the Leipzig
"Singacademie" with Ferdinand David, and, intoxicated with the
first performance of Berlioz's Faust at Weimar, he had determined
to give such another in the Vocal Union of which he was Co-
director. With this object he begged Liszt for the score. But the
plan was not carried out, as Radecke exchanged his post at New
Year, 1853, for that of a Music Director at the Leipzig Town
theater.]

Best thanks, dear Radecke, for your letter and the approved good
intention.

The "Faust" score will be at your service with great pleasure as
soon as I have got it back from Berlioz. It is probable that the
copy which Berlioz will see about for me in Paris will be ready
by Christmas, so that I shall be able to send it you soon after
New Year.

In the course of the winter I intend also to give a performance
of the little oratorio "La Fuite en Egypte," attributed to the
imaginary Maitre de Chapelle Pierre Ducre. This graceful and
interesting work should meet with approbation in Leipzig, and
offers no difficulty either for voice or orchestra. If you keep
the secret, and let your Gesangverein [Vocal Union] study it
under the name of Pierre Ducre, a composer of the sixteenth
century, I am convinced that it will not fail to make an effect.

[Liszt's playful suggestion about the Flight into Egypt was based
upon the fact that Berlioz, on its first performance, had
mystified the Paris public and brought forward the work under the
feigned name of Pierre Ducre, the organist of the Sainte Chapelle
in Paris in the year 1679.]

Joachim goes the day after tomorrow to Berlin; Cossmann is in
Paris; and Nabich [The first trombone player of the Weimar
orchestra, and a most admirable performer on his instrument.] is
performing in London, Liverpool, and Manchester. None the less we
are giving "Tannhauser" next Sunday (12th) (with subscriptions
suspended!), and for this occasion the entire Finale of the
second act and the new ending of the third will be studied.

Now farewell, and be active and cheerful, is the wish of yours
most sincerely,

F. Liszt

December 9th, 1852



93. To Bernhard Cossmann

[Weimar, December, 1852.]

[The date and ending of the letter are wanting, but from its
contents it may be ascribed to this date.]

Thanks, dear friend, for your kind few lines, which have given me
sincere pleasure. Joachim is not yet back from Berlin, and Beck
[The chief tenor (hero-tenor) at the Court Opera] has again got
his old attack of the throat, and I fear rather seriously, from
which these six years of cures, it appears, have not succeeded in
curing him radically. In consequence of this dearth of tenors,
the performances of Wagner's and Berlioz's operas are going to be
put off till February, when I hope that Tichatschek will be able
to come from Dresden and sing "Tannhauser," "Lohengrin," and the
"Flying Dutchman."

As for Cellini [Berlioz's opera]; we shall unfortunately have to
wait until Dr. Lieber, the new tenor engaged for next season, at
present at the Cologne theater, has learnt the part. I hear
Lieber's voice highly spoken of, and it seems that he possesses
also a dose of intelligence sufficient to understand how he ought
to behave here.--

In the matter of news I have one small item to give you--namely,
that on your return your salary will be raised fifty crowns, to
make the round sum of four hundred.--Laub [Ferdinand Laub, a
noteworthy violinist, was engaged for the 1st of January, 1853,
as Joachim's successor as Concertmeister at Weimar.] will arrive
very shortly, and accepts the propositions which have been made
to him. He will not be...



94. To Wilhelm Fischer, Chorus Director in Dresden

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Otto Lessmann at
Charlottenburg.--The addressee was an intimate friend of Wagner's
("Letters to Uhlig, Fischer, and Heine"--Leipzig, Breitkopf and
Hartel, 1889).]

Dear Sir,

By today's post I have sent you a minutely corrected copy of the
score of the "Flying Dutchman."

As this copy was my own property (Wagner had left it for me after
his stay here in 1869) I could not suppose that Uhlig could
expect it back from me as a theater score. The last letter from
Wagner to me has made the matter clear, and I place this score
with pleasure at his further disposal. I have replied to Wagner
direct and fully; he is therefore aware that I have sent you my
copy. [For fuller particulars about this see the "Wagner-Liszt
Correspondence," vol. i., pp. 207-9.]

Allow me to beg you kindly to make my excuses to Herr Heine
[Ferdinand Heine, Court actor and costumier, famous through
Wagner's letters to him.] that I do not answer his letter just
now. His indulgent opinion of our Lohengrtn performance is very
flattering to me; I hope that by degrees we shall deserve still
better the praise which comes to us from many sides: meanwhile,
as the occasion of his writing was just the matter of the
"Hollander" score, and as this is now quite satisfactorily
settled, it does not require any further writing.

With best regards, yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 13th, 1853

Is Tichatschek coming to our "Lohengrin" performance in February?
Please beg him to try to do so. On Weymar's side nothing will be
neglected, and it will be a real joy to us both.



95. To Edmund Singer

[Formerly Concertmeister at Weimar; at present Court
Concertmeister and Professor at the Stuttgart Conservatorium.]

Dear Sir,

I thank you much for your friendly letter, and commission Herr
Gleichauf (in whom you will recognize an admirable viola
virtuoso) to persuade you not to retract your promised visit to
me at Weymar. It would be very pleasant to me to be able to keep
you here a longer time, yet I doubt whether you would be
satisfied with such a modest post as our administrative
circumstances warrant. When we have an opportunity we will talk
further of this; meanwhile it will be a pleasure to me to see and
hear you again. Laub's acquaintance will also interest you; he
has just been playing some pieces with a really extraordinary
virtuosity and bravura, so that we have all become quite warm
about it.

Come, then, as soon as you have a couple of spare days, and be
assured beforehand of the most friendly reception.

With my very best regards,

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Saturday, January 15th, 1853



96. To Frau Dr. Lidy Steche in Leipzig

[The addressee sang for two winters in the Gewandhaus concerts
(as Frl. Angermann). After her marriage she started a Vocal
Union, in the forties, with which, in December 1853, she gave so
excellent a pianoforte performance of "Lohengrin" at her own
house, and afterwards at the Minerva "lodge," that Hoplit, in his
account of stage performances (Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik), spoke
of the Steche undertaking as a "model performance." This was
before the performance of "Lohengrin" at the Leipzig theater in
January 1854.]

My dear Madame,

I have the pleasure of answering your inquiries in regard to the
performances of the Wagner operas with the following dates:--

For next Wednesday, February 16th, the birthday of H.R.H. the
Grand Duchess, the first performance of the "Flying Dutchman" is
fixed. (N. B.--For that evening all the places are already taken,
and, as a great many strangers are coming, it will be difficult
to find suitable rooms in Weymar.) The following Sunday, February
20th, the "Flying Dutchman" will be repeated; and on the 27th
(Sunday) "Tannhauser" is promised, and on March 5th (Saturday)
"Lohengrin." Between these two performances of February 27th and
March 5th the third performance of the "Flying Dutchman" will
probably take place, of which I can give you more positive
information at the end of this week. The Wagner week proper
begins therefore with February 27th and closes with March 5th,
and if it were possible to you to devote a whole week to these
three glorious works of art I should advise you to get here by
the 27th,--or, better still for you (as you are already quite
familiar with "Tannhauser"), to come in time for the third
performance of the "Flying Dutchman," the date of which is still
somewhat uncertain, but which will probably be fixed for the 2nd
or 3rd March. Immediately after the first performance we shall
get quite clear about it, and I will not fail to let you know
officially the result of the theater Conference here (in which I
am not concerned).

Accept, my dear Madame, the assurance of the high esteem of

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 4th, 1853



97. To Gustav Schmidt, Capellmeister at Frankfort-On-The-Maine

[Autograph (without address) in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet
at Valentigney.--The contents show to whom the letter was
addressed.]

Dear Friend,

Berlioz's two symphonies, "Romeo and Juliet" and "Faust," have
been twice given here in the course of this winter with the
utmost success. Berlioz was so good as to lend me the score and
parts,--but with the express condition that they should not go
out of my hands. When, at the request of the Leipzig Academy of
Singing [Singacademie], I asked him some weeks ago whether he
would not allow me to place "Faust" at the disposal of the
Leipzig Institute for a proposed performance, he replied to me as
follows:--

"Considering the deplorable performances of which my works have
often been the victims both in Germany and elsewhere, I have
resolved never to lend them in manuscript. Moreover there are
enough of my works printed in score and in separate parts (the
three Symphonies, several Overtures, the 5th May, the Requiem,
etc.) to make it unnecessary to seek for others. If I made an
exception for you," ["Pour toi." Showing that Liszt and Berlioz
employed the "tutoyer" towards one another.] etc...

Although I was perfectly certain that the Leipzig performance
would be a very satisfactory one, as many of my friends took a
lively interest in it, and although I have not the least doubt
that you would be anxious to give "Faust" its full value in
Frankfort, yet you see from the above lines of Berlioz that I, to
my regret, dare not risk any further application to him in this
matter. "Faust," moreover, will appear in score this year in
Paris, and I sent Berlioz his manuscript back a short time ago.

Should you be disposed to perform something or other of Berlioz's
in Frankfort, I can recommend you, first of all, most warmly:-

The two Overtures to "Cellini" and the "Carnaval Romain";

Two numbers out of the Symphony "Romeo and Juliet" -the feast at
Capulet's house and the Queen Mab (Scherzo);

And two Marches from the "Harold" Symphony and the "Symphonie
Fantastique"-the March of the Pilgrims and the "Marche de
Supplice" ["March on the Way to Execution"].

But it will be necessary for you to have several rehearsals--and
indeed separate rehearsals for the quartet, and separate
rehearsals for the wind instruments.

The effect of Berlioz's works can only be uncommonly good when
the performance of them is satisfactory.

They are equally unsuited to the ordinary worthy theater and
concert maker, because they require a higher artistic standpoint
from the musician's side.

I looked through Kittl's [1809-68. Director of the Prague
Conservatorium.] opera some years ago in a piano arrangement,
and, between ourselves, I do not think the work will last. Kittl
is a personal friend of mine, and I should have been glad to be
able to give his work here; but...nevertheless...etc., etc.

Raff's "King Alfred" is a much more successful and important
work; and, without wishing to injure Kittl, there is in Raff
quite other musical stuff and grist. [Steckt doch in Raff ein
ganz anderer musikalischer Kern and Kerl: untranslatable play on
words.]

During your last stay in Weymar I spoke to you of Vesque's new
opera "Der lustige Rath." Various local circumstances have
delayed the performance at Vienna of this really pretty, nicely
worked out opera. The mise-en-scene does not require any special
efforts; the piece only requires a somewhat piquant and not
unskillful soprano singer. Altogether the opera appears to me to
be written in a charming style, not too superficially
conservative, and to be one of the best among the new operas
mezzo-carattere. In case you still have time and are not
indisposed to give the opera in Frankfort, I can send you the
score. You would do Vesque an essential service if you could give
the opera soon, and would have friendly relations with him, for
Vesque is a cultivated, intelligent, and first-rate man. [Vesque
von Puttlingen (pseudonym, Hoven), 1803-83, Councillor of the
Austrian Foreign Ministry, composer of songs and operas.] There
are not too many such!

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, February 27th, 1853



98. To Heinrich Brockhaus, Bookseller in Leipzig

[Published in a German translation: La Mara, "Letters of
Musicians during Five Centuries, vol. ii., 1887.]

My dear Mr. Brockhaus,

In thanking you for your kind mention of the notice joined to my
name in the Conversations Lexikon, I wish above all things not to
go beyond the limits of most scrupulous delicacy, which in these
sorts of things have always appeared to me all the more desirable
to maintain because they are so very often passed. Consequently I
will only allow myself to point out three misstatements of fact
in the article about myself: firstly, my supposed title of ex-St.
Simonien; secondly, my supposed journey to America; thirdly, my
diploma of the University of Konigsberg, which my biographer
arbitrarily changes into a diploma of Doctor of Music, which was
not the one given to me.--

I have never had the honor of belonging to the association, or,
to put it better, to the religious and political family of St.
Simonisme. Notwithstanding my personal sympathy with this or that
member of it, my zeal has been but little beyond that which
Heine, Boerne, and twenty others whose names are in the
Conversations Lexikon showed at the same period, and they limited
themselves to following pretty often the eloquent preachings of
the Salle Taitbout. Among my numerous tailors' bills, I can
certify that there is not one to be found of a bleu-barbot coat
[The dress of the St. Simonists.]; and, as I have mentioned
Heine, I ought to add that my fervor was far short of his, for I
never thought of wishing to "Commune through space with the
Child-lake Father," by correspondence or dedication, as he has
done!--

Further, I can also assure you that my practical course of the
geography of Europe has not extended beyond it, and that the four
or five other parts of the globe are entirely unknown to me. And
when you come to see me at Weymar I can show you, amongst other
diplomas, that of the University of Konigsberg, in virtue of
which I have the honor to belong, exceptionally, to the class of
Doctors in Philosophy, an honor for which I have always been
peculiarly grateful to this illustrious University.

As to the summary judgment passed upon my person and my works in
this article, you will easily understand that I only accept it as
transitory and with due reserve, much obliged though I am besides
to the author for his kind intentions. After having attained,
according to my biographer, the first aim of my youth,--that of
being called the Paganini of the Piano,-it seems to me it is
natural that I should seriously have the ambition of bearing my
own name, and that I should count somewhat on the results of a
desire and of persevering work, so far as to hope that in one of
the later editions of the Conversations Lexikon I may have a
place more in accordance with my aims. [The article in question,
which was published at a time when Liszt's greater works had
partly not yet been written, and partly were not yet known in the
wider circles, speaks of poverty of invention, and considers his
compositions rather those of a virtuoso than of imaginative
significance.]

Accept, my dear Mr. Brockhaus, the expression of my most sincere
regard, and believe me

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar March 22nd, 1853



99. To Dr. Franz Brendel in Leipzig

[Autograph of the letter to Brendel in the possession of Frau Dr.
Riedel in Leipzig.--Brendel (born 1811, died November 25th, 1868,
in Leipzig) rendered great services to the New German (i.e., the
Wagner-Liszt) musical tendencies, as a writer on music
(Geschichte der Musik, History of Music), and as editor of the
Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik (founded by R. Schumann). He also,
together with Liszt, originated the "Allgemeine Deutsche
Musikverein" (the "German Universal Musical Union"), and was its
president up to his death.]

Dear Friend,

A little trip to Gotha, where the Duke had invited me to be
present at the performance of his opera "Casilda" the day before
yesterday, must bear the blame of my delay in writing to you.
After duly thinking over and considering your letter, I must tell
you first and foremost my exact opinion with regard to the
immediate appearance of the proposed paper. In my opinion at
least two or three months are requisite to establish the
necessary relations with the chief co-operators, and to give due
weight to the whole undertaking. Without complete agreement as to
means and aims we should compromise rather than help the matter.
We must have the positive agreement and assurance of Semper,
Stahr, Hettner, Hauenschild, and others (among whom Vischer of
Tbingen must be sure not to be forgotten), before the first
number appears. We have to struggle for a far higher and more
difficult end than, for instance, the Unterhallungen am
hausliehen Herd [Entertainments at Home] or the Fliegende Blatter
fur Musik. [Fly-leaves for Music.] The most important step for us
is the very first, at the house door; and if we do not weigh this
step with due reflection we shall run a great risk of winning
only imaginary future subscribers for the Art Work of the Future,
and of seeing our best wishes for its feasibility shipwrecked.

Whether also the title Kunstwerk der Zukunft [Art Work of the
Future.]	should be employed, or what other definition should
be the axis of our united efforts in the opening number, I will
put on one side for the present. The full discussion of this and
other things I will keep for your next visit to Weymar. Raff's
opera is announced for this day fortnight (Sunday, April 17th).
If it is agreeable to you to come here sooner, you will be most
welcome at any moment. This time and every time that you come to
Weymar, I beg you to stay with me, both for your own convenience
and mine.

Frster's exact address I will send you very soon, although I
conclude that letters addressed Herr Hofrath Ernst Forster would
be safely delivered by the post office. Stahr is the best person
to give you information about Herr von Hauenschild (Max Waldau--
not Count, as far as I know), and Hettner is a Professor in Jena.

Further, it is my opinion that you had better not send your
communications to these gentlemen until we have settled some of
the chief points in this matter.

I shall undertake a security of four hundred thalers on this
proposed agreement between us, in return for a receipt from the
management which you will give me. I cannot at present hold out
the prospect of further support; yet it is possible that I may
succeed in getting three to five hundred thalers annually, under
certain conditions, for which there is no personal ground
whatever (and which I hinted to you in our last conversation in
Leipzig), for the pages of The Present and Future.

Remember me kindly to your wife, and be assured of the entire
willingness of

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, April 3rd, 1853



100. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Good advice is seldom cheap, and I must honestly confess that in
my present very fluctuating circumstances I am not rich enough to
help you efficaciously by lending you a helping hand, however
much I might wish to do so. Stahr's refusal is very much to be
regretted, for, in order to attain your end and to influence the
world of literature, you positively require more literary men of
great note to join you. Next to the money question the formation
of the nucleus of management is the most important matter in this
undertaking. However zealous and self-sacrificing you and
Schlonbach [Arnold Schlonbach, journalist, died long ago.] may be
in devoting your talents and powers to the paper, yet I doubt
whether you will be able to keep it going unless you get some
further capable men of talent as co-operators. This brings us,
however, again to the money question, which I unfortunately am
not in a position to solve. To be obliged to give it up after six
months would be a far worse fate than not to begin it at all.
Therefore, before everything, the moral guarantee must be
forthcoming for its continuance, and for the constantly
increasing spread of the paper, and these depend principally on
the guarantee which the first five or six co-operators warrant.
You remark quite truly that, if Wagner would take an interest in
the matter, it would be of the greatest help. Perhaps he might be
persuaded to do so, and I will willingly start the subject to
him.

The title, size (as well as the limits of the paper, and cover),
and fortnightly issue give me thorough satisfaction, and
according to my opinion nothing more need be altered in these
three particulars. A weekly issue has its advantages--
nevertheless I have always thought that two papers per month are
on the whole better than four. But whether it is possible and
advisable to make the first start as early as July I much
question. "Tout vient a point a qui sait attendre," says the
French proverb. It certainly is important to seize the right
moment, and that must be decided by you. Let me only beg you not
to give too much weight to passing and local influences, and only
to come forward when you can hold your ground with quiet,
deliberate courage. Retreat belongs to the enemy. For us it is
"Gradatim vincimus."

The matter of the security remains as promised. If you should not
be ready by July, October would be just as favorable, if not more
so--only, in Heaven's name, no backward step when once started!--
Some articles of provision and ammunition seem to me to be
absolutely necessary before you begin. Two months are a short
time to get them ready, and I scarcely think it will be possible
for you to be ready for action by July. Have you written yet to
Wagner? You must not expect much from Hettner without Stahr. But,
through Hinrichs or Franz, Hauenschild might perhaps be won over.
I advise you to stick fast to Schwind. One of his last pictures,
"Beethoven's Fancy," bought by the King of Greece, points to him
above all others as the representative of painting in your paper.

May I beg you also to send a few lines to Kurnberger to tell him
that I have given you his manuscript? It would be discourteous if
I were to leave him without any answer, and, as I cannot say
anything further to him, we should save useless circumlocution if
you would be so good as to correspond with him direct.

Incidentally you would also save me another letter about nothing,
if you would write to Lenz (on the subject of this conference).

Whilst I am talking with you, Senora Pepita Oliva is doing her
favorite tricks at the theater, which are more prized and rated
higher than they deserve, so I am assured. "J'aime mieux y croire
qu'y aller voir." [I would rather take it for granted than go and
see it.] The brothers Wieniawski have also been here some days.
The violinist is a virtuoso of importance,--that is to say, in
the ordinary, but not quite correct, sense of this word; for
Virtuoso comes from Virtu, and should neither be so falsified nor
so misapplied.

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

April 30th, 1853.



101. To Louis Kohler

Dear Friend,

You have again given me a real pleasure by your article on the
Romanesca (in the last numbers of the Signale), for which I would
gladly requite you. The best way to do this would be by a
performance of "Lohengrin"; unfortunately there is very little
prospect of that. Still it is not impossible that between the
19th and 26th of this month there may be a performance of this
one work by royal command; and, as you are already so kindly
disposed towards me, and have promised me to come to Weymar, do
make yourself ready, and give me the great pleasure of your
company for a few days--if possible, from the 19th to the 26th of
this month. The marriage festivities of Princess Amalie of Sachs-
Weymar and Prince Henry of the Netherlands, which will take place
then, will be the occasion of a grand court concert on the 20th,
and the performance of Marx's oratorio "Moses" on the 22nd or
24th, and probably a couple of other musical performances.
Joachim is also coming at the same time, and there will be no
dearth of entertainment for us. Once more best thanks-and a safe
journey--and a revoir--which will be a great pleasure to your
very affectionate and obliged.

F. Liszt

Weymar, May 6th, 1853



102. To Louis Kohler

Dear Friend,

A safe journey--and "auf Wiedersehen" next year in Weymar at a
chance performance of "Lohengrin"! There is now no probability of
a Wagner performance here for a week or ten days, and probably
the "Flying Dutchman" will then be chosen.

You ought to keep all my scribblings which appear henceforth.
Meanwhile I send you only the score of the Weber Polonaise, in
which the working-out section (pages 19, 20, 21) will perhaps
amuse you.

I am writing to Wagner today that he should himself offer you a
copy of the "Nibelungen." You ought to receive it soon.

You will find a little packet of Plantaja cigars in your cloak.
May it help you to recall your Weymar visit, and think with warm
remembrance of

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, May 24th, 1853

If you should stay some days in Berlin, ask Dorn why he has not
yet sent me his score of the "Nibelungen"? Perhaps he has not had
my letter in reply to his in which he mentioned that the score
was coming.

When you have half an hour to spare, ask my pupil Winterberger
[Composer, piano and organ virtuoso; born at Weimar 1834; was for
a long time a Professor at the St. Petersburg Conservatorium;
since then lives at Leipzig.] (through Schlesinger) to play you
my "Prophete" Fugue on the organ. I consider this opus as one of
my least bad productions--if you have not got a copy of it I will
send you one on the first opportunity through Hartel.

Your box and cloak are just sent off "Station restante."



103. To Louis Kohler

"Kiraschio! Plimaschio!"

[The refrain of a journeyman's song, given by L. Kohler in his
work "The Melody of Speech," in which "The cry of the natural man
gives vent to itself in unbridled pleasure."]

Dear friend! Your work [The same work, "The Melody of Speech"
(Leipzig, J. J. Weber, 1853).] has given me a refreshing draught
to quaff,--not exactly a theoretical "cure" water, such as the
people promenading past my window are constrained to take, and
which, thank Heaven, I neither require nor take; but a finely
seasoned, delightfully comforting May drink,--and I thank you
warmly for the lively, pleasant hours I have passed with you in
reading and singing your work. The objections with which the
Philistines and pedants will arm themselves against you don't
interest me in the least. You have certainly brought forth a
fresh and exciting little book, and that is a great service not
easily attained!--Be satisfied not to please the worse half of
brave musicians, among which I might count myself, and write on
cheerfully, regardless of shops and shopkeepers!--Specially do I
give you my best thanks for the "Weymarasche Zeilen," and the
very friendly quotation of my earlier songs. Later on, when I
bring out a couple more numbers, I must make a somewhat remodeled
edition of these earlier songs. There must, in particular, be
some simplifications in the accompaniment. But that you have
thought favorably and indulgently of these things, with a due
regard to the inner impulse which brought them forth (in my
"storm and stress" period), is very pleasant to me. The Lenau
concluding song is charmingly composed--only publish some more
like that, with or without comment!

I have just received a letter from Wagner for you, which he sends
to me as he does not know your address. Take this opportunity of
sending me your street and number; for I always address to Putzer
and Heimann, which is too formal. At the beginning of July I
enjoyed several Walhalla-days with Wagner, and I praise God for
having created such a man. Of my further summer projects I will
only say that at the end of September I shall conduct the Musical
Festival at Carlsruhe, and at the beginning of October shall
return to Weymar (where I shall spend the winter).

I have written to Haslinger and Spina to send you the "Hungarian
Rhapsodies" and the "Soirees de Vienne" (songs after F. Schubert,
in nine parts). The next time I pass through Leipzig I will tell
Kistner that you must not fail to have a copy of the "Harmonies
Poetiques et Religieuses." The previously mentioned pieces you
will have without delay. I have sent my Mass and Ave Maria to
Marpurg by Raff. If you approve of these compositions I will
gladly get a couple more copies in your honor. My Catalogue will
not come out till next winter, as I have not yet had any time to
revise it.

Let me hear soon from you, dear friend, and keep ever in friendly
remembrance

Yours sincerely and with many thanks,

F. Liszt

Carlsbad, August 1st, 1853

Address to me always at Weymar.



104. To Richard Pohl in Dresden

[Printed in Pohl's pamphlet "The Carlsruhe Musical Festival in
October, 1853" (by Hoplit). Leipzig, Hinze, 1853.--The addressee,
a writer on music (born 1826), one of the oldest and most
faithful adherents of Liszt and Wagner, lived in Weimar after
1854, his wife Jeanne (nee Eyth) having a post there as a harp
virtuosa: after Liszt's departure he was, as he still is,
occupied as editor in Baden-Baden.]

In various accounts that I have read of the Festival at
Carlsruhe, there is one point on which people seem pretty much
agreed--namely, the insufficiency of my conducting. Without here
examining what degree of foregone judgment there may be in this
opinion, without even seeking to know how much it has been
influenced by the simple fact of the choice of myself as
conductor, apart from the towns of Carlsruhe, Darmstadt, and
Mannheim, it certainly would not be for me to raise pretensions
quite contrary to the assertion which it is sought to establish
if this assertion were based on facts or on justice. But this is
precisely what I cannot help contesting in a very positive
manner.

As a fact one cannot deny that the ensemble of the Carlsruhe
programme was very remarkably performed, that the proportion and
sonority of the instruments, combined with a view to the locale
chosen, were satisfactory and even excellent. This is rather
naively acknowledged in the remark that it is really surprising
that things should have gone so well "in spite of" the
insufficiency of my conducting. I am far from wishing to deck
myself in the peacock's feathers of the Carlsruhe, Mannheim, and
Darmstadt orchestras, and am assuredly more disposed than any one
to render full justice to the talents--some of them very
distinguished--of the members of these three orchestras; but, to
come to the point, whatever may be said to the contrary, it is
acknowledged, even by the testimony of my adversaries, that the
execution was at times astonishing, and altogether better than
there had been reason to expect, considering that I was
conductor.

This fact placed beyond discussion, it remains to be seen whether
I am so completely a stranger there as they try to make out, and
what reasons there can be for thus crying down a conductor when
the execution was satisfactory, especially if, as is just, one
bears in mind the novelty of the works on the programme for
almost the entire audience. For, as every one knew at Carlsruhe,
the Ninth Symphony, as well as the works of Wagner, Berlioz,
Schumann, etc., were not well known by any one but myself, seeing
that they had never been given before in these parts (with the
exception of the Berlioz piece, which a portion only of the
Carlsruhe orchestra had played under the direction of the
composer).--

Now as regards the question of right--to know whether in good
conscience and with knowledge of the matter one can justly accuse
me of being an insufficient conductor, inexperienced, uncertain,
etc.: without endeavoring to exculpate myself (for which I do not
think there is any need amongst those who understand me), may I
be permitted to make an observation bearing on the basis of the
question?

The works for which I openly confess my admiration and
predilection are for the most part amongst those which conductors
more or less renowned (especially the so-called "tuchtigen
Capellmeister" [ Qualified conductors.]) have honored but little,
or not at all, with their personal sympathies, so much so that it
has rarely happened that they have performed them. These works,
reckoning from those which are commonly described nowadays as
belonging to Beethoven's last style (and which were, not long
ago, with lack of reverence, explained by Beethoven's deafness
and mental derangement!)--these works, to my thinking, exact from
executants and orchestras a progress which is being accomplished
at this moment--but which is far from being realized in all
places--in accentuation, in rhythm, in the manner of phrasing and
declaiming certain passages, and, of distributing light and
shade--in a word, progress in the style of the execution itself.
They establish, between the musicians of the desks and the
musician chief who directs them, a link of a nature other than
that which is cemented by an imperturbable beating of the time.
In many cases even the rough, literal maintenance of the time and
of each continuous bar |1,2,3,4,|1,2,3,4,| clashes with the sense
and expression. There, as elsewhere, the letter killeth the
spirit, a thing to which I will never subscribe, however specious
in their hypocritical impartiality may be the attacks to which I
am exposed.

For the works of Beethoven, Berlioz, Wagner, etc., I see less
than elsewhere what advantage there could be (which by-the-bye I
shall contest pretty knowingly elsewhere) in a conductor trying
to go through his work like a sort of windmill, and to get into a
great perspiration in order to give warmth to the others.

Especially where it is a question of understanding and feeling,
of impressing oneself with intelligence, of kindling hearts with
a sort of communion of the beautiful, the grand, and the true in
Art and Poetry, the sufficiency and the old routine of usual
conductors no longer suffice, and are even contrary to the
dignity and the sublime liberty of the art. Thus, with all due
deference to my complaisant critics, I shall hold myself on every
occasion ulterior to my "insufficiency" on principle and by
conviction, for I will never accommodate myself to the role of a
"Profoss" [Overseer or gaoler.] of time, for which my twenty-five
years of experience, study, and sincere passion for Art would not
at all fit me.

Whatever esteem therefore I may profess for many of my
colleagues, and however gladly I may recognize the good services
they have rendered and continue to render to Art, I do not think
myself on that account obliged to follow their example in every
particular--neither in the choice of works to be performed, nor
in the manner of conceiving and conducting them. I think I have
already said to you that the real task of a conductor, according
to my opinion, consists in making himself ostensibly quasi-
useless. We are pilots, and not mechanics. Well, even if this
idea should meet with still further opposition in detail, I could
not change it, as I consider it just. For the Weymar orchestra
its application has brought about excellent results, which have
been commended by some of my very critics of today. I will
therefore continue, without discouragement or false modesty, to
serve Art in the best way that I understand it--which, I hope,
will be the best.--

Let us then accept the challenge which is thrown to us in the
form of an extinguisher, without trouble or anxiety, and let us
persevere, conscious of right--and of our future.

F. Liszt

Weymar, November 5th, 1853



105. To Wilhelm Fischer, Chorus Director at Dresden

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Otto Lessmann, writer at
Charlottenburg. (Printed in his Allgemeine Musik-Zeitung, 1887,
No. 38.)--The addressee was the well-known friend of Wagner. (See
"Wagner's Letters to Uhlig, Fischer, and Heine."--Grevel & Co.)
Vol. I. 12]

Dear Sir and Friend,

Your letter has given me real pleasure, and I send you my warmest
thanks for your artistic resolve to bring "Cellini" to a hearing
in Dresden. Berlioz has taken the score with him to Paris from
Weymar, in order to make some alterations and simplifications in
it. I wrote to him the day before yesterday, and expect the score
with the pianoforte edition, which I will immediately send you to
Dresden. Tichatschek is just made for the title-role, and will
make a splendid effect with it; the same with Mitterwurzer as
Fieramosca and Madame Krebs as Ascanio, a mezzo-soprano part.
From your extremely effective choruses, with their thorough
musicianly drilling, we may expect a force never yet attained in
the great Carnival scene (Finale of the second act); and I am
convinced that, when you have looked more closely into the score,
you will be of my opinion, that "Cellini", with the exception of
the Wagner operas,--and they should never be put into comparison
with one another--is the most important, most original musical-
dramatic work of Art which the last twenty years have to show.

I must also beg for a little delay in sending you the score and
the pianoforte edition, as it is necessary entirely to revise the
German text and to have it written out again. I think this work
will be ready in a few weeks, so you may expect the pianoforte
edition at the beginning of February. At Easter Berlioz is coming
to Dresden, to conduct a couple of concerts in the theater there.
It would be splendid if you should succeed in your endeavors to
make Herr von Luttichau fix an early date for the "Cellini"
performance, and if you could get Berlioz to conduct his own work
when he is in Dresden. In any case I shall come to the first
performance, and promise myself a very satisfactory and
delightful result. [Dresden did not hear "Cellini" till thirty--
four years later.]

Meanwhile, dear friend, accept my best thanks once more for this
project, and for all that you will do to realize it successfully,
and receive the assurance of the high esteem of

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 4th 1841



106. To M. Escudier, Music Publisher in Paris

[Autograph (without address) in the possession of Monsieur
Etienne Charavay in Paris.--The contents show to whom it was
written.]

My dear Sir,

My time has been so absorbed by the rehearsals of a new opera in
five acts, "Die Nibelungen", by Mr. Dorn, musical conductor in
Berlin, the first performance of which will take place tomorrow,
and also by a heap of small and great local obligations which
accumulate for me in particular at the beginning of winter, that
I have never yet had a moment in which to send you my very
cordial thanks for your biographical notice on occasion of the
Alexandre Piano, which [i.e., the biographical notice had just
reached me. [A "giant grand piano" with three keyboards and
pedals and registers, made according to Liszt's own directions.]
I hope you will excuse this delay in consideration of the short
time left me, and that you feel sure beforehand how kindly I take
it of you for thus taking my part, in divers circumstances, for
the honor of my name and of my reputation--a matter in which I
will endeavour not to render your task too difficult.

With regard to the Schubert opera of which you again spoke to me
in your last letter, I have a preliminary and very important
observation to make to you--namely, that the rights of the score
of "Alfonso and Estrella," in three acts, were obtained some
years ago by Messrs. Hartel of Leipzig. As this work has not
hitherto been performed anywhere they have not been in a hurry to
publish it, and it was only communicated to me (by a copy) in
case of a performance at Weymar. Therefore, before taking any
other steps, it is indispensable that you should apply to Messrs.
Hartel to obtain their authorization, either for a performance,
or for the right to make a foreign edition of this work, and to
make conditions with that firm relative to the matter. I do not
doubt that Messrs. Hartel will be most obliging in the matter;
but you cannot neglect this first step without serious ulterior
disadvantages.

Hartel's consent once given, you must think of adapting to this
charming music a libretto which is worthy of it,--and, if you are
fortunate in doing this, success, and a popular and productive
success, is undoubted.

Allow me to beg you once more to send me a copy of the ballet of
Gluck's "Don Juan" and of the "Dictionary of Music" which you
have just published,--I have already asked Belloni for them, but
he is a little subject to distractions in these matters,--and
accept, my dear sir, together with my best thanks, the assurance
of my affectionate regard.

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 21st, 1854



107. To Monsieur Marie Escudier, Music Publisher in Paris.

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.]

My Dear Sir,

Mr. Franck [Cesar Aug. Franck, born at Liege in 1822, composer
and professor at the Paris Conservatoire, teacher of Faure,
Chabrie, and d'Indy, the chief representatives of the new French
school of music.] having written to me for a special introduction
to you, I have great pleasure in fulfilling his request by
writing these few lines to you. For many years past I have had a
favorable opinion of Mr. Franck's talent in composition, through
having heard his trios (very remarkable, as I think, and very
superior to other works of the same kind published latterly).--

His oratorio "Ruth" also contains beautiful things, and bears the
stamp of an elevated and well-sustained style. If the opera which
he wants to have performed at the Lyric theater answers to these
antecedents and to what I expect of Mr. Franck, the Lyric theater
could only congratulate itself on its choice, and the best chance
of success would be assured. Being unable to judge of it at a
distance, and the score of this opera being unknown to me, I
confine myself simply to drawing your attention to the very real
talent of Mr. Franck, at the same time recommending him
affectionately to your kindness.

Pray accept, my dear Sir, the expression of my sincere regard.

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 28th, 1854



108. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I have lately been over-occupied, and in addition to that I have
been working somewhat, so that I have never had a free half-hour
for correspondence.

I send you today the score and pianoforte edition of my
"Kunstler-Chor." By next autumn I hope that half a dozen other
(longer) scores will be in print. "Ha, der Verruchte!" ["Ah, the
wretch!"] we can then say, as in "Tannhauser." Happily, however,
no journey to Rome is necessary to obtain my absolution. We only
wish to have done with so much outcry and tasteless chatter.

I shall beg David to put off my Leipzig rehearsals for a couple
of weeks, as I cannot well get away from here now, and must also
have the parts written out afresh. If David does not arrange it
otherwise I shall probably come in the latter half of March.--.

Cornelius is telling you more fully, at the same time with this,
what I have talked over with him.--Griepenkerl has been here a
couple of days, and yesterday read his drama "Ideal and Welt"
before our Grand Duke. The company was much the same as at
Schlonbach's reading.--.

About your book I am very curious, and beg that you will send it
me immediately. With regard to the opportunity for the paper I
can tell you something when I come to Leipzig. In the course of
next summer a monthly paper will make its appearance here, out of
which much might grow. This is between ourselves, for the public
will learn about it later.

Remember me most kindly to your wife, and remain good to

Your very sincere and grateful friend,

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 20th, 1854

P.S.--If you see Count Tyskiewicz please repeat my invitation to
him to come for a couple of days to Weymar. If he is free next
Thursday, that would be a good day. We have a concert here at
which the "Kunstler-Chor" and a new orchestral work of mine ("Les
Preludes"), the Schumann Symphony (No. 4.), and his Concerto for
four horns will be given.



109. To Louis Kohler

My very dear Friend,

I come late--yet I hope you have not forgotten me. I am sending
you, together with this, the score and pianoforte arrangement of
my chorus "an die Kunstler," ["To the artists."] and also those
numbers of the Rhapsodies which have been brought out by
Schlesinger. The "Lohengrin" score you have no doubt received two
months ago from Hartel, whom I begged to send it you direct--also
the "Harmonies" from Kistner, and the last number of the
"Rhapsodies" from Haslinger. At the end of the year you shall get
some still greater guns from me, for I think that by that time
several of my orchestral works (under the collective title of
"Symphonische Dichtungen" [Symphonic Poems.]) will come out.
Meanwhile accept once more my best thanks for the manifold proofs
of your well-wishing sympathy, which you have given me publicly
and personally. You may rest assured that no stupid self-conceit
is sticking in me, and that I mean faithfully and earnestly
towards our Art, which in the end must be formed of our hearts'
blood.--Whether one "worries" a bit more or a bit less, as you
put it, is pretty much the same. Let us only spread our wings
"with our faces firmly set," and all the cackle of goose-quills
will not trouble us at all.

That your article has been rudely and spitefully criticized need
not trouble you. You presuppose your reader to have refinement
and educated feeling, artistic acuteness, a fine perception, and
a certain Atticism. These, my dear friend, are indeed rare
things--and only to be found in very homoeopathic doses among our
Aristarchuses. Sheep and d[onkeys] have no taste for truffles.
"Good hay, sweet hay, has not its equal in the world," as the
artist-philosopher Zettel very truly says in the "Midsummer
Night's Dream"! Moreover, dear friend, things didn't and don't go
any better with other better fellows than ourselves. We need not
make any fancies about it, but only go onward quietly,
perseveringly, and consistently.

"Lohengrin" will be given here on the Grand Duchess's next
birthday, April 8th. Gotze is coming this time from Leipzig, and
sings the part of the Knight of the Swan. I hope that in May
Tichatschek will undertake the role; he has already been studying
the complete work for a long time past, and has had a splendid
costume made for it. Perhaps you will be inclined to hear this
glorious work here either in April or May. That would be very
delightful of you, and I need not tell you how pleased I should
be to see you among us again.--

Rafi is working hard at his "Samson," and tells me that he will
have finished it by Christmas. Cornelius, whom I think you do not
know (a most charming, fine-feeling and distinguished nature),
has likewise a dramatic work, poem and music, in readiness for
next season. We gave a good performance of Gluck's "Orpheus"
lately, and for the last performance of this season (end of June
I think we shall still give the Schubert opera "Alfonso und
Estrella," if those same theater influences which already made
themselves prominent by the "Indra" performance when you were at
Weymar do not decide against this work, so interesting and full
of intrinsic natural charm!--Farewell, dear friend, and send
speedy tidings of yourself to

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 2nd, 1854



110. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Herewith an article which I send you for your paper. "Euryanthe,"
which I conduct here tomorrow, is the occasion of it. Still a
more general question is aroused in it, which I am to a certain
extent constrained "to agitate" from Weymar.["Gesammelte
Scriften" vol. iii., I.] I flatter myself that our ideas will
meet and harmonize in it. At first I had prefaced it by a couple
of introductory lines, which I now erase. Will you be so good as
to introduce me yourself in the Neue Zeitschrift by a few words?
You will be the best one to make up this little preface. My name
can be put quite openly with its five letters, as I am perfectly
ready to stand by my opinion.

Tuesday morning I go to Gotha. The Duke's opera is to be given at
the end of this month, or at latest on the 2nd April, and from
the day after tomorrow till the first performance I shall be
quartered at Gotha. In consequence of this I must unfortunately
give up my excursion to Leipzig for the moment,--but I hope that
David will allow another rehearsal in the Gewandhaus in the
course of April, after the "Lohengrin" performance here with Gaze
(on April 7th and 8th), which I must of necessity conduct. The
news, which it appears some papers have published, that I was
thinking of arranging a concert in Leipzig, belongs to the
generation of ducks [geese?] who amuse themselves in swimming
around my humble self. My visit to Leipzig has no other object
than to make some of the musicians acquainted with one or two of
my symphonic works. Should they be pleased with them, they might
perhaps be given there next season. In any case, however, several
of them will appear in score next autumn.

My time is exceedingly limited, and I must see about a great many
things today which do not put one in the mood for correspondence.

Yours in friendship,

F. Liszt

Saturday, March 18th [1854]



111. To Louis Kohler.

[Weimar, April or May, 1854]

My very dear friend,

I am extremely glad that you liked my article on "Euryanthe" and
theater direction, and I thank you most truly for your warm and
very encouraging letter. For many weeks past I have been
imitating you (as you and others always set me a good example),
and am publishing several views on Art-subjects and Art-works in
the Weimar official paper. By degrees these articles will swell
into a volume, which shall then contain the complete set.

For the present I allow myself to send you my Sonata, which has
just been published at Hartel's. You will soon receive another
long piece, "Scherzo and March," and in the course of the summer
my "Annees de Pelerinage, Suite de Compositions pour le Piano"
will appear at Schott's; two years--Switzerland and Italy. With
these pieces I shall have done for the present with the piano, in
order to devote myself exclusively to orchestral compositions,
and to attempt more in that domain which has for a long time
become for me an inner necessity. Seven of the Symphonic Poems
are perfectly ready and written out. I will soon send you the
little prefaces which I am adding to them, in order to render the
perception of them more plain. Meanwhile I merely give you the
titles:--

1. "Ce qu'on entend sur la Montagne" (after V. Hugo's poem in the
"Feuilles d'Automne").

2. Tasso. "Lamento e Trionfo"

3. "Les Preludes" (after Lamartine's Meditation poetique "Les
Preludes").

4. "Orphee."

5. "Promethee."

6. "Mazeppa" (after V. Hugo's Orientale "Mazeppa").

7. "Festklange."

8. "Heroide funebre."

9. "Hungaria."

By Christmas I intend to bring out the scores of all these--which
would make about fifteen hundred plates in octavo size.

The post affair in regard to your letter with the article on
Raff's "Fruehlingsboten" is very unpleasant to me. Neither has
come into my hands, or else I should assuredly have let you know
much sooner. What has become of it cannot now be traced; a
similar thing happened also with a manuscript sent to me from
Dresden, which was never able to be found. Excuse me, dear
friend, for the carelessness which you supposed I had shown, of
which I am in this case not guilty, as Pohl has already written
to you by my request--and continue to keep for me always your
sympathetic friendship, with which I remain, in complete
harmonious unison,

Yours most truly and gratefully,

F. Liszt



112. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Whilst you are trotting about in Leipzig aus Rand und
Band,[Uncontrolledly; a pun on the words Rand and Band (edge of
the paper and volume), Brendel being editor of a paper.] I have
been obliged to keep my bed, owing to a slight indisposition. The
reading of your article in the Jahrbuchern [Year-books] has given
me a pleasant hour, and I thank you heartily for the value and
significance which you accord to my influence and endeavour here,
both in this article and in the topographic section of your book.
As long as I remain here we will take care that Weimar does not
get into a bad way.

I hope to be quite on my legs again in a few days. My present
indisposition is nothing but an overstrain and knock-up, which a
couple of days' rest and some homoeopathic powder will easily set
right. Probably we shall see one another in the early days of
next week at Leipzig; but don't let us speak of it before-hand,
as I have already been three times prevented from making this
little trip.

The Orpheus article was sent to you yesterday. Perhaps it would
still be possible to let it appear in the next number of the
paper; if not, then it can appear the following week. The order
of succession which  I gave you by letter appears to me the right
one, and begins with the Orpheus. This article is moreover as
good as new, for, as your paper allowed me more space, I profited
by it to make the earlier articles twice as long.["Gesammelte
Schriften." vol. iii., 1.]

There are several points in your writing that we will soon talk
over viva voca. I am still really very weak today, and merely
wanted to write to thank you, and to tell you of my speedy advent
in Leipzig (probably next Tuesday or Wednesday).

Yours in friendship,

F. Liszt

Wednesday, April 26th, 1854

Your commissions to Cornelius and letter to Cotta have been
attended to.



113. To Louis Kohler

Dear Friend,

I am going once more to give you a pleasure. By today's post you
will receive Richard Wagner's medallion. A friend of mine, Prince
Eugene Sayn-Wittgenstein, modeled it last autumn in Paris, and I
consider it the best likeness that exists of Wagner.

A thousand thanks for all the kind things you write and think of
me. I very much wish that you should be in agreement with my
present and my next work. If I could only dispose of my time
better! But it is a wretched misery to have to spend one's time
upon so many useless things and people, when one's head is quite
full of other things!--Well, it must be so. God grant only
patience and perseverance! I cannot remember for certain whether
I have already sent you the Avant-propos to my Symphonic Poems,
which I have in the meantime had printed on the occasion of their
performance here. In any case I send them, together with the
portrait for which you asked. I am now working at the ninth
number (Hungaria)--the eight others are perfectly ready; but it
will certainly be next spring before they appear in score.

Of pianoforte music I have nothing more to send you (until the
"Annees de Pelerinage" appear at Schott's), except the little
"Berceuse," which has found a place in the "Nuptial Album" of
Haslinger. Perhaps the continuous pedal D-flat will amuse you.
The thing ought properly to be played in an American rocking-
chair with a Nargileh for accompaniment, in tempo comodissimo con
sentimento, so that the player may, willy-nilly, give himself up
to a dreamy condition, rocked by the regular movement of the
chair-rhythm. It is only when the B-flat minor comes in that
there are a couple of painful accents...But why am I talking such
nonsense with you?--Your very perspicuous discovery of my
intention in the second motive of the Sonata--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a 2-measure score excerpt from his
Sonata]

in contrast with the previous hammer-blows--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with another 2-measure score excerpt
from his Sonata, similar to the first excerpt above except the
melody is transposed and the rhythm is slightly different]

perhaps led me to it.

Farewell, my dear friend, and remain good to your

F. Liszt

Weymar, June 8th 1854



114. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I have had to alter a good deal in the "Robert" article,
especially in the division of the subjects. Do not be angry about
it. It will only make a very little trouble, and it pleases me
better like this. Ergo my present Varianten [various readings]
must be printed word for word in the next number.

If you have a couple of hours to spare, come next Saturday to
Halle. Schneider's "Weltgericht [Last Judgment] is to be given
there by the united Liedertafel [Singing Societies] of Dessau,
Magdeburg, Berlin, Halle, etc. (on Saturday afternoon at 3
o'clock), and I have promised to be there. It would give me great
pleasure to meet you at Halle; I shall put up at the Englischer
Hof there. I hope you will accept my invitation, and therefore I
shall say, Auf Wiedersehen [Au Revoir]!

Yours in friendship,

F. Liszt

June 12th, 1854

It will be easy for you to find out for certain about the
performance at Halle. In any case I shall come for the day fixed
for the "Weltgericht" (a peculiar work, written, as it were, from
a pedestal of his own!). At present it is announced for next
Saturday. Should there be any alteration, I shall arrange
accordingly, and come later.--.

P.S.--The proofs must be very carefully revised, as there are a
great many little alterations. Be so good as to revise the whole
thing accurately yourself. When the article has appeared, please
send me today's proofs back. ["Gesammelte Schriften," vol. iii.,
I.]



115. To Karl Klindworth in London

[A pupil of Liszt's, eminent both as a pianist, conductor, and
musical editor; born at Hanover in 1830, lived in London, Moscow,
and America; has, since 1882, been director of a music school in
Berlin.]

Best thanks, dear Klindworth, for your nice letter. After the
"Lamento" it seems a "Trionfo" is now about to be sounded. That
gives me heartfelt pleasure. Your Murl-connection and Murl-
wanderings [The Society of "Murls" (Moors, Devil-boys--that is to
say, Anti-Philistines) was started at that time in Weimar. Liszt
was Padischah (i.e. King or President); his pupils and adherents,
Buelow, Cornelius, Pruckner, Remenyi, Laub, Cossmann, etc., etc.,
were Murls.] with Remenyi [A celebrated Hungarian violinist.] are
an excellent dispensation of fate, and on July 6th, the day of
your concert at Leicester, the Weimar Murls shall be invited to
supper at the Altenburg, and Remenyi and Klindworth shall be
toasted "for ever!"--[Liszt writes "for ever hoch leben lassen."]


On July 8th I go from here to Rotterdam. The days of the
performances are July 13th, 14th, and 15th. The last number but
one of Brendel's paper (June 16th) contains the complete
programme. The principal works will be Handel's "Israel in
Egypt," Haydn's "Seasons," the Ninth Symphony, and a newly
composed Psalm by Verhulst (the royal conductor of the
Netherlands, director of the Euterpe Concerts in Leipzig about
twelve years ago, and at present director of the Rotterdam
Festivals). Roger, Pischek, Formes, Madame Ney, Miss Dolby, etc.,
have undertaken the solos, and the programme announces nine
hundred members. It would be very-nice if you and Remenyi and
Hagen [Theodor Hagen, a writer, known as a witty critic of his
time under the name of "Butterbrod" [bread and butter] in the
signale; died subsequently in America.] could come; in that case
you would have to start at once, for on the 13th it begins, and
on the 16th I leave Rotterdam--and go for a couple of days to
Brussels, where I shall meet my two daughters.

A couple of Murls would look well in Rotterdam, and would make up
to me in the best possible way for a lot of Philistinism which I
shall probably have to put up with there (by contact with many
honorable colleagues and companions in Art)...So, if you possibly
can, come. We will then have a Murl-Musical Festival in my room.
(N.B.--I shall be staying with Mr. Hope, the banker.)

One has to get accustomed to the London atmosphere, and make
one's stomach pretty solid with porter and port. For the rest,
musical matters are not worse there than elsewhere, and one must
even acknowledge some greatness in bestiality. If you can stand
it, I am convinced that you will make a lucrative and pleasant
position for yourself in London, and also gain a firm footing for
the Murl propaganda ("une, indivisible et invincible") on the
other side of La Manche, "ce qui sera une autre paire de
manches." (In case you don't understand this joke, Remenyi must
explain it to you.) So be of good courage and among good things!
However things may be, never make capitulation with what is idle,
cowardly, or false--however high your position may become-and
preserve, under all circumstances, your Murldom!--

The two pieces from Raff's "Alfred" [Arranged by Liszt for the
piano.] have been brought out by Heinrichshofen (Magdeburg), and
are dedicated to Carl Klindworth. Write me word how I can send
them to you in the quickest and most economical manner--together
with the Sonata. [It bore the title, in Liszt's handwriting, "Fur
die Murlbibliothek" (for the Murl Library).] The Dante Fantasia
will appear in the autumn, with the other pieces of the "Annees
de Pelerinage," at Schott's, and I will tell him to reserve a
copy for you.

Since you went away I have worked chiefly at my Symphonic Poems,
composing and elaborating. The nine numbers are now quite ready,
and seven of them entirely copied out. Next winter I intend to
publish the scores, which ought to make about a thousand engraved
plates. Immediately after my return from Rotterdam I shall set to
work on the Faust Symphony, and hope that I shall have it ready
written out by February.

Hartel is publishing also a couple of transcriptions from
"Lohengrin" (the Festal March before the third act, with the
Bridal Chorus, Elsa's Dream and Lohengrin's rebuke to Elsa),
which I wrote lately.

A propos of Hartel, haven't you heard anything of your
arrangement of the Schubert Symphony? The matter is being delayed
rather long, and when I go to Leipzig I will inquire at Hartel's.
[The arrangement for two pianos of the C major Symphony was
brought out by them.]  I have nothing new to tell you of Wagner.
Joachim and Berlioz came to see me in May. Hoffmann von
Fallersleben has settled here, and we see each other pretty
often. His last poems, "Songs from Weymar," are dedicated to me.

Mason went to London a fortnight ago, and will probably come to
Rotterdam. Laub is getting married in Bohemia, and brings his
wife here in September. Schulhoff was also with me for a day.

Of Rubinstein I will tell you more when there is an opportunity.
That is a clever fellow--the most notable musician, pianist, and
composer, indeed, who has appeared to me from among the newer
lights, with the exception of the Murls. Murlship alone is
wanting to him still. But he possesses tremendous material, and
an extraordinary versatility in the handling of it. He brought
with him about forty or fifty manuscripts (Symphonies, Concertos,
Trios, Quartets, Sonatas, Songs, a couple of Russian Operas,
which have been given in Petersburg), which I read through with
much interest during the four weeks which he spent here on the
Altenburg. [Liszt's home] If you come to Rotterdam you will meet
him there.

Now farewell, my dear Klindworth, and let me soon hear from you.

Your

F. Liszt

July 2nd, 1854

From the 10th to the 15th of July letters will find me in
Rotterdam--Poste restante. N.B.--Remenyi gives me no reply about
the manuscript of Brahms' Sonata (with violin). Probably he has
taken it with him, for I have, to my vexation, rummaged through
my entire music three times, without being able to find the
manuscript. Don't forget to write to me about this in your next
letter, as Brahms wants this Sonata for printing.



116. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I send you herewith a long article on "Harold" and Berlioz, which
Pohl will translate, and adopt in his intended book on Berlioz.
Be so good as to see that Pohl gets the manuscript as soon as
possible, as he is probably in Leipzig now.

[The article appeared in the "Neue Zeitschrift" in 1855
(afterwards "Gesammelte Schriften," vol. iv), whereas it did not
appear in Pohl's book on Berlioz, which only saw the light thirty
years later, in 1884.]

Tonight I go to Rotterdam for the Musical Festival, and thence
for a couple of days to Brussels. On the 22nd--24th of July I
shall come to Leipzig for a few hours, before I get back to
Weimar.

I suppose you have given up your Rotterdam journey. If you have
anything to send for from there, write me a line immediately to
Poste restante, Rotterdam.

Two articles are ready for your paper, "Die weisse Frau" [The
White Lady] and "Alfonso and Estrella." As soon as the
"Montecchi" and the "Favorita" appear you shall receive them [the
complete "Gesammelte Schriften," vol. iii, 1]. The "Fliegender
Hollander" is also ready, but must be copied.["Gesammelte
Schriften," vol. iii., 2.] This article is a very long one, and
will take up several of your numbers.

Remember me kindly to your wife, and bear me in friendly
remembrance as your willing collaborator and attached friend,

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 7th, 1854



117. To Anton Rubinstein.

[Rubinstein (born 1830, at Wechwotynetz in Russian Bessarabia)
gave concerts as early as 1839 in Paris, and Liszt, who was
there, welcomed in the boy the future "inheritor of his playing,"
and helped him in his studies, both during his stay in Paris, and
during his stay in Vienna later on, by giving him lessons. When
Rubinstein, in 1854, after a long sojourn in Russia, came back to
Germany, Liszt gave him a most hospitable reception at the
Altenburg at Weimar.]

What are you doing with yourself, my dear Van II.? [From
Rubinstein's likeness to Beethoven Liszt jokingly called him Van
II. (that is, Van Beethoven)] Are you settled according to your
liking at Bieberich, and do you feel in a fine vein of good-humor
and work, or are you cultivating the Murrendo[This must refer to
some witty joke.] of your invention?

Your luggage van of manuscripts was sent off to you the day after
my return, and will have reached you in good condition, I think.
I acquit myself herewith of my little debt of one hundred
thalers, with many thanks for your obligingness, until the case
arises again. A propos of obligingness, will you please send me
the letter of introduction for Cornelius's sister, who is about
to begin her theatrical career in the choruses of the Italian
opera at St. Petersburg? I told Cornelius that you had promised
it to me. And I should be very glad to send it him without too
much delay. His sister is an excellent young person, not too
pretty, but well brought up, and whom one can introduce with a
good conscience. It is to be feared that she will feel herself
very isolated there, and will get "Heimweh" [homesickness]!

Let me hear from you soon. As regards myself I have very little
to tell you at this moment. Weymar is deserted, as the Court is
absent. Schade alone is radiant, for he has already got a heap of
subscribers to his "Weymar'sche Jahrbucher" [Weimar Year-books],
the first number of which is half printed and will definitely
appear on the 28th August. Mr. de Beaulieu will not be back for
three weeks; in spite of this send me your scenario of the
Russian opera as soon as ever you have finished it, for I will
see that he has it, and, if there is no political obstacle (which
is a very exceptional circumstance in these matters), your work
shall be given next November. [The opera "The Siberian Hunters"
was, in point of fact, given at Weimar through Liszt's
instrumentality.] When you have sufficiently enjoyed the charms
of Bieberich, come and see me at the Altenburg. It seems to me
that you will be at least as comfortable here as elsewhere
(Baden-Baden with Madame * * * excepted!), and Van II may be
certain of being always welcome

To his very affectionate friend,

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 31st, 1854

For the translation of your opera I again recommend Cornelius,
but you will have to pass some weeks here to hasten the work.



118. To Dr. Franz Brendel

You would have greatly deceived yourself, dear friend, if you had
attributed any sort of personal aim to my last intimation
regarding the conduct of the critical part of your paper. By no
means could that be the case, and I think I even said to you in
the course of conversation that, so long as my set of articles on
various operas, which provisionally closes with the "Flying
Dutchman", is going on in the Neue Zeitschrift, it seems to me
more becoming not to bespeak any other musical productions of
mine. None the less do I consider it desirable and quite in the
interest of our cause that, for the future, the more important
productions, especially the works of R. Schumann, Hiller, Gade,
etc., should be brought into consideration more fully and oftener
than has been the case of late years. The bookseller's views, as
regards the sending or non-sending of works, appear to me
unimportant and even injurious for the higher position which your
paper maintains.--

I send you herewith Cornelius's article on the Prize Symphony and
the "Girondistes" Overture. It is very nicely written, and will
probably suit you. If possible put it into your next number.

I cannot now undertake the discussion about the Schumann
collective writings, as I am prevented by musical work for a long
time. Still, if I write later on a couple of articles on the
work, that need not prevent you from bringing out very soon one
or more articles discussing the same work. There is much to take
in and to bring out in it, which one critic alone is scarcely
capable of conceiving. The best plan of all would be if you
yourself will undertake the discussion of the Schumann writings.
Should you, however, not have time for it, then Pohl would be the
best man for this work. His predilection for Schumann, and his
familiarity with Schumann's views, qualify him thoroughly for
this.

My articles on the "Flying Dutchman" must not wait so long as you
propose to me in your letter. I wish explicity that the two
articles on the "Weisse Dame" and "Alfonso and Estrella" should
appear as soon as possible, and immediately afterwards the
"Flying Dutchman", so that by the end of September this series of
twelve opera discussions may have all appeared in the Neue
Zeitschrift.

At the same time with the proofs of the article on the "Weisse
Dame" you will receive the "Alfonso and Estrella" article, and,
as soon as these are out, the "Flying Dutchman", which must be
published in September--for various reasons, which cannot well be
explained in a letter.

Raff's book "Die Wagnerfrage" [The Wagner Question] has arrived
here today, and I have already read it. The author is so pleased
with himself that it would be a miracle if his readers were
joined to him in the same proportion, and Raff is specially at
variance with miracles!--

This book makes on me the effect of a pedagogic exuberance. Even
the occasional good views (on harmony, for example) that it
contains are obscured by a self-sufficiency in the tone and
manner of them, of which one may well complain as insupportable.
What Raff wishes to appear spoils four-fifths (to quote the time
which he adapts so ridiculously to "Lohengrin" of what he might
be. He is perpetually getting on scientific stilts, which are by
no means of a very solid wood. Philosophic formulas are sometimes
the envelope, the outside shell, as it were, of knowledge; but it
may also happen that they only show empty ideas, and contain no
other substance than their own harsh terminology. To demonstrate
the rose by the ferule may seem a very scientific proceeding to
vulgar pedants; for my part it is not to my taste; and without
being unjust to the rare qualities of Raff's talent, which I have
long truly appreciated, his book seems to me to belong too much
to the domain of moral and artistic pathology for it to help in
placing questions of Art in their right light.

I beg you, dear friend, not to repeat this to anybody, for I
could not go against Raff in any but the most extreme case, for
which I hope he will not give me any occasion. Against the many
charges to which he has exposed himself I even intend to shield
him as far as possible, but I am very much grieved that he has
mingled so much that is raw and untenable in his book with much
that is good, true and right.

Farewell, dear friend, and give most friendly greetings to your
wife from

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

August 12th, 1854

In the "Favorita" article a great error has been allowed to
remain. "No lover, no knight behaves thus"--and not "A lover
behaves thus," etc. Send me at once the proofs of the "Weisse
Dame", and in September bring the "Fliegende Hollander", which
must not wait any longer.

I am now working at my Faust Symphony. The three-keyboard
instrument arrived yesterday from Paris. It might be well to take
the opportunity of my Catalogue appearing at Hartel's to see
about a special article on it in your paper.



119. To Anton Rubinstein

[August, 1854]

My dear Van II.,

Whatever scruple I may have in making the shadow of an attempt on
the liberty of your determinations and movements,--a scruple of
which I gave you a pertinent proof by not insisting any further
on your choosing Weymar instead of Bieberich as your villegiatura
during this last month,--yet duty (and a theatrical duty!)
obliges me to snatch you from your Rhine-side leisure, to set
yourself to work afresh at your business on the banks of the
Ilm,--

"Non piu andrai, farfalone," etc. [Aria from Mozart's "Figaro"]

We have to hunt the Siberian bear; ["The Hunters of Siberia", an
opera of Rubinstein's.] and whether it is the season or not, I
don't trouble myself about that. Mr. de Beaulieu has just
answered me in the affirmative about the proposition I made to
him to give your "Hunters of Siberia" at the beginning of
November (the 9th, a date already made famous by the "Homage to
Art" a Prologue which will be again given this season), and asks
me particularly to push on as fast as possible the copying of all
the parts. Now one must kill the bear before selling his skin--
that is to say, translate the libretto, fit it to the music, and
arrange the score for the performance at Weymar.

According to what we arranged verbally, I spoke about it to
Cornelius, who accepts the work of translator with pleasure, and
will fulfill it promptly, and, I am persuaded, to your
satisfaction. The only thing wanting is for you to come at once,
and spend a fortnight at Weymar to finish everything. I give you
then rendez-vous at the Altenburg, where your former quarters
await you. No one will bother you there, and you can give
yourself up to cultivating murrendos [La Mara thinks there was a
joke in connection with this; I cannot help thinking it is a
corruption of morendo, and that perhaps Rubinstein joked about
cultivating a particular touch or nuance.--Translator's note] to
your heart's content whenever the fancy takes you. Try therefore
not to be too long over your farewells to the Tannhausers of the
banks of the Rhine (and if by chance Madame S. is there, pack
yourself off secretly so as not to provoke a scene of too much
frenzy), so as to get to Weymar by 1st to 3rd September, for your
score must be given to be copied by the 15th to the 20th. I will
keep your three books till you come, and will give them you back
at the Altenburg, and I take great pleasure in advance in your
success on our stage.

A revoir then, my dear Rubinstein, in a week's time.

Yours ever in friendship,

F. Liszt

Write me simply a word to fix the date of your arrival, so that I
may let Cornelius know, as he is gone for a week to his mother, a
few hours away from here.

In the matter of news I will tell you that my instrument with
three keyboards is installed in the second etage of the
Altenburg, and that I have finished the first part of my Faust
Symphony (a third of the whole)--the two other parts will be
ready in November, I hope.

I shall also have a little friendly quarrel to pick with you,
which I reserve for our after-tea conversations.

A bientot!



120. To Alexander Ritter in Dresden.

[Ritter at this time joined the Weimar Hofcapelle (Court
orchestra); was afterwards music director at Stettin, and lives
now in Munich; is celebrated as the composer of the operas "Der
Faule Hans" and "Wem die Krone."]

Hearty good wishes on your marriage, dear friend. I reproach
myself for disturbing you in your honeymoon. Well, a little music
to it won't hurt anybody. So come as soon as it is agreeable to
you. The matter is not so very pressing; I only beg you to send a
few lines in reply to Herr Jacobi, the secretary of the Court
theater, who wrote to you previously, and to tell him the date of
your arrival in Weymar. As your marriage takes place on the 12th
of this month, you are quite justified in asking for a few days'
respite. If it suits you to stay a fortnight longer in Dresden,
then fix the 1st of October for your coming to Weymar. With
regard to your quarters, I am quite ready to help you in word and
deed.

In case Pohl is in Dresden you can tell him that his wife is also
engaged from the 15th of September (on which date the theater
here reopens). I wrote yesterday to Brendel, in order to get
Pohl's exact present address. I expect the answer tomorrow, and
Herr Jacobi will immediately write to Frau Pohl.

Meanwhile remember me most kindly to your wife, and dispose
entirely--without ceremony--of

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 6th, 1854



121. To Bernhard Cossmann, Schloss Chanceaux bei Loches in
Touraine

Weymar, September 8th, 1854

Dear Friend,

Whilst you are promenading at your leisure beneath the fine oaks,
beeches, birches, horse-chestnuts, etc., of Chanceaux, I have the
sotte chance [Silly opportunity] of gaping chanceusement
[doubtfully] to the crows of Weymar, where we have certainly no
Chanceaux, but pretty well of gens sots [stupid people] im Loch
[In this hole. All plays upon words, and given therefore in the
original.] (near Loches!!). This almost attains to the height of
punning of our friend Berlioz, does not it?--I should not be able
to keep on such heights, and therefore I hasten to descend to
more temperate regions (des regions plus temperees),-"le Clavecin
bien tempere of J. S. Bach," for example, or to some "Beau lieu"
with or without marque au nez (Marconnay). [A play on words. The
name of the Intendant of the Weimar Court theater was Beaulieu-
Marconnay.] (I implore you to keep this execrable improvisation
to yourself, for, in my position as Maitre de Chapelle, I should
run the risk of being fined by the "Hofamt" [office in the royal
household] for allowing myself such an application of Berlioz's
treatise on instrumentation--but I really don't know what
tarantula of a pun is biting me at this moment!)

Mr. de Beaulieu has just done two graceful acts for me, for which
I am very grateful. Madame Pohl is engaged as harpist to the
Weymar Kapelle, and A. Ritter of Dresden--the brother of Hans de
Bulow's friend--as violinist in place of little Abel, who is
leaving us to go and probably assassinate some Cain at a second
or third desk in an orchestra, somewhere!

A. Ritter is going to marry Mdlle. Wagner on the 12th of this
month (the sister of Johanna), who has played in comedy at the
Breslau theater, and who, by her husband's orders, will not
continue playing when she has her home to keep. Let us hope so at
least! These two new engagements are a great pleasure to me, and
I shall willingly console myself for the loss of the innocent
Abel.

And as Mr. de Beaulieu is just in such a good temper, I advise
you to profit by the circumstance to write him a letter,
artistically turned, to beg for a prolongation of your holiday,
which he will grant you with a good grace, I am sure.

The theater will reopen the 15th September. The 16th "Ernani"
will be given. In the course of October we shall have the
"Huguenots", with a new singer from Prague, Mdlle. Stoger, of
whom one hears wonders.

For the 9th October (fiftieth anniversary of the entry of H.I.H.
the Grand Duchess Marie Paulowna into Weymar) a rather curious
performance will be arranged:--

1st. The Homage to Art by Schiller.

2nd. One of my Poemes Symphoniques.

3rd. "The Hunters of Siberia", Opera in one Act--Music by
Rubinstein.

4th. The Finale of "Lorelei" by Mendelssohn.

For the winter season they are thinking of giving the two
"Iphigenies", "in Aulis" and "in Tauris", by Gluck, and
Schumann's "Genoveva".

Rubinstein and Wasielewski (of Bonn) have been here some days.
Raff has published his volume "The Wagner Question." I would
neither answer nor vindicate it!--My monster instrument with
three keyboards has also arrived a fortnight ago, and seems to me
to be a great success--and on your return I shall pretty nearly
have finished my Faust Symphony, at which I am working like a
being possessed.

This is all my news from here, to which I add the expression of
the old and sincere friendship of your very affectionate

F. Liszt

P.S.--I, on my side, will also write to Mr. de Beaulieu about
you, but it is the thing for you to write him a few lines. The
matter in itself will not present any difficulty.



122. To Gaetano Belloni in Paris

[autograph in the possession of M. Etienne Charavay in Paris]

[September 9th, 1854]

My dear Belloni,

Will you do me the kindness to tell Mr. Escudier that on my last
visit to H.R.H. the Duke of Gotha I gave Monseigneur the volume
on Rossini, and spoke to him at the same [time] of the desire
that Mr. Escudier had mentioned to me in his last letter to be
admitted into the order of H.R.H., before putting himself at his
command? It goes without saying that I warmly recommended Mr.
Escudier to the Duke; but nevertheless he seemed to turn a little
deaf, at any rate with one ear, to the side of the ribbon. In the
course of this month I shall probably see the Duke again, and
will speak to him again about it. On your side do not neglect
Oppelt [a Belgian writer; translated the Duke's opera], who
frequently corresponds with Gotha, and rest assured that I shall
not fail to be agreeable to your friends on this occasion.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Nothing new here. The theatrical season will open with "Ernani"
on the 16th September at latest; they talk of mounting
"Rigoletto" or the "Foscari." Unfortunately the German
translations of Verdi's operas are not worth a straw, and we are
great purists at Weimar. In November the "Huguenots" will also be
given, for the first time at Weymar, the late Grand Duke never
having permitted the performance of this work on account of his
respect for Luther, whom his ancestors had specially protected.

Hartel is going to engrave several of my scores. Four or five of
them will appear in the course of the winter ("Tasso"--the
"Preludes"--"Orphee"--"Mazeppa" will be printed first) under the
title of "Poemes Symphoniques."

I won't write to Escudiers--it will be enough if you let them
know of my good intentions in regard to them. You know that I am
overdone with correspondence, and, unless it is absolutely
necessary for me to write, I abstain from it, so as not to
interrupt my work of composition, which is my first raison
d'etre.



123. To Eduard Liszt in Vienna

What affliction and what desolation, my very dear friend! [Eduard
Liszt, then member of the provincial Court of Justice in	the
Civil Senate, had lost his wife from cholera.] Alas! in trials
such as these even the sympathy felt by those who are nearest to
us can do but little to alleviate the overwhelming weight of the
cross which we have to bear. And yet I wish to tell you that in
these days of sorrow my heart is near to yours, sympathizing with
your suffering, and trusting that "the peace of the Lord," that
peace which the world can neither give nor take away, may sustain
you.

Ever yours,

F. Liszt

October 10th, 1854

P.S.--Try to come and see me soon!



124. To Anton Rubinstein

Weimar, October 19th, 1854

Schott makes me ashamed, my dear Rubinstein. Here come the new
proofs of the "Kamenoi-Ostrow," [Rubinstein had written a number
of short pianoforte pieces named after the Emperor's summer
residence near St. Petersburg.] which he addresses to me for you,
and I have not yet sent you the previous ones! To excuse myself I
must tell you that I am frightfully busy (especially at the
theater), and that I did not want to put the proofs in a wrapper
without writing and thanking you for your charming and clever
letter from Leipzig. Well, here is the whole packet at last,
which you can send direct to Schott. Nevertheless, I am in your
debt for the carriage (which please beg Redslob to put to my
account), and for ten crowns which I borrowed from you at the
railway. As you are coming back here at the beginning of November
we shall have plenty of time to settle these little matters.

The rehearsals of your "Chasseurs de Siberie" begin in the course
of next week. You may trust in my zeal, and be assured that your
work will be suitably prepared. I only beg you to be here about
the 4th November, in order to give us your own ideas at the final
rehearsals. If you decidedly prefer to be a spectator at the
performance, I will willingly conduct the work--but perhaps at
the general rehearsals the fancy may take you to mount the
conductor's chair, as I proposed to you at first: whatever you
definitely decide in this matter will only be agreeable to me.
Therefore just do as you generally do, I beg you, without
ceremony or bother of any kind.

How do you find yourself as regards the musical atmosphere of
Leipzig? Has your "Ocean" obtained the suffrages of the Areopagus
which must be its first judge? At which Gewandhaus Concert will
Mr. Van II. be heard? If you already know anything positive as to
your debuts in Leipzig, write it to me, with a continuation of
the commentaries which amused me so much in your former letter.
We have nothing of special news here which can interest you.
Madame Wagner returns to Weymar the day after tomorrow, and next
Sunday "Lohengrin" will be given. The Wednesday after that a new
singer (Mdlle. Stoger, the daughter of the director at Prague),
who possesses a beautiful voice and appears to be highly endowed,
will make her debut in "Lucrezia Borgia." On the 24th October I
expect Madame Schumann, whom you will already have seen and heard
at Leipzig. When you have an opportunity please tell her not to
delay her journey to Weymar, for I have made all the arrangements
with Mr. de Beaulieu, etc., from the 24th to the 26th, for the
Court Concert and for the one which will take place at the
theater in her honor.

My "Faust" is finished, and I am going to give it to the copyist
in a couple of days. I am very curious to make acquaintance with
yours, and to see in how far the beaux-esprits differ whilst
meeting on common ground! Your "murrendos" at Leipzig will have
proved favorable to your conversations with the Muse, and I look
forward to a fine Symphony. A revoir then, dear friend; on the
4th November, or the 5th at latest, we have the first performance
of an unpublished tragedy, "Bernhard von Weymar," for which Raff
has written a grand Overture and a March, and on the following
days your general rehearsals.

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt



125. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[Beginning of November, 1854]

Dear Friend,

Pohl's article on Lieder und Spruche, etc. (Songs and Sayings),
appears to me to be of general interest to the public--therefore
I begged you to put it in your paper.

Touching what you have reserved of Raff's, I am quite of opinion
that you should also make room for him in his critical
examinations of the Minnesingers. [The German poet-singers of the
Middle Ages.] The ground is an interesting and attractive one--
and if a rather warm discussion should ensue later on between
Raff and Pohl, the field of the Minnegesang (love-song) is by far
the most agreeable for both, as well as the more entertaining for
your readers. Ergo, put Pohl's article into your next number.
Raff can then spring his mines in honor of the Minnegesang when
he pleases. This may make a quite pleasant and harmless joke--
perchance a crown of lilies will mingle with it in the end and
shape the affair into a University concern...Your paper, in any
case, will not suffer. Therefore set to work and go through with
it!

In Bussenius [Bussenius, under the pseudonym W. Neumann,
published the set of biographies "The Composers of Recent Times"
(Balde, Cassel).] you have rightly found the man of whom I
previously foretold you somewhat. I think that by the New Year he
will settle at Gotha, and carry on there with his firm (Balde)
greater literary and publishing undertakings. Meanwhile don't
speak of this. When the outlook is more certain, and things are
favorably settled, I will tell you more.

I gladly accept your friendly invitation to write an article for
your New Year's number. In the course of the next few days you
will receive the article on Clara Schumann, and shortly
afterwards the second half of "Robert Schumann."

Cornelius has been rather unwell for several days, which has
delayed the translation. [Peter Cornelius translated the articles
written in French by Liszt--with the collaboration of the
Princess Wittgenstein--for the Neue Zeitschrift; those which are
published in vols. iii. to v. of the "Gesammelte Schriften."]

Will you, dear friend, be so good as to give my special thanks to
Herr Klitzsch for his article in today's number? By the favorable
manner in which he enters into the intentions of my Mass, and the
artistic sympathy he shows for my endeavour, he has given me a
very great pleasure. Probably a good opportunity will present
itself, later on, for me to undertake a further work in the
religious style, as I feel and conceive it, by the composition of
a "Missa Solemnis" for mixed chorus and orchestra...For the
present I cannot, however, occupy myself with this; but
aufgeschoben soll nicht aufgehoben heissen. [A German proverb--
"Put off is not given up."]

When I come to Leipzig I shall have the pleasure of calling on
Klitzsch and giving him my best thanks in person. If you think I
ought to write him a few lines before then, let me know.

Litolff was here several days, and we have come nearer together
both from a friendly and an artistic standpoint. His fourth
Concerto (Conzert-Symphonie) is a marked advance on the previous
ones. He played this, as well as the third Concerto, the day
before yesterday, in a truly masterly and electric, living
manner. Frau Dr. Steche will have told you about it. Perhaps in
your next number you will put in a short appreciative notice of
Litolfff's appearance here.

Rubinstein left for Leipzig at midday today. The performance of
his Symphony ["Ocean"; given for the first time, November 16th,
1854, at the Gewandhaus Concert for the Poor.] is fixed for the
16th at the Gewandhaus, and later on he will also appear as a
pianist. Hartel, Hofmeister, and Schott have already taken about
thirty of his manuscripts, which is about the smaller half of his
portfolio!--

About the Berlin "Tannhauser" affair I cannot for the moment say
more than that I have always made Wagner feel perfectly at
liberty to put me on one side, and to manage the matter himself,
according to his own wishes, without me. But so long as he gives
me his confidence as a friend, it is my duty to serve him as a
discreet friend--and this I cannot do otherwise than by giving no
ear to transactions of that kind, and letting people gossip as
much as they like. Don't say anything more about it for the
present in your paper. The matter goes deeper than many
inexperienced friends of Wagner's imagine. I will explain it to
you more clearly by word of mouth. Meanwhile I remain passive--
for which Wagner will thank me later on.

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

N. B.--Pohl wishes his Minnesinger article not to be signed with
the name Hoplit, but with the letters R. P., when it appears in
your paper.



126. To Anton Rubinstein

Your "Dialogue Dramatique" a propos of your "Ocean" is a little
chef-d'oeuvre, and I shall keep it, in order, later on, to put it
at the disposal of some future Lenz, who will undertake your
Catalogue and the analysis of the three styles of Van II. We
laughed with all our hearts, a deux, in the little blue room of
the Altenburg, and we form the most sincere wishes that Gurkhaus,
[Principal of the music firm F. Kistner in Leipzig.] the deus ex
machine, may have come to put you out of the uncomfortable state
of suspense in which the Gewandhaus public did you the honor to
leave you. To tell the truth, this decrescendo of applause, at
the third movement of your Symphony, surprises me greatly, and I
would have wagered without hesitation that it would be the other
way. A great disadvantage for this kind of composition is that,
in our stupid musical customs, often very anti-musical, it is
almost impossible to appeal to a badly informed public by a
second performance immediately after the first; and at Leipzig,
as elsewhere, one only meets with a very small number of people
who know how to apply cause and effect intelligently and
enthusiastically to a piece out of the common, and signed with
the name of a composer who is not dead. Moreover I suspect that
your witty account is tainted with a species of modesty, and I
shall wait, like the general public, for the accounts in the
newspapers in order to form an opinion of your success. Whatever
may come of it, and however well or ill you are treated by the
public or criticism, my appreciation of the value that I
recognize in your works will not vary, for it is not without a
well-fixed criterion, quite apart from the fashion of the day,
and the high or low tide of success, that I estimate your
compositions highly, finding much to praise in them, except the
reservation of some criticisms which almost all sum up as
follows--that your extreme productiveness has not as yet left you
the necessary leisure to imprint a more marked individuality on
your works, and to complete them. For, as it has been very justly
said, it is not enough to do a thing, but it must be completed.
This said and understood, there is no one who admires more than I
do your remarkable and abundant faculties, or who takes a more
sincere and friendly interest in your work. You know that I have
set my mind upon your "Ocean" being given here, and I shall beg
you also to give us the pleasure of playing one of your
Concertos. In about ten days I will write and tell you the date
of the first concert of our orchestra.

Meanwhile your "Chasseurs de Siberie" will be given again on
Wednesday next (the 22nd). I will tell Cornelius to give you
tidings of it, unless the fancy takes you to come and hear it, in
order to make a diversion from your "Voix interieures" [internal
voices] of Leipzig.

Write to me soon, my dear Van II., and believe me wholly your
very affectionate and devoted friend,

F. Liszt

November 19th, 1854



127. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Kahnt [The subsequent publisher, for many years, of the Neue
Zeitschrift.] is only known to me by name, as an active and not
too moderately Philistine publisher. Personally I have never met
him, and therefore I cannot give a decided opinion as to his
fitness and suitability for the post of publisher of the Neue
Zeitschrift--yet, on the grounds you give me, it seems quite
right. Nothing is to be expected from Bussenius until he has made
a firm footing at Gotha, which can only come to pass in the
course of the next months; besides this, he has such gigantic
plans for his new establishment in Gotha that the affairs of the
Neue Zeitschrift might be left somewhat in the background. I
entirely agree with you on this point, that you cannot put the
Neue Zeitschrift in the market and offer it to just any publisher
who has shown himself up to now hostile to our tendencies. To do
such a thing as that could never lead to a satisfactory result. I
would, however, remark that the next few years will probably set
our party more firmly on their legs; the invalidity of our
opponents vouches pretty surely for that, apart from the fact,
which is nevertheless the principal point, that powerful talent
is developing in our midst, and many others who formerly stood
aloof from us are drawing near to us and agreeing with us.
Consequently it seems to me that it is not to your interest to
conclude at once a contract for too many years with Kahnt,
unless, which is scarcely likely, he were to make you such an
offer that you would be satisfied with it under the most
favorable conditions. If Kahnt shows the necessary perception and
will for the matter, try to get him to have a consultation with
me about it at Weymar. As he is also a music publisher I could
tell him some things, and make others plainer, which would not be
without interest to him. He need not be afraid that I shall
belabor him with manuscripts or urge him to untimely or useless
sacrifices...(I need not waste more words over the purity of my
intentions!) But I think it is desirable that, if Kahnt consents
to become editor of the Neue Zeitschrift, I should put him on his
guard about several things beforehand which do not come exactly
within the sphere of your activity, but which may essentially
help to the better success of the undertaking. A couple of hours
will be ample for it, and as I shall not be absent from Weymar
during the coming weeks Kahnt will find me any day. Perhaps it
could be arranged for you to come to Weymar with him for a day,
and then we three can make matters perfectly clear and
satisfactory.

Although it is very difficult to me to make time for the more
necessary things, yet I am quite at your service with a short
article for the trial-number on Wagner's "Rheingold." I had
arranged the article so as to do for the New Year's number--you
shall have it in four to five days. Dispose of it as suits you
best. In case the "Clara Schumann" article does not appear in the
next number of the paper, and we do not have to wait too long for
the trial-number, it would be well perhaps to put it in there.
Possibly it might also be reprinted in the trial-number.

I am glad that you, dear friend, after some "jerks and wrenches,"
have come together again with the pseudo-Musician of the Future,
Rubinstein. He is a clever fellow, possessed of talent and
character in an exceptional degree, and therefore no one can be
more just to him than I have been for years. Still I do not want
to preach to him--he may sow his wild oats and fish deeper in the
Mendelssohn waters, and even swim away if he likes. But sooner or
later I am certain he will give up the apparent and the
formalistic for the organically Real, if he does not want to
stand still. Give him my most friendly greetings; as soon as our
concert affairs are settled here I shall write and invite him to
give one of his orchestral works here.

Do not let yourself be grieved at the ever-widening schism in
Leipzig about which you write to me. We have nothing to lose by
it; we must only understand how to assert our full rights in
order to attain them. That is the task, which will not be
accomplished in a day nor in a year. Indeed, it is as it is
written in the Gospel, "The harvest truly is plentiful, but the
laborers are few!" Therefore we are not to make ourselves over-
anxious--only to remain firm, again to remain firm--the rest will
come of itself!--

I will do my utmost for Fraulein Riese, [Pianoforte teacher in
Leipzig, who for years went every Sunday to Weimar to study with
Liszt; died 1860] that she may not repent the somewhat trying
journey. It is a splendid and plucky determination of hers to
come regularly to Weymar, and I hope she will gain thereby much
pleasure and satisfaction.

Nauenburg's proposal of a Tonkunstler-Versammlung (meeting of
musicians) in Weymar is very flattering to me; the same was
written to me from several other sides. Hitherto I have always
abstained from it, because I thought it was more prudent not to
sell the bear's skin before the bear is shot. Moreover the
ordinary fine talk without deeds ["much cry and little wool"] is
very distasteful to me: let friend Kuhmstedt [Professor at a
school, and Music Director at Eisenach; died 1858] sing that kind
of philosophical fiortures in Eisenach; I have no talent for it.
None the less we can return to the Nauenburg proposition at a
convenient opportunity, and see how it could be best carried out.
According to my opinion, Leipzig would be the most suitable
place--and the summer a good time for it.

I consider Raff's polemic entirely harmless. Your readers will
get a lesson in history from it, for which they can but be
grateful to you--and we need not be anxious about Pohl. It will
not puzzle him to eat his way out suitably and wittily.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt December 1st, 1854



128. To J.W. von Wasielewski in Bonn

[Formerly Conductor of the Town Vocal-Union at Bonn (born 1822),
afterwards at Dresden; then again in Bonn as Music Director, and
living since 1884 in Sondershausen. Widely known as a literary
man through his biographies of Schumann and Beethoven, and also
through his book "The Violin and its Masters," etc.]

Dear Friend,

Owing to the somewhat long detour of the "Pesther Lloyd," in
which the friendly lines of remembrance have been reprinted which
you dedicated to the "Altenburg" in the Cologne paper, I only
heard of these a few days ago. [Written on the occasion of a
week's visit to Liszt at the Altenburg at Weimar, at which time
A. Rubinstein was also the Master's guest.] Please therefore to
excuse the delay in my thanks, which are none the less sincere
and heartfelt.

I have heard many accounts of your most successful concert
performances in Bonn, all of which unite in giving you due praise
for your excellent conducting. At the beginning of January
concert affairs here, which have hitherto been in a vacillating
and fluctuating condition, owing to various local circumstances,
will take a more settled turn; I will send you the complete
programme shortly. By today's post you will receive the "Songs
and Sayings" from the last period of the "Minnesang," arranged
for four voices by W. Stade (of Jena). It is an interesting work,
and the editors would be very much indebted to you if you would
have the kindness to give a couple of numbers of them at your
concerts. The little pieces make quite a pretty effect, and one
peculiar to themselves, which will prove still more intense with
the beautiful Rhine Voices. Perhaps you would also find time and
inclination to make the public favorably disposed towards the
work by a few lines in the Cologne paper.

How is Hiller? Has his "Advocate" [an opera, "The Advocate." It
had no success, and was publicly ridiculed at the Cologne
Carnival.] won his requisite suit, as I wish from my heart may be
the case? It would be very kind of you to let me know your plain,
unvarnished opinion of the performance. I should like to
recommend an early performance of the opera in Weymar if Hiller
has nothing against it. As you frequently have occasion to see
Hiller I beg you to ask him whether it would be agreeable to him
to send me the text-book and the score, so that I may make the
proposal to the management to give the opera here very soon.--
Should the matter be then so arranged that he himself conducts
the first performance I should be very glad indeed, and I will
write to him more fully about it.

The opera Repertoire here will be rather at a stand-still this
winter. Frau von Milde is in an interesting condition:
consequently there can be no Wagner operas from three to four
months; for Frau von Milde is for us, and for these operas in
particular, not to be replaced. Berlioz's "Benvenuto Cellini"
must also be left unperformed; all the more because Beck, the
tenor, has entirely lost his upper notes, and is less able than
ever to sing the part of Cellini. But Berlioz will come here in
January to conduct his oratorio "L'Enfance du Christ," etc.
(German translation by Cornelius), and his "Faust." I on my side
have also finished my "Faust Symphony" (in three parts--without
text or voice). The entity or non-entity has become very long,
and I shall in any case have the nine "Symphonic Poems" printed
and performed first, before I set "Faust" going, which may not be
for another year. Rubinstein's "Ocean Symphony" is to figure in
one of our next programmes. If it were not the rule to keep these
concerts exclusively instrumental, I should have begged Hiller
for his "Loreley." Probably a good opportunity will occur for
giving this work when he himself comes to Weymar, as he promised
me he would do.

Joachim sent me, together with his Hamlet Overture, which is in
print, two others--to "Demetrius" (by Hermann Grimm), and to
"Henry IV." (of Shakespeare)--two remarkable scores composed with
lion's claws and lion's jaws!--

Have you any news of Schumann? Give me some good tidings of his
recovery. "Genoveva" will be given here in April at latest.--

Once more best thanks, dear friend, for the very pleasant days
you gave us here, which the inhabitants of the Altenburg most
agreeably remember; they send you most friendly greetings. I have
not forgotten about the Weimar orchestra matter--a half-prospect
has already appeared of realizing my wish, which is in accord
with your own. I cannot help, however, always doubting whether it
will be for your advantage to exchange Bonn for Weymar, for your
position in Bonn appears to me to offer you decidedly improving
chances from year to year, and in these regions so much is
wanting...that I am constrained to be satisfied with small
things. Well, what must be will be. Meanwhile keep in kind
remembrance

Yours in sincere friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 14th, 1854



129. To William Mason in New York

[A pupil of Liszt's, born 1828 at Boston, esteemed as a first-
rate piano virtuoso in America]

My dear Mason,

Although I do not know at what stage of your brilliant artistic
peregrinations these lines will find you, yet I want you to know
that I am most sincerely and affectionately obliged to you for
the kind remembrance you keep of me, and of which the papers you
send me give such good testimony. "The Musical Gazette" of New
York, in particular, has given me a real satisfaction, not only
on account of the personally kind and flattering things it
contains about me, but also because that paper seems to ingraft a
superior and excellent direction on to opinion in your country.

Now you know, my dear Mason, that I have no other pride than to
serve, as far as in me lies, the good cause of Art, and whenever
I find intelligent men conscientiously making efforts for the
same end I rejoice and am comforted by the good example they give
me. Will you please give my very sincere compliments and thanks
to your brother, who, I suppose, has taken the editorship-in-
chief of, the Musical Gazette, and if he would like to have some
communications from Weymar on what is going on of interest in the
musical world of Germany I will let him have them with great
pleasure through Mr. Pohl, who, by the way, no longer lives in
Dresden (where the numbers of the Musical Gazette were addressed
to him by mistake), but in the Kaufstrasse, Weymar. His wife,
being one of the best harpists whom I know, is, now among the
virtuosi of our orchestra, which is a sensible improvement both
for opera and concerts.--

A propos of concerts, I will send you in a few days the programme
of a series of Symphonic performances which ought to have been
established here some years ago, and to which I consider myself
in honor as in duty bound to give a definite impetus at the
beginning of the year 1855.--Toward the end of January I expect
Berlioz. We shall then hear his trilogy of "L'Enfance du Christ,"
[The Childhood of Christ] of which you already know "La Fuite en
Egypte," [The Flight into Egypt] to which he has added two other
little Oratorios called "Le Songe d'Herode" [Herod's Dream] and
"L'Arrivee a Sais." [The Arrival at Sais]--His dramatic Symphony
of Faust (in four parts, with solos and chorus) will also be
given entire while he is here.

As regards visits of artists last month which were a pleasure to
me personally, I must mention Clara Schumann and Litolff. In
Brendel's paper (Neue Zeitschrift) you will find an article
signed with my name on Madame Schumann, whom I have again heard
with that sympathy and thoroughly admiring esteem which her
talent commands. As for Litolff, I confess that he made a great
impression on me. His Fourth Symphonic Concerto (in manuscript)
is a very remarkable composition, and he played it in such a
masterly manner, with so much verve, such boldness and certainty,
that it gave me very great pleasure. If there is something of the
quadruped in Dreyschock's marvelous execution (and this
comparison should by no means vex him: is not a lion as much a
quadruped as a poodle?), there is certainly something winged in
Litolff's execution, which has, moreover, all the superiority
over Dreyschock's which a biped with ideas, imagination, and
sensibility has over another biped who fancies that he possesses
a surfeit of them all--often very embarrassing!

Do you still continue your intimate relations with old Cognac in
the New World, my dear Mason?--Allow me again to recommend you
measure, which is an essential quality for musicians. In truth, I
am not very much qualified to preach to you the quantity of this
quantity; for, if I remember rightly, I employed a good deal of
Tempo rubato in the times when I was giving my concerts (a
business that I would not begin again for anything in the world),
and again, quite lately, I have written a long Symphony in three
parts entitled "Faust" (without text or vocal parts), in which
the horrible measures of 7/8, 7/4, 5/4, alternate with C and
3/4.--

In virtue of which I conclude that you ought to limit yourself to
7/8ths of a small bottle of old Cognac in the evening, and never
to go beyond five quarters!--

Raff, in his first volume of the "Wagner-Frage," has realized
something like five quarters of doctrinal sufficiency; but that
is an example that can hardly be recommended for imitation in a
critical matter, and especially in Cognac and other spirituous
matters.

Pardon me, my dear Mason, for these bad jokes, which however my
good intentions justify, and try to bear yourself valiantly both
morally and physically, which is the heartfelt wish of

Your very affectionate

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 14th, 1854

You did not know Rubinstein at Weymar. [Liszt was mistaken about
this. Mason had even done the principal honors to Rubinstein at
his first visit to Weimar, in the absence of the Master.] He
stayed here some time, and notoriously cuts himself off from the
thick mass of so-called pianist composers who don't know what
playing means, and still less with what fuel to fire themselves
for composing--so much so that with what is wanting to them in
talent as composers they think they can make themselves pianists,
and vice versa.

Rubinstein will constantly publish a round fifty of works--
Concertos, Trios, Symphonies, Songs, Light pieces--and which
deserve notice.

Laub has left Weymar; Ed. Singer has taken his place in our
orchestra. The latter gives great pleasure here, and likes being
here also.

Cornelius, Pohl, Raff, Pruckner, Schreiber, and all the new
school of new Weymar send you their best remembrances, to which I
add a cordial shake hand. [Written thus in English by Liszt]

F. L.



130. To Rosalie Spohr

Pray pardon me, dear artist and friend, that I am so late in
expressing the hearty sympathy which your Weymar friends take in
the joyful event of your marriage. [To Count Sauerma.] You know
well that I am a poor, much-bothered mortal, and can but seldom
dispose of my time according to my wishes. Several pressing
pieces of work, which I was obliged to get ready by this New
Year's Day, have prevented me up to now from giving you a sign of
life--and I am employing my first free moment to assure you that
the changing date of the year can bring with it no variation in
my sincere, friendly attachment. Remember me most kindly to the
papa and sister, and write to me when you can and tell me where
you are going to live henceforth. Possibly I might happen to be
in your neighborhood, in which case I should hasten to come and
see you.

I have but little news to give you of Weymar. That Litolff has
been to see me here, and played his two Symphony-Concertos
capitally, you doubtless know. Probably he will come back after
his journey to Brussels, in the course of next month, when I also
expect Berlioz here. Our orchestra now also possesses a very
first-rate harpist, Frau Dr. Pohl, with a good double-movement
harp of Erard. It seems that poor Erard is no better, and his
"cure" at Schlangenbad has not had the desired result. I
frequently get very sad tidings of his condition through my
daughter.

I thank you warmly for the friendly reception you accorded to
Herr Wolf as a Weymarer. I hope he did not inconvenience you by
too long visits. His wife brought me some weeks ago the original
sketch of your portrait, which is to become my possession.

The Frau Furstin [Princess] and Princess Marie commission me to
give you their most friendly greetings and wishes, to which I add
once more the expression of my friendly devotion.

A thousand respects and homage.

F. Liszt

January 4th, 1855



131. To Alfred Dorffel in Leipzig

[Writer on music, born 1821; custodian of the musical section of
the town library of Leipzig: the University there gave him the
degree of Dr. phil. honoris causa.]

Dear Sir,

Allow me to express to you direct my most cordial thanks for the
conscientious and careful pains you have taken in regard to my
Catalogue. ["Thematic Catalogue of Liszt's Compositions."] I am
really quite astonished at the exactitude of your researches, and
intend to repeat my warm thanks to you in person in Leipzig, and
to discuss with you still more fully the motives which lead me
not entirely to agree with your proposal, and only to use a part
of your new elaboration of my Catalogue. To avoid diffuseness, I
can for today only state a couple of points.

The standpoint of your new arrangement is, if I have rightly
understood you, as follows:--There are still being circulated in
the music-shops a certain number of copies of my works,
especially of the "Studies," "Hungarian Rhapsodies," and several
"Fantasiestucke" (under the collective title of "Album d'un
Voyageur"), etc., that I have not included in my Catalogue, which
I gave into Dr. Hartel's hands for printing;--and you have taken
upon yourself the troublesome task of arranging these different
and somewhat numerous works in what would be, under other
circumstances, a most judicious manner.

However gratifying to me this interest of yours in the production
of a suitable Catalogue can but be, yet I must declare myself
decidedly for the non-acceptance of the portions added by you
(with certain exceptions).

1. The Hofmeister edition of the twelve Studies (with a
lithograph of a cradle, and the publisher's addition "travail de
jeunesse"!) is simply a piracy of the book of Studies which was
published at Frankfort when I was thirteen years old. I have long
disowned this edition and replaced it by the second, under the
title "Etudes d'execution transcendante," published by Haslinger
in Vienna, Schlesinger in Paris, and Mori and Lavener in London.
But this second edition has now been annulled several years ago,
and Haslinger has, by my desire, put aside my copyright and
plates, and bound himself by contract not to publish any more
copies of this work henceforth. After a complete agreement with
him I set to work and produced a third edition of my twelve
Studies (very materially improved and transformed), and begged
Messrs. Hartel to publish it with the note "seule edition
authentique, revue par l'auteur, etc.," which they did.
Consequently I recognize only the Hartel edition of the twelve
Studies as the SOLE LEGITIMATE ONE, which I also clearly express
by a note in the Catalogue, and I therefore wish that the
Catalogue should make no mention of the earlier ones. I think I
have found the simplest means of making my views and intentions
clear by the addition of the sign (+).

2. It is the same case with the Paganini "Etudes" and the
"Rhapsodies Hongroises;" and after settling matters with
Haslinger I completely gained the legal right to disavow the
earlier editions of these works, and to protest against eventual
piracy of them, as I am once more in possession both of the
copyright and the entire engraving plates.

These circumstances will explain to you the reappearance (in a
very much altered conception and form) of many of my
compositions, on which I, as piano player and piano composer, am
obliged to lay some stress, as they form, to a certain extent,
the expression of a closed period of my artist-individuality.

In literature the production of very much altered, increased, and
improved editions is no uncommon thing. In works both important
and trivial, alterations, additions, varying divisions of
periods, etc., are a common experience of an author. In the
domain of music such a thing is more minute and more difficult--
and therefore it is seldom done. None the less do I consider it
very profitable to correct one's mistakes as far as possible, and
to make use of the experiences one gains by the editions of the
works themselves. I, for my part, have striven to do this; and,
if I have not succeeded, it at least testifies to my earnest
endeavour.

3. In the "Annees de Pelerinage" (Schott, Mainz) several of the
pieces are again taken from the "Album d'un Voyageur." The Album
brought out by Haslinger must not be quoted in the Catalogue,
because the work has not been carried out according to its
original plan, and Haslinger has given me back, in this case
also, the copyright and plates.

As the natural consequence of what I have said I beg you
therefore, dear sir, not to undertake any alteration in the
disposition and arrangement of my Catalogue, and only to add the
various enlargements and improvements, for which I have to thank
your overlooking and corrections, as I have now given them and
marked them.--

The title of the Catalogue might sound better thus in German:--

F. Liszt

"Thematischer Catalog." ["Thematic Catalogue"]

And the letters of the headings "Etudes--Harmonies--Annees de
Pelerinage--Ungarische Rhapsodien--Fantaisies on Airs from
Operas, etc.," must be rather large, and these headings separated
from the special title of the works.

I cannot agree with the admission of a supplementary Opus-
number,--but it is of consequence to me that the Catalogue should
come out speedily, in order to get as clear a survey as possible
of my works up to the present time (which, however, are by no
means sufficient for me).

Accept once more my best thanks, dear Sir, as also the assurance
of high esteem of

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

January 17th, 1855.

P.S.--I take the liberty of keeping your edition of the Catalogue
here meanwhile, as it cannot be used for the arrangement of the
Hartel edition.



132. To Anton Rubinstein

Your fugue of this morning, my dear Rubinstein, is very little to
my taste, and I much prefer to it the Preludes that you wrote at
an earlier date in this same room, which, to my great surprise, I
found empty when I came to fetch you for the Berlioz rehearsal.
Is it a fact that this music works on your nerves? And, after the
specimen you had of it the other time at the Court, did the
resolution to hear more of it seem to you too hard to take? Or
have you taken amiss some words I said to you, which, I give you
my word, were nothing but a purely friendly proceeding on my
part? Whatever it may be, I don't want any explanations in
writing, and only send you these few lines to intimate that your
nocturnal flight was not a very agreeable surprise to me, and
that you would have done better in every way to hear the "Fuite
en Egypte" and the "Fantaisie sur la Tempete" of Shakespeare.

Send me tidings of yourself from Vienna (if not sooner), and,
whatever rinforzando of "murrendo" may happen, please don't do a
wrong to the sentiments of sincere esteem and cordial friendship
invariably maintained towards you by

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 21st, 1855.



133. To Louis Kohler

My very dear Friend,

Hans von Bulow will bring you these lines. You must enjoy
yourself in the artist who, above all other active or dying out
virtuosi; is the dearest to me, and who has, so to speak, grown
out of my musical heart.--When Hummel heard me in Paris more than
twenty-five years ago, he said, "Der Bursch ist ein
Eisenfresser." [The fellow is a bravo."] To this title, which was
very flattering to me, Hans von Bulow can with perfect justice
lay claim, and I confess that such an extraordinarily gifted,
thorough-bred musical organism as his has never come before me.

Receive him as an approved and energetic friend, and do all you
can to make his stay in Konigsberg a pleasant one.

Yours in friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 16th, 1855

The engraving of my Symphonic Poems is in progress, and in the
course of this summer five or six of them will be ready. There is
a good bit of work in it.

At the present time I am exclusively engaged in the composition
of a "Missa Solemnis." You know that I received, from the
Cardinal Primate of Hungary, the commission to write the work for
the consecration of the cathedral at Gran, and to conduct it
there (probably on the 15th of August).



134. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Sunday, March 18th, 1855

A few words in haste, dear friend, for I am over head and ears in
work. First and foremost, my best thanks for your communications,
with the request to continue them, even if I cannot always answer
the different points thoroughly.

I send you herewith the title of "The Captive" [Song, by Berlioz,
for alto voice with orchestra or piano.]--the words must be
written under the notes both in French and German. There can be
no copyright claimed for this Opus in Germany, as it appeared
years ago in Paris. It is to be hoped, however, that Kahnt will
not lose by it, as he has only to bear the cost of printing--and
in any case it is a suitable work for his shop..--.

To be brief--Panofka's [A well-known teacher of singing and
writer on music (1807-88); collaborator of the Neue Zeitschrift.]
letter, in your last number, must be regarded as a mystification.
In the first few lines a glaring falsehood, founded on facts, is
conspicuous, for the Societe de Ste. Cecile has been in existence
for years, and was formerly [1848-54] conducted by Seghers [Pupil
of Baillot (1801-81)]--not to mention that Berlioz conducted the
Societe Philharmonique, where "many Symphonies were performed,"
for at least a season (of something like four years)--and then as
regards Scudo, [Musical critic and journalist in Paris (1806-64)]
it must appear incredible to see a man like that mentioned with
approval in your paper. It is well known that Scudo has, for
years past, with the unequivocal arrogance of mediocrity, taken
up the position of making the most spiteful and maliciously
foolish opposition, in the revue des Deux Mondes (the
"Grenzboten" only gives a faint impression of it), to our views
of Art, and to those men whom we honor and back up. (I can tell
you more about this by word of mouth.) If Panofka calls that
"persuasion and design," I give him my compliments...on his
silliness.--

Your views on the characteristic motives are right, and for my
part I would maintain them very decidedly against the bornes
attacks which they have to bear--yet I think it is advisable not
to discuss Marx's book ["The Music of the Nineteenth Century,"
1855.] at present.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt



135. To Dr. Franz Brendel

April 1st, 1855

Dear Friend,

The question of criticism through creative and executive artists
must some time come on the tapis, and Schumann affords a
perfectly natural opportunity for it. [Liszt's article on Robert
Schumann, "Gesammelte Schriften," Vol. iv.] By the proofs of the
second article (which I thank you much for having corrected with
the necessary exactitude) you will observe that I have modified
several expressions, and have held them in more just bounds.
Believe me, dear friend, the domain of artists is in the greater
part guilty of our sluggish state of Art, and it is from this
side especially that we must act, in order to bring about
gradually the reform desired and pioneered by you.

Tyszkiewicz's [Count Tyszkiewicz, writer on music, collaborator
of the Neue Zeitschrift.] letter gave me the idea of asking you
to make him a proposal in my name, which cannot be any
inconvenience to him. In one number of Europe artiste he
translated the article on "Fidelio." [By Liszt, "Gesammelte
Schriften," Vol. iii., I.] Should he be disposed to publish
several of my articles in the same paper, I am perfectly ready to
let him have the French originals, [Liszt's articles were, as
already mentioned, written in French and translated into German
by Cornelius.] whereby he would save time and trouble. He has
only to write to me about it; for, after his somewhat capricious
behaviour towards me, I am not particularly inclined to apply to
him direct, before he has written to me. I am in perfect
agreement with his good intentions; it is only a question how far
he is able and willing to carry them out, and how he sets about
it. His "Freischutz-Rodomontade" is a student's joke, to which
one can take quite kindly, but which one cannot hold up as a
heroic feat. If he wishes to be of use to the good cause of
musical progress, he must place and prove himself differently.
For my part I have not the slightest dislike to him, only of
course it seemed rather strange to me that, after he had written
to me several times telling me that he was coming to see me at
Weymar, and had also allowed Wagner to write a letter of
introduction for him, which he sent to me, he should ignore me,
as it were, during his long stay in Leipzig. This does not of
course affect the matter in hand, and I am not in the least angry
at his want of attention, but I simply wait till it occurs to him
to behave like a reasonable man.

I thank you for your tidings about Dietrich--although I am
accustomed to expect less, rather than more, from people.

On the 9th April Schumann's "Genoveva" will be given here--and I
think I may venture to promise before-hand that the performance
will be a far better one than that at Leipzig. Fraulein Riese
will tell you about the "Transfiguration of the Lord." [Oratorio
by Kuhmstedt] Of this kind there should certainly be no more
[oratorios The word is missing in the original, as the corner of
the letter is cut off] composed.

Yours in friendship,

F. Liszt



136. To Anton Rubinstein

My dear Rubinstein,

Gurkhaus has just sent me a copy of your "Persian Songs," on the
title-page of which there is a mistake which I beg you to get
corrected without delay. The Grand Duchess Sophie is no longer
"Hereditary Grand Duchess," but "Grand Duchess" pure and simple,
and I think it would not do to send her the dedicatory copy with
this extra word. Please write therefore to Gurkhaus to see to it.

In the number of the Blatter fur Musik which has come to me I
have read with great pleasure and satisfaction Zellner's article
on your first concert in Vienna. It is not only very well written
but thoroughly well conceived, and of the right tone and manner
to maintain for criticism its right and its raison d'etre. I
second it very sincerely for the just eulogy it gives to your
works; and, if you have the opportunity, make my compliments to
Zellner, to whom I wrote a few lines the other day. This article
coincides rather singularly with that which appeared in the Neue
Zeitschrift (No. II.) on Robert Schumann, in which I probed
rather deeply into the question of criticism. If you believe me,
my dear Rubinstein, you will not long delay making yourself of
the party; for, for the few artists who have sense, intelligence,
and a serious and honest will, it is really their duty to take up
the pen in defense of our Art and our conviction--it matters
little, moreover, on which side of the opinions represented by
the Press you think it well to place yourself. Musical literature
is a field far too little cultivated by productive artists, and
if they continue to neglect it they will have to bear the
consequences and to pay their damages.

With regard to Weymar news, I beg to inform you that this evening
Kulhmstedt's oratorio "The Transfiguration of the Lord" will be
given at the theater, under the very undirecting direction of the
composer. I cannot, unfortunately, return him the compliment he
paid you at Wilhelmsthal--"Young man, you have satisfied me";
for, after having heard it at three rehearsals, I found no
satisfaction in it either for my ears or my mind: it is the old
frippery of counterpoint--the old unsalted, unpeppered sausage,
[Figure: Musical example]

etc., rubbish, to the ruin of eye and ear! I will try to leave it
out in my Mass, although this style is very usual in composing
Church music. In five or six weeks I hope to have finished this
work, at which I am working heart and soul (the Kyrie and Gloria
are written). Perhaps I shall still find you at Vienna (or in the
outskirts, which are charming), when I come to Gran in the month
of July.

If not, we shall see each other again at Weymar, for you owe me a
compensation for your last fugue, which is no more to my taste
than Kuhmstedt's counterpoint. When are you going to send me the
complete works of Anton Rubinstein that you promised me, and
which I beg you not to forget? Your idea of a retrospective
Carnival seems to me excellent, and you know how to write
charming and distinguished pieces of that kind.

Farewell, dear friend; I must leave you to go and have a
rehearsal of Schumann's "Genoveva," which is to be given next
Monday. It is a work in which there is something worthy of
consideration, and which bears a strong impress of the composer's
style. Among the Operas which have been produced during the last
fifty years it is certainly the one I prefer (Wagner excepted--
that is understood), notwithstanding its want of dramatic
vitality--a want not made up for by some beautiful pieces of
music, whatever interest musicians of our kind may nevertheless
take in hearing them.

A thousand cordial greetings, and yours ever,

F. Liszt

Weymar, April 3rd, 1855

When you write to me, please add your address. I beg you will
also return my best compliments to Lewy. [Pianist in St.
Petersburg; a friend of Rubinstein's.]

A thousand affectionate messages to Van II. from the Princess.



137. To Freiherr Beaulieu-Marconnay, Intendant of the Court
theater at Weimar

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Hermann Scholtz, Kammer-
Virtuosos in Dresden. The addressee died in Dresden.]

Dear Baron,

It is not precisely a distraction, still less a forgetfulness,
with which I might be reproached as regards the programme of this
evening's concert. The indications which Her Royal Highness the
Grand Duchess condescends to give me are too precious to me for
me not to be most anxious to fulfill at least all my duties. If,
then, one of Beethoven's Symphonies does not figure in today's
programme, it is because I thought I could better satisfy thus
the intentions of H.R.H., and that I permitted myself to guess
that which she has not taken the occasion to explain this time.
The predilection of His Majesty the King of Saxony for
Beethoven's Symphonies assuredly does honor to his taste for the
Beautiful in music, and no one could more truly agree to that
than I. I will only observe, on the one side, that Beethoven's
Symphonies are extremely well known, and, on the other, that
these admirable works are performed at Dresden by an orchestra
having at its disposal far more considerable means than we have
here, and that consequently our performance would run the risk of
appearing rather provincial to His Majesty. Moreover if Dresden,
following the example of Paris, London, Leipzig, Berlin, and a
hundred other cities, stops at Beethoven (to whom, while he was
living, they much preferred Haydn and Mozart), that is no reason
why Weymar--I mean musical Weymar, which I make the modest
pretension of representing--should keep absolutely to that. There
is without doubt nothing better than to respect, admire, and
study the illustrious dead; but why not also sometimes live with
the living? We have tried this plan with Wagner, Berlioz,
Schumann, and some others, and it would seem that it has not
succeeded so badly up to now for there to be any occasion for us
to alter our minds without urgent cause, and to put ourselves at
the tail--of many other tails!--

The significance of the musical movement of which Weymar is the
real center lies precisely in this initiative, of which the
public does not generally understand much, but which none the
less acquires its part of importance in the development of
contemporary Art.

For the rest, dear Baron, I hasten to make all straight for this
evening by following your advice, and I will ask Messrs. Singer
and Cossmann to play with me Beethoven's magnificent trio (in B-
flat--dedicated to the Archduke Rudolph), as No. 3 in the
programme.

A thousand affectionate compliments, and

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Monday, May 21st, 1855



138. To Anton Rubinstein

My dear Rubinstein,

On my return from the Musical Festival at Dusseldorf, where I
hoped to meet you, I found the parcel of oeuvres choisies and the
portrait, which is very successful, of Van II. I hasten to give
you my best thanks for this first sending, begging you not to
forget your promise to complete, in the course of their
publication, the collection of your works, which have for me
always a double interest of Art and friendship. This morning we
had a taste, with Singer and Cossmann, of the Trio in G minor, of
which I had kept a special recollection--and afterwards Princess
Marie Wittgenstein (who commissions me to give all her thanks to
you, until she can have the pleasure of giving them to you in
person) demanded the pieces dedicated to her, which had complete
success. A propos of dedications, the Grand Duchess Sophie is
enchanted with the "Persische Lieder" ["Persian Songs"], and this
she has probably already intimated to you. Shortly before her
departure for Dusseldorf she sang several of them over again,
taking more and more liking to them. Decidedly the first
impression that these "Lieder" made on me, when you showed them
to me, and when I begged you to publish them without delay, was
just, and I have not been deceived in predicting for them a
quasi-popular success. Mdlle. Genast, who has returned from
Berlin, tells me that she made a furor there with "Wenn es doch
immer so bliebe!" ["Oh, could it remain so for ever!"] But,
unfortunately, as an older song has it, "it cannot remain so for
ever under the changing moon!" The last time I was passing
through Leipzig (where they gave my "Ave Maria" exceedingly well
at the Catholic Church), I told Gotze to appropriate to himself
three or four of your "Persische Lieder," which he will sing
splendidly; and, as he comes here pretty often, I will beg him to
give us the first hearing of them at some Court concert. The
Grand Duchess Olga is expected for the day after tomorrow; and
if, as is probable, they treat her to a little concert, I shall
take advantage of the opportunity to make her become better
acquainted with the Trios you dedicated to her, and which I
consider as among your best works. In the parcel I noticed the
absence of "L'Album de Kamennoi-Ostrow," which I should like to
make known, or, better still, to offer from you to H.I.H. the
Dowager Grand Duchess, and which I want you to send me for this
purpose.

If by chance you pass through Bonn, do not forget to go and see
Professor Kilian, who has been interested in you from very old
times, and with whom we talked much of you and your works during
the journey from Cologne to Dusseldorf.

Write me word soon what you are doing now. I, for my part, shall
spend the summer at Weymar, up to the time of my journey to Gran
(June-August). I count on your promise to come and see me in the
autumn, unless your road should lead you into these parts sooner.
You may be very sure of being always most welcome at the
Altenburg--and, even if a number of those holding our musical
opinions should meet still less often than in the past, that
would not in any way influence the very sincere feelings of
friendship and esteem which I bear towards you and keep towards
you invariably. When we see each other again, you will find my
"Divina Commedia" pretty far advanced; I have sketched a plan of
it (a Symphony in three parts: the two first, "Hell" and
"Purgatory," exclusively instrumental; the third, "Paradise,"
with chorus): but I cannot set myself entirely to this work until
I have finished the new score of my choruses from Herder's
"Prometheus," which I am rewriting in order to have it printed
shortly after the publication of my Symphonic Poems, six of which
will come out next October.

I am very curious to see what your new case of manuscripts will
contain. Have you set to work on "Paradise Lost"? I think that
would be the most opportune work for taking possession of your
fame as a composer.

A thousand cordial expressions of friendship, and

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

June 3rd, 1855



139. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[Weimar, June 1855]

Dear Friend,

Best thanks for your munificence. The weed [Cigars] is very
welcome, and you will have to answer for it if it induces me to
importune you with some more columns. Meanwhile I send you the
proofs of the second Berlioz article, together with a fresh
provision of manuscripts, and with the next proofs you will get
the end.

I will also send you very soon a report of the Dusseldorf Musical
Festival (not by me), the authorship of which I beg you to keep
strictly anonymous. Probably he will be piquant and forcible. On
the whole, and also in detail, the Dusseldorf Musical Festival
can only be described as a great success, and I, for my part,
rejoice in this and every success without particularly envying
it. My task is quite a different one, the solution of which is by
no means troubled thereby.

If you should by any chance have read that I am going to America
(!--there are many people who would be glad to have me out of
sight!), and that a Leipzig virtuoso (in Leipzig such animals as
virtuosi are seldom to be met with!) is going to take my place
here, you can simply laugh, as I have done, at this old canard--
but don't say anything to contradict it in your paper; such bad
jokes are not worth noticing, and are only good as finding food
for inquisitive Philistines. In a few days I hope to be able
again to do something serious with my work, and shall not leave
Weymar until my journey to Hungary (at the end of August).
Gutzkow's appointment is still in suspense, but is not
impossible. Have you read Frau Marr's (Sangalli's) brochure,
brought out by Otto Wigand? The pages which she devotes to my
work here may perhaps interest you, and I have absolutely nothing
to complain of in them, especially in view of the fact that I
have not hitherto been able to go "hand in hand" with Marr. Marr
has, moreover, according to what he told me, given in his
resignation as artistic Director, [At the Weimar Court theater]
and one cannot get clear about the entire theater-management for
some weeks to come. I keep myself very passive in the matter, and
don't fish in troubled waters. Thus much is certain--that if
Weymar wants to do anything regular, it cannot do without my
ideas and influence. About the rest I don't need to trouble
myself. Last Sunday we held a satisfactory performance of
"Tannhauser" in honor of the Princess of Prussia--and next Monday
the opera will be repeated.

Friendly greetings to your wife from your almost too active
fellow-worker and friend,

F. Liszt

I am writing to Fraulein Riese one of these next days, to invite
her to the performance of my Mass at Jena. [The Mass for male
voices was performed there in the latter half of June.]



140. To Dr. Franz Brendel.

[The first sheet of the original is missing]

Evers' [Doubtless Carl Evers (1819-75), composed Sonatas, Salon
pieces, etc.] letter has amused me, and it will cost you but
little diplomacy to conciliate the sensitive composer. You know
what I think of his talent for composition. From people like that
nothing is to be expected as long as they have not learned to
understand that they are uselessly going round and round in what
is hollow, dry, and used up. That good Flugel [Music writer and
composer; at that time teacher in a school at Neuwied; now
organist at the Castle at Stettin.] has also little power of
imagination, although a little more approach to something more
earnest, which has at least this good in itself--that it checks a
really too naive productiveness...His letter on the Dusseldorf
Musical Festival is again a little bit of Barenzucker
[Liquorice.] (reglisse in French), and W.'s article in comparison
with it quite a decent Pate Regnault. When we see each other
again I will make this difference clear to you--meanwhile make
the Rhinelanders happy with the latter, and don't be afraid of
the whispers which it may perhaps call forth; for, I repeat, it
contains nothing untrue or exaggerated, and in your position of
necessary opposition it would be inconsistent if you were to keep
back views of that kind from the public.

With the most friendly greeting, your

F. Liszt

June 16th, 1855.

My Mass for male voices and organ (published by Hartel two years
ago) will be given next week at the church in Jena. As soon as
the day is fixed I will let Fraulein Riese know.

Once more I recommend you to keep the W. article strictly
anonymous.



141. To Concertmeister [Leader of orchestra] Edmund Singer.

Dear Singer,

If I write but seldom to my friends there is, besides other
reasons, one principal cause for it, in that I have but seldom
anything agreeable or lively to tell them. Since your departure
very little has happened here that would interest you. One half
of our colleagues of the Neu-Weymar-Verein [New Weymar Union] is
absent--Hoffmann in Holland, Preller in the Oldenburg woods,
Pruckner and Schreiber at Goslar, etc., etc.--so that our
innocent reunions (which finally take place in the room of the
shooting-house) are put off for several weeks. Cornelius is
working at a Mass for men's voices--on the 15th of August we
shall hear it in the Catholic Church. I, on my side, am working
also at a Psalm (chorus, solos, and orchestra), which will be
ready by your return, in spite of all interruptions which I have
to put up with by constant visits. An exceptionally agreeable
surprise to me was Hans von Bulow, who spent a couple of days
here, and brought with him some new compositions, amongst which I
was particularly pleased with a very interesting, finely
conceived, and carefully worked-out "Reverie fantastique."  Until
the 15th of August (when his holidays end) he remains in
Copenhagen, where he will certainly meet with a friendly
reception. Perhaps next summer you would be inclined to go there.
You would find it a very pleasant neighborhood, and many pleasant
people there, who have also been agreeably remembered by me. If I
had time, I would gladly go there again for a couple of weeks, to
find a little solitude in the Zoological Gardens and to forget
somewhat other bestialities. [Probably a play on the words
Thiergarten (beast-garden) and Bestialitaten]  This satisfaction
is not so easily attainable for me elsewhere.

I envy you immensely about Patikarius [Hungarian gipsy
orchestras] and Ketskemety. [Hungarian gipsy orchestras] This
class of music is for me a sort of opium, of which I am sometimes
sorely in need. If you should by chance see Kertbeny, who has now
obtained a logis honoraire, please tell him that my book on the
Gipsies and Gipsy Music is already almost entirely translated by
Cornelius, and that I will send it to him by the autumn. But beg
him at the same time not to write tome, as it is impossible for
me to start a detailed correspondence with K.

I sent the pianoforte arrangement (with the voices) yesterday to
Herr von Augusz, with the request that he would present them,
when he had an opportunity, to His Eminence Cardinal Scitowsky.
The Mass [Liszt's Graner Messe.] will not take up an excessively
long time, either in performance or studying. But it is
indispensable that I should conduct the general rehearsal as well
as the performance myself; for the work cannot be ranked amongst
those in which ordinary singing, playing, and arrangement will
suffice, although it offers but small difficulties. It is a
matter of some not usual trifles in the way of accent, devotion,
inspiration, etc.

When are you coming back, dear Singer?  Only bring home with you
an orderly packet of manuscripts, that is to say to Weymar, where
I hope that you will feel yourself more and more at home.

The members of our Club who are still here send you the most
friendly greetings by me, to which I add a cordial "auf baldiges
Wiedersehen" ["May we soon meet again!"].

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

August 1st, 1855

P.S.--Joachim is going to make a walking tour in Tyrol. I hope he
will come and see us on his return. Berlioz proposes to give some
concerts in Vienna and Prague next December. I shall probably
postpone my journey to Wagner (at Zurich) until November. I shall
remain here for the next few months, in order to write several
things in readiness for the winter.



142. To Bernhard Cossmann In Baden-Baden

Wilhelmsthal, August 15th, 1855

Here am I really on the road to Baden-Baden, dear friend; but
that does not advance matters at all, and in spite of myself I
must resign myself to remain en route. Tomorrow morning I return
to Weymar, where I have promised to meet my two daughters, as
well as Mr. Daniel [Liszt's son], who has pretty well
distinguished himself at the general competition. After passing
ten days or so with me the girls will take up their abode with
Madame de Bulow at Berlin, who is good enough to take charge of
them, and Daniel will return to Paris to continue his studies
there. I was hoping also to be able to spend a week or two there-
-but that cannot possibly be arranged, and on reflection I was
obliged to limit myself to conducting the Princess W[ittgenstein]
as far as Eisenach, whence she has continued her journey to Paris
with her daughter (with the special view of seeing the exhibition
of pictures there); and for my exhibition I shall content myself
with that to the north, which I can enjoy from the windows of my
room!--This picturesque solemnity is almost up to the height of
the musical solemnities of Baden which you describe to me in such
bright and lively colors, but with this difference, that at
Wilhelmsthal we are very much favored by the element of damp,
whereas at Baden the artists who give concerts are drained dry.

At Weymar all the world is out of doors, and the town is pretty
full of nothing, offering to the curiosity of travelers only the
trenches and practical circumvallations in honor of gas-lighting
which they are going to start in October. Singer is bathing in
the Danube (at Ofen), and tells me he shall be back by the roth
of September; Raff is promenading amid the rose and myrtle
shrubberies of his "Sleeping Beauty" at Wiesbaden; Stor is
returning with his pockets full of new nuances which he has
discovered at Ilmenau, where he has composed (as a pendant to my
Symphonic Poem) "Ce qu'on entend dans la vallee"! ["What is heard
in the valley." Liszt's work bears the title "Ce qu'on entend sur
la montagne" ("What is heard on the mountain.")] Preller
[Friedrich Preller, the celebrated painter of the Odyssey
pictures] has found beautiful trees in the Duchy of Oldenburg
which serve him as a recovery of the "Recovery" [Or a "recreation
of the Recreation." I do not know which is meant. The original is
"qui lui servent d'Erholung von der 'Erholung.'"--Translator's
note.]; Martha Sabinin [A pupil of Liszt's, a Russian] is
haunting the "Venusberg" in the neighborhood of Eisenach in
company with Mademoiselle de Hopfgarten; Bronsart [Hans von
Bronsart, Liszt's pupil, now General-Intendant at Weimar] is gone
to a sort of family congress at Konigsberg; and Hoffman [Hoffmann
von Fallersleben, the well-known poet] is running through Holland
and Belgium to make a scientific survey of them; whilst Nabich is
trying to gain the ears of England, Scotland, and Ireland with
his trombone!

I, for my part, am in the midst of finishing the 13th Psalm (for
tenor solo, chorus, and orchestra), "How long wilt Thou forget
me, O Lord?" which you will hear this winter; and I shall not
leave Weymar till November to go and pay a few days' visit to
Wagner at Zurich. Don't altogether forget me, my dear Cossmann,
in the midst of your solemnities----[The end of the letter was
lost.]



143. To August Kiel, Court Conductor in Detmold

[Autograph (without address) in the possession of M. Alfred
Bovet, of Valentigney. The contents lead to the conclusion that
the above was the addressee (1813-71).]

I have been prevented until now, by a mass of work and little
outings, from sending you my warmest thanks for your kind
forwarding of the opera text of "Sappho," and I beg that you will
kindly excuse this delay. The manner in which Rietz's composition
to the Schiller dithyramb is to be interwoven with the poem I
cannot venture fully to explain. I confess also that the
dramatico-musical vivifying of the antique is for me a sublime,
attractive problem, as yet undecided, in the solution of which
even Mendelssohn himself has not succeeded in such a degree as to
leave nothing further to be sought for. Some years ago "Sappho"
(in three acts--text by Augier, music by Gounod) was given at the
Paris Opera. This work contains much that is beautiful, and
Berlioz has spoken of it very favorably in the Journal des
Debats. Unfortunately it did not appear in print, and up to the
present time no other theater has performed it, although it made
a sensation in Paris and ensured a first-rate position to the
composer. If it would interest you, dear sir, to get to know the
score, I will willingly write to Gounod and beg him to give me
the work to send to you.

I have repeatedly heard the most gratifying tidings of the
sympathy and care which you bestow in Detmold upon the works of
Wagner and Berlioz. Regardless of the many difficulties,
opposition, and misunderstandings which meet these great
creations, I cherish with you the conviction that "nothing truly
good and beautiful is lost in the stream of Time," and that the
pains taken by those who intend to preserve the higher and the
divine in Art do not remain fruitless. In the course of this
autumn (at the end of November at latest) I am going to see
Wagner, and I promise to send you from Zurich a little autograph
from his hand. I would gladly satisfy your wish sooner, but that
the letters which Wagner writes to me are a perfectly inalienable
benefit to me, and you will not take it amiss if I am more than
avaricious with them.

Accept, my dear sir, the assurance of my highest esteem, with
which I remain

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 8th, 1855

Enclosed are Berlioz' letter and the manuscript of "Sappho."



144. To Moritz Hauptmann

[The celebrated theorist and cantor of the Thomashirche in
Leipzig (1792-1868)]

Very dear Sir,

By the same post I send you, with best and warmest thanks for
your friendly letter, the volume of Handel's works which contains
the anthems. The second of them, "Zadok the Priest and Nathan the
Prophet anointed Solomon King," is a glorious ray of Handel's
genius, and one might truly quote, of the first verse of this
anthem, the well-known saying, "C'est grand comme le monde." ["It
is as great as the world."]--

The cantata "L'Allegro, il Pensieroso," etc., enchants me less,
yet it has interested me much as an important contribution to
imitative music; and, if you will kindly allow me, I want to keep
the volume here a few days longer and to send it back with the
two others.

I agree entirely, on my side, with your excellent criticism of
Raimondi's triple oratorio ["Joseph," an oratorio by the Roman
composer, consisting of three parts, which was given with great
success in the Teatro Argentina in Rome in 1852]. There is little
to seek on that road, and still less to find. The silver pfennig
(in the Dresden Art-Cabinet), on which ten Pater Noster are
engraved, has decidedly the advantage of harmlessness to the
public over such outrages to Art, and the Titus Livius, composed
by Sechter, will probably have to moulder away very
unhistorically as waste-paper. Later on Sechter can write a
Requiem for it, together with Improperias over the corruption of
the taste of the times, which have found his work so little to
their taste.

With the pleasant expectation of greeting you soon in Leipzig,
and of repeating to you my best thanks, I remain, my dear sir,
with the highest esteem,

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, September 28th, 1855



145. To Eduard Liszt

I have just received your last letter, dearest Eduard, and will
not wait till Vienna to give you my warm thanks for your faithful
friendship, which you always prove to me so lovingly on all
possible occasions. The Mozart Festival seems to me now to have
taken the desired turn--that which I suggested from the
beginning--and to shape itself into a festival of "concord,
harmony, and artistic enthusiasm of the combined Art-fellowships
of Vienna." [Liszt was invited by the magistrate of the city of
Vienna to conduct two concerts on the 27th and 28th of January,
1856, for the	celebration of the centenary of Mozart's
birth.]

It is to be hoped that I shall not stick fast in my task, and
shall not let this opportunity go by without attaining the
suitable standpoint in Vienna.

Meanwhile I rejoice at the satisfactory prospects which present
themselves for the Mozart Festival, and greet you heartily.

F. L.

Berlin, December 3rd, 1855

You will have the most favorable news from Berlin.



146. To Frau Meyerbeer in Berlin

[The wife of the composer of the Huguenots (1791-1864), with whom
Liszt stood all his life in such friendly relations that it is
very	extraordinary that there are no Liszt letters extant among
Meyerbeer's possessions.]

Madame,

Your gracious lines only reached me at the moment of my leaving
Berlin, so that it was no longer possible for me to avail myself
of the kind permission you were good enough to give me.
Nevertheless, as it is to be presumed that neither the brilliant
departure of which I was the hero a dozen years ago, nor the less
flattering dismissal with which the infallible criticism of your
capital has gratified me this time, will prevent me from
returning from time to time, and without too long an interval, to
Berlin (according to the requirements of my instructions and of
my artistic experiments), I venture to claim from your kindness
the continuation of your gracious reception, and thus venture to
hope that the opportunity will soon arise for me to have the
honor of renewing viva voce, Madame, the expression of my
respectful homage.

Your very devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December. 14th, 1855

The Princess Wittgenstein is much pleased with your remembrance,
and would be delighted to have the opportunity of thanking you
personally.



147. To his worship Dr. Ritter von Seiler, mayor of the city of
Vienna, etc.

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet, of Valentigne--.
VOL. I.]

Your worship and dear Mr. Mayor,

The willingness which I had already expressed, at the first
mention of the impending Mozart Festival, becomes to me, by your
kind letter of the 19th of December (which I only received
yesterday, owing to the delay from its having gone to Berlin), a
duty, which it is equally my honor and pleasure to fulfill. With
the utmost confidence and conviction that the resolution of the
Town Council will meet with the fullest assent and most
gratifying recognition among all circles of society--the
resolution is as follows: "That all undertakings in connection
with the Mozart Secular Festival shall be conducted and carried
out in the name of the city of Vienna,"--and in agreement with
the honorable motives of the Town Council "to lend to the
festivities the worthy and higher expression of universal
homage," I, for my part, undertake with the most grateful
acknowledgments the commission to conduct the Festival Concert on
the 27th January, 1856, and its repetition on the 28th according
to your desire; and I hope to fulfill quite satisfactorily every
just claim which is made on the musical director of such a
celebration.

Although the excellent orchestra, chorus, and staff of singers in
Vienna--long intimate with Mozart's works--afford the complete
certainty of a most admirable performance, yet I think it is
desirable that I should come a couple of weeks before the concert
is to take place, in order to have time for the necessary
rehearsals; and immediately on my arrival. I shall have the honor
of paying my respects to you, dear Mr. Mayor, and of placing
myself at the service of the Festival Committee.

In the programme which has been sent to me, the music of which
will take about three hours in performance, I am pleased with the
prospect before us, that the glories which Mozart unfolds in the
different domains of Art--Symphony, Opera, Church, and Concert
music-are taken into account, and that thus the manifold rays of
his genius are laid hold of, as far as is possible in the limits
of a concert programme. Whilst thoroughly agreeing with the
performance of the different items as a whole, I have
nevertheless one request to make--namely, that you would be good
enough to excuse me from the performance of the Mozart Pianoforte
Concerto which has been so kindly designed for me, and that this
number may be given to some other pianist of note. Apart from the
fact that for more than eight years I have not appeared anywhere
in public as a pianist, and that many considerations lead me to
adhere firmly to my negative resolve in this respect, the fact
that the direction of the Festival will require my entire
attention may prove, in this case, my sufficient excuse.

Accept, Your Worship, the assurance of the high esteem with which
I have the honor to remain,

Dear Mr. Mayor, yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 26th, 1855.



148. To Eduard Liszt

My very dear Eduard,

Scarcely had I returned to Weymar [From the Mozart Festival at
Vienna.] when I again put on my travelling coat to help in
Berlioz' concert at Gotha, which took place the day before
yesterday--and the whole day yesterday was spent in rehearsals of
"Cellini;" followed by a Court concert in the evening (in honor
of H.R.H. the Prince Regent of Baden); so that this morning is
the first leisure moment I have had to take up my pen again and
my position...at my writing-table. I profit by it first of all to
tell you how happy I am in this earnest intimacy, as sincerely
felt as it is conscientiously considered--this real intimacy of
ideas and feelings at the same time--which has been cemented
between us in these latter years, and which my stay in Vienna has
fully confirmed. All noble sentiments require the full air of
generous conviction, which maintains us in a region superior to
the trials, accidents, and troubles of this life. Thanks to
Heaven, we two breathe this air together, and thus we shall
remain inseparably united until our last day!

I am sending you after this the document which serves as a basis
to the Bach-Gesellschaft [Bach Society], from which it will be
easy to make out an analogous one for the publication of Mozart's
complete works. I earnestly invite and beg you to carry out this
project to its realization.

According to my ideas, the "Friends of Music in Austria" should
constitute and set the matter going, and the Royal State Press
should be employed for it, especially as one can foresee that
special favors might be obtained from the Ministry. Probably the
whole Festival Committee of the Mozart Celebration will also
consent to this undertaking, in the sense that, by an edition of
Mozart's works, critically explained, equally beautifully
printed, and revised by a committee appointed for it, a
universally useful, lasting, and living monument to the glorious
Master will be formed, which will bring honor and even material
gain to all Austrian lovers of music and to the city of Vienna
itself. Without doubt, if the matter is rightly conducted, it
will also pay well and be pretty easy to carry through. In about
twelve years the whole edition can be completed. In the
composition of the Committee of Revision I stipulate to call your
attention to a few names. Spohr, Meyerbeer, Fetis, Otto Jahn,
Oulibicheff, Dr. Hartel--among foreigners these ought especially
to have a share in the matter; and a special rubric must be given
to the cost of revision. The work of proof-correcting, as well as
the special explanations, commentaries, comparisons of the
different editions, ought not to be expected gratis; therefore a
fixed sum should be applied to it. Haslinger, Spina, and Gloggl,
being Vienna publishers, ought specially to be considered, and
would be the best to direct the propagation and regular sending
out of the volume, which is to appear on the 27th of January
every year.

At Spina's you would find several volumes of the Bach-
Gesellschaft, to which is always added a list of the subscribers
and a statement of accounts for the past year.

I advise you to keep on good terms with Zellner, who was the
first to air the subject in his paper (after I had invited him to
do so), and to get him into the proposed Committee, if the matter
be taken up in earnest. In the Committee of Revision Schmidt (the
librarian) and Holz must not be forgotten. With regard to my
humble self, I don't want to be put forward, but simply to take
my place in alphabetical order; but please explain beforehand
that I am ready to undertake any work which they may think fit to
apportion to me. I likewise undertake to invite the Grand Duke of
Weimar, the Duke of Gotha, etc., to become subscribers.

The whole affair must bear the impress of an Art enterprise--and
in this sense the invitation to a Mozart-Verein [Mozart Union]
must be couched. (I leave you to decide whether you prefer the
word Mozart-Gesellschaft [Mozart Society] or Mozart-herein for
the Publication of the Complete Works of Mozart, or any other
title.) Together with this I repeat that certainly there is no
need to fear any loss in this matter, but that probably there
will be a not insignificant gain. This gain, according to my
ideas, should be formed into a capital, until the edition is
completed, to be then employed, or perhaps not till later, by the
Society of Austrian Lovers of Music for some artistic purpose to
be decided upon.

.--. Be so good as to give Herr Krall the sum (24 florins) for
the four seats kindly placed at my disposal for the two concerts
of the Mozart Festival. Although I have only paid in cash six
gulden of the amount, because the other gentlemen insisted on
sending me several gulden, yet I expressly wish that the receipts
should not be any smaller through me--any more than that the
performance should suffer by my conducting!--Therefore please
don't forget the twenty-four gulden.

Berlioz arrived here yesterday evening, and I shall be over head
and ears in work with Cellini, the great Court concert on the
17th, and the performance of Berlioz' Faust in the course of next
week, the preparations for which I have undertaken.

Cellini I shall conduct--with the two others I only direct the
rehearsals.

In faithful friendship thy Saturday, February 9th, 1856.
F. Liszt



149. To Dr. von Seiler, Mayor of Vienna. [Autograph in the
possession of M. Alfred Bovet, of Valentigney.]

Dear Sir,

As it was not permitted me to see Your Worship again at home
before my departure, I venture to express once more in these few
lines my warmest thanks for the very great kindness shown to me
during my stay in Vienna, the remembrance of which will not fade
from my grateful thoughts.

The worthy example which you, dear Mr. Mayor, and the Town
Council of Vienna have given on the occasion of the Mozart
Festival, guaranteed and attained the desired prosperity and
success of the affair. This example will doubtless bring forth
fruit in other places, so that the whole artist society will owe
you the most grateful acknowledgments for it. As regards myself
and my modest services on that occasion, I am very happy to think
from the kind letter signed by yourself and Herr Councillor
Riedel von Riedenau, that what I did so gladly was well done--and
I only cherish the wish that coming years may offer me an
opportunity of devoting my poor, but seriously well-intentioned
services in the cause of music to the city of Vienna, whose
musical traditions shine forth so gloriously. Accept, dear sir,
the assurance of high esteem with which I have the honor to
remain

Your most obliged

F. Liszt

Weymar, February 10th, 1856



150. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

Before everything else I must give you my warmest thanks for the
manifold proofs of your friendship and attachment which you have
given me lately; especially has the article in the last number
but one of the paper, taken from the concluding chapter of your
musical history, truly rejoiced me, and I should have written you
at once a couple of lines in grateful acknowledgment had I not
been so very much engaged, on my return here, that I have had no
leisure hour until now. In Leipzig I could only stay from the
time of one train to the other, and could not go to see any one
except Hartel, whom it was necessary for me to see. Scarcely had
I arrived here than I had to go to Gotha (where I was present at
Berlioz' concert), and the previous week we had enough to do with
the preparations and rehearsals of "Cellini" and the Court
concert. The performance this time was really capital. Caspari
had studied his part admirably, and made a good thing of it; the
opera, thanks to him, made quite a different impression from what
it did formerly, when poor Beck (now the proprietor of a cafe in
Prague, where I saw him lately) had to fit himself as best he
could into the Cellini jacket!--Probably Pohl will send you a
full account, and also mention the concert which took place the
day before yesterday at the Castle. Berlioz conducted it, and
Fraulein Bianchi very much pleased the nobility as well as the
rest of the audience--so that she is again engaged for a small
concert next Thursday.

In contrast to many other artists of both sexes, Fraulein Bianchi
is well-bred, without being stupidly stuck up, and, in addition,
a pleasant and well-trained singer whom one can safely recommend.

The few lines which she brought me from you were her best
introduction to me--only I will beg you, another time, not to be
in doubt as to "whether I still think of you with the old
friendship." Once for all, you may be perfectly certain on this
point, that I shall not develop any talent for Variations towards
you, but be always ready to give a proof, on every opportunity,
of how highly I prize your services in matters musical, and how
sincerely friendly I am to you personally.

F. Liszt

February 19th, 1856

Next Sunday "Lohengrin" will be given (with Fraulein Marx from
Darmstadt as Ortrude)--and on Thursday, the 28th February, the
entire "Faust" of Berlioz.



151. To Dionys Pruckner in Vienna

[Liszt's pupil; has been a professor at the Stuttgart
Conservatorium since 1858.]

Dearest Dionysius,

The joyful tidings of your success ever find the most joyful echo
in Weymar, and I thank you much for the pleasant tidings in your
letter. Haslinger, on his side, was so kind as to write me a full
account of your first concert, as well as the Court soiree at
H.R.H. the Archduchess Sophie's--and yesterday evening v.
Dingelstedt gave me also full details of your concert ravages in
Munich. All this plainly shows dass man Bock-Bier trinken kann,
ohne deswegen Bocke zu schiessen! [A play on words: that one may
drink "Bock" beer, without thereby making blunders.]

I entirely approve of your intention of spending some months in
Vienna and its charming environs--also of your closer intercourse
with the Master Czerny, whose many-sided musical experiences may
be of the greatest use to you practically and theoretically. Of
all living composers who have occupied themselves especially with
pianoforte playing and composing, I know none whose views and
opinions offer so just an experience. In the twenties, when a
great portion of Beethoven's creations was a kind of Sphinx,
Czerny was playing Beethoven exclusively, with an understanding
as excellent as his technique was efficient and effective; and,
later on, he did not set himself up against some progress that
had been made in technique, but contributed materially to it by
his own teaching and works. It is only a pity that, by a too
super-abundant productiveness, he has necessarily weakened
himself, and has not gone on further on the road of his first
Sonata (Op. 6, A-flat major) and of other works of that period,
which I rate very highly, as compositions of importance,
beautifully formed and having the noblest tendency. But
unfortunately at that time Vienna influences, both social and
publishing, were of an injurious kind, and Czerny did not possess
the necessary dose of sternness to keep out of them and to
preserve his better ego. This is generally a difficult task, the
solving of which brings with it much trouble even for the most
capable and those who have the highest aims.

When you see Czerny remember me to him as his grateful pupil and
devoted, deeply respectful friend. When I pass through Vienna
this summer, I shall rejoice to have a couple of hours with him
again. I shall probably find you still there. According to what
has been written to me, the consecration of the Gran Cathedral
will take place at the beginning of September, in which case I
shall start from here at the beginning of August.

Excuse me for not having been willing to send you the orchestral
parts to the "Turkish Capriccio." It seemed to me, on the one
hand, unsuitable to ask Hans for it--apart from the fact that the
sending of the parts backwards and forwards from Berlin to Vienna
is very roundabout--and, on the other hand, I could not but
suppose that you would find first-rate copyists in Vienna, who
would do the copying for you far better in a fortnight.
Principles of economy are UTTERLY WORTHLESS in copying, and, if
you will believe my experience, always choose therefore the best,
and consequently most expensive, copyists for transcribing the
parts that you want. Recommend them, into the bargain, to do them
with great care, and to add the cues (which are a great help
towards a good performance).

Bronsart wrote to you at my direction, to let you know in good
time that you should get the parts copied out in Vienna yourself,
and should look them over carefully with the copyist before the
rehearsal--a work which I have often done in earlier years, and
in which I generally make a rule of not sparing myself.

Please find out for me at Spina's, on a convenient opportunity,
how far the engraving of the Schubert Fantasia [Fantasia in C
major, on the Wanderer.] (instrumented by me) has progressed, and
whether he can soon send me the proofs. Bronsart played the
Fantasia with orchestral accompaniment lately at Jena.

Fare you well, dearest Dionysius, and send soon some good tidings
of yourself to

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 17th, 1856.



152. To Breitkopf & Hartel

Dear Sir,

Whatever fate may be in store for my Symphonic Poems, however
much they may be cut up and pulled to pieces and found fault with
through their performances and reviews everywhere, yet the sight
of the beautiful manner in which these first six numbers are
published and got up will always be a pleasant satisfaction to
me, for which I give you my warmest and heartiest thanks..--. The
two scores still wanting (Nos. 1 and 9) I will send you at the
end of this month, and will request you to publish them in the
same size and manner. Although there is somewhat of the
SPECULATIVE in these things, yet [I] by no means seek

to make a speculation of it, and only expect your friendly favor
in so far as a favorable pecuniary result may arise from it in
future years. I am expecting next time the proofs of the two-
piano arrangements, and you shall receive the two remaining piano
arrangements at the same time as the two last scores..--.

In the matter of the Handel-Gesellschaft, [Handel Society] the
scheme of which you have sent me, pray be assured of my most
complete readiness. The choice of Messrs. Hauptmann, Dehn,
Chrysander (Otto Jahn?), as the musical directors proper, I
consider thoroughly suitable--as also of Messrs. Gervinus and
Breitkopf and Hartel as members of the committee--and, as soon as
the pecuniary basis of the undertaking is fixed, I shall not fail
to get you some subscriptions, as I did for the Bach-
Gesellschaft.

With warm thanks and esteem,

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, May 15th, 1856

If it is possible to you to send me soon the proofs of the five
piano arrangements I shall be glad, as they make the
comprehension and spread of the scores easier.



153. To Louis Kohler

Dear Friend,

After I had seen about your commission to Dr. Hartel, and he had
sent me your Methode, [Systematic method of teaching for
pianoforte playing and music, 1857 and 1858.] I delayed writing
to you, because the result (favorable, as might be expected) of
the little business had been already communicated to you through
Hartel, and I wished at the same time to send you somewhat of my
wares. Unfortunately, I have been hindered by multifarious
occupations from getting through the proofs of my Symphonic Poems
quickly; and, besides this, these proofs have taken up a great
deal of my time; for although I had not omitted, in the first
proofs, to have things altered in the scores many times, yet many
things looked different to me in print from what I wished them to
be, and I had to try them over again plainly with the orchestra,
have them written out again, and ask for fresh proofs. At last
the six first numbers have come out, and even if they are very
badly done I can no longer do them otherwise or better. No doubt
you have already received from Hartel the copy destined for you,
and within a short time you will receive the somewhat freely
arranged pianoforte edition--for two pianos--of the same things.
I tried at first a four-hand arrangement of them, which would be
much more practicable for sale, but gave up this mutilation, as I
saw that in four-hand pieces the working into one another of the
hands stands too much in the way of my tone-picture. The two-
piano arrangement sounds passable, if I mistake not. Bulow,
Bronsart, Pruckner, etc., have played it several times, and you
will assuredly find in Konigsberg a partner (masculine or
feminine) who will beguile you into it. I shall be very glad if
the things please you somewhat. I have labored too much in order
to realize the requisite proportion and harmony, for them to be
able to give me any other pleasure if some sympathy, and also
some understanding of the spirit of them on the part of my few
friends, does not fall to my share. However that may be, tell me,
dear friend, quite candidly, without any compliments, what
impression the pieces have made on you. The three numbers which
will appear next are still longer, worse, and more venturesome.
But I cannot let matters rest there, for these nine numbers serve
only as Prolegomena [Prologue, preface] to the "Faust" and
"Dante" Symphonies. The former is already settled and finished,
and the second more than half written out. "Away, away," [Written
in English.] with Mazeppa's horse, regardless of the lazy hack
that sticks in the mud of old patterns!

Let me soon hear from you how you dispose of your time in
Konigsberg. In Frau Knopp you have got an excellent Ortrude. What
have you been giving this winter? Do you keep on a good
understanding with Marpurg? Is Pabst remaining in K.?

Don't forget also to let me have your Methode (I forget the exact
title) through Hartel. Although I have grown too old and too lazy
to improve my piano-playing, yet I will get some good out of it
for my pupils, amongst whom are two or three really brave,
earnest fellows. Beyond that I have very little to tell you of
Weymar. Since Berlioz' stay here, which gave occasion for the
Litolff cudgel-smashing newspaper rubbish, Carl Formes and
Johanna Wagner have been playing here; the latter with well-
deserved and extraordinary success in Gluck's "Orpheus" and
"Iphigenia in Aulis" (in Wagner's translation and arrangement).
This evening the "Sleeping Beauty" (a fairy-tale epic), by
Joachim Raff, will be given. According to my opinion, this is
Raff's most successful and grateful work.

Farewell, dear friend, and bear in friendly remembrance

Your very sincere and obliged

F. Liszt

Weymar, May 24th, 1856



154. To Louis Kohler

My Very Dear Friend,

At last I have come out of my "Purgatory"--that is to say that I
have come to the end of my symphony to Dante's "Divina Commedia."
Yesterday I wrote the final bars of the score (which is somewhat
smaller in bulk than my "Faust" Symphony, but will take pretty
nearly an hour in performance); and today, for rest and
refreshment, I can allow myself the pleasure of giving you my
friendliest thanks for your friendly letter. The dedication of
your work "Systematic Method of Teaching for Pianoforte Playing
and Music" (the latter must not be forgotten!) pleases me much,
and you will allow me to take a modest revanche [revenge]
shortly, in dedicating one of my latest works to you. Probably
Schlesinger will bring out several books of my songs next winter,
in which you will perhaps find much that is in sympathy with your
ideas of the melody of speech. Hence I wish that you would not
refuse me the pleasure of using your name in connection with
them, and of letting it precede them, as an interpretation, as it
were, of the intention of the songs. Hartel will send you in a
couple of days the first seven numbers of the arrangements for
two pianofortes of my Symphonic Poems which have already
appeared. An arrangement of that kind is not so easy to make use
of as a four-hand one. Nevertheless, after I had tried to compass
the score of Tasso plainly into one pianoforte, I soon gave up
this project for the others, on account of the unadvisable
mutilation and defacement by the working into and through one
another of the four-hand parts, and submitted to doing without
tone and color and orchestral light and shade, but at any rate
fixing an abstract rendering of the musical contents, which would
be clear to the ear, by the two-piano arrangement (which I could
arrange tolerably freely).

It is a very agreeable satisfaction to me that you, dear friend,
have found some interest in the scores. For, however others may
judge of the things, they are for me the necessary developments
of my inner experiences, which have brought me to the conviction
that invention and feeling are not so entirely evil in Art.
Certainly you very rightly observe that the forms (which are too
often changed by quite respectable people into formulas) "First
Subject, Middle Subject, After Subject, etc., may very much grow
into a habit, because they must be so thoroughly natural,
primitive, and very easily intelligible." Without making the
slightest objection to this opinion, I only beg for permission to
be allowed to decide upon the forms by the contents, and even
should this permission be withheld from me from the side of the
most commendable criticism, I shall none the less go on in my own
modest way quite cheerfully. After all, in the end it comes
principally to this--WHAT the ideas are, and HOW they are carried
out and worked up--and that leads us always back to the FEELING
and INVENTION, if we would not scramble and struggle in the rut
of a mere trade.

When is your Method of teaching coming out? I rejoice beforehand
at all the incitement and forcible matter contained in it. You
will shortly receive a circular with a letter from E. Hallberger
(Stuttgart), who asks me to undertake the choice of pieces to
appear in his edition of the "Pianoforte." Do send something soon
to it; it is to be hoped that the establishing and spreading of
this collection will prove quite satisfactory.

Fare you well in your work, dear friend, and think affectionately
of

Yours ever sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 9th, 1856.

P.S.--In your next letter send me your exact address.



155. To Hoffmann von Fallersleben

[The well-known poet (1798-1874), who was living at that time in
Weimar; was an intimate friend of Liszt, and in 1854 founded,
with him, the Neu-Weimar-Verein, which, under the presidency of
Liszt, was joined by all the most distinguished musicians,
authors, and painters of Weimar.]

Dear Friend,

In your [The second person singular is employed in this letter]
pleasant villeggiatura, where you will find no lack of the
Beautiful and Good, let yourself also be welcomed by a friend of
the New-Weymar

School, who is truly yours. It is true I have nothing new to tell
you. You already know that the Grand Duke received your poem on
the morning of his birthday, and said the kindest things about it
to me later on. Most of our colleagues of the Neu-Weimar-Verein
are away and scattered in various countries;--Singer in Pesth;
Soupper [Eugen v. Soupper, concert singer, a countryman of
Liszt's, was in Weimar in 1855-56.] in Paris, where he is trying
the solitude of a crowd (according to Chateaubriand's expression,
"the crowd, that vast desert--not dessert--of men"); Stor [Music
director in Weimar; died 1889.] at the bathing-place Heringsdorf,
probably drawn there by a secret affinity between his herring
form and the name of the place; Winterberger in Holland, to
inspect the Haarlem and other organs, which he will certainly do
in a masterly way; and Preller goes today to Kiel. On the
Altenburg no change worth mentioning has taken place: visits of
strangers to me fail not summer or winter, and, still less, works
which have become my life's task. I might almost sing, like
Hoffmann von Fallersleben,

"Hier sitz ich fest, ein Fels im Meer, Woran die Wellen toben; 's
geht drunter, dran and druber her--Ich bleibe fortan oben"--

["Here firm I sit, a rock sea-girt, On which the waves are
dashing, But I remain above, unhurt, Nor heed the waters'
lashing."]

if only there were more waves and less marsh!--

My travelling plans are still somewhat vacillating, because I
cannot yet decide whether I shall go to Hungary or not. In any
case I shall go and see R. Wagner, in the middle of September at
latest, at Zurich, where Stahr at present is with his wife (Fanny
Lewald). Stahr will shortly publish a new volume of Paris Letters
(about the Exhibition), and is translating Suetonius for the
Classical Library coming out at Stuttgart. He told me that there
is a passage in Suetonius which one can quite apply to the
baptism of the Prince Imperial in Paris! After this precedent,
why might not everything in the Horoe belg, and the Weymar Year-
Book be proved as referring to something?

Remember me most warmly to your dear Amphitrion, whom I
unfortunately did not manage to see again before her departure,
and, if the Mildes are in the same house as you, give them my
best greetings, woven into a toast.

Fare thee well, dearest friend, and do not remain too long away.

Thine in heartfelt friendship,

F. Liszt Weymar, July 14th, 1856



156. To Wilhelm wieprecht, General Music Director of the Military
Corps of the State of Prussia

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Otto Lessmann at
Charlottenburg. The addressee (1802-72) was one of the inventors
of the bass-tuba, and improved many of the wind instruments.]

Dear Friend, I learn from several Berliners, who have passed
through here, that you have had the great kindness to instrument
my march "Vom Fels zum Meer" ["From the Rock to the Ocean."]
splendidly, and have had it performed several times. Permit me to
express my warmest thanks to you for this new proof of your
friendship, and at the same time to remind you of a promise the
fulfillment of which is very much desired by me.

It is that, in my last visit to Berlin, you were so kind as to
say that the Symphonic Poem Tasso would not be amiss arranged by
you for a military band, and you, with your well-known readiness
for action, expressed your willingness to arrange the
instrumentation accordingly. Allow me today to lay claim to half
your kind offer, and to beg you to strike out forty-two pages of
this long score, and so to dispose your arrangement that, after
the last bar of page 5 (score), you make a skip to the second bar
of page 47 (Lento assai), by this means shortening the lamento of
Tasso and of the public also.

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt of the last
bar of page 5.]

[Here, Liszt illustrates with another musical score excerpt, from
the second bar of page 47.]

By the same post I send you the score and the piano arrangement
(for two pianofortes) for convenience in looking it over. If the
concluding figure (Letter M., Moderato pomposo) seems to make a
better effect in the instrumentation by following the piano
arrangement with the simple quaver figure [Liszt illustrates with
a brief musical score excerpt] instead of the triplets, according
to the score, I have not the slightest objection to it, and beg
you altogether, dear friend, to feel quite free to do as you like
in the matter. The flattering thing for me would be just this--
that the work should please you sufficiently for you to be
allowed to take what liberties you wish with it.

Some years ago Dahlmann gave a lecture at Bonn upon immature
enthusiasm. God preserve us rather from untimely pedantry!
Certainly no one shall have to suffer from this from my side!

I am sending you, together with the "Tasso" score, that of
"Mazeppa" also. Take an opportunity of looking at the concluding
"March" (beginning page 89 of the score):--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

(N.B--It must begin with the 4/6 chord, perhaps after a couple of
introductory bars roll on the drum--without any distinct tone.)

Perhaps the subject may suit for some occasion or other.

Forgive me, dear friend, for being so pressing, and behold in
this only the joy which the fulfillment of your promise will give
me. Next winter I hope to give you my thanks in person in Berlin.

Meanwhile accept the expression of high esteem of yours truly and
with all friendly acknowledgments,

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 18th, 1856

If, as I imagine, the Finale from "Tasso" could be so arranged
that moderate military bands could play it fairly well, I should
of course be glad. However I leave it entirely in your hands to
do with it whatever seems best to you, and give you my best
thanks beforehand for your kindness.



157. To Concertmeister Edmund Singer

Dear Friend,

In consequence of the definite decision which was made known to
me yesterday by T. R. the Titular Bishop and the Cathedral Cantor
Fekete, my Mass is to be performed on the day of the
consecration. [Of the Cathedral of Gran] I shall therefore get to
Pest by the 11th or 12th August, as I had previously arranged,
and shall be very glad to see you and two or three others of my
friends again. I am also reckoning on you for certain as leader
of the orchestra at the rehearsals and performance of the Mass. I
am writing tomorrow to Winterberger, who is making a tremendous
sensation in Holland, to beg him to undertake the organ part, and
to be in Pest by the middle of August.

While speaking of Holland, I may add that Herr Vermeulen (General
Secretary of the "Maatschappy" ["Maatschappy tot bevordering der
toonkunst."]) is coming to see me here early in August. This
offers me a good opportunity of being of service to you in regard
to your concert arrangements in Rotterdam and Amsterdam, etc., of
which I will not fail to make use. More of this viva voce.
Meanwhile, it would be better for you not to write there.

I enclose several notes of acknowledgment for E., Dr. F., B. and
K., to which I beg you will kindly attend.

And now one more commission, which you can easily fulfill through
Rosavoegly, [Music publisher in Budapest] with my best greetings
to him. In my reply to the official letter of H. R. von Fekete
yesterday I forgot to repeat that, in order to avoid loss of
time, it is easy to have the voice parts (solos and chorus)
written out before my arrival, and as carefully as possible,
clean and clearly. I will willingly discharge the copyist's fee,
and the orchestral parts I will bring with me together with the
score, so that the rehearsals may begin as soon as the performers
taking part in it are assigned to me.

I confidently hope that we shall have a very fine performance,
without trouble and worry, and one in which musicians as well as
audience will find pleasure and edification. The length of the
Mass will also fulfill the required dimensions, and yesterday I
hunted out a couple of "cuts," which could be made, if necessary,
without any essential harm to the work. You know, dear Singer,
that I am a special virtuoso in the matter of making cuts, in
which no one else can easily approach me!--

I am simply not disposed, in spite of much prudent advice, to cut
my Mass and myself altogether, all the less so as my friends and
countrymen have on this occasion shown themselves so kind and
good to me. I therefore owe it to them to give them active proof
that their confidence and sympathy in me are not wholly
undeserved--and with God's help this shall be irrefragably
proved!

For the rest I want to keep very quiet and private this time in
Pest. Composers of my sort write, it is true, plenty of drum and
trumpet parts, but by no means require the too common flourish of
trumpets and drums, because they are striving after a higher aim,
which is not to be attained by publicity.

"Auf baldiges Wiedersehen," ["To a speedy meeting"] dear friend--
I leave here by the 9th August at latest. Meanwhile best thanks
for your letter,--and

Ever yours,

F. Liszt

July 28th, 1856.



158. To Joachim Raff

[Raff (1822-82) lived, as is well known, for some years in Weimar
(first of all as Liszt's secretary), and at that time joined the
Liszt tendencies as a composer, afterwards going other ways.]

Dear Sir and Friend,

It is very pleasant to me to find from your letter that you have
taken aright the recognition in my article on the "Sleeping
Beauty," and see unequivocally in its attitude a fresh proof of
the high estimation in which I hold your artistic powers, as well
as of my readiness to be of use to you as far as my insight and
loyalty in Art matters will permit me. In this first discussion
of a work so much thought of and so widespread, it was most
important that I should draw the attention of Art-fellowship to
your entire works and higher endeavors during the past six years.
You will still give me the opportunity, I hope, later on, of
spreading much deserved praise and of placing more in the shade
any chance differences in our views. If I have not placed you
this time so completely as I should have wished among the musical
fellowship of the time, like a Peter Schlemihl,[The man without a
shadow--German fable.] this was partly in consequence of your own
oft-repeated advice that "one should not exclusively praise men
and works if one wishes to be useful to them."[Neue Zeitschrift
fur Musik. Later "Gesammelte Schriften," vol. v.]

I do not always agree with you in this view, but on this occasion
I hope I have hit the happy medium.

Accept my best thanks for the friendly interest you have shown in
my orchestral compositions in the concert direction of Wiesbaden.
Whether I shall be able to comply with several invitations for
concerts in the coming winter depends on a good many
circumstances which I cannot quite settle beforehand. But in any
case I shall be glad if my compositions become more widely
spread, and perhaps during your present stay in Wiesbaden the
opportunity may offer of conducting one or two numbers of the
Symphonic Poems, in accordance with your previous intentions.

At the end of next week at latest I set out for Gran, to conduct
my Mass on the 31st of August (in celebration of the consecration
of the Basilica). Toward the middle of September I go to Zurich,
where, if I am not prevented by any special hindrances, for which
I always have to be prepared, I think of spending a couple of
weeks with Wagner.

Fare you well, dear Raff, and send soon some tidings of yourself
to

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, July 31st, 1856.

Hans von Bulow has been with me a couple of days, and goes to
Baden-Baden the day after tomorrow. Winterberger is scoring an
extraordinary triumph by his organ-playing in Holland, and played
the Prophete and BACH Fugue [Fugue on the name of Bach] before an
audience of two thousand people with immense success.

Do not forget to give my friendly greetings to Genast [the
celebrated Weimar actor, afterwards Raff's father-in-law] and my
homage to Mademoiselle Doris [Afterwards Raff's wife, an
excellent actress].



159. To Anton Rubinstein

It is a very great regret to me, my dear Rubinstein, to have to
miss your visit the day after tomorrow, of which you sent me word
by Mr. Hallberger. You know what a sincere pleasure it always is
to me to see you again, and what a lively interest I take in your
new works. This time in particular I am at high tension about the
completion of your Paradise Lost. If the continuation and the end
correspond with the beginning which you showed me, you have
reason to be really and truly satisfied with yourself, and you
may sleep in peace conscious of having written a grand and
beautiful work.

Unfortunately, whatever curiosity I have to be quite assured of
this, I cannot stay here any longer, and must start tomorrow
morning for Gran, where, in spite of a lot of useless talk, the
thread of which you have perhaps followed in the papers, they
will end after all by giving my Mass on the 31st of August (the
day of the consecration of the Basilica). You see that I have
only just time to set the thing on foot, and cannot, without the
risk of unpleasantness, defer my arrival beyond the day which,
moreover, I officially fixed about a week ago.

Please excuse me then, my dear Rubinstein, for my involuntary
fugue, and allow me to make up for it without too much delay. On
my return from Hungary I shall come through Stuttgart (towards
the middle of September). Perhaps I shall find you still there,
which would be a very great pleasure. We would sing together the
choruses, solos, and orchestra of your new score with all our
might! And Winterberger (who has just had a fabulous success at
Rotterdam, Haarlem, etc., where he has given several organ
concerts largely attended) might also be one of the party, for I
expect to make the journey from Zurich with him, and on our way
we shall explore the organs of Ulm, Stuttgart, Friburg, and
Winterthur.

Will you let me know by a few lines what your plans are for the
end of the summer and autumn? Shall you return to Leipzig? Will
it suit you to try your Oratorio first at Weymar? In this latter
case, which you may be sure will be the most agreeable to me, I
will try to facilitate the arrangements that have to be made as
regards copies, and to save you the expense of copying. Toward
the end of October, at latest, I shall be back here; and, if we
do not meet before, I count on your not letting this year elapse
without coming again for a few days to your room at the
Altenburg, where you are certain of being always most cordially
welcome, for we shall make no changes.

If you have a quarter of an hour to spare do write a piece of a
few pages for Hallberger, without making him wait any longer, for
I especially want one of your loose works to appear in the first
copy of the "Pianoforte."

The Princess bids me give you her best compliments, to which I
add the expression of frank and cordial friendship of your very
devoted

F. Liszt

August 6th, 1856.

Have you received my things in score? Continue to address me at
Weymar.



160. To Joachim Raff

You would be making a great mistake if you put any mistrust in my
conduct, and I can assure you with a perfectly good conscience
that to me there is nothing more agreeable and more to be desired
than to rely entirely on one's friends. With regard to the
Wiesbaden affair, I must necessarily await a definite invitation
from the concert directors before I can give a definite answer. I
think I have too often shown that I am ready and willing, for it
to be necessary for me to say more on that point. I was again at
Sondershausen last Sunday, and promised to go there again in the
course of next winter. The orchestra there, under its conductor
Stein (whose acquaintance I had not made until now), has
performed two of my Symphonic Poems--"Les Preludes" and
"Mazeppa"--with really uncommon spirit and excellence. Should
there be a similar willingness in Wiesbaden, it will of course be
a pleasure to me to accept the invitation of the concert
directors; so also I am greatly obliged to you for being so
helpful toward the spread and sympathetic understanding of my
works. But from your letter I see that you will not be staying
much longer in Wiesbaden, and as I am not acquainted with the
present circumstances there I cannot reckon beforehand on the
friendly reception without which public performances always prove
very unfruitful for composers. According, therefore, to whether
these circumstances show themselves favorable or unfavorable to
my honest endeavors, I will come, or I will remain at home.

I give you my heartiest good wishes for the performance of your
"King Alfred" [an opera of Raff's]. Your two "Tanz-Capricen"
(bolero and valse) have been sent me by Hallberger, and I have
already recommended a speedy edition of both.

This afternoon I start for Gran. In the middle of September I
shall get to Stuttgart and go to Zurich. Letters can be always
addressed to me at Weymar, and before the end of October I shall
be back here again.

With best greetings and thanks, yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, August 7th, 1856



161. To Anton Rubinstein

I much regret, dear Rubinstein, to have missed your visit to
Weymar, and, while thanking you most sincerely for your kind
intention, I am going to beg you to grant me full reparation by a
second visit when I return.

By the news which reaches me from the Altenburg I learn that you
think of spending part of the winter in Berlin, and will there
give your "Paradise Lost," which will doubtless be a piece well
found, and from which you will derive benefit. Please do not fail
to let me know in good time which day it is to be performed, for
I am set upon being present at this first performance, and shall
certainly come to Berlin unless anything absolutely unavoidable
prevents me.

I expect to be back at Weymar towards the end of October, and to
set seriously to work again, a thing which is not possible
elsewhere. The rehearsals of my Mass are going on here admirably,
and I expect we shall have a very fine performance at Gran on the
31st, where, moreover, there will be so many other things and
people of quite a different importance to be seen and heard, that
they will scarcely hear three bars of my Mass. Happily my work
has the good luck to have two general preliminary rehearsals,
public ones, at Pest next week, and a final rehearsal at Gran
itself. Zellner will probably be there, and you will hear about
it from him. Possibly also the same Mass will be given on the
28th September (the day of St. Wenceslas, the patron saint of
Bohemia) at Prague, whence they have just written to me to that
effect. You will give me great pleasure, my dear Rubinstein, if
you will write me something about your autumn and winter plans;
and if by chance I can be of use to you in any way show me the
friendship of disposing entirely of me, as of one who is your
very sincerely affectionate and devoted

F. Liszt Pest, August 21st, 1856

Address always to Weymar.

I am still expecting to go by Stuttgart to Zurich towards the
middle of September, but it is possible that Prague may occasion
me a fortnight's delay.



162. To Eduard Liszt

[Pest,] Friday, September 5th, 1856

Dearest Eduard,

Yesterday's performance of my Mass was quite according to my
intentions, and was more successful and effective by far than all
the preceding ones. Without exaggeration and with all Christian
modesty I can assure you that many tears were shed, and that the
very numerous audience (the church of the Stadtpfarrei [I.e., the
parish church] was thronged), as well as the performers, had
raised themselves, body and soul, into my contemplation of the
sacred mysteries of the Mass...and everything was but a humble
prayer to the Almighty and to the Redeemer!--I thought of you in
my heart of hearts, and sought for you--for you are indeed so
very near and dear to me in spirit!--Next Monday, the 8th
September, at the consecration of the Hermine-Kapelle (which the
Cardinal Prince Primate of Hungary will consecrate), my Mass for
four men's voices will be sung. Winterberger will accompany it on
a Physharmonica of the organ genus. On the same evening (Monday)
the concert for the benefit of the Pension Fund will take place
at the theater: Singer and Pruckner will play at it, and two of
my Symphonic Poems--"Les Preludes" and "Hungaria" (Nos. 3 and 9)-
-will be given.

On the 14th September at latest I shall get to Vienna, and I will
write to Haslinger more definitely about it. Meanwhile will you
please tell Haslinger, as I cannot write to him until the concert
in the Hungarian theater is over.

.--. I expect to leave here before the end of next week.

God be with you and with your

F. L.

At the rehearsal this morning I was told that you have got such
an excellent article on the Mass in the Wanderer. I suppose you
sent the number to Weymar? If possible let me have one here also.



163. To Louis Kohler

Bravo, dear friend, for the three very graceful and charmingly
conceived melody-dialogues! I have pleasure in them, and am
certain of the success of this charming selam. [Meaning a musical
bouquet.] As an old laborant [Worker in a laboratory] at piano
music allow me merely to lay before you a slight alteration in
the two bars before the return of the motive (No. I). According
to my conception one bar more would have a beneficial effect
there, thus:--

[Here Liszt writes out a 5-measure excerpt of piano music]

If you agree with this version, write me simply Yes to the
address of Richard Wagner, Zeltweg, Zurich. I shall get there
next Sunday, and stay some days with our great friend. At the
beginning of November I shall be back in Weymar.

Hearty greetings from yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Stuttgart, October 8th, 1856.

In No. 3 (in the first two bars) the F seems to me the right
sound in the bass, and that was what you had first written:--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

instead of:--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with another musical score excerpt]

Will you leave these little alterations to me in the proof?



164. To Dr. Gille, Councillor of Justice at Jena

[An ardent friend of Liszt's, a promoter of musical endeavors, a
co-founder and member of the Committee (General Secretary) of the
Allgemeine Deutsche Musikverein, is at the head of the Liszt
Museum in Weimar, and lives in Jena, where he is Prince's Council
and Councillor of Justice.]

Zurich, November 14th, 1856

My very dear Friend,

I am heartily rejoiced at the honorable proof of the sympathy and
attachment of our Circulus harmonicus Academiae Jenensis, which
was prepared for me for the 22nd October by your kindness, and I
give you my warmest thanks for it, begging you to be so good as
to pass them on also to our friends Stade and Herr Schafer, whose
names strengthen the diploma.

It touches me deeply that you join the Gran Basilica and my
"Missa Solemnis" in this diploma. You may be sure, dear friend,
that I did not compose my work as one might put on a church
vestment instead of a paletot, but that it has sprung from the
truly fervent faith of my heart, such as I have felt it since my
childhood. "Genitum, non factum"--and therefore I can truly say
that my Mass has been more prayed than composed. By Easter the
work will be published by the Royal State Printing Office at the
cost of the Government, thanks to the kind instructions of His
Excellency Minister von Bach, and I am looking forward to the
pleasure of presenting one of the first copies to the Circulus
harmonicus. The Mass has been given a second time at Prague since
I left, and, as Capellmeister Skraup writes, "with increasing
interest"; a couple more performances, in Vienna, etc., are
pending.

Pray excuse me, dear friend, for not having sent you my thanks
sooner. Your letter found me in bed, to which I am still confined
by a somewhat protracted illness, which will delay my return to
Weymar some weeks. Next week I am to begin to get out into the
air again, and I hope to be able to get away in about ten days.
At the beginning of December I shall be at Weymar, and shall then
soon come to you at Jena.--

I shall have a great deal to tell you verbally about Wagner. Of
course we see each other every day, and are together the livelong
day. His "Nibelungen" are an entirely new and glorious world,
towards which I have often yearned, and for which the most
thoughtful people will still be enthusiastic, even if the measure
of mediocrity should prove inadequate to it!--

Friendly greetings, and faithfully your

F. Liszt



165. To Dr. Adolf Stern in Dresden

[Poet and man of letters, now professor at the Polytechnikum at
Dresden, a member of the Committee of the Allgemeine Deutsche
Musikverein since 1867.]

Very Dear Sir and Friend,

A long and protracted illness has kept me in bed for a fortnight
past--and I owe you many apologies for my delay in sending you my
warmest thanks for the very kind remembrance with which you
adorned the 22nd of October. The beautiful poem, so full of
meaning, and soaring aloft with its delicately powerful flight,
goes deeply to my heart, and my dreams hear the charm of your
poetry through Lehel's magic horn tones! Perhaps I shall be able
shortly to tell you what I have heard, when the disjointed sounds
have united in shaping themselves harmoniously into an artistic
whole, from which a second part of my Symphonic Poem "Hungaria"
might well be formed.

Meanwhile I have ventured to send your poem to a couple of my
friends in Pest, who will delight in it like myself.

In spite of my illness I am spending glorious days here with
Wagner, and am satiating myself with his Nibelungen world, of
which our business musicians and chaff-threshing critics have as
yet no suspicion. It is to be hoped that this tremendous work may
succeed in being performed in the year 1859, and I, on my side,
will not neglect anything to forward this performance as soon as
possible--a performance which certainly implies many difficulties
and exertions. Wagner requires for the purpose a special theater
built for himself, and a not ordinary acting and orchestral
staff. It goes without saying that the work can only appear
before the world under his own conducting; and if, as is much to
be wished, this should take place in Germany, his pardon must be
obtained before everything.--I comfort myself with the saying,
"What must be will be!" And thus I expect to be also standing on
my legs again soon, and to be back in Weymar in the early days of
December. It will be very kind of you if you will not let too
long a time elapse without coming to see me. For today accept
once more my heartfelt thanks, and the assurance of sincere
friendship of your

F. Liszt

Zurich, November 14th, 1856



166. To Louis Kohler

Enclosed, dear friend, is a rough copy of the Prelude to
"Rheingold," which Wagner has handed me for you, and which will
be sure to give you great pleasure.

After having been obliged to keep my bed for a couple of weeks,
which has lengthened out my stay here, I am now making ready to
go with Wagner the day after tomorrow to St. Gall, there to
conduct a couple of my Symphonic Poems with a very respectable
orchestra (twenty violins, six double basses, etc.). Toward the
middle of December I shall be back in Weymar, and shall continue
to write my stuff!--

A thousand friendly greetings.

F. Liszt

Zurich, November 21st, 1856



167. To Eduard Liszt

St. Gall, November 24th, 1856

.--. A really significant concert took place yesterday at St.
Gall. Wagner conducted the Eroica Symphony, and I conducted in
his honor two of my Symphonic Poems. The latter were excellently
given--and received. The St. Gall paper has several articles on
the subject, which I am sending you.

By Christmas I will send you the new copies of my Mass (which I
think I have considerably improved in the last revision,
especially by the concluding Fugue of the Gloria and a
heavenward-soaring climax of the subject.

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a vocal score excerpt at the point
where the singer sings: "et u-nam sanctam catho-li-camet a-po -
sto - - - - li-cam"]

Probably the work will be ready to appear by Easter. If you write
by return of post, you can send the ministerial answer to my
letter to Bach to me here. The contents, of which you have told
me, please me much, and I reckon with confidence that the
publishing of the score will fix the sense and meaning of my work
in public opinion. The work is truly "of pure musical water (not
in the sense of the ordinary diluted Church style, but like
diamond water) and living Catholic wine."

.--. Farewell, dearest Eduard, and remain true to me in heart and
spirit, as is also to you your

F. Liszt



168. To Alexander Ritter, Music Director in Stettin

Munich, December 4th, 1856

Dear Friend,

I received your letter on a day when I again greatly missed your
presence. We were together with Wagner at St. Gall, and the
Musical Society there had distinguished itself by the production
of an orchestra of ten first, ten second violins, eight violas,
six celli and double basses. Wagner conducted the Eroica, and I
two of my Symphonic Poems--"Orpheus" and "Les Preludes." The
performance and reception of my works were quite to my
satisfaction, and the "Preludes" had to be repeated (as they were
in Pest). Whether such a production would be possible in Stettin
I much doubt, in spite of your friendly advances. The open,
straightforward sense of the public is everywhere kept so much in
check by the oft-repeated rubbish of the men of the "But" and
"Yet," who batten on criticism, and appear to set themselves the
task of crushing to death every living endeavour, in order
thereby to increase their own reputation and importance, that I
must regard the rapid spread of my works almost as an imprudence.
You desire "Orpheus," "Tasso," and "Festklange" from me, dear
friend! But have you considered that "Orpheus" has no proper
working out section, and hovers quite simply between bliss and
woe, breathing out reconciliation in Art? Pray do not forget that
"Tasso" celebrates no psychic triumph, which an ingenious critic
has already denounced (probably mindful of the "inner camel,"
which Heine designates as an indispensable necessity of German
aestheticism!), and the "Festklange" sounded too confusedly noisy
even to our friend Pohl! And then what has all this canaille to
do with instruments of percussion, cymbals, triangle, and drum in
the sacred domain of Symphony? It is, believe me, not only
confusion and derangement of ideas, but also a prostitution of
the species itself!

Should you be of another opinion, allow me at least to keep you
from too greatly compromising yourself, so near to the doors of
the immaculate Berlin critics, and not to drag you with myself
into the corruption of my own juggling tone-poems. Your dear wife
(to whom I beg you to remember me most kindly) might be angry
with me for it, and I would not on any account be put into her
bad books. Instead of conducting my Symphonic Poems, rather give
lectures at home of the safe passport of Riehl's "Haus-Musik,"
and take well to heart the warning,

"Ruckkehr zum Mass." ["A returning within bounds." A footnote by
Liszt follows: "Dabei wird naturlich das Mass der
Mittelmassigkeit als einzig massgebend verstanden." ("By this is
of course understood the bounds of mediocrity as the one
limitation.") A play on the words, "Mass," "Massigkeit," and
"Massgebend."]

On this road alone can you soon attain a conductor's post, and
the "esteem" due to you as a music director, both from musicians
and people of rank.

For the rest you would entirely misconstrue my good advice if you
thought you could see in it only a pretext for not keeping my
former promise of coming to see you at Stettin. I shall most
certainly come to you on the first opportunity, and shall be
delighted to spend a couple of days with such excellent friends.
But first of all I must stop in Weymar for a while, in order to
finish some works begun, and to forget altogether my lengthy
illness in Zurich.

I had some glorious days with Wagner; and "Rheingold" and the
"Walkure" are incredibly wonderful works.

To my great sorrow, I only saw your brother Carl [A musician, a
friend of Wagner's.] a couple of times in the early days of my
stay in Zurich. I will tell you vaud voce how this happened, so
entirely against my wish and expectation, through a provoking
over-sensitiveness on the part of your brother. I am sure you
don't need any assurance that I did not give occasion in any way
to this. But for the future I must quietly wait till Carl thinks
better and more justly of it.

Farewell, dear friend, and let me soon hear from you again.

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Bronsart is going shortly to Paris, where he will stay some time.
Cornelius is working at a comic opera [This would be the Barber
of Baghdad.--Translator's note.] in the Bernhard's-Hutle. Raff is
to finish his "Samson" for Darmstadt. Tausig is giving concerts
in Warsaw. Pruckner will spend the winter in Vienna and appear at
several concerts. Damrosch composed lately an Overture and Entre-
acte music to the "Maid of Orleans." Stor plunges himself into
the duties of a general music director. Thus much have I learned
of our Neu-Weymar-Verein.



169. To Professor L. A. Zellner in Vienna

[General Secretary of the Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde ("Society
of Lovers of Music") in Vienna; composer and writer on music.]

To my letter of yesterday I have still to add a postscript, my
dear friend, concerning the information in your new
Abonnement,[The Blatter fur Musik, Theater, and Kunst ("Pages of
Music, theater, and Art"), edited by Z.] in which I was struck
with	 the name of Bertini among the classics, which does not
seem to me suitable. As far as I know, Bertini is still living,
[He did not die till 1876.] and according to the common idea, to
which one must stick fast, only those who are dead can rank as
classic and be proclaimed as classic. Thus Schumann, the
romanticist, and Beethoven, the glorious, holy, crazy one, have
become classics. Should Bertini have already died, I take back my
remark, although the popularity of his Studies is not, to me, a
satisfactory reason for making his name a classic.--Moscheles'
and Czerny's Studies and "Methods" would have a much more just
claim to such a thing, and your paper has especially to set
itself the task of counteracting, with principle and consistency,
the confusion of ideas from which confusion and ruin of matters
arise. Hold fast then to this principle, both in great and small
things, for the easier understanding with the public, that the
recognition of posterity alone impresses the stamp of "classical"
upon works, in the same way as facts and history are established;
for thus much is certain, that all great classics have been
reviled in their own day as innovators and even romanticists, if
not bunglers and crazy fellows, and you yourself have commented
on, and inquired into, this matter many times..--.

In your number of today I read an extract from my letter to
Erkel, [A well-known Hungarian composer ("Hunyadi Laszlo")] in
which, however, the points are missing. Erkel shall show you the
letter on the first opportunity, for he has not left it lying
idle in his desk. Of course no public use is to be made of it.

Yours ever, F. L.

January 2nd, 1857



170. To Herr von Turanyi, Musical Conductor of the Town of Aix-
la-Chapelle

[Published in the Allgemeine Musikzeitung, July 11th, 1890]

Weymar, January 3rd, 1857

Dear Herr Capellmeister,

Although I am still kept to my bed by a long-continued
indisposition, yet I will not delay giving you my warmest thanks
for the active pains you have so kindly taken to place my
endeavors in the cause of Art in a better light than I could
otherwise have expected in your neighborhood.

The result of the choice of myself as conductor of the Musical
Festival at Aix-la-Chapelle this year--a result which was
notified to me yesterday by the letter of the Committee of the
Lower-Rhine Musical Festival--is a welcome sign to me of the
gradual recognition which an open and honestly expressed,
consistent, and thoroughly disinterested conviction may meet with
in different places. Whilst feeling myself especially indebted to
you for having brought about this result, I would express to you
at the same time the fact of my readiness to answer your very
flattering wishes to the best of my powers, and to put aside any
hindrances that may be in the way, in order to fulfill the task
entrusted to me, if the following remarks are brought to the
attention of the Committee, as I consider them essential to the
success and also to the importance of the Musical Festival.

My conducting in Aix-la-Chapelle can only have such significance
as attaches to the less-known and newer works, and those which
are more nearly allied to the Art-interests of today; its
justification would be strengthened by an excellent performance
of such works. I was on this account completely in accordance
with the programme you so kindly sent me (with the addition of
one or two numbers), as I am unable to be with the other
programme, received in the letter of the Committee yesterday. The
latter is as follows:--

First day: Messiah by Handel.--Second day: Mass (in D major) by
Beethoven.

The former as follows:--

First day: Mass by Beethoven (preceded by one of the shorter
works of Handel--or possibly by a Cantata by Bach [?]).

Second day: Schubert's Symphony (in C); one of the larger choral
works of Schumann (say, perhaps, "The Rose's Pilgrimage"--or one
of the Ballades), and, as I should propose, one of the longer
scenes from Berlioz' "Faust," and one or other of my Symphonic
Poems.

You will not expect of me, dear Herr Capellmeister, that I should
go off into a great panegyric about Handel and, if you caught me
doing it, you might stop me immediately with the words of the
ancient Greek who did not want any more praises of Homer--"You
praise him, but who is thinking of blaming him?" The fullness and
glory of this musical majesty is as uncontested as the pleasant,
emulating, easily attainable performance of the "Messiah," a
chef-d'oeuvre, which has been for years the "daily bread," so to
speak, of great and small vocal societies both in England and
Germany. With the exception of Haydn's "Creation" there is
scarcely a work of that kind existing which could show such
countless performances. I, for my part, chose the "Messiah" for
performance again in Weymar (in August 1850)--partly because
Herder had interested himself in the preparation of the German
text--and in the previous August they celebrated the Middle-Rhine
Musical Festival at Darmstadt with it. This latter circumstance
enhances my general consideration as to the artistic
judiciousness of a repeated performance of the Messiah, up to a
special point in regard to the Aix-la-Chapelle Festival, and
therefore I should like the question put to the Committee
"whether they consider that, in the interests of the 'fresher
life of the Musical Festival there,' it can be advantageous for
the Lower-Rhine to repeat it after the Middle-Rhine."

The sentence in the letter of the Committee, in which the hope is
cherished and expressed that "the celebrated Frau Lind-
Goldschmidt may be engaged," leads me to an almost more serious
consideration.--

Do not be alarmed, dear sir, and do not be in the least afraid
that I am going to struggle, in the usual style of our
unchivalrous Don Quixote of musical criticism, with the windmill
of virtuosity. You could not fairly expect this of me either, for
I have never concealed that, since the grapes of virtuosity could
not be made sour for me, I should take no pleasure whatever in
finding them sour in somebody else's mouth.

Frau Land-Goldschmidt stands as incomparable in her glittering
renown as a singer as Handel in his as a composer, with the
difference--which is in Frau Lind's favor to boot--that Handel's
works weary many people and do not always succeed in filling the
coffers, whereas the mere appearance of Frau Lind secures the
utmost rapture of the public, as well as that of the cashier. If,
therefore, we place the affairs of the Musical Festival simply on
the satisfying and commercial debit and credit basis, certainly
no artist, and still less any work of Art, could venture to
compete with, and to offer an equal attraction to, the high and
highly celebrated name of Frau Lind. Without raising the
slightest objection to this, I must express my common-sense
opinion that with this magnet all others would be quite
superfluous, which, however, cannot be quite so indifferent to
me; for, as Louis XIV. represented the State, so Frau Lind would
constitute the Musical Festival proper. This avowal (for which I
deserve, at the very least, stoning with the usual ingredients of
operations of that kind in our civilized age, if I did not happen
to implore grace of the divine Diva herself)--this avowal I
already made last year, on occasion of the Dusseldorf Musical
Festival, to my esteemed friend of many years, Ferdinand Hiller.
What is the use of orchestra and singers, rehearsals and
preparations, pieces and programmes, when the public only want to
hear the Lind, and then hear her again--or, more correctly
speaking, when they must be able to say they leave heard her, in
order to be able to wallow at ease in their enthusiasm for Art?
What I foresaw then was also confirmed to a hair, for it proved,
as everybody knows, that all the sympathy of the public went in
favor of whatever Frau Lind did, so that the so-called Artist-
concert on the third day was the most fully attended, because in
it there were an aria from "Beatrice di Tenda" and Swedish songs
as special attraction--for which marvels the very simplest
pianoforte accompaniment was no doubt sufficient.--Should the
Committee of Aix-la-Chapelle be minded to take to heart the motto
of Hiller's Symphony, "Es muss doch Fruhling werden," ["The
spring will surely come."] in all its artistic endeavour, and, as
you write, to steer clear towards the goal of a "fresher
rekindling of the Musical Festival," we shall be obliged, alas!
to do without the Swedish Nightingale and Europe's Queen of Song.

In short, the point of the matter of this year's Musical Festival
at Aix-la-Chapelle is, as concerns myself, as follows:-

If they decide on having the "Messiah," I must beg to be pardoned
for having to excuse myself from coming. [Liszt finally dropped
his objection to the "Messiah." He had it performed at the
Musical Festival, conducted by him.]

If the Committee accepts the programme I have drawn (Schubert
Symphony, etc., including the last numbers) for the second day,
then it will be a pleasing duty to me to accept the honor of the
invitation, always supposing that the means for a brilliant
performance of the Beethoven Mass and the other works are
forthcoming, as one cannot doubt will be the case in Aix-la-
Chapelle--if my share in the Festival does not in any way give
offence to the neighboring towns, in which case I should of
course gladly and quietly retire, in order not to occasion any
disturbance, or unsatisfactorily prepared discord in the customs
of the musical Rhine-lands. I think there is no need for me to
accentuate the fact that a musical conductor cannot blindly
subscribe to just every programme that is put before him, and I
hope that the honorable Committee will not consider that there is
any assumption in my proposition to place the Aix-la-Chapelle
programme more in accord with my own collective endeavors.

I am writing a few lines of thanks by the next post to President
Herr Van Houten for the distinction shown to me about the
consideration contained in this letter, which I beg that you will
communicate to him verbally.

Awaiting further communications from the Committee, I remain,
dear Herr Capellmeister, with warm acknowledgements and high
esteem,

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt



171. To J. W. von Wasielewski in Dresden

Dear Friend,

Your letter reached me, after some delay, in Zurich, where I had
to keep my bed for several weeks--and today I write to you still
from my bed, and sulking because the geographical change which I
have made has not brought about any improvement in my
pathological condition (which, by the way, is quite without
danger).

How are you, dear Wasielewski?  Have you settled yourself
pleasantly in Dresden? Are you working at music industriously and
methodically?--How far have you got in your biography of R.
Schumann? With regard to this work, the publication of which I am
awaiting with great interest, I am sorry to be unable to follow
the wish you so kindly express. Many letters addressed to me by
Schumann in earlier years are lost, and since my residence in
Weymar (from the year 1848) we certainly wrote to one another
from time to time, but only when theater or concert performances
of his works gave a sort of business occasion for it. Weymar does
not deserve the reproach of having kept itself too much in the
background in this respect. At the Goethe Festival in 1849 I had
the great closing scene to the second part of "Faust" given,
which was, later on, repeated; at the beginning of 1852 the music
to Byron's "Manfred," with a stage performance of the drama such
as he desired, was given several times, and, as far as I know, up
to now no other theater has made this attempt. [Liszt was
actually the first.] The Weymar theater is likewise the only one
which contains in its repertoire Schumann's "Genoveva" (which was
indeed given here for the first time in April 1855). It goes
without saying that, during the years of my work here, most of
his chamber music--Quartets, Trios, Sonatas--as well as his
Symphonies, Overtures, and Songs, have been cherished with
particular preference and love, and have been frequently heard in
various concerts, with the exception of one of the most
important; but the very slight amount of public activity of our
Vocal Union has prevented, as yet, any performance of the "Peri,"
which, however, has already been partly studied, and will ere
long be given at last.

As a contribution to your biographical studies, dear Wasielewski,
I should like to tell you truly with what sincere, heartfelt, and
complete reverence I have followed Schumann's genius during
twenty years and faithfully adhered to it. Although I am sure
that you, and all who know me more intimately, have no doubt
about this, yet at this moment the feeling comes over me--a
feeling which I cannot resist--to tell you more fully about my
relations with R. Schumann, which date from the year 1836, and to
give them you here plainly in extenso. Have a little patience,
therefore, in reading this letter, which I have not time to make
shorter.

After the buzz and hubbub called forth by my article in the Paris
Gazette Musicale on Thalberg (the meaning of which, be it said in
passing, has been quite distorted), which was re-echoed in German
papers and salons, Maurice Schlesinger, the then proprietor of
the Gazette Musicale, took the opportunity of asking me to insert
in his paper a very eulogistic article on anything new that came
out in the world of Art. For months Schlesinger sent me with this
object all sorts of novelties, among which, however, I could not
find anything that seemed to me deserving of praise, until at
last, when I was at the Lake of Como, Schumann's "Impromptu" in C
major (properly variations), the "Etudes symphoniques," and the
"Concert sans orchestre" [Concerto without orchestra] (published
later, in the second edition, under the more suitable title
Sonata in F minor) came into my hands. In playing these pieces
through, I felt at once what musical mettle was in them; and,
without having previously heard anything of Schumann, without
knowing how or where he lived (for I had not at that time been to
Germany, and he had no name in France and Italy), I wrote the
critique which was published in the Gazette Musicale towards the
end of 1837, and which became known to Schumann.

Soon afterwards, when I was giving my first concerts in Vienna
(April to May 1838), he wrote to me and sent me a manuscript
entitled "Gruss an Franz Liszt in Deutschland" ["Greeting to
Franz Liszt in Germany"]. I forget at this moment under what
title it was afterwards published; the opening bars are as
follows:--

[Here, Liszt hand-writes the score for the opening bars. It is
the beginning of the second Novelette Op. 21, but not quite
correctly quoted by Liszt]

At about the same time followed the publishing of the great
"Fantasia" (C major) in three movements, which he dedicated to
me; my dedication to him in return for this glorious and noble
work was only made three years ago in my "Sonata" in B minor.

At the beginning of the winter of 1840 I traveled from Vienna
back to Paris by way of Prague, Dresden, and Leipzig. Schumann
paid me the friendly attention of welcoming me immediately on my
arrival in Dresden, and we then travelled together to Leipzig.
Wieck, afterwards Schumann's father-in-law, had at that time a
lawsuit against him to prevent his marriage with Clara. I had
known Wieck and his daughter from Vienna days, and was friendly
with both. None the less I refused to see Wieck again in Dresden,
as he had made himself so unfriendly to Schumann; and, breaking
off all further intercourse with him, I took Schumann's side
entirely, as seemed to me only right and natural. Wieck without
delay richly requited me for this after my first appearance in
Leipzig, where he aired his bitter feelings against me in several
papers. One of my earlier pupils, by name Hermann Cohen--a native
of Hamburg, who in later years aroused much attention in France,
and who, as a monk, had taken the name of Frere Augustin (Carme
dechausse [Barefooted Carmelite])--was the scapegoat in Leipzig
for Wieck's publicly inflamed scandal, so that Cohen was obliged
to bring an action for damage by libel against Wieck, which
action Hermann won with the assistance of Dr. Friederici,
barrister-at-law.

In Leipzig Schumann and I were together every day and all day
long--and my comprehension of his works became thereby more
familiar and intimate. Since my first acquaintance with his
compositions, I have played many of them in private circles in
Milan, Vienna, etc., but without being able to win over my
hearers to them. They lay, happily, much too far removed from the
insipid taste, which at that time absolutely dominated, for it to
be possible for any one to thrust them into the commonplace
circle of approbation. The public did not care for them, and the
majority of pianists did not understand them. In Leipzig even,
where I played the "Carneval" at my second concert in the
Gewandhaus, I did not succeed in obtaining my usual applause. The
musicians, together with those who were supposed to understand
music, had (with few exceptions) their ears still too tightly
stopped up to be able to comprehend this charming, tasteful
"Carneval," the various numbers of which are harmoniously
combined in such artistic fancy. I do not doubt that, later on,
this work will maintain its natural place in universal
recognition by the side of the "Thirty-three Variations on a
Waltz of Diabelli" by Beethoven (to which, in my opinion, it is
superior even in melodic invention and importance). The frequent
ill-success of my performances of Schumann's compositions, both
in private circles and in public, discouraged me from including
and keeping them in the programmes of my concerts which followed
so rapidly on one another--programmes which, partly from want of
time and partly from carelessness and satiety of the "Glanz-
Periode" ["Splendor period"] of my pianoforte-playing, I seldom,
except in the rarest cases, planned myself, but gave them now
into this one's hands, and now that one, to choose what they
liked. That was a mistake, as I discovered later and deeply
regretted, when I had learned to understand that for the artist
who wishes to be worthy of the name of artist the danger of not
pleasing the public is a far less one than that of allowing
oneself to be decided by its humors

--and to this danger every executive artist is especially
exposed, if he does not take courage resolutely and on principle
to stand earnestly and consistently by his conviction, and to
produce those works which he knows to be the best, whether people
like them or not.

It is of no consequence, then, in how far my faint-heartedness in
regard to Schumann's pianoforte compositions might possibly be
excused by the all-ruling taste of the day, but I did without
thinking of it thereby set a bad example, for which I can hardly
make amends again. The stream of custom and the slavery of the
artist, who is directed to the encouragement and applause of the
multitude for the maintenance and improvement of his existence
and his renown, is such a pull-back, that, even to the better-
minded and more courageous ones, among whom I am proud to reckon
myself, it is intensely difficult to preserve their better ego in
the face of all the covetous, distracted, and--despite their
large number--backward-in-paying We.

There is in Art a pernicious offence, of which most of us are
guilty through carelessness and fickleness; I might call it the
Pilate offence. Classical doing, and classical playing, which
have become the fashion of late years, and which may be regarded
as an improvement, on the whole, in our musical state of things,
hide in many a one this fault, without eradicating it:--I might
say more on this point, but it would lead me too far.

For my part I need not, at least, reproach myself with having
ever denied my sympathy and reverence for Schumann; and a hundred
of the younger companions in Art in all lands could bear witness
that I have always expressly directed them to a thorough study of
his works, and have strengthened and refreshed myself by them.

If these particulars have not wearied you, dear Wasielewski, I
will gladly continue them, and tell you about everything from my
second visit to Leipzig (at the end of 1841) which was brought
about by Schumann, up to my last meeting with him at Dusseldorf
(in 1851). Friendly greetings

From yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 9th, 1857.



172. To General Alexis von Lwoff in St. Petersburg

[1799-1877; in addition to his military position, he was a
celebrated violinist, and conductor of the Imperial Court-Singers
at St. Petersburg.]

Your Excellency and My Honored Friend,

Permit me to think that I am not quite effaced from your
recollection, and to avail myself of the medium of Mdlle. Martha
de Sabinin to recall myself to you more particularly. It being
her wish to find herself in pleasant relations with the chief
representatives of music in St. Petersburg, it was natural that I
should introduce her in the first instance to you, and recommend
her to you first and foremost as the protegee of Her Imperial
Majesty the Grand Duchess Marie Pawlowna, as well as of the
reigning Grand Duchess of Saxe-Weymar (in whose service she has
been for several years as Court Pianist and Professor at the
Institute for Young Ladies of the Nobility),--and, secondly, as a
clever woman and excellent musician and pianist, who, after
having gone through the most conscientious study, is perfectly
fitted to teach others in a most agreeable manner.	She
especially excels in her execution of classical music and
ensemble; and, this side of music being, from what I hear, more
and more cultivated at St. Petersburg, especially through your
care, I am pleased to think that Mdlle. de Sabinin will easily
find an opportunity of coming out advantageously in this line. I
much regret that you have, as yet, neglected Weymar since I have
been settled here. It would have been a pleasure to me to place
at your disposal a musical personnel, which has been justly
spoken of with praise, for the performance of your "Stabat Mater"
and other of your compositions, which we should have great
pleasure in applauding. Let me hope that you will not always be
so rigorous towards us, and pray accept the expressions of high
esteem and respect with which I shall always be, dear and honored
friend,

Your Excellency's very obedient servant,

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 10th, 1857



173. To Johann Von Herbeck in Vienna

[Hofcapellmeister (Court conductor), and an excellent conductor
(1831-1877).--The above letter, as well as a later one addressed
to the same musician, was published in "Johann Herbeck. Ein
Lebensbild von seinem Sohne Ludwig." Vienna, Gutmann, 1885.--Date
in Herbeck's handwriting.]

[Received January 12th, 1857]

Dear Sir,

On my somewhat delayed return to Weymar I find your friendly
letter, for which I send you my

sincere and warmest thanks. I am very much pleased to learn from
you that you have succeeded, thanks to your careful and
intelligent preparation, in making such a good effect with the
"Faust" (Student) Chorus. [It was the first choral composition
which was conducted by Liszt in Vienna, and with the very same
Mannergesangverein which Herbeck conducted.] This light little
piece has been pretty successfully given several times by
Mannergesangvereinen [Vocal societies of male voices] in Cologne,
Berlin, etc., and even in Paris. When I published it fifteen
years ago, I did not think much about making allowance for any
possible laxity in the intonation of the singers; but today, when
my experience has taught me better, I should probably write the
somewhat steep and slippery passage as follows:--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a vocal score musical excerpt at
the point where the singer sings "Die Ko-chin hat ihr Gift
gestellt, da ward zu eng ihr in der Welt, etc."]

Probably this version would also be more effective--with the
alteration in the last verse (in honor of prosody!):--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a vocal score musical excerpt at
the point where the singer sings "ha, sie pfeift auf dem letzten
Loch."]

I shall venture shortly to send you (by Herr Haslinger), my dear
sir, a couple of other Quartets for male voices to look through.
If, after doing so, you think you may risk a public performance
of them, I leave the matter entirely in your hands.

There is not the slightest hurry about the Mass, [For men's
voices. On the occasion of the Mozart Festival in Vienna in 1856,
conducted by Liszt, he had played portions of this Mass to
Herbeck, and the latter felt himself, as he wrote to Liszt,
"electrified by the spirit of this work and its creator," and set
himself "at the same time the artistic duty of a worthy rendering
of this Song of Praise."] and I fear that the preparation of this
work will cost you and your singers some trouble. Before all else
it requires the utmost certainty in intonation, which can only be
attained by practicing the parts singly (especially the middle
parts, second tenor and first bass)--and then, above all,
religious absorption, meditation, expansion, ecstasy, shadow,
light, soaring--in a word, Catholic devotion and inspiration. The
"Credo," as if built on a rock, should sound as steadfast as the
dogma itself; a mystic and ecstatic joy should pervade the
"Sanctus;" the "Agnus Dei" (as well as the "Miserere" in the
"Gloria") should be accentuated, in a tender and deeply elegiac
manner, by the most fervent sympathy with the Passion of Christ;
and the "Dona nobis pacem," expressive of reconciliation and full
of faith, should float away like sweet-smelling incense. The
Church composer is both preacher and priest, and what the word
fails to bring to our powers of perception the tone makes winged
and clear.

You know all this at least as well as I do, and I must apologize
for repeating it to you. If the extent of the chorus allows of
it, it might perhaps be desirable to add a few more wind
instruments (clarinets, bassoon, horns, indeed even a couple of
trombones) to support the voices more. If you think so too,
please send me a line to say so, and I will at once send you a
small score of the wind instruments. [Herbeck himself undertook,
at Liszt's desire (which, as he wrote, filled him with joy and
pride), to write the instrumental accompaniment to the Mass.] You
shall have the vocal parts from Jena immediately. For today
accept once more my best thanks, together with the assurance of
the highest esteem of

Yours ever,

F. Liszt



174. To Professor Franz Gotze in Leipzig

[The celebrated singer in Leipzig (1814-88); was a pupil of
Spohr's, and was first violinist in the Weimar Hofcapelle, then
went on to the stage, and both as a lyric tenor and as a singer
of Lieder was incomparable. He was the first who publicly went in
for Liszt's songs, in which his pupils imitated him.]

Dear Friend,

In consequence of an invitation of the directors, I shall have
the honor of having several of my works performed at the concert
on the 26th February for the Orchestral Pension Fund in Leipzig,
and very much wish that you would do me the kindness to sing two
of my songs ("Kling leise, mein Lied" and "Englein du mit blondem
Haar"), and to rejoice the public with your ardent and
beautifully artistic rendering of these little things.

Fraulein Riese is so good as to bring you the new edition of my
six first songs (amongst which is the "Englein" in A major)--a
couple more numbers will shortly follow.

Grant me my request, dear friend, and rest assured beforehand of
the best thanks, with which I remain,

Yours in most sincere friendship, F. Liszt

Weymar, February 1st, 1857



175. To Dionys Pruckner in Vienna

Weymar, February 11th, 1857

From all sides, dearest Dionysius, I hear the best and most
brilliant accounts of you. Without being surprised at this I am
extremely pleased about it. To make a firm footing in Vienna as a
pianoforte player is no small task, especially under present
circumstances! If one succeeds in this, one can, with the utmost
confidence, make a name throughout Europe. It is very important
for you, dear friend, to appear often in public, so as to make
yourself feel at home with them. In production the public have
far more to care about the artist than he has to care about them,
or indeed to let himself be embarrassed by them. At home, our
whole life through, we have to study and to devise how to mature
our work and to attain as near as possible to our ideal of Art.
But when we enter the concert-room the feeling ought not to leave
us, that, just by our conscientious and persevering striving, we
stand somewhat higher than the public, and that we have to
represent our portion of "Menschheits-Wurde," [Manhood's dignity]
as Schiller says. Let us not err through false modesty, and let
us hold fast to the true, which is much more difficult to
practice and much more rare to find. The artist--in our sense--
should be neither the servant nor the master of the public. He
remains the bearer of the Beautiful in the inexhaustible variety
which is appointed to human thought and perception--and this
inviolable consciousness alone assures his authority.

Through your father I learn that you are thinking of going to
Munich in the course of the spring. I, on my side, had also the
intention of giving you a rendez-vous there. But yesterday I
definitely accepted the conductorship of the Musical Festival of
the Lower-Rhine, which will take place this year in Aix-la-
Chapelle at Whitsuntide, on the 31st May, and could not undertake
a long journey before then, in order not to break in on my work
too much.

At the beginning of September we shall have grand festivities
here in honor of the centenary of Carl August. Rietschel's
Schiller and Goethe group will then be put up, and there will be
a great deal of music on this occasion at the theater, for which
I must prepare. I hope we shall see each other before then.

Bronsart is in Paris. You shall have his Trio very soon. Bulow is
playing in Rostock, Bremen, and Hamburg. The Aix-la-Chapelle
Committee have also invited him to the Musical Festival. Singer
goes next week to Rotterdam, and on the 26th February a couple of
my Symphonic Poems will be given at the Gewandhaus (directed by
myself). I yesterday finished the score of another new one, Die
Hunnenschlacht, [The Battle of the Huns] which I should like to
bring out in Vienna when there is an opportunity.

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt



176. To Joachim Raff

[February 1857]

You may rest assured, dear friend, that it was very much against
the grain to me that I could not accept the kind invitation of
the Wiesbaden Concert Committee, for which I have to thank your
intervention; and your letter, in which you explain to me some
other circumstances, increases my sincere regret. But for this
winter it is, frankly, impossible for me to accept any
invitations of that kind, and I think I have told you before now
that I have had to excuse myself in several cities (Vienna,
Rotterdam, etc.). Even for Leipzig, which is so near me (although
I might appear somewhat far-fetched to many a one there!), it was
difficult to find a day that would suit me. On the 26th of this
month the "Preludes" and "Mazeppa" are to be given in the
Gewandhaus under my direction (for the Orchestral Pension Fund
Concert). Perhaps this performance will serve as a definite
warning for other concert-conducting, which might have been
thought of, to question my "incapability as a composer," so often
demonstrated (see the proof number of the "Illustrirte

Monatsheft" of Westermann, Brunswick, the National Zeitung, and
the "thousand and one" competent judges who have long since been
quite clear on the matter!).

How far are you in your Opera? When will one be able to see and
hear something of it? As far as I have heard, you intend to
perform "Samson" first in Darmstadt. If this does not happen at
too awkward a time for me I shall come.

After having twice renounced the honor of conducting the
approaching Musical Festival of the Lower-Rhine (to be held this
year at Aix-la-Chapelle) a deputation of the Committee arrived
here yesterday. In consideration of their courtesy I shall
therefore go to Aix-la-Chapelle at Whitsuntide, and perhaps you
will let yourself be beguiled into visiting me there. By that
time also the Mass [The Gran Festival Mass] will probably have
already come out, and you must have a copy of it at once. By the
many performances, which have been of great use to me in this
work, many additions, enlargements, and details of performance
have occurred to me, which will enhance the effect of the whole,
and will make some things easier in performance. An entirely new
concluding fugue of the "Gloria," with this motive:--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a vocal score musical excerpt at
the point where the singer sings "Cum sanc-to spi-ri-tu, in
Gloria."]

may not be displeasing to you.

Very shortly I will send you also the three numbers still wanting
(1, 8, and 9) of the Symphonic Poems, so that you may again have
some (for you) light reading as a rest from your work. The "Berg"
Symphony was given, in its present form, a short time ago at
Bronsart's farewell concert. Bronsart played the same evening a
Trio of his own composition in four movements, which I esteem as
a successful and very respectable work.

Once more best thanks for the fresh proof of your friendly
attachment which your letter gives me, and don't let too long a
time elapse without sending good news to

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt



177. To Concertmeister Ferdinand David in Leipzig

[Printed in Eckardt's "F. David and the Mendelssohn Family,"
Leipzig, Dunker & Humblot, 1888.]

Leipzig, February 26th, 1857, 10 o'clock

[Preceding the body of the letter, Liszt illustrates with a vocal
score musical excerpt with the words "Away! Away!" written in
English by Liszt.  It is a quotation from Liszt's Symphonic Poem
"Mazeppa," which he had conducted in the Leipzig Gewandhaus on
the same day as the "Preludes," and with which he had had ill-
success. David, who was present as leader of the orchestra,
"disapproved"--according to Eckardt--of Liszt's composing
tendency, but continued, till his life's end, "filled with
admiration for the incomparable artist and genial man," in the
friendliest relations with Liszt.]

Before I go to bed let me give you my most sincere and heartfelt
thanks, my very dear friend, which I owe you for this evening.
You have proved yourself anew such a thorough gentleman
[Gentleman, put in English by Liszt] and high-standing artist at
this evening's concert.

That is nothing new in you, but it gives me pleasure, as your old
friend, to repeat old things to you, and to remain ever yours
most gratefully,

Franz Liszt



178. To Wladimir Stassoff in St. Petersburg

[A Russian writer, a musical and art critic, at present director
of the Imperial Public Library at St. Petersburg.]

An illness, not in the least dangerous, but very inconvenient,
since it obliges me to keep my bed rather often (as at this
moment), has deprived me of the pleasure of replying sooner to
your very kind letter, firstly to thank you for it, and also to
tell you how delighted I shall be to make acquaintance with Mr.
Scroff's manuscripts, which you kindly introduce to me in so
persuasive a manner. Many people who have the advantage of
knowing Mr. Seroff, among others Mr. de Lenz and Prince Eugene
Wittgenstein, have spoken of him to me with great praise, as an
artist who unites to real talent a most conscientious
intelligence. It will be of great interest to me to estimate the
work to which he has devoted himself with such praiseworthy
perseverance, and thus to avail myself of the opportunity offered
to me of hearing those sublime works of the LAST PERIOD (I
purposely put aside

the inappropriate word MANNER, and even the term STYLE) of
Beethoven--works which, whatever Mr. Oulibicheff and other
learned men may say who succeed more easily in POURING FORTH in
these matters than in being well versed [A play on words--verser
and verse.] in them, will remain the crowning point of
Beethoven's greatness.

With regard to the edition of these scores of Mr. Seroff's for
two pianos, I will willingly do what you wish, though at the same
time confessing to you that my credit with the editors is not
worth much more than my credit with the above-mentioned learned
men, as these latter do their best to keep all sorts of cock-and-
bull stories going, which prevent the editors from running any
risk in mad enterprises they have so peremptorily been pointed
out to be! And, more than this, you are not ignorant that
arrangements for two pianos--the only ones adapted to show the
design and the grouping of ideas of certain works--are but little
in favor with music-sellers and very unsaleable, as the great
mass of pianists is scarcely capable of PLAYING ON the piano, and
cares very little (except sometimes for form's sake and human
respect) for the interest of intelligence and feeling which might
attach to the promenades of their fingers. In spite of all this,
please rest assured, sir, that I shall neglect nothing that can
justify the confidence you place in me, and pray accept the very
sincere regards of

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 17th, 1857

I am awaiting with impatience the parcel you promise me, and beg
you to make it as large as possible, so that I may make a
thorough acquaintance with Mr. Seroff's work. Especially be so
good as not to forget the arrangement of Beethoven's latter
Quartets.



179. To Wilhelm von Lenz in St. Petersburg

For pity's sake, dear friend, don't treat me like Moscheles;
don't think I am dead, although I have given you some little
right to think so by my long silence. But there are so many
"demi"-people, and demi-clever people (who are at least as
dangerous to Art as the demi-monde is to morals, according to
Alexandre Dumas), who say such utter stupidities about me in the
papers and elsewhere, that I really should not like to die yet,
if only not to disturb their beautiful business. You were even
complaining of one single whistling blackbird [Merle; means also
a whistling or hissing fellow.] pastorally perched on your book--
what shall I say then of the croaking of that host of ravens and
of obliques hiboux [Oblique owls; the term is repeated
afterwards, and evidently refers to some joke, or else to some
remark of Lenz's.--Translator's note.] that spreads like an
"epidemic cordon" all the length of the scores of my Symphonic
Poems?--Happily I am not made of such stuff as to let myself be
easily disconcerted by their "concert," and I shall continue
steadfastly on my way to the end, without troubling about
anything but to do what I have to do--which will be done, I can
promise you. The rest of your "Beethoven," of which you speak,
has never reached me, and for six months past I have not had any
news of B., who, I am afraid, finds that he is clashing with some
rather difficult editorial circumstances, but from which I
presume he will have the spirit to free himself satisfactorily. A
propos of Beethoven, here is Oulibicheff, who has just hurled
forth a volume which I might well compare with the dragons and
other sacred monsters in papier-mache, with which the brave
Chinese attempted to frighten the English at the time of the last
war.--The English simply replied by bombs, which was the best
mode of procedure. If I find time in the course of the summer, I
shall answer Oulibicheff very respectfully in a brochure which
may be a pretty big one. For the moment I am still pinned to my
bed by a lot of boils which are flourishing on my legs, and which
I consider as the doors of exodus for the illness which has been
troubling me rather violently since the end of October.

Mr. Stassoff, having written to me about Mr. Seroff, I wrote him
word quite lately that I should have real pleasure in making
acquaintance with the arrangement for two pianos of Beethoven's
later Quartets, etc. As soon as he lets me have them I will
examine them with all the attention that such a work merits, and
will write him my opinion, such as it is, with sincerity. As to
the question of the edition, that is not so easy to solve as you
seem to think. I wrote to Mr. Stassoff that arrangements for two
pianos, which are the only ones that give a suitable idea of
certain works, have very little currency with the public, as it
is very rare to find two instruments with most amateurs. In spite
of this, if, as I am inclined to think, Mr. Seroff's work answers
to the eulogies you pronounce on it, I shall try to find him a
publisher, and ask you only to get Mr. Seroff to let me know what
sum he expects.

Why, dear friend, don't you decide to make a trip to Germany, and
to come and see me at Weymar? I asked you this three years ago,
and I again assure you that such a journey would not be without
use to you. It is in vain for you and Oulibicheff to enumerate
the advantages and improvements of Russia in musical matters;
people who know anything of the matter will beware of taking you
literally. Art at Petersburg can only be an accessory and a
superfluity for a long time to come, in spite of the very real
distinction and, if you will, even the superiority of some
persons who work at it with predilection, and who reside there.
Proofs abound in support of this opinion, and could not be so
soon changed.

Believe me, my dear Lenz, if you wish to get to know the heart of
the musical question, come to Germany and come and see me.

Meanwhile don't trouble yourself any more than I do about either
"merles" or "obliques hiboux"; go on familiarizing yourself with
the smiles and glances of your "chimera," and believe me your
most sincerely affectionate and devoted

F. Liszt

Weymar, March 24th, 1857



180. To Eduard Liszt

Best and excellent Eduard,

At last I send you the pianoforte edition of the Mass, which I
could not get in order sooner, much as I wished to do so, partly
owing to the excess of matters, letters, and business which have
been pressing upon me, and partly also on account of my illness,
which has obliged me to keep my bed for more than three weeks
past. As regards the edition, which can be got up in two styles,
according to whether one wants it to be economical or luxurious,
I send you word of all that is necessary on the accompanying
note-sheet (first page of the score--written by my hand), and beg
you, best friend, to use your influence to get the proofs sent to
me and to get the work published as quickly as possible. [The
Gran Mass.]

Your last letter was again a great pleasure to me, owing to your
loving comprehension of my works. That in composing them I do not
quite work at haphazard and grope about in the dark, as my
opponents in so many quarters reproach me with doing, will be
gradually acknowledged by those among them who may be honest
enough not to wish entirely to obstruct a right insight into the
matter through preconceived views. As I have for years been
conscious of the artistic task that lies before me, neither
consistent perseverance nor quiet reflection shall be wanting for
the fulfillment of it. May God's blessing, without which nothing
can prosper and bear fruit, rest on my work!--

I have read with attention and interest the discussions in the
Vienna papers, to which the performance of the Preludes and the
concert gave rise. As I had previously said to you, the
doctrinaire Hanslick could not be favorable to me; his article is
perfidious, but on the whole seemly. Moreover it would be an easy
matter for me to reduce his arguments to nil, and I think he is
sharp enough to know that. On a better opportunity this could
also be shown to him, without having the appearance of correcting
him. I suppose the initials C. D. in the Vienna paper mean
Dorffl--or Drechsler? No matter by whom the critique is written,
the author convicts himself in it of such intense narrowness that
he will be very welcome to many other people less narrow than
himself. His like has already often existed, but is constantly in
demand. The musician nowadays cannot get out of the way of all
the buzzing. Twenty years ago there were hardly a couple of
musical papers in Europe, and the political papers referred only
in the most rare cases, and then only very briefly, to musical
matters. Now all this is quite different, and with my "Preludes,"
for instance (which, by the way, are only the prelude to my path
of composition), many dozen critics by profession have already
pounced on them, in order to ruin me through and through as a
composer. I by no means say that present conditions, taken as a
whole, are more unfavorable to the musician than the earlier
conditions, for all this talk in a hundred papers brings also
much good with it, which would not otherwise be so easy to
attain;--but simply the thinking and creative artist must not
allow himself to be misled by it, and must go his own gait
quietly and undisturbed, as they say the hippopotamus does, in
spite of all the arrows which rebound from his thick skin. An
original thinker says, "As one emblem and coat of arms I show a
tree violently blown by the storm, which nevertheless shows its
red fruit on all the boughs, with the motto, Dum convellor
mitescunt; or also, Conquassatus sed ferax."

When you have an opportunity I beg you to give my best thanks to
my old friend Lowy for the letter he wrote me directly after the
performance of the "Preludes." I know that he means well towards
me, in his own way, which, unfortunately, cannot be mine,
because, to me, friendship without heart and flame is something
foreign; and I cannot understand, for instance, why at the
concert in question he did not take his customary place, but kept
back in a corner, as he tells me. Pray when have I given him any
occasion to be ashamed of me? Do I not then stand up in the whole
world of Art as an honest fellow, who, faithful to his
conviction, despising all base means and hypocritical stratagems,
strives valiantly and honorably after a high aim? Given that I,
deceived by my many-sided experiences (which really cannot be
estimated as very slight, since I have lived and worked through
the periods--so important for music--of Beethoven, Schubert,
Mendelssohn, as well as Rossini and Meyerbeer), led astray by my
seven years' unceasing labour, have hit upon the wrong road
altogether, would it be the place of my intimate friend, in the
face of the opposition which is set up against me because I bring
something new, to blush, hide himself in a corner, and deny me?
You did otherwise and better in this, dearest Eduard, and your
conduct with Castelli was, as ever, perfectly right. My few
friends may take a good example from you, for they assuredly need
not let themselves be frightened by the concert which the bullies
and boobies raise against my things. I have, as usual, thought
over your musical remarks and reflections. The fourth movement of
the Concerto, [No. I, in E flat major.] from the Allegro
marziale,

[a score appears here]

corresponds with the second movement, Adagio:--

[a score appears here]

It is only an urgent recapitulation of the earlier subject-matter
with quickened, livelier rhythm, and contains no new motive, as
will be clear to you by a glance through the score. This kind of
binding together and rounding off a whole piece at its close is
somewhat my own, but it is quite maintained and justified from
the standpoint of musical form.

The trombones and basses

[a score appears here]

take up the second part of the motive of the Adagio (B major):--

[a score appears here]The pianoforte figure which follows

[a score appears here]

is no other than the reproduction of the motive which was given
in the Adagio by flute and clarinet,

[a score appears here]

just as the concluding passage is a Variante [various reading]
and working up in the major of the motive of the Scherzo,

[a score appears here]

until finally the first motive

[a score appears here]

on the dominant pedal B flat, with a shake accompaniment,

[a score appears here]

comes in and concludes the whole.

The Scherzo in E flat minor, from the point where the triangle
begins, I employed for the effect of contrast.

[a score appears here] As regards the triangle I do not deny that
it may give offence, especially if struck too strong and not
precisely. A preconceived disinclination and objection to
instruments of percussion prevails, somewhat justified by the
frequent misuse of them. And few conductors are circumspect
enough to bring out the rhythmic element in them, without the raw
addition of a coarse noisiness, in works in which they are
deliberately employed according to the intention of the composer.
The dynamic and rhythmic spicing and enhancement, which are
effected by the instruments of percussion, would in more cases be
much more effectually produced by the careful trying and
proportioning of insertions and additions of that kind. But
musicians who wish to appear serious and solid prefer to treat
the instruments of percussion en canaille, which must not make
their appearance in the seemly company of the Symphony. They also
bitterly deplore, inwardly, that Beethoven allowed himself to be
seduced into using the big drum and triangle in the Finale of the
Ninth Symphony. Of Berlioz, Wagner, and my humble self, it is no
wonder that "like draws to like," and, as we are treated as
impotent canaille amongst musicians, it is quite natural that we
should be on good terms with the canaille among the instruments.
Certainly here, as in all else, it is the right thing to seize
upon and hold fast [the] mass of harmony. In face of the most
wise proscription of the learned critics I shall, however,
continue to employ instruments of percussion, and think I shall
yet win for them some effects little known.

I hear from Paris that at all the street corners there they are
selling a little pamphlet for a sou entitled "Le seul moyen de ne
pas mourir le 13 Juin a 1'apparition de la Comete." ["The only
means how not to die on the 13th of June at the appearance of the
comet."] The only means is to drown oneself on the 12th of June.
Much of the good advice which is given to me by the critics is
very like this seul moyen. Yet we will not drown ourselves--not
even in the lukewarm waters of criticism--and will also for the
future stand firm on our own legs with a good conscience.

I had still much more to say to you, but the letter has become so
long that I should not like to take up any more of your time. It
is to be hoped that we shall see each other in the course of this
summer, when we shall be able again to talk over everything to
our hearts' content. Meanwhile I thank you again warmly for your
friendship, and remain yours from my heart.

F. Liszt

What you tell me of your idea for Daniel [Liszt's son] is very
agreeable and soothing. I must beg the Princess to correspond
with you in reference to the matter. My decision to send D. to
Vienna, in order to finish his law there, and to entrust him to
your protection, is pretty much unchanged.

Weymar, March 26th, 1857

In the next number of Brendel's paper appears a long letter from
R. Wagner on my individuality as a composer, which will be of
interest to you.



181. To Georg Schariezer, Vice-President of the Church Musical
Society at the St. Martin's Coronation Church in Pressburg

[From a copy of Herr Stadthauptmann Johann Batka in Pressburg.--
The Church Musical Society, which has been in existence since
1833, and which undertakes the performance of classical
instrumental Masses during the service every Sunday and saint's
day, performed Beethoven's Grand Mass as early as 1835, and many
times since, and has given Liszt's Gran Mass every year since
1872.]

Dear Sir,

The friendly intention of the highly renowned Pressburg
Kirchenmusikverein [Church Musical Society] to give a performance
of my "Missa Solemnis" is an uncommon pleasure to me, and I send
Your Honor my special thanks for the kind letter with which you
have honored me in the name of the Kirchenmusikverein. Much as I
should like to meet your wishes without any ceremony, and to send
you the score and parts at once, yet I am constrained to beg for
a long delay, for the reason that the score, together with the
pianoforte arrangement, is obliged to remain for some months
longer in the Royal State Printing House in Vienna, and I cannot
get the parts copied out afresh until the publication of the work
next September. The copies which were used at Gran and Prague
have been lost, and several essential alterations which I have
finally made in the score necessitate the making of an entirely
new copy.

I hope, however, that you, dear sir, as well as the K.-M.-V, will
continue your kind intention towards me, whereby I may have the
prospect of my Mass being performed by you later on. If I am not
quite mistaken, the Church element, as well as the musical style
of this work, will be better understood and more spiritually felt
after frequent performances than can be the case at first in the
face of the prevailing prejudice against my later compositions,
and the systematic opposition of routine and custom which I have
to meet with on so many sides. Thus much I may in all
conscientiousness affirm, that I composed the work, from the
first bar to the last, with the deepest ardor as a Catholic and
the utmost care as a musician, and hence I can leave it with
perfect comfort to time to form a corresponding verdict upon it.

As soon as the score comes out I shall have the pleasure of
sending Your Honor a copy; and should your present design perhaps
come to pass in the spring, I shall be delighted to be present at
the performance, and to conduct the final rehearsals myself.

Accept, dear sir, my best thanks, together with the expression of
my high esteem.

Yours most truly,

Franz Liszt

Weymar, April 25th, 1857



182. To Eduard Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

I have been thinking over the matter of supporting the voices by
some wind instruments and brass in my Mass for men's voices,
without being able to make up my mind to write out this
accompaniment. I ought properly to hear the Vienna chorus in
order to hit the right proportion, which is very various,
according to the size of the church, and also the class of
instruments, and the less or greater ability of the musicians. It
would be very agreeable to me if Herbeck, who appears to take an
interest in my work, would take the decision upon himself
according to what he thinks best, and would either keep in the
printed organ accompaniment, or write a small additional score as
support to the voices. In the latter case I think that horns,
clarinets, oboes, and bassoons cannot be dispensed with, and that
probably trombones would also make a good effect in the Kyrie and
Credo.

Remember me most kindly to Herbeck, and tell him my idea as well
as my request. In the studying of the Mass he will best ascertain
which passages most require a supplement-accompaniment.

Owing to my long-continued illness, which obliges me for the most
part to keep my bed, I have not yet been able to hear his
Quartet, which he was so good as to send me; but I shall shortly
give it over to our excellent Quartet Society (Singer, Cossmann,
Stor, Walbruhl) for a performance.

By today's post I send you an alteration in the Agnus Dei of my
Gran Mass, which I beg you to hand to the compositor. The voice
parts remain as before, but in the pauses I make the first
subject come in again in the basses, which makes the movement
more completely one whole. The compositor must work by this proof
for the whole Agnus Dei, and only revert to the general score
where the "Dona nobis pacem" (Allegro moderato) comes in.

Wagner's letter has been published in a separate form, and you
will receive several copies of it, as I believe you take interest
in it, and will make a good use of it.

The Princess has been a prisoner to her bed for more than three
weeks, and is suffering from acute rheumatism. Princess Marie has
also been poorly, so that the whole house has been very dismal.
The last few days I have pulled myself together, and have had my
choruses to Herder's "Prometheus" performed, which have
unexpectedly made a very good impression, and were received with
unusual sympathy. In the course of the summer I shall have the
whole work printed. The eight choruses, together with the
[spoken] text, which has been skillfully compiled after Herder
and Aeschylus [By Richard Pohl], and the preliminary Symphonic
Poem (No. 5 of those published by Hartel), take about an hour and
a half in performance. If I am not mistaken, the work will, later
on, approve itself in larger concerts.

About the 15th May I shall be going to Aix-la-Chapelle, to
conduct the Musical Festival there at Whitsuntide. That will be
another good opportunity for many papers to abuse me, and to let
off their bile!--If the programme which I shall put forward is
realized at the September Festival you must come here and hear it
with me.

My mother writes from Paris that Blandine has been living with
the Countess d'A. since the 20th of this month. Cosima's marriage
with H. von Bulow will probably take place before September.
About Daniel the Princess will write to you fully when she is
better.

God be with you and yours. Yours from my heart,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 27th, 1857



183. To Frau von Kaulbach

[The letter, together with the following one, written by Kaulbach
to Liszt in the fifties, was published in the Tagliche Rundschau
[Daily Review], and afterwards in the Neue Berline Musikzeitung
[Berlin New Musical Paper] of March 19th, 1891. It is well known
that Liszt derived his inspiration to write the Hunnenschlachl
[Battle of the Huns] from Kaulbach's celebrated picture on the
staircase of the New Museum in Berlin. He intended to work up the
six pictures of Kaulbach's which are there, in a similar
symphonic manner, probably for theatrical performance in Weimar.
Dingelstedt appears also to have planned an after-poem in verses.
Kaulbach's letter to his friend is as follows: "Your original and
spirited idea--the musical and poetic form of the historical
pictures in the Berlin Museum--has taken hold of me completely. I
much wish to hear yours and Dingelstedt's ideas of this
performance. The representation of these powerful subjects in
poetical, musical, and artistic form must constitute a harmonious
work, rounded off into one complete whole. It will resound and
shine through all lands!!--I shall therefore hasten to Weimar, as
soon as my work here will let me free.--With the warmest regards
to the Princess, that truly inspired friend of Art, and to her
charming daughter, from myself and my wife, I remain, in
unchangeable respect and friendship, Your faithful, W.
Kaulbach."]

Dear Madam,

I have been encouraged to send you what indeed truly belongs to
you, but what, alas! I must send in so shabby a dress that I must
beg from you all the indulgence that you have so often kindly
shown me. At the same time with these lines you will receive the
manuscript of the two-pianoforte arrangement of my Symphonic Poem
"Die Hunnenschlacht" (written for a large orchestra and completed
by the end of last February), and I beg you, dear madam, to do me
the favor to accept this work as a token of my great reverence
and most devoted friendship towards the Master of masters.
Perhaps there may be an opportunity later on, in Munich or
Weymar, in which I can have the work performed before you with
full orchestra, and can give a voice to the meteoric and solar
light which I have borrowed from the painting, and which at the
Finale I have formed into one whole by the gradual working up of
the Catholic chorale "Crux fidelis," and the meteoric sparks
blended therewith. As I already intimated to Kaulbach in Munich,
I was led by the musical demands of the material to give
proportionately more place to the solar light of Christianity,
personified in the Catholic chorale "Crux fidelis," than appears
to be the case in the glorious painting, in order thereby to win
and pregnantly represent the conclusion of the Victory of the
Cross, with which I, both as a Catholic and as a man, could not
dispense.

Kindly excuse this somewhat obscure commentary on the two
opposing streams of light in which the Huns and the Cross are
moving; the performance will make the matter bright and clear--
and if Kaulbach finds something to amuse him in this somewhat
venturesome mirroring of his fancy I shall be royally delighted.

Through Dingelstedt, whom our Grand Duke is taking away from
Munich, you have heard the latest news from Weymar, and I have,
alas! only bad news to give you of the Princess W. For many weeks
she has been confined to bed with acute rheumatism, and it is
hardly likely that she will be restored to health before my
departure for Aix-la-Chapelle towards the middle of May. Allow
me, my dear lady, to beg you to give Kaulbach my warmest and most
hearty thanks for the wonderful sketch of Orpheus with which he
has honored and delighted me; and once more begging you to pardon
me for the dreadful scrawl of my manuscript, I remain yours with
all respect and devoted friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, May 1st, 1857



184. To Fedor von Milde, Kammersanger

[A singer in the service of a prince] in Weimar [An excellent
Wagner singer. The first Telramund in Lohengrin.]

Dear Friend,

I cannot refuse myself the pleasure of letting you know of the
really extraordinary success, not made up, but thoroughly
effectual and brilliant, of your wife. [Rosa, nee Agthe, trained
by Franz Gotze.] Cologne, Dusseldorf, Bonn, Elberfeld, and the
entire neighborhood agree with Aix-la-Chapelle that your wife
made the festivity of the Musical Festival; and although success
cannot as a rule be considered as a criterion of artistic worth,
yet if it be attested so truly and de bon aloi as in this case,
and follow that artistic worth, it has something refreshing and
strengthening in which we, in trio, can fully rejoice.

A speedy meeting to us, and friendly greetings and thanks from

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Aix-La-Chappelle, Wednesday, June 3rd, 1857



185. To Johann von Herbeck

Weymar, June 12th, 1857

Dear Sir and Friend,

On my return from the Aix-la-Chapelle Musical Festival--which may
be considered successful on the whole, from the very fact that
opponents do not conceal their dissatisfaction--I find here your
kind letter, for which I send you my warmest thanks. My excellent
cousin and friend, Dr. Eduard Liszt, had already informed me of
your kind willingness to undertake the instrumentation of my
Vocal Mass: I am entirely in accord with the various sketches you
so kindly lay before me in your letter, and only beg you, dear
sir, to complete this work according to your own best judgment,
without any small considerations. I certainly should not wish the
organ to be absent from it, but it is a perfectly correct idea to
give those passages in the Kyrie, Suscipe deprecationem,
Crucifixus, and others besides,

[A score appears here]

to the wind exclusively. When I expressed to my cousin my wish to
place the instrumentation of the Mass in your hands, it was
because I was convinced beforehand of the excellence of your
work. The examples which you have given me in your letter show me
that I was not wrong, and I shall rejoice most sincerely when the
moment arrives for us to go through the whole score together.
Eduard intends to visit me here towards the end of August, and if
it is possible for you to come to Weymar at the same time with
him, and to stay a few days in my house, it will be very
agreeable to me.

On the 3rd, 4th, and 5th September the Jubilee festivities of the
Grand Duke Carl August will take place here, on which occasion I
propose to perform several of my later orchestral compositions,
and also the chorus "An die Kiinstler." ["To Artists."] Eduard
will give you a more detailed programme of the Festival later on.
Should you, however, be prevented from being present at it, it
needs no special assurance to you that your visit will be very
welcome to me any day, and I will do my best that you shall not
suffer from ennui in Weymar. [Herbeck accepted the invitation.]

May I also beg you to send me, when you have an opportunity, and
if possible very soon, the parts of your Quartet, [D minor,
unpublished] which pleases me so much, and which, both in its
mood and in its writing of the different parts, is so eminently
noble and finely sustained. In case you have not been able to
arrange for the copying of the parts, it will be a pleasure to me
to get them copied here. Our Weymar quartet, Messrs. Singer,
Stor, Walbruhl, and Cossmann, is competent for this work, and you
will, I trust, be satisfied with the performance. Unfortunately
Cossmann's illness has prevented our usual quartet-productions
for some months past, and Cossmann was also unable to take part
in the Aix-la-Chapelle Musical Festival. But yesterday he told me
that in a few days he should be able to take up his bow again,
and therefore I want them to set to work on your Quartet at once.

To our speedy meeting then, and once more best thanks from yours
in all friendship,

F. Liszt



186. To Countess Rosalie Sauerma, nee Spohr

Your letter gave me great pleasure, dear Countess and admirable
artist, and, though still obliged to keep my bed (which I have
been able to leave so little during the whole winter), I hasten
to reassure you entirely about my state of health. As a fact, I
have never done my obstinate illness the honor of considering it
serious, and now less than ever, for I hope to have entirely got
over it by the end of the week. So do not let us talk about it
any more, and let me tell you at once how sincerely I rejoice in
your projects of being, so to say, in the neighborhood of
Dresden, for it seems to me that, among the towns of Germany, it
is the one in which you will find most charm. I shall certainly
come and pay you my visit there in the course of the winter, and
I hope also that you will not altogether forget your friends of
Weymar.

When you come back here, you will find very little change, but
simply three more Weymarers--Goethe, Schiller, and Wieland--whose
statues will be inaugurated next September, on the occasion of
the celebration of the Jubilee fetes of the Grand Duke Carl
August. They are also planning music for the occasion; and I
predict to you beforehand that you will be able to read all sorts
of unflattering things on this subject, as the music in question
will be in great part my composition. However that may be, I
shall try to have always something better to do than to trouble
myself with what is said or written about me.

How delighted I shall be to hear you again, and to rock myself as
in a hammock to the sound of your arpeggi. You have not, I am
sure, broken off your good habits of work, and your talent is
certain to be more magnificent than ever. Quite lately Madame
Pohl, who played Parish Alvars' Oberon Fantaisie charmingly,
recalled most vividly the remembrance of the delightful hours at
Eilsen and Weymar, which I hope soon to resume at Dresden...Be so
kind as to present my best compliments to your husband and all
your dear ones, and pray accept, dear Countess, the expression of
most affectionate homage from yours very sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weymar, June 22nd, 1857

The Princess W. has been very seriously ill for more than two
months; she is only just convalescent, and bids me give her best
remembrances to you.



187. To Ludmilla Schestakoff, nee Glinka, in St. Petersburg

[sister of the celebrated Russian composer Glinka]

Madame,

I wish I were able to tell you how much I have been touched by
the letter you have done me the honor to address to me. Thank you
for having thought of me as one of the most sincere and zealous
admirers of the fine genius of your brother, so worthy of a noble
glory for the very reason that it was above vulgar successes. And
again thank you for the grace which prompts you to wish to
inscribe my name on one of his orchestral works, which are
certain to be valued and to obtain a sympathetic preference from
people of taste.

I accept with a real gratitude the dedication with which you
honor me, and it will be at once my pleasure and duty to do my
best towards the propagation of Glinka's works, for which I have
always professed the most open and admiring sympathy. Of this I
beg you, Madame, to receive anew my assurance, and to accept the
most respectful homage of

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, October 7th, 1857

I am writing by the same post to Mr. Engelhardt in Berlin to
thank him for his letter, and to tell him that I feel quite
flattered at seeing my name attached to a score of Glinka's.



188. To Carl Haslinger

[autograph without address in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet
in Valentigney--The above was presumably the addressee.]

Dear Friend,

The writing of notes [music] draws me more and more away from the
writing of letters, and my friends have already much to pardon me
in this respect. With the best will in the world to fulfill my
obligations, it is nevertheless impossible for me, owing to the
countless claims that are made on me, to find time to do so. So
do not scold me, dear friend, for having left your last letter
unanswered. I had given myself a great deal to do with some
manuscripts; the final proofs of the Faust and Dante Symphonies,
in particular, which will now soon be engraved, had occupied me
much longer than I expected. The two works are now as well
finished as I am in a position to make them, and will, I hope,
hold their POSITION.

I congratulate you most warmly on the performance of your opera.
You may safely expect various disagreeables in connection
therewith, which are inseparable from musical work. The great
thing is to remain cheerful, and to do something worth doing. The
cuckoo take the rest!--

Let me have a talk with you about the Zellner matter in Vienna,
if, as seems likely, I have to go there at the end of May for the
performance of my Mass. Meanwhile thank you very much for the
pains you have taken over the proof-sheets of this long-
protracted work, and I should be glad if the whole were ready to
come out by the time I reach Vienna.

Tausig, who is to come out in Berlin at the beginning of January,
will probably come with me. There is again a real "bravo,"
[Literally, iron-eater.] as Hummel said of me when he heard me in
Paris in the twenties.

Will you be so kind as to give the enclosed letters to
Winterberger and Rubinstein? How is our friend Winterberger
getting on in the not very suitable atmosphere of Vienna? Let me
know something about him soon. Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 5th, 1857.



189. To Hofcapellmeister Stein In Sondershausen.

[Autograph in the possession of M. Alfred Bovet at Valentigney.--
The addressee, a first-rate conductor (born 1818), lived from
1853 in Sondershausen; died 1864.]

Let me give you once more my hearty thanks, dear friend, for the
delightful day you gave me at Sondershausen, which continues so
brightly and pleasantly in my recollection. The rare consummation
with which your orchestra solved one of the most difficult tasks,
and brought "what one hears on the mountains" [Liszt's Mountain
Symphony] to the impressive understanding of the ears in the
valley (if not indeed under the water and worse still),
strengthens me in my higher endeavors,--and you, dear friend,
will have to bear some of the responsibility if I go on writing
more such "confused," "formless," and, for the every-day critic,
quite "fathomless" things.

Singer [A letter from this first-rate violinist is on the same
sheet with Liszt's.] needs no further recommendation from me, as
he is already known to you as an eminent virtuoso. Especially at
Court concerts his own refined and brilliant qualities are placed
in their most favorable light.

If it is possible for you to take an opportunity of bringing out
my dear and extraordinary budding genius Carl Tausig ["The last
of the virtuosi;" as Weitzmann called him; born at Warsaw 1841;
died at Leipzig 1871.] at the Court, I promise you that he will
do honor to your recommendation.

In all esteem and devotion, yours ever,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 6th, 1857



190. To Alexander Ritter in Stettin.

Dear friend,

Your tidings sound as incredible as they are pleasant. And I must
admit, what has long been proved to me, that you are a valiant
and excellent friend, and prove your friendship splendidly by the
success of your venturesome undertaking. Specially do I give you
my best thanks for the pregnant and poetic form which you gave to
the Tasso programme. Later on, as you have broken the ice in so
happy a fashion, we can push on with

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt of the
beginning of the Symphonic Poem "Festklange."

and other such corrupt things in Stettin!--

I was not able to attend to your letter about the matter of the
parts of the Flying Dutchman until after my return to Weymar.
Herr von Dingelstedt spoke to me about the idea in regard to the
fee for Wagner (from the Stettin Directors), and the reply to you
from the Secretary Jacobi will be to that effect. If, as I
presume, you can so arrange that this idea is carried out, and
that Wagner receives his fee, the parts shall be sent you from
here.

I visited your dear sisters many times in Dresden, and had some
delightful chats with them.

In Carl's Sonatas [Carl Ritter], which I have read with much
interest, there is a decidedly musical germ; only I hope that by
degrees more juicy fruit may spring from it.

Cornelius is bringing his completed opera back to Weymar at the
end of this month. [Doubtless "Der Barbier von Baghdad."] Lassen,
who is getting on splendidly with his ("Frauenlob "), has
composed several exquisite songs between whiles. "Landgraf
Ludwig's Brautfahrt" ["Landgrave Ludwig's Bridal Journey," an
unpublished opera of Lassen's.] will again be given next Sunday,
and from New Year (1858) Lassen will act as Grand Ducal Music
Conductor of Weymar. Gotze is retiring from work, and your friend
Stor undertakes his post as First Music Conductor. Damrosch, your
successor, has composed a quite remarkable Violin Concerto with a
Polonaise Finale, with which you will be pleased.

Recall me most kindly to your wife's remembrance, as one who
remains ever

Yours in all affection and devotion,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 7th, 1857



191. To Capellmeister Max Seifriz At Lowenberg

[Autograph in the possession of Herr Alexander Meyer Cohn in
Berlin. The addressee (1827-85) was, after 1854, conductor to
Prince Hohenzollern-Hechingen at Lowenberg in Silesia, until the
latter's death in 1869, when he became Court Conductor in
Stuttgart.]

Dear Herr Capellmeister,

With my very best thanks for your friendly letter I send you,
according to your wish, the score of the "Prometheus" choruses.
For the present I am not requiring it, and send it you with great
pleasure, so that you may be able to read it through at your
ease. I fear, alas! that the difficulty of some of the intonation
in the first choruses may make the studying of it a rather
detailed matter to you. Such irksomeness unfortunately attaches
to all my works, not excepting the Ave Maria, which I might
nevertheless venture to recommend to you next, if you have any
intention of performing a vocal work of my composition. It was
published by Breitkopf & Hartel (score and parts), and has been
pretty favorably received at various performances of it.

I wrote yesterday to His Royal Highness, and expressed my special
thanks for the kind attention in inviting Herr von Bulow during
my stay at L. I rejoice immensely at the thought of these days,
in which musical matter will by no means be wanting to us.
Meanwhile remember me most kindly to your orchestra, which
preserves so well its high renown, and accept, my dear sir, the
assurance of high esteem with which I remain

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weymar, December 24th, 1857

In the early part of April you shall hear when I am coming to
Lowenberg.



192. To Alexander Seroff

My dear Sir,

By what I said in the Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik, [1858, No. 1,
in the article "Oulibicheff and Seroff."] on New Year's Day, of
your remarkable articles on Oulibicheff, you will have seen to
what point I take your ideas into consideration, and how closely
we meet in our musical convictions. To the sincere eulogies which
I have had much pleasure in addressing to you in public, it
remains to me to add those which I owe you for the conscientious
work that you have had the kindness to communicate to me by
sending me the pianoforte score of Beethoven's Quartet in C sharp
minor. Without the least exaggeration, I don't think anything of
its kind could have been better done, as much on account of the
intelligent division of the parts between the two pianos, as by
the skill with which you have appropriated to the piano the style
of this Quartet, without forcing or disfiguring anything.

In this latter task there are without doubt some impossibilities
which one cannot fail to recognize, and, whatever effort we may
make, we shall never succeed in rendering on our instrument
either the intensity or the delicacy of the violin bow. In the
same manner the coloring, and the fine nuances of the violin,
viola, and violoncello will always escape us--but in spite of
this it is due to you in justice to recognize that your work
identifies itself as far as possible with the sentiment and
thought of the original, and that you have frequently succeeded
in supplementing the poverty and defects inherent in such an
arrangement.

About six weeks ago I sent your manuscript to Mr. Schott, the
editor, at Mainz, recommending him to publish your arrangement.
Up to the present time I have received no reply, which, however,
seems to me a good sign. As soon as ever I hear his determination
I will let you know. Possibly in the course of the summer you
will find a few weeks' leisure to make a journey into these parts
and to bring us the complete collection of your arrangements of
Beethoven's latter instrumental works. In that case let me beg of
you, my dear sir, not to forget me, and to rest assured
beforehand of the lively interest that I shall take in your work,
which it would be doubly interesting to me to go through with
you. Bearing in mind the original, we should probably find,
between us, some details to modify previous to a definite
publication.

For today allow me to thank you once more, my dear sir, very
cordially for having associated me in thought with your beautiful
work, and pray accept the expression of very sincere and
affectionate regard of

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 8th, 1858



193. To Basil von Engelhardt

[A very intelligent musical amateur, a friend of Glinka's, and
publisher of several of his works]

Sir,

Whilst giving you my very sincere thanks for so kindly sending me
the Glinka scores published by your friends, I am much pleased to
be able at the same time to inform you that the Capriccio on the
melody of the "Jota Aragonese" has just been performed (on New
Year's Day) at a grand Court concert with most complete success.
Even at the rehearsal the intelligent musicians whom I am proud
to count among the members of our orchestra had been both struck
and delighted by the lively and piquant originality of this
charming piece, so delicately cut and proportioned, and finished
with such taste and art! What delicious episodes, cleverly joined
to the principal subject (Letters A and B)! What fine nuances and
coloring divided among the different timbres of the orchestration
(Letters C to D)! What animation in the rhythmic movement from
one end to the other! How the happiest surprises spring
constantly out of the logical developments! and how everything is
in its right place, keeping the mind constantly on the watch,
caressing and tickling the ear by turns, without a single moment
of heaviness or fatigue! This is what we all felt at this
rehearsal; and the day after the performance we promised
ourselves to hear it again speedily, and to make acquaintance, as
speedily as possible, with Glinka's other works.

Will you, my dear musician, be so kind as to renew the expression
of my gratitude to Madame Schestakoff for the honor she has done
me in dedicating this work to me? And when you have time, do come
and hear it with your own ears at Weymar. I can assure you that
you will not have occasion to regret the troubles of a little
journey; and were it only the rhythm

[FIGURE: Music example in 2 staves, the upper 'wind and brass',
the lower 'string quartet']

that would be enough to make ample amends for them. I beg you,
sir, to accept the assurance of my sincere regard.

F. Liszt

Weymar, January 8th, 1858

P.S.--I shall be much obliged if you will send me two
supplementary parts of the quartet (first and second violin,
viola, and bass) of each of Glinka's works.



194. To Felix Draseke

[Now professor at the Dresden Conservatorium, a well-known
composer of importance, also a writer on music (born 1835)]

Your articles [Published in the paper started by Brendel, "Hints"
(or "Suggestions")], which were so universally suggestive, my
dear and valiant friend, have given great pleasure to us on the
Altenburg. I hope to have an opportunity of showing you my
gratitude in a lasting and abiding fashion. Meanwhile be
satisfied with a good conscience in having strengthened and
sustained an honest man in his better purpose.

I have received through Brendel an invitation to Prague, which I
shall probably accept for the beginning of March. I am delighted
to think of seeing you again, dear friend, in passing through
Dresden, and perhaps you might make it possible to accompany me
to Prague. The "Dante Symphony" and the "Ideale" are again to be
given there, and, if I am not mistaken, you will rather like the
former work in its present shape. The Dresden performance was a
necessity to me, in order to realize its effect. As long as one
has only to do with lifeless paper one can easily make a slip of
the pen. Music requires tone and resonance!--I cannot at first
lay claim to effectual results, because I have to meet too much
opposition. The chief thing is that my present works should prove
themselves to be taking a firm footing in musical matters, and
should contribute something towards doing away with what is
corrupt...

What is Reubke [A pupil of Liszt's.] doing, and how does he like
Dresden?--Take him most friendly greetings from me. By-the-by ask
him also to give me tidings as soon as possible (through Herr
Menert) about the copying	of the orchestral parts of the
Rubinstein Oratorio "Paradise Lost," and to get Herr Menert to
send me these parts to Weymar by the end of this month at latest.
It is to be hoped that Reubke won't have left the score in his
box like Pohl! But if by chance he has committed such a
transgression I beg that he will make amends as speedily as
possible.

Fischer (the organist) wrote to me lately, to ask me for a
testimonial to his musical ability, as he wants to have one to
show in Chemnitz. Please to make my friendly excuses to him for
not fulfilling his wish--possibly, in view of the enmity which I
have to bear on all sides, such a document would do him more harm
than good; apart from the fact that I very unwillingly set about
drawing up such testimonials. He must not, however, misconstrue
this disinclination on my part, and may rest assured of my
readiness to be of use to him.--

I would still draw your attention to Bronsart's concert in
Leipzig. It will take place in a few days, and if you can get
free I invite you to it. Bronsart is a very dear friend of mine;
I value him as a character and as a musician. If you go to
Leipzig go and see him; he will please you, and will receive you
in the most friendly manner. He is a friend of Bulow's. Both
names have the same initials, and for a long time Bronsart signed
himself "Hans II." in his letters to me.--

In the virtuoso line we have lately been hearing Sivori and
Bazzini here several times. The latter is now in Dresden; I told
him that Reubke would perhaps call on him. Get Reubke to do so,
and assure him that he will be most friendlily received. A well-
known piece of Bazzini's, "La Ronde des Lutins," was, by a
printer's error, called "Ronde des Cretins!" ["Rondo of Idiots."]
What an immeasurably large public for such a "Rondo"! If only
half of them would become subscribers to the Anregungen (Hints)!

Once more a thousand thanks, dear friend, for your courageous
battling; I on my side will endeavour not to let us have to
acquiesce with too overpowering a modesty! [An untranslatable pun
on the  words "beseheiden" and "Bescheidenheit."

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

[Weimar,] Sunday, January 10th, 1858



195. To Louis Koehler

My very dear friend,

A few days ago I received a letter from Koenigsberg, signed by a
gentleman unknown to me. By	chance this letter has got lost,
and I cannot myself remember the exact name. But, as your name
was mentioned in it, I beg you to be so good as to let Herr * * *
know that I do not possess the arrangement of the second movement
of my Faust Symphony made by Zellner in Vienna for pianoforte,
violin, harp, and harmonium, and that consequently I cannot hand
it over to him. Besides this, I do consider such a fragmentary
performance of this work of mine, which stands in such bad credit
with the critics, as rather unsuitable, and would not advise any
concert-giver, and still less any concert-directors, to smuggle
into a programme my name so challenged as a composer. How long
this curious comedy of criticism will last I am unable to
determine; anyhow I am resolved not to trouble my head about the
cry of murder which is raised against me, and to go on my way in
a consistent and undeterred fashion. Whether I shall be
answerable for the scandal, or whether my opponents will entangle
themselves in the scandal, will appear later. Meanwhi